      "identifier" : [
         "8_06912_193"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "j4à 1.0.",
         "THE 1914 WAR-ILLUSTRATED",
         "THE, 194WAR --ILLUSTRA Britain's War, Director The prompt appoint- wpent of Kitchener of SKhartoum Wo. the imhpor- tant post of Minister of rWar bas been received with the utmost satis- laction throughout the JC~mpire. Thc tail Irishl youtii of twenty, who received hs baptism of Brc with the disaster- ridden Frenchi army ini thc Franco-Prussian war, ~bas become the man wiiom thc arrogant Pruasian fears moat of aIl bis enemies. Hs -whole career bas been a course of preparation. Emerging from Wool- wich as a second lieu-- tenant in O.e Royal Engineers-the calculat- Ing, scientifle arm of Steservice-H e r b e r te Horatio Kitchener was - called from survey work in Palestine, to be one of the original 25 Engliali officers who reorganized the; Egyptian army. He .- accompan ied 'Wolseley's beated expediliion to relieve Gordon at Khar- toum; and lie witnessed the evacuation of the Soudan. And then for thirteen years Kitchener reniained in Egypt, plan- niýng, preparing, organ- izing for one great purpose: the rèeovery of the Soudan, and the vindication of Brit6h authority and influence. It was Kitchener'ir methods which vindicated British arms in South Africa. Long, silent, ex- haustive preparation fol- lowed by the swift, inevitýble, crushing stroke. No one but Kitchener could have had tIc eupatience and skili to \"round Up\" the elusive Boer cOmmanders. Then for seven years this great noiseless organiz- ing genius was focussed upon the army of Eng- land's greatest çlepend- ency. The wbole Indian army was completely Earl Ktchenler of Khiartoum, Great Brltaln's War Minister, who enJoys the entire confidence of lihe wbole Empire re-organimsead the Englhali a» native force. tratodesuy pi. Theoe ilane o, therefore, vWho pouese a More lntimae ie gt iiIto, ad a mom boix prehenuive otighi ',0f, the mllitary resoiurce of the Empire than LQ.t -Kithene ofKhiar- toum. l'is uknowledge, combined with hie ser- vices * t hompe on the Gemeral Staff durigthe. laipt tiiree --yas--a hii» the one iman whl eiperience qualîeu for, thé militar directiét of the, world'à groatowt lem1\u003e in 1»tiie pnet Tei foflowing le brief outlil» of bits ao- tivities: Edueate l \u0026X rod Bnfflwea 1878-89; commwa 8; Nil.e lxpmIttlý, -1884-86 (\"qatd\", brevet Lieut..\u003cCoL,moa witkoci\",Id CL à. - Governor o.f ,-u 19880-99 (u 11aap; soudan Admt~o' a16, 'including 0 moent at Tokll patoe, C.B., aPM 018sp'; MdjutantiOm. Jgytu army, 1888-U;41r, 8ois Expeditionr'Force, ,46(romote4 Major- Osmsieii, Britisii modal, Khedive modal wltii two eclampe\u0026) ; -'commanded Khartoum Expedition, 1M0 (thanks of Pailla- ment, raimeL te'Peta firo to saveza moýW) . of st*,ffof Porem ta'Southk Â i, 18091900 Comandr- Pach, promote ieut.- Coviimd Q.»rui re- oeivéd Viacounty, grant Of UôO,000,thanku Of Parliament); *COMnMan- der-Im-Chief, India, 1902- 9; Member cf COomm$ttee of Imperial D.fNnoe, 1910. Mai; \u003ceneral Sir Archlbald J. Murraly, 1 (hier or Staff to General Frenchi jielit.'-Cenei-al Sir. Douglas Hait; praised \u003c,mially for bis skil i n companding the 1 si British Army Corps Major General Colin John Mackenzie, former' Chier or -Staff and lot Mlitary Member or Militta Council of Canada, bas taken the fleld General, Sir H. smitt Dorrien leMdlngthe 2nd British Army Corps, hisbly praise by (3eneraI French. Ho vHi Dehoroman- bered by Canadians. as having lthe, Cana- dian contingent ln bis command ln lime South AtrIcan War",
         "THE 1914 WAR-ILLUSTRATED Governor Gallieni, Commander of the Defences of Paris Sir John French, the beloved leader or the British Expeditionary rorces MirlEdwarl Grey, K.G., BrItain's aistinguli shed lini ste, r or oreign AiT rS,,deC actions the Nation hias nnaniniouslyi\u003e ra run inl a :k 4ewtýLIcChier Aide tu the Czar",
         "THE 1914 WAR- ILLUSTRATED King Albert Or Belgium, who bas manrtîlly resisted the Kalser's extraordinary demanda P'rince Alexander of Teck, brother Io Queen Mary 1- ~4 AdirliraJ Jelil,,,e. i'. Command or Britain's Navy r - GenepldI 1 1(ien powell a hero ol' the Southl rrîca war. and fjuride r ýf lhe B (y eUI')LS, Who has called 200,000 Boy scouUte raiiy round the cuieïs",
         "THÉ -1914 WAR-ILLUSTRATED- Irovsioning a Warship. 'Thils pictîîre gives, a goo(I i(ea of the hugeness or the task Thse Rlght Hon. Wlnston Spencer Churchill, Flrst Lord or the Admiralty Soldier and Saflor, too. Brtitsh Marines \"Out Torpedo Nets!\" Shu(wiîng lovv oui- Battleslîips obtain protection steel netting A Cavalry Transport. HOW horses are swung- astiore A BrItIsh Mine Layer. ]itaie along r'ails and Iowered over the -;ter*n by mealus or",
         "4, f. ~- THE 1914 WAR-ILLUSTRA.TED British Soldiers enjoy a game of Dominoes while shelis burst overhead. Britsh Wounded Embarking on a Hospital Ship at Havre. A British Warship Convoying five large Merchantmen. A British Water-Filter Cart being filled at a River. Gordon Highlanders on the March. London in War Time. Searchlights operating frorn Charing Cross Station and Old Lambeth Bridge. 4 ~ \u003c~4~ 44fl,3~W4¾43a.fl r the task means or mmmmmm\"wm",
         "'XI#M 1e14 WAR-ILLÜS'rRATf British Wounded Homeward Bound Admirai Sir I3erkley Milne, in charge or Naval Squadron Admirai Sir Wm. Henry Mlay, Second ln commandi or tbe British Navy Lord Roberts fteviews War H-eroes Admirai Sir F. C. Brldgeman, serving uncler 1Admirai Jellicoe, A German machine! gun was necessary to destroy two Irish Guardsmen. Earl Roberts and Staff Engliah RecruitB who have ainswered their Country'a Cal! being hurriedlà, l)Iuugllt tb a sta:t~e ecency -'-'j-. '~V c,~ -.",
         "lUE 1914 WAR-4LLÙStÈATÈD) th British Lancers in action near the Beigian border -s. Maharajah or Nahha Woman and the War. Ladies at a London Hotel Sewing for the Red Cross A Tiwana Lancer Maharajah of Travancore t A Cumpany of Territoriais ln London en route to thle front, August th, 1914 Baroda's C-nC HI.H. Thakore Saheb of Gondal Mfaharajah 0f fikanir Royai Faiiily or Britain sees Regiments off 10 thé Front MIaharajah of Jodhpuvt *'t-~ 4 .4 ~ -4- - A' -I '7Y je. charge or ire. Three, are 110W h Arniy. 4. ~1 i r .4 -r 4? -k 1- 44, 'i i z",
         "THE 1914 WAR-ILLUSTRATED Indian Troops in France te help the Allies. Making their way te the firing line. Seing Dad4y off to the Front!1 A comnmon sight in England nowadays. The wife of one of the soldiers of the Ist Battalion Grenadier Guards and their young son accompanying hlm to the station whcre they entrained for the war zone. M4otor Cycle Ambulances in use by British at Front. It will be observed that the motor cycle has side car converted into an ambulance. Several of these are already in use by the British Army at the front. THE PRINCIPAL RACES REPRESENTED IN THE RANKS 0F THE ALLIES. t Japanese Infantry. 5'l.rpshooter. v.' J -~ ~",
         "THE 1914 WAR-ILLUSTRfl'ED German troops leaving Berlin for the front. British convalescent camp in the north of France,where wounded seldiers are regaining health and strength before returning to the firing line. Major General . A. B. Aldersen, C.B. commandihg thse Canadian Expedltlonry Ferces. cone of the mout popular offlcers of thse Britishs Arrny. He la 53 yemrsof mge and bas seen mucis active-service. German soldiers driving non-conibatants before thjeh. Removing a badly wounded Germin. French troops pulling down German frontier mark. This frontier post, bearing the Black Eagle of Germany, stood in the Vosges across which the French ad- vanced. A German marine band ln Antwerp. A deadly boit from the blue. A highly explosive bomb thrown at a German cavalry column by an English aviator struck an ammunition wagon, -killing 15 of the enemy. Chlldren ln Fllght frorn Antwerp. Sorne of the littie eilîdren wbo were compefled tefiee frem their homnes in Antwerp durlng the bomnbardftaent of their hornes by the \u003cerrnans. Germais soldiers uslng a chureh st Acrschot as a stable. A scene at Sali sbury Plains, where the Canadian contingent arc encamped, showing the troopçrs marching across the field to bç Týyiçwed ,' Lord Kitchener and Earl Roberts. Several I",
         "THE 1914*WAR-ILLUSTRATED Miss Aira York, the well-known Amnerican actress, reéeiving the congratulations\\ of Corporal Hudson of the Canadian Gordo« Highlbnders' for ber success in collccting socks and cigarettes for \"Tommy fltkins\" at the front. The aeroplane homb-droppera at work. Showin g bow the bomib is held before being dropped on the desired spot. English prîsoners returning from work, in Germnany. British prisoners workinig for their. German captors. German guards keeping watch over British prisoners as tliey build fences. Croup of the lSth Sikh Infantvy. An freo hedrietheucûi 'n thu .\\'sne Riverhy a plank bridge, ùnder heavy lire, in~~~~~~ ore1o rv h C .ige while the engineers were building a pontoon - .7 - t",
         "THE 1914 WAR-ILLUSTRATED' French officers reading the war news to their men. British Veterans read theý wa r news with intense intere~. Beian soldiers arriving at Havre. Germnan officers seen decipherlng orders received from the general staff. Britain's sons in a French village on the way to the battie front. 4 i ,~ 4. 4 A Britisli field bakery at wo ok. British soldiers struggling w\"ith French newspapers. ~' ~ -~ '~ s... I. E",
         "w \\. ,~;j. .4 THE 1914 WAR-ILLUSTRATED The 20th Madras Infantry. Wouinded Cordon Ilighilaiiders titrii linglcy Hlli, Birminghami,ito a dormitorv. A German soldier sprawling on a Lambeth Bridge under flash i iglhts, an Belgian cottager's bed in a drunken illustration from a Leipzig paper. sleep, stili clutching lus rifle and the boulie fromn which he bas been drinking. Rev. P*#land Allep cIiaplain of the iii fated Britishi hospital ship Rohilla, being brought ashore by life gulards who ivent to the rescue of the vessel, which foundered off the coast of W'hithy. The lRohilla ws .n ts way fromn Leith to Dunkirk to take off wounded Belgian and English soldiers from the fighting ini the north of France. A British naval armoured train at îvork in BeIgium. AX Dubilin Ambulance Class. I 1' 4lctting a post office delivery ready t\u0026 send around to the troops. 444 14044i ~44. 4h . t)Iflers ioniIT1(~.A mi~ rny, Learning how to muouet a restivc i'-C ( M'i cers fi oin Indi a.",
         "THE 1914 WAR-ILLUSTRATED British Infantry behind barbed wire fence coolly awaiting a charge of German Cavalry. ne ý m-ââk C.eneral Botha, premier of South Af rica and Cotnmander-in-Chlef of the South African forces. Xounded Briàish Sailor being conveyed te hospital in motor bus, The bus window has been smashed by shrapnel but otherwise is in gond condition. British Defenders of Belgium. British marines fighting from the trenches near Lierre during a German attack. The ire of the British tars was deadly. -ry readyti roops. Wounded British Marine, instead of going te hospital rejoins comrades in trenches. Graham White (centre), in charge *of the Aviation Forceà of Great Britain, and Lieut. Porte right), who is to command the transatlantic fluer -'Am- crica,\" whichf was trecentl shipped over from the U. S e ,, BritisiM rn sln e t t t 1 ttafe\\ d %,fti ( Uuli. It a restiyC Britlsh Marines going te A typical Irtdian Regi;mci f Briti\u0026h N4val Reserves ln Belgium. take up their position ln the trenches outzide Mons vhere the Germans suffered a severe repulse.j -Jw- )eing brought off the coast off wounded abc@\"-- 1 7fflý ýý f",
         "14P,1914 WAR-ILLUS1iRATEfl A Group of British Prisoners of War in German Custody. Wounded British Salors ina London Motor Bus in BeIgiuiMei route to the nearest Hospital. Searchlights on 0Wd Lambeth Bridge, London. Lord Kitchiener receiving a cali fro I Lord Roberts ini his rooni at the War Office. Indian Troops in Camp in France. Sti h licona Ilise, lWiniipileg, Carada's Ci .sik Cavali y Regiment. Now ini the 01(1 Land xmith thec Canadian Expeditioiiy Iorcec. Col. McDonnell,DSC wv1wu cuxnxxds, can be seen beated in the centre of the group. 1' ontht. lç)kout for the enemy.",
         "THE 1914 WAR-ILLUSTRATED A scene in the village of Pau, France. sllowing 300 German war prisoners being escorted by French soldi;r-sao a detention camp. The Late Lord Roberts' last inspection. \"Little Bobs,\" as he was affectionately known, wliose sudden death on the evening of November 14, came as a shock, is seen in this photo, which was macke November 4, at Salisbury Plains, during his inspection of the Canadian, troops there. German artîllery becorning bogged in a flooded area in Belgium. Po werful British guns witli the Allied forces. Wounded soldiers at Ostend waiting to be taken on the boat. Canadian contingent armored motor corps on Salisbury Plains, England, in which the King was greatly interested, 1 5 . Î",
         "16'£itH 1914 WAP.-ILLUSI'RATPD J,ý rB r it I rc Kng or $pain dlscusslng War ProIIemo witb ishlm Puma, Minter -Nicholas il, Czarr 0fRUSSia, 4' r.,'",
         "THE 1914 WAR-ILLIJSTRATED Hnw %%chldren:are 'playin g waErJapane .boys at Tokio. jpns English boys marchfng throuigh a London street. A Frenchi nurse attending to n wouinded jack tar. Sir Edward Gry and tva officer, of' thelR' FIying Corps. Týhe officier ta the Ieft lanr Edward'sa brother- and la reparted ta b. a prisoner cf var at Ogstend. Braggart Ulans show themacives cawards at heart. Jelgian peasants report tirat the scauting parties cf Uhlans are extremely suspiciaus of cvii piay. Having demarrded refrebhments they refuse ta drink uritil same 4 of the villagers sipped first thus pvoving that it had nat been porsaned. And thiese are tire creatures wiio ravislred Ielgian wornen and cblidren. The Firebrand cf Turkey, Enver Bey. Manarcha Withaut a Country. Anew and unpnbiished photo cf King Aibert and his vife, Qucien Elizabeth of Beigium. * ''itialice of the Canadiait Expeditioriar\\ 'lI-i Oui boys bird bcarcciy ianded at i hbefut e oit oCf tlia-officel - i-t' wirbi, a cbariîîig ycuuxg Frerielj ..,and! tbev %titre j rarried r Oct. 2c. (-Ur Gulli-, rde Ilcrin uaterial aspri l.ý-fnii-r 1- lil cîhvillager s' iiglit warçlî foritpiub. jUter iii the ialei-ljnodie(l meni JeU for trie battlefieil the Freccb ilages xx cie grrtrdcul niglit arr!f day, 1) v the çricst and o lii peasants, wii ,trîpper] evcry straiiget inr or 1r to exaiîr hic papers. lite Fictiel a.1vi ator Des Moulinais, wbo lias i eivcîi higli hanors -tram the French govern- mient for bis daring, fiighta. b .",
         "=EE 1914 WAR-I.;LLUSTRATED Iierlor yîew'or oneo0f the shopg 0f Krupp, Jermany, wbere the, large gruns are made A C oen 1 f pe tlovas o German Submarines in the Kiel Cana, waiting for an'op- )ortunity to tac the British Fleet The fortifICations Of the Ilanc« of Heligoland. Oerman ;erritory IA Zeppelin. Germany's Air Fighter GePman CrIliser \"Goeben\" ordered from many neutral liarbors during war progres Vie beautiful bridge il t 'panq tule Nre[le ,It i tege, where Germans were repulsed 2, s",
         "T 1914 WAR-?LXJiEAE A view of the Spa Grounds of Scarbo rough, the fashionable Eng1ish waterint M~ort on the coast, 200 miles from London and directly opposite KCieI the German navi buse, which has been shelled by the Germnan fleet making a sudden dash across the North Sea. British Admnirai Sir F. C. D. Sturdee, whose squadron engaged the German fleet off the Falkland Islands in the South Atlantic and won a victory. *This mii1e was washed ashore. When in position in the sea it floats the other way up, the. anchor chains being attached to the eye-holes seen above. Tbç Clrnsanspy \u003cCarl 4y) r *$,th. London tower. Joc is The top photo is H.M. S. Sydney whfch terminated the Emden's destfun The Emden is shown below and her captain, Von Muller. One of the new women police volunteers on duty, London, England. Sdlei.marchin woubgh Svda,0« Âi\"SOmIm Sodea to cm ,rk ta an~iW Britis.h soldiers in their new fur jackets at the front. Amnerican Christmas ship. Jason, at Plymouth, wbere big guns are waiting to be mounted on British ships. The size of the guns can be judged hy comparing the line of British sailors drawn up inl front. A coningent arriving at Peradenlya, Cello, fortraining. Iubmarlnes :tel Cana, Dr Wnop- t0 atiack lsb Fieet pulsed",
         "THE 1914 WA1k- LL.USTRATED Confisca ting Belgian cattle to feed thse German garrison. The «Kaple Leaf\", quartette at rehearsal on Silisbury Plains, inging \"0 Canada.\" England's big siege guns now at the front. One of the monster new heavy Englisli guns being landed in France preparatory to nioving it ta the front. These pans mounted on heavy carniages and drawn by traction engines are capable of executing an appalling amount of damage. A~ Highland Regiment crossing a pontoon bridge near the battle -ground of the Aisne. Belgian1 soldiers firing at a passing aeropiane. A picturesque group choosing a site for an Indiaji camp in France-Allies of three nations. German ii-is i lingidh* at th, , elart Ls alufl tthe Hu in Ri ciiii Ncw Yuî k ciLý Ii terior ni ailRîî1igi,1î \\iitaîu ij .\\îîî I îîCv ~Tr ain.*A splenidid idea la conveyed by this photo of iv h4t a militai an la.iu tai lOOks like. Iu its spotless interior, the wounded -ire conveyed from the bll'iîi\"lili o dile base hospitals. Every aid known to modern science and surgery is CaHII i iiaIi the men are being borne in this train to the hiospiÏtals. This parittinlar !i: dl i, ilit Midland railroad, but every railroad comPany hI England isfuj i'.nmn manv such trains sinularly equipped- i v ~",
         "-i7114W a.4LBrktb Behind Kng George and King Albert are the Prince of Wales and Sir Pertab gingh, viewing the march past of soldiers at the front. Turkey's first loss, the annexation of Cyprua . The Brltlsh Commlasouoe rding the proclamation. German prisoners leavlng Lagos for England. French dragoons on their way to the trenches near Ypres. A Japanese correspondent chattmng with some officers near a Russian artillery park in a Polish village B ritish fighters of the rank and file, as weil au members of the Britis Red Cross, division, equipped for winter blastu li the trenches on the western battle front. tlis .ded lerti the anv The Ypres-Armentiers battle began with the meeting of British cavalry with German cavalrY to t!'e nortlh of the Bettune-AMre caral. Russian ArtIlle,-y entering M'arsaw just in tiqie to repulse the Germans. .nglisli )unted \u003ealling",
         "and, Desorlbod poisoned. Civil liberties do not miany, there is no freedom of the ublio opinion,;am there is publie Sg the peôples who are free and bt consàt ( iy or twoc âce or retdeae LO battie. I aru, the stoe ho wasintl 9 have\" baffle me and ii W0hit abou ,e, orld lth i B 81istter c s~'~II a~ndunatexble ùmi 4t~o~* ~ nsd tbe'who ir Mwr»iard Grey, th, Âat.eAUl tho othe jence., publi Utèùdig te'garbie( †litomplet put forward at Berlin b'ae but served to pile Up higher the maso o tht the it of'tuswar resté upoi ýy, whioh long aud murderouely broode( OiWté plottinga $0niake :Germar miitar ne' 4 the maoter of human deetinies, in w -wdeGerman Empire Yespeeches of Sir Edward Grey h Parlia ment sud of Mr. Asquith, on the occasion a. the State documents bèing laid on the table an utterances of profound historie importance as thôse State documenta are likewise of pro fowid historie value. Sir Edward Grey'i speech, which was delîvered not many houri b;efore, the war began, is couched throughoul i wrds of extraordiary moderation anc restrint; while heavy with the sense of war, il is ýthel-poeh -of a great peace Mini#ter, sud ai we read it, again, and ponder it;* the caîni m narhlling of deedesud official utterances fi irresistibie. -1$ is the iron logic of fact, of event Whyir we at war, we people of Canada ehoulerto shoulder with .the people of th( British Isles and the people of alI the reet ol the Empire? Because in thie great etrugglE of the spiit, of freedom againet the demon ol force, British, freedom je at etake. We anÈ fighting in defence of everything that makeE life worth living, in defence of every ideal by which, our country existe as a civilized com- munity. It je a war to defend the eecurity of our national future. To come down te particulars aud details i anewer to the ques- tion of why the Britishý Empire sud the nations fightig in alliance with us are engaged i this war with the Empires of German aud Austria,. Hungary, the plain facte speak for themeelves. The whole aim sd object of the militaist regime which for a half century past has absolutely controlled Germany bas been avow- ,edly to make the German people subservient at home and feared abroad. Every, ingenuity of the science of destruction lias been devel- oped with absorbing euergy, and uo consider- ation of pity or humanity lias been allowed to interfere with the decrees of the god of \"Blood, aud'Iron.\" The minds of the Germanpeople flic\u003ci~~wigodof \"Blood and Iron\" ie a ,W d *ty *ith no bwl of compassion. He ÙW grad n~der his heel the email nationahe a s*orntoIptect, and taiks of a saèred treaty as ej \"a msrtp )of ? aper.1y He flings bombs férmthe of sky upoii i1eix1 cities, scornfui of womnen a s ad eblidren. Ho burne towns and village, and slaughters, the, old and the weak, not in ar ger and luit, but according to an iron ru~e Ho Re smorelles. even with bie own. He flings them' i close formation on certain death. They muet \"1hack their way through,\" or- die. Ef \"Botter to lose an army corps than change of àPlan.\" 1$ je al force-force--force-Boullese e, uad cruel and barbarie. It ie divorced from n ail moral cons;ideratýion--!-from mércy, from u justice, from pity. TJntil this eystem is broken Je and crushed, there can be no peace i this world. How did this eyetemn precipitate the preeent \u003e8 war? 1$ resorted to a devioue course of pro- y cedure. On July 23,- Austria presented to îè ervis an ultimatum making demands the d cc~\u003eaneof which would have been for [y. Servis. national suicide. The assassination of lé the Arohduke Franz Ferdinand, heir to the It lmperial crown of Auetria-Hungary was the e pretext which was seized upon for the purpose cf of crushing Servis. The ultimatum. gave Servis oniy forty-eight houre in which to eub- il mit. Servia made an humble reply, agreeig [d to nRearly all demandesud offering to submit le the others to the Hague Tribunal. This offer le Austria-Hungary insultingly rejected.- Noth- ,r ing can be'plainer than that Germany dictated ic that ultimatum, and coerceç Auetria-Hungary d throughout that whole course of events. 1, Let us cite in1partial witnesses. Admirai )f Mahan, retired, of the United States Navy ýn recognized as a foremoet authority on ef5a jd 1ower and n\u0026aa strategy and on hietorical y questions, has written: a '\"The aggessive insolence of Austria-Hungary's ultimatum to Servia, taken with the concession by the latter of ail the demande except those which were toe L- humiliating for their national self-respect, indicate that )f the real cause of the war is other than that set forth by \u003e the ultimatum. Knowing from psst experience how the matter muet be viewed in Ruesia, it le incredible that Austria would have ventured on the ultimatum - unles he was. assured beforehand of the consent of Germany to it. The inferenoe je irresistible that the substance of the ultimatum wae the pretext for a war [t already determined on as soon as a plausible occasion d Let us cite another impartial' witness, the ýt New York World, which, in dealing with the i5 campaign headed by Count Bernstorff, the a German Ambassador at Washington, to en- 5deavor to change the verdict of Public opinion in the United'States, a campaigu which lias *failed to eecure a reversai of the United States e verdict againet Germany, says: f \"The arguments employed do not appeal to the e American mind. With every desire to bce fair to ail *sides, the overwhelming majority of editorial writers are able to see in the war only a cataclyem provoked e b y German militarism, with the object of making G ermany the predominant Power in Europe. When r Professor Munsterburg and others denounce Britain as 'a traitor to the Teuton race,' because she ides with - Russia, America, Americane recaîl that until the fart T that until recent years Germany'e great ambition was a Russo-German alliance against France and England.\" - It is well kn own that what Bismarck aixned s at was a \"Kaiserbund,\" and alliance of the s three Kaisers-German, Austrian and Russian *i-against the rest of Europe, with the idea of * later on making Austria-Hungary part of the German Empire. But the European develop- 3 mente took another course. The alliances - formed between France and Russia, and Great b Britain and France created:a situation which r made it inevitable that the course taken last July by Germany in, naking Austria-Hungary its tool in thqf matter of the ultimatum to 0 Servia would Provide a pretext for Germany 1 to strike. Germany deliberately took meas- ures to provide this pretext., Sir Edward Grey strained every effort to preéserve the peace of Euoe He macle proposai' after proposai, 0or ferer rFrne, Russia and Italy con- curring, but Germany i every case refusing. Germany was dete inmed on war. In the worde of Imperial Chancellor von Bethmann Hollweg: \"If a nation will not, or cannot spend so much onu ite armaments that it-ca' force ite way through the world, it must fait back into the secorqd row. The weak become the prey of the, etrong. Parchment je parch.. ment, steel ijeeteel.\" These words 'I'ere uttered morethan a year- gé-.They mae*weU be cited here by way of preface to the mention of the \"scrap of paper\" declaration by the same Imperial Chancellor von Bethmann Hollweg, who je the German Emperor'e chief Minister of State, not responsible to the Ger- man people, for the German people have not reeponeible Government, but responsible only to the Emperor. That speech will etand forever in history as the moet striking utterance of the epirit of the whole canceroue eyetem of systeniatic double-, dealing and cynical - faithiesen ese which had grown up iynder the military autocracy 'at Berlin. In his last interview with the. British Ambassador at Berlin, Sir Goechen, on August 4, the Imperial Chancellor, when he made his \"infamous propoeal\" that Great ]3ritain should allow the violation of the neutrality of Belgiuni, said that the treaty, eigned by Germany as welI as by Great Britain, guaran'teeing Belgian neutrality, was \"Just a ecrap of paper.\" The New York World on August 29, after recalling the fact that Magna Charta, the Bül of Riglits, the Declaration of Independence and the decisione of the Supreme Court of the United States are \"j ust scrape of paper,\" said: \"The Hay-Pauncefote Treaty is 'a scrap of paper,' and one of the most brilliant moral victories won by President Wilson is the Act of Congrees which vol- untarily repealed the violation of the terme of that 'scrap of paper.' Respect for -these 'ecrape of paper' measure a nation's honor no less than ite freedom. Our democracy itself is only 'a scrap of paper,' but it looses forces no autocrat can etay. T he Germani army je the most wonderful military machine ever contructed by the hand and brain of man, but in the final reckoning of history this 'scrap of palier' will prove more powerful than ail the Kaiser's legioneM.\" SThe utterances of the press of. the UÜnited States are noteworthy because the 'JFnited States is not involved in this war,: aud bç*)ue the people 'of the United States are an i4teili- gent and rèading people. To quote one more utterance of one of the journals of highest standing i the United States, out of the multitudes of similar utterances that might be quoted, the New Yorkç Outlook sys: \"Hietory will hold the German Emperor respopeble frthis war.' Austria would neyer have made lrin- defensible attack on Servia if she had not been aaeured beforehand of the support of Germany. The German Emperor'e consent to co-operate with Great flritain in mediation would have put a stop to Austria's advance. To doubt that Germany and Austria have been in alliance in this act of brigandage is to ehut one's eyes to all the signe.\" With the ýviolation of the neutrality of Belgium by Germany the war began. Great Britain, having exhausted every possible effort to avent the war, was finally compelled by its most sacred obligations, as well as by the necessity of protecting both itself and the Empire, to take action, which it did with the instant and unanimous approval sud support of the whole Empire,. It is the British Empir that Germany lias been planning aîl along to destrpy. \"The old century saw a Gerinan Europe,\" said the Emperor. \"The newone shal ee a German world. The trident of power over the sea muet be in our haýnds.\" Said Mr. Asquith in hie speech at the Guildhall on September 4: \u003c'The ultimate and hot far distant aim of- GernialY. was to crush the independence and the autonomy of the free States of Europe. First Belgium, then Hollaiid and Switzerland-countries, like our own, imbued and sustained with the spirit of liberty-we were, one after the uther, to be bent to the yoke, and these 'ambitions were fed and fostered by a body of',new doctrines and new philosophy prèached - by. 'professors *'and'learned mien in Germany. The free and full self-developme1It ob ha ne Iu An HE Th On Fo An In Ou * Ou An",
         "0u 114 WAjt- ÏIic ew eeiia1States, te ourseIves, te our eat a nd growiing Dominions, over the eas, to our kinsmen 'Àj.oastloe At1ntic ' -- the weffi-primg and life-breath of na~tional existee that self-development is the one capital off once in tue code of those who have made force Iheir sureme divinity and upon its altars are prepaid t . acifce both the gathered fruits and the potential term of the unfettered human spirit., Upon this issue everything that containe the promise and hope that j leds te emânipation and fuller liberty for the millions Swho make up the masses of mankind will ho found booner or jeter te depend.\" - ]Beginning with a gross violation of inter- -national law and of the most sacred treaty obligations, by invading Belgium, Germany has gone on with further violations of inter- national law and of the Hague Convention, by bombarding unfortified. towns, such as'] -Vain, Maline, Termonde, ànd-ethemj y e \"indemities\") on towias and cties, whiC expressly contrary to the Hague Conveni signed by Germany, by atrocities upon fencelessanard unoffending c ivil1by barous destruction and deatton is not a war which originated in the assa ation of an Austrian Archduke by a Ser student. It is a war which has arisen oul the German desire to dominate the worl deliberate war of aggression, for whichC many has been making prodigious preparati for more than twenty years. Thé milita Patriotie Songs Il GOD SAVE THE KING God save our gracious King, Long live our noble King, God save the King; Send him victerious, Hlappy and glorious, Long te, reign over us; God save the King. O Lord, our God, arise, Scatter his enemies, And make them fait; Confound their politics, Frustrate their knavish tricks, On him our hopes we fix; God save us ail. Thy choicest gifts in store, On him be pleiàsed te pour, Long may he reign; May he defend our laws, And ever give us cause To sing with heart and voice; God save the King. TE MAPLE LEA! IOREVER In days of yore, the hero Wolfe, Britain's glory did maintain, And planted firm Britannia's flag On Canada's fair domain, Here may it wave, our boast, our pride, And joined in love together, The Thistie, Shamrock, Rose entwine The Maple Leaf forever. tory as Sof the louble- ffh had acy 'at British \u0026ugust ide his should lgiuiii, as well leIgian 'The calling Eights, Ad the United paper,' won b y [ch vol- of that reeom, 1but àt âermahi ne ever t in the r' wiU [Jited hited . pause itelli- ,:More ighest )f the ght be aasuibl lerman fritain Ustria's a have to shut ty of Great effort by its y the d the ffh the pport Xnpire mg to IrInan rt of Ldsy dhall nany ,of the [oland ed and Ce after bitions es snd earned paient In Autumn timne our emblemn dear Dons its tints of crimson hue; Our biood wouid dye a deeper red, She.d, dear Canada for yôu! Ere sacred rights our fathers won To foemen we deliver, Weli fighiting die-our battle cry, \".The Maple Leaf forever.\" Chorus J God bleus our loved Canadian homes, Our Dominion's vast domain: May plenty ever be our lot, And pee hold api endiess reign; Our Union, bound by ties of love, That discord caxinot sever, And flourisb green o'er Freedom's home, The Maple Leaf forever. Chorus. )eace of roposal, ily Con- efusing. In the thmann cannot, b it- can ust fait become parch- 9 Ivere ae~weli by the ;hinann 's chief îe Ger- mve not le only LA MARSEITT-fLLASE Ye sons of France awake to glory, Hark! hark! what myriads round yog rnue! Your chiidren, wives and grandsires hoary, Behoid their teàirs and hear their cries. (repeat) Shall hateful tyrants, mischief breeding, With hireling hosts, a ruffian band Affriglit and desolate the land, While peace and liberty lie bleeding? REFRAIN- To armns, to arms, ye brave, Th'avenging sword unsheath; March on, march on, all hearts resolved On liberty or death. a01 Now, now the dangerous storm is rolling, Which treach'rous kings, confederate, raise; The dogs of war, let loose, arehowling, And, Io! our fiel4Is and cities blaze, (repeat) And shaîl we basely view the ruin, Whiie lawless force, with guilty stride, Spreads desolation f ar and widé, With crimes and blood bis hands imbruing? Refrain. With luxury and pride surrounded,, The vile insatiate despots dare, Their thirst of power and gold unbounded, To mete and vend the light and air; (repeat) Like beasts of burden they wouid ioad us, Like Qods, would bid their slaves adore; But man is man,-and who is more? Then shail they longer iasb and goad us? Refrain. ion, the.ranks of eah amby,'o4 de- who have eyes tosueo can i dti* bar- picIe andidem; for wbi\u003c*s îd This And the contending arinies vaM sBm- isue involved, for while the G vian force isdrivnto rély o GM Atof rival idea of lberty caDs bt d, a of ail races- frein the uttérmo*u Ger- eath té deïend it. UnbiddÈt ions the sons of Canada, of Austi arist Africa, of India,\u003e of \u0026Il parts rally, together to fight under oti it isthe fiagof freedom. 4 O Libertyl cm an urW Once hiavirg- fet thy Can duzj a otain Or(\u003e -4p hynba Too lin the worilm ha T1Iat fleood'a do Bùt ý é, 0 wdW And ail their arts an ut TOURE lINOAn» OOuniIliE We've wated uplaI»g Cricket. , And ev'rykIdnd ofganw- At féootball,\"golf, and polo, You mn emou~ae. dyour n But noW Your o0tin*?O-m4 Yeu To play your paut in War, Anduo matter what.befalla rou, We shl lms ru AUthe more, So, corne sd johi the f~é Ami your fathers did beore. REFRAIN- Oh f wedont iant to lose yod,but wetu*I oughtteg For your Kigand your Conty botJ, m yeuse; We shah wat yoý andud u you, bu ý our might and main We shahl cheer you,,thsn you, ki. roi When you corne baàk aplu. Oh, we don't want teélo; you but we th\" ought te go For your King and your CountrY bco$m m you se; We shalwant you and miayo, b' w», our niight and mmn We shail cheer yo, tha»k you, kis you, Wr you Côme ba ahi.j We want you from alquarters So, help us, South sud North We want yeu hi your thoumade, Frem Falmouth te the Forth,* You'filnover Ind us fail you' *WIhen you are i distresa, Se, anawer when we hall yeu, And let your iword be \"Yes\" And se your naine, in years to corne Each mother's son shail bleus. REFRAIN- It's easy for us (women) (people) To stay at home and ishout, But remember, ther' a duty To the men who first went eut, The odds against that handful Were nearly four te eue, And we cannot rest until It's man for man, and gun for gun, And ev'ry (Weman's) 1(Body's) duty- Ite see that duty dene! On Merry England's far-famed land, May kind heaven sweetly smile; God bless old Scotland evermore, And Ireland8 emeraldÂslet--- Then swell the song, both loud and long, Till rocks and foresi quiver; God save our King and heaven bles The Maple Leaf, forever. Chorus. RU=EBRITANNI When Britainfirat at Heaven's commuand,- Arose from out the azure main,. This was the charter, the charter of the land, And guardian angels sung this strain: CHORUS- Rule Britannia, Britannia rules the waves! .Britons neyer ghail be slaves. The nations not so blest as thee, Shail in their turn to tyrants bend, Whilst thou shait flourish, shaît flourish great and free, And te the weak protection lend. ChOrUB To thee belongs the rural reign, Thy cities shail with commerce shine, And lands far over, far o'er the spreading n-arn, Shall stretch a hand to grasp with thmne. Chorus CHORUS- The Mapie Leaf, our emblem dear The Maple Leaf forever! God save our King, and heaven bleus, The Mapie Leaf forever! On many hard-fought battlefields Our brave fathers, side by side, For freedom, homes and lôved ones dear, Firmly stood and nobiy died: And those dear rights which they maintained, We swear to yield them neyer, We'ii raiiy round the Union Jack, The Maple Leaf forever! ' l*JIu unorU8 k S.",
         "r eat turc OAK?$Y SI. DRiBerge ~ '3raA Floj ick Sl-evanger m ryFirleh CR\u003cJ/$ s I 10V lee 1. b l,,mrdee - -S o l h m r 4 o uN H A U ' * r i ~mo P'r'! ?*rOSe 17bor Suoge--6 ~ 0 .,. ChFes PAR-0 ' I leb\u0026 eno\" Miihsn: -4.r .4- Cua otlAo± ersjlNrme~ * 400,0 Blok Heldr ro r.;na t ; . . ', - -b-u am 4tenoa 00e eg(orn.%.FI4r'.. Bolgn itU 'h 1 h.. 1 ie e£6ü .. ..... ( \u003c ' q l ....... . .. RooZ00.000 n. E 0CV. O TR LL E T sersizr~ 8~Mrsla ~7, oCyq\" E. . .... ..... ..... . .. N .... .. s *. Reval 0Gpesi 'Oum R vngrd ndzm £Kovnoo erDubno ose Ao£oCeoLemberg - - ----- -- %9 - .:,.*..Ae.. MOTchNen$ RovnoO - Duraz .. Ar(pnpkDu4 ui* Tarievi Jrl9t f ¶ 24,Co-gnj.j., OAus Woe idc/s obfaLn",
         "1Thoti hé ZeppeýI and other cities. ,- Q.érm\u0026nys aéroplane consiet of 58 squadron01-iI éach, a total ef formidable and' oLhsl Ioall7 ver. M-~~tWbe worl in file4vwith admira- * 0A t Uga t tin Belglium'a wondér-' oi#and.agaluat theé GermnnGoliath. * ~ the triuMph o! braina againet #ýueI fürce snd the bralu behind'it al ~s uaIo! Oeneml Brialmont, thé Vul*o o ur timp. 1h vas-Brialinot jbrn IM8I, dléd 1903) who dé.ignéd thé fortifications of Liège, and also those Of Namu« sud Autwerp, and ln hie câpaeihy o! liuopétor-Geueral hé carniéd eut the whole achémé for thé défeucé o! Hfelgium. Eaving filléd to wary thé fortifics- __tignqof liege,_by hunling eolid _masses o! mn at them, thé O rmane brought up theïr;siege gWae to bombard thé forts. But wiiatévér kappéne Liège has played -ber part in thé 'great var, sud, richly desérves thé Cross o! thé Léegion of Honor whlch Président Poincaré conférred upou hér for holding thé Gérman hosto at boy- In4iale Place in the Empire Thot vtéran Anglo-Indian, no well Içnown i Bombay, Sir George Birdwood, K.CJ.B. discussig England's mission lu India ta Septembér \"Empiré Magazine,\" siys:I \"Our mission, judged by thé history o! thé rise, progrèns and consolidation o! thé 'Pax Britaunica' lu India, has ob- vioualy beeu to securé te thé United lingdom o! Great -Britain sud Iréland thé uudieturbéd monopoly, sud failiug thot, thé absolute freédom o! trade with thé East Indies-that lea, o! aIl thosé maritime co untiès from South. Africa to China sud Australasia, thst form acrose thé Indian Océan thé sweéping arci o! which India is, if iun.strong -~ Ub FV. bq Yfrt*e e, tie, UAM. ad OCOi ý - l ~dI,.,Wr'u *\"- ih .lI $ý diy1slpoe1uo inat or ti. gro- bir ofteoftthe pBoph. te ode fa.n imlrEfl i j\u003e What oa di a don for ûe? Wy, literafly aurytIgag - everytbing that bas mode tWeme lfri,*o thé face of the. globe ae inconsldérable stbe Islando ap\"ly that moke up Jâpan, the. greatest Em- ~ amerpfre-4n lbIesrg njsd glory and wlsdom, mne an d prosperty sud honor and might-. -'the greâtoot the world bas ever known. la dotol,ý It gtarted Our Réyal. Navy ou nIts modembuii; It mode Our, côm- metoll marine the carriers for al the craft world; lt éreated. the We\u0026t-Eud of Ln doplni-oot ftpm Temple Bar and à, liht, Cbarng- Cross; _-aud-the West ECnd of on îdýnugh sd,', gala, Oheltenham aud Pm' ýnd Bathsud Olalnad It wathe wealth and ean 'of Ikdia, the loribelung's gold, brought us nét py by éur tr-ade wlith India, tbat-alone en- ,,A ing- abled us t10 fansd repulse and eruh if_ mile Bonaparte down lnto the dust, and ship et thé hlm off and bind hlm-a second Prome- skllfully theus-to a before nameleas rock in the South Atlantic, to die thème like a Ben- gai tiger In ts overlooked and forget. ten jungle trap'\\\" Dogis of War Asl le wéll known, doge are N~gl uséd lu Bélgium for draught purposes, both lu péacé sud war. lt le not so well kuown that Éolland le likè hér neighbor lu making fre use o! thé services o! doge ini war time. Britain le now to ou éxteut following thèse éex.mplée, a spécial contingent o! bloodhounde baving béén déspatched to thé Low Couunies forRFed Cross work. Thé doge, whèu la thé- fiéld, carry a complété équipmént o! firet-aid appliaucès, sud are hrainèd to search for thé wound\u0026d. The Kiel Canal Thé Kaiser Wilhélm Canal is a great Germen canal conécting thé North Ses with thé Baltic and popularly kuown as thé Kiel Canal. Thé naturel routé from thée-Baltic to thé North Sés around thé unorhh o! Dénmark le circuitous sud dangérous. Thé canal wae iutended te givé àGermauy opportunity to usé hér fiéet lu 'beth. séas. Il connecte Brunsbuttel harbor néon thé xùouth o! thé' Elbe with Holténau on Kiel Boy, paseiug through lowlands- sud lakes sud aloug river vol- leys. Its reconstruction was undértakén five yéars ago, to, hé complétéd this yéar. Its width is 144 féet, ite depth 36 féét and its length 61 miles. At heu places it has beén widéned so as to permit shipe to pass. It le built at ses level, but'has twin locks for thé regulation o! hidés; tliéy are eighty-hwo féet longer and thirhy-two feet wvider thon thé Panama Canal locks, altliough thé depth of thé Panama wvaterway, is-greahér thon that of thé Kiel watcrway. Thé route around Dénmark le 429 miles longer than thé routé through thé Kiel Canal. Apaft fronùt tu question of hoouri and 0e! morallty, ik appom orteme quite *b*.3. hbat w. 'muet stand or 'ful wlth Froace or-B.Igiurn, or fanl without thésu. e haW bve lest ol ngar , se- ouritys the. froutier' of the British JhÈ. pie lien -betweos Oermy.aid France- Roýbert BI.tobiord. Tabloid, Hietory So, naméd i la aaid by Egbé't, -Oret king o! thé English, in a gênerai council held at Wiuchester A.D. 829*. Enlad was united to. Wales in 1283, to Scot- land in 1d03. Ireland was incorporated with them by set of législative union in 1801, sud thé wholé ..wae cialled 'thé United Kingdôm of Great Britain and Iréland. The -British Empire containe about 7,000,000 square miles of térritory, with approximately 341 000,000 inhala- -tante. The présent King of Englaud euccéeded hie fathér King-Edrward VII, May 6,'1910. Thé British Empire in the- largest in thé world, exteuding into Ïve7y zone sud climate, comprisiug more thon a \"ith part o! -the land of thé globe, émbracing under ite rulé nesrly a sixth part of the inhabitants of the globe. _ FRACE. l In the fifth century At ws couquèréd by the Franka, -a Gérman people of Frauconia ta Gèrmany, wlieré they be- came knowni about 240. Before thé rév- olution France was divided into forty goveruments. Sinée 'the overthrow o! Napoléon III, Sept. 3, 1870, i-t bas been a' républie. Thé Président da elected for seven yéare by thé Senaté and the Chamber of Deputies unitèd iu a con- grées. Hé concludéd tréaties with.for- eigu powérs, but caunot. déclare war without previous assent of both Cham- bers. It contsins 204,000 square miles, aud thé population in 39,000,000. In 1870'war broké ont between France and Germauy, in which thé Germons were u'iin-terruptédly succeseful. Thé bOttlé of Sedan decidéd the war in favor of thé Gérmaus on Sept.' 1, 1870. Thé Germons marched into Paris on thé 28th day of January, 1872. Thé provinces of Alsace and LoTrainé, which are thé battlé grotind of thé présent war, were givén bock to Gérmany. Thé inhabitants of thèse provinces are loyal -to thé French and are helping them fight Germany at this timé. RUSSIA. Ruesia was formerly called Muscovy. 1h le thé largésh counthry in thé world and comprises thé whole of uorthern Europe and uorthern àia. Thé rapid risé of power under Peter -thé Great and Catherine II is unequaléd. Thé govern- ment o! Russaini an abso lute monarch, which le hereditary in thé family o! thé Czar. Thé whole législative, executive and judicial power iâ unit9d 1'n thé per.- son of thé Czar, whosé will aloné is law. Thé princes and princesses of thé royal l'Ouse muet obtain consent of thé Czar to marniage or théir children cannot in- hénit thé hhroné. Thé ares of thé em- piré le 8,660,282 square, miles, and its inhabitants npmber about 126,000,000. Iniportant évents in baté Russian hie- tory are: Dismnmbermént of Poland 1772-93 and 95, wars of Napoléon and burning of Mosew 1812, Cri.mean War 1853-55, vast incréase ln area of thé Aýsi- atié provinces 1858-73, sale of Alaska ho thé Un-ited States in 1867, the Turkislî war in 1878 and thé Japaîteése war in 1905, in which thé little browii nationi defeated 'thé Russian arin1y alfd navv trne after Urne sand worn the war in a remarkabl\u003e\" short space of Mime. Belgium waï~ known ln ancien't time' as ]3elgae. Mi was coniquered' by Juiue Caesar ,in. 51 B.O. Its fiz-, ia about one-gighth of Gwreat Britain, and ft is one of,_the mont- densely populated coun- tries in the world., Its government is a liberal constikutional monarchy founded in 1831.' It bas about 7,000,000 inhabi. tante. The country has been the scene of many important events, and the bat.' tlefleld on whith the EngXK4h, French, German and Spanieh arnues bave oftenï fought. It in no new thing for the Bel- glane to have armiez over-running thefr land.- Belgi m is probably the grave of, more soldiez~ethen lie buried in anyother countiy. Belgium used to bélong to Roi. land, but lui 1831 théy elected a king and the Dutch made war on them. Several foreign powérs interféréd and induced, thé -Dutch to desat- from hostilities. AUSTÉIA-HuNfGÂRY. Ancicntly called Noricu'm. It was an- nexed to thle Roman Empire about AýD. 33 and over-run by the 1111n , during the ôth and Oth centuries and taken fromn them by Charlemagne. He divided -the govérnment establishing kingdoms of Eastern Bavdria and Auotria. Louis The German, eon of Louis le' Débonnaire, about 817, subjugated Radbod, and os ruler of Austria, about 65 yéare later,, thé descendante of thé latter rose in Ba. varia againet the Empéror Charce the Fat, and eventually the rulers of Au$- tria were declared ýnn\u003cdiate princes of the Empire. Iaý 1156 the Kiugdom wa made a Ducliy by Emperor Fréderick 1, and in 1453 it was raised to, an Àrch Duchy by the Emperor Frederick II Rudolph, Count of 1lapsburg, electédl Emperor of Germany in 1273, acquired Austria in 1278, and f rom. 1493 to 1804 hie descendants were Emperors of Ger- màny. In 1804 the Emperor Francis II renounced the titie of Emperor of Ger- many and beca.me thé Empéror of Aus- tria as Fraucie I. Iu Auguat, 180, Francis becamé the Empéror of Austria only. The Empire was named the Aus- trian-Hlungary Mouarehy by decree No- vember, 1868. The Empire is now di- vided into two parts, eéparated by the. river Leithe. Its présent ruler la Frul- cis Joseph, who suceeeded Ferdinanid I, who abdiceted in favor.of the présent Emperer, December 2, 1848. Fm\"n\u0026i Ferdinand was heir présumptive to the throne until his recent assassiiatioi, which ie the direct cause of the préserà wa.GERMANY. The- old name for Germauy wos Ger- mania, and it waa 'ancieutly divided ito independent states. Thé Germons long. resisted the Romans, and although Rorne conquered parts o! thé country ctheY were éxpelled béfore A.D. 300. In the fifth century the Huns and othér Eoat- ern tribes f rom Ruesia over-ran Ger- many and conquered it. In the latter part of the 8th century Charlemagne 01 France conqueréd the Saxons and Other tribes and was crowned Emperoi Of Germany at Rome, Dec. 25, 800. At the eiAnction of his family thé Empire be- came elect'ive and was held mostly bY thie Hapsburgs 1437 to 1804. After the war with Frahce which éndéd in 1872 Gerrnany concluded a confederartiofl be' tweèn the grand duchies o! Baden sud Hesse, Bavaria and Wurtemberg, and on. dan. 18, 1871, Wdlliam I wae proclaimed Emperor. He died in 1888, and wa5s OC ceded by Fredérick William. On June 15, 1888, thé present. Empéror, William\" If. was roclaiimé-d Emperor. Nicho borniin 1894 aun Darmsti Victoria Bngland Albér thé lath Duches Albert boru 1. 1903; s Jose, b( Prg -M. R Bar le 1 from a fathér, . tor Gen Hé diéd camé Pi agé of 2 énce o1 eulogy 01 From \"Voltair Departir showed tact. Hé su thé nint dahion( Hé rel1f Agricult Kin Peter ondî's th and Draj in Juné, in11883 t Who (lied 8?11, Cr\u003c Grandi(J datîgliter",
         "WAR- ient time by Julius ia about Imd 4~t je ted COU-. nent is a , founded 0 inhabi. the scone ithe bat. French, Rve often7 the Bel- idng their grave of any other g toHROI. king and Several induced Lities. vas an- )out ÂýD. 1during id taken .e divided gdoms of jouis The bounairo, ,and as irs later,, se in Ba- arlos the of Aufi- \u003crinces of dom wau xderick 1, an Arcli brick III eleeted acquired to 1804 of Ger- 'rancis II 7of Ger- Sof Ans- nt, 180, 1 Austria the Ans- ,cree No- nov di- i by the is Frui- linand I, tpreseut Francis re te the isination, B proment was Ger- ided into ans long. gh Romne zry .Lhey In tho ier Eut- tran Ger'- Lie latter naglO 01 ,nd other pereli of '.At the npire bo- ostly by Uter the in 1872 ution be- Lden and an sd on,. vas am. on JulO wiilliaml Emperor of Rus8ia N-iicholas II, Emperor «IFRu1ia, vas born in 1868. Ho came 'to the throne in 1894 and msrried Princess Alice of Hesse Darmstadt, a ýgrnddaughter of Queen Victoria and cousin of Oeorge V of England. King Albert of Belgium Albert I of Belgium is the nepliew of the late King Leopold IL. 'Ho married Duchessý Eliza.beth of Bavaria. King\" Albert has two sons: Prince Leopold, boru 1901, sud ,Prince Charles, born 1903; alsof -a daugliter, Princeas Marie Jose, born 1906. President -of France M. Raymond Poincare was born at Bar le Duc on Aug. 20, 18M 'Ho cornes fromn an old Lorraine family. Hie father, Antony Poincaré, bOcame Inspec- tor General of Ralway sud Irrigation. Ho died in 1911, ju st before hie son be- carne President of the Council. At the age of 23 h\u0026was Secretary of the confer- once of lawyers ,and pronounced -au ouiogy on D ufaure whic~h won admiration. From 1Sà3-188o lie wrote for the \"Voltaire.\" Ho vas elected Senator for Departrnent of the Meuse in 1913 sud showed 'vonderful union of force sud tact. He succeeds Monsieur Fallieres sud is the nin'th Chief of State since the foun- dation of the Republic on Sept., 1870. Ho reaigned his position as Minister of. Agriculture to take the Preeident's chair. King Peter of Servia Peter I, King of Servis, vas born 1846 and is the son of Alexander Karageorgevic and Di-aga of Servis, who were murdered in June, 1903. King Peter vas married in 1883 to Princess Yorka of -Montenegro, who lied in 1890. The engagement of his 'Y', Crown Prince Alexander, to the Grand Duchess -Olga of Russia, oldest dangiter of the Czar, lias been rumored. A Distinguis1aed General ý tihRoyal Family at'Britain leada the royal familios and Intimate political affiliation. present King, George V, \"Iby the of God, of ýthe United Kiugdom, of Oritain and Ireland and of 'the Dominions Beyond the Seas, Defendor of the Faith, Emperor ,» vas boraJune 8,1865, auceed- ie father, Ed%¶ard VII, May 6, 1910. married Prinoess Victoria Mary of , (May 26,* 1807), on July 6, 1893. ~children are: war Albert.Prince of Wales .... 1804 rt Frederick ................ 1895 ris Alexandra Mary ......... 1897 *nry William................. 1900 4eorge Edward.................. 1902 jýhn Charles................... 1905 Many rulers of Europe are grand- \"tIdren of Quecu Victoria and are either flnt cousins or brothers and sistors, as !ollows: George V, England, son of Edward VII; Queeu Maud, Norway, deugliter of Edward VII; EmperorWil- latm of Germauy, son of Princess Victoria; Quecu Sophia Dorothbes of greco, daughter of Princesa Victoria; Carins of Russia, daughter of Princes Alice; -Queen Victoria of Spain, daughtor ~fPrinceas Bestrice. On lier splentdid naval base * ad -coloby in the Yellow Sea, Gormany lias spent uutold wealth sud labor. Tiie Japanese, it is clear, are bout on totally destroying the huge -commercial position v hicli Ger- many bias built np in the Far Bast sud the Pacific. More bitterly oppomed te (Jermany than they vere to Russia, the' Japaneso are in the smre position as the Frenchi. They have a \"revanche\" te carry ont. - When they emerged victoriens from their war with China, in 1895, it was Cormauy that wove the idiome by whicli Japan 'Was, robbed of Liao.tuug snd forced te prepare - for war wiih Rusdia. Groat, Britaim'a Food snpplyý .t has been s gonorai impression that Great Britain would flnd it s difficuit matter te f ced lier millions vithout the assistance. of German and - Austrian Empire\u0026. Iu part, tiireamazingly rapid growth of production in the Dominions is responsible for our relative indepeiù- dence of the German Powers. Over 80 per cent of our wheat, for instance, nov cornes fromn Canada aud our overses, kinsnu.'The.greater part, et ,.ir '.meat cornes from South America, the Colonies, tfi United States sud Denmrark, in the order given. From noue of these, quar- tera is the anpply iu the least likely te fall off. Dsiry produce, sucli as butter, cheese sud eggs, vo buy in the. main from Scandinavia sud Holland-good friends of ours-sud our owu Colonies. Lt - las been said that vo roly largely upon Cermany for potatoes. Tiis ie net se. She dees not supply ns witli quit. tvo per cent of the. 400,000 tUe '14ve imnport, sud even this minute quantlty consists of the very early potatoes, which ve can essily, do vithout. Our supplies of sugar yull undoubtedly sufer throughi the var, because vo get about haîf of tliem from Germany snd Aýustro-Hungary. eut in the firet place vo can largely reduce oui~ congumptiu of sugar witliout, in the case of adulte, inujeý r, bw.tbin lteu 1b ïq\u0026 secqu4iy, va un une or is froely oltmunàble, and â * -iýëw lent for sweetnng purposes; lâ*a4, 1 it is beet sigr vhloh 'we draw' froIeý the.Qerman Pv.ers, anid the miutting off of thla viii stimulate the traite lu cane sugar vitii our D'ominions nd ur foreign friends, to thir great cotnt Then, apart f r4m theupli which vo obtala aormally~, thailhs te the operatibosa of the. Navy, wè ubali. divert to Brtish ports. for tii. use of the British Wpçple large quantlties of foodatufs ,W1iICIIordlnarily, p t. Ger- many and Austo-JIunay. Finlyl, Our owa harveat, tth priurlpal source of food suyI is bofteous. So that on the, wtxoie John BU!sd'$s*unuing.up of him position, Md prospecta lnu e#prd -to food is \"ýGolng on qit. e i\u003e àa* you.\" General Smith-Dorrien, the successor of the lamonted (Jouerai Orieýion as comniander of one of the*army corps in the British Expeditiouary Fore, lhias ai- ready von 'distinction in- more than one hsrd-fought campaigu. la the éOutrai' relief 'expédition 'ane' the Tirah opera- tions ho played parts whieli clearly- marked hlm ont for the command v.hieh vwas given Min during the South 4frican War, that,. namely, of the lgth Brigade.' In tbis post ho proved him possession of tactical and strategical qualities of 'an exceptional ord r. frther north, ini the Orange.Free Stato, ho rendered services no leas great snd valuable, and viien lie vas subsequently appointed to command a division, anid made a major-general, these- steps *ere varmly -approved tliroughout thé army. Afterwards Goen- oral Smith-Dorrien, became Adjutant- (Joueral in Indis; ho vas made a lieu- tenant-genersi in 1906; and a full general in 1912, in w.hich year ho vas also given the Southern Cornuand. j apan anta Kiao Chau Lord Kltcheoer 's Counsel to the British Soldier \"Remember tiat the, houer of the. Britishi Army depends on your. ludividuai \"Lt vili be your duty net only te' set an example of discipline aud perfect steadiness under tire, but aIse 'te msiu- tain the. meet friendl\u003e' relations vith those vhom yon are belping lu this trouble. \"The operatious in whicli yeu are engaged viii, for the meut part, take place lunea frioudly country, sud yen Canada, Augiralia, New gs.uAd South- Afrim,5 Jadis, NotW kaIxl-- tliey aIl recognime that w.. Are uoutI. ably lluked la latereat, i f\"; hIn- ur ideals . ow 1quiekl\u003e' thy i th meanlng of lth *\"var; the,, M*de *0 aggression, tii,*. ambition of autoçraey *1x1 a receus W#I determined te umske hi ew mire suprerne oeer .ail tbe* ,\u0026r$dk-4\"isad8. With the clearor vi'sion of the. oversea. people \"vho, bfesus.of théi disue, and theîi solation. have far .1ta, 4tii0, eaW that thua vas s ~war for the '-po« vation of amal nations, for th* r*ts of nationalitios, hovever luagi4at; for the eurity 'of the. one sSill msn against the dominnt rmny. ]Ney 414 not wait te roesmop; tii.\u003e' as,, tli* From the niaterial aide, theinitui*. peudence of the, luteremia of tii»Brtislh Empire wam brought hêmeo t en e fore var was deoIýred between Ger- muauy aud Engimnd b\u003e'the qchaos 0* their malt stock oxohangeu, Oa\"I4aà finauciali nterests ame luterlinked witii those of many nations, augi If ah. Iiad ueeded the. lesmon, 1h vau there for lier nuhen ber gr i- exchauen se vel l a e stock exchanges uddeiiiy OOUgosted st the tlireAt and not theo operation ot *ar. No one in aIL. the, EPIPIre doeIred this war; fev la. ail thia Empire iii flincli- uow ta e a o.iu.a it hias corne ve have, found At the YOiy start unlty of iaterest, brotherhpod and understanding; snd Jif vovin,thie fabrie of this Empire, from hie utane to the. Mukrumbldgee, viii. b. \"baud upoù the. people'\u0026 vili, andail, tii. people\u0026s wiL\" laI the readjustmenta' of national boumdaries iu Europe,-sud the nov dis- position of races, it viii b. found that there is only oue race throughout the proeut British Empire. The ' railva\u003e'. of bri\"have b st ail Points put l h iam.4 f« th* gouocy. The Goverumt veMo» e evevy possible way. Ib Arrangements bave b#ee . vounded. This part o w ovoked he unshipheit Sn« of$t4 , tieus of the poubfe, esPww0 04rtim the. vornen of theietouwaé1w orgaulsed it ite 1.4rou ma.,'ok p lng partie. lu every hown a Tii.\u003e 4re réady to des! witii the *ýjm484 vihenever the. ralwas abulug . hom. Thousanda of houeeholders of ait àla.s have offered their resldees for use as' liompitals, convalescent homes, ete.",
         "THE-t014 WAR-ILLttUlRATED Fuill sized illustrations of \"five o'clock tea biscuits\" served to Houghton's \"Hell Hounds\" at Salisbury Plains. On the reverse side of the biscuit is written the names of fourteen members of the Machine Gun Section of the Canadian Overseas Force. Members of Houghton's (Canadians) Machine Gun Corps at Salisbury Plains. Captain Critchley, who operates a large ranch in Alberta, and his three sons, all of whom are now fighting for the Empire. Each is more than six feet in height and all are in Strathcona's Horse. The Canadian Troops ir Camp on Salisbury Plains",
         "THE 1914 WAR-ILLUSTRATED Sweden, King Gustav. Denmark, king Frederick. Norway, King Haakon. The three Scandinavian kings accompanied by their ministers cf foreign affaira and secretarie*s met Dec. l8th and 19th at Malmo, southern Sweden, te discuss affaira of common interest which have arisen as a result of the war. The meeting was arranged byKing Gustav (left\u003e. wlîç invited King Frederick of Denmarl\u003c (center) and King Îfaakon of Norway (righit) to visit him at Malmo. This meeting may be the mont mementeus one since war hroke out as it may result in an alliance cf the three Scandinavian kingdoms ini a new triple alliance or tjiple entente. If such be the case then a new and powerful alliance cf Europan nations will have been bôrn. ft is altogether unlikely tlat the Cermnsor Als would attempt te attack any one of these Scandinavian ceuntli es when it is understood that tliey are united fnr defensive purpeses against any such possible attack. It is understcod, should an alliance of the three nations take place, it would be in the form of an alliance for defence only, ne aggressive alliance being contemplated. rteen * An orderly, in the Royal Armny Medical corps -went eut te attend to a badly wouaded officer. While lie was applying bandages a shot hit lhlm and ho knew ho was mortaill woundcd. Nevertheless he cainmly went on wlth his wcrk, saving te officer's lfei, and ha barely finished it ere lie feil dead. Belgian Soldiers. In front of the tree trunk a pit has been dug and covered wlth branches. Belgian and Britisli cavalry wintcring ini the trenches. Afitr a fierce artilèry Ijorbardment in east Prtissia the main Russian force; advanced \\'dtLh the bayonet and enveloped tlAe German Ieft. The Germansfled from the trenclles and were cut uP in smýall parties T'he. gallant/ cliarve of the London Scottish 4- 19",
         "THE 1914 WAR-:-LLUSTRA1eD Canadian officers in Londonr, Eng1and. In centre is Sir Frederick Borden, a former Minister of Militia. Germnan ministers arriving at the Reichstag. Caring fo r the wounded horse 'in war. A veterinary surgeon performing an operation under chloroform on the field. Canadian ndlitiamen at play in camp. A chauffeur wounded four times driving British staff officers about a battlefield. Fren~c1i soldiers distri ýutinig part oX4ieir rations to poor children. Russian tr ansport wagonis'crossing a river in Poland. Transport difficulties of tic Austiianis--Ctins ld wagons stuck iiin uddy ground. Im \u003ct\u003e t aski\u003et cll cwau 11. se Cadîe ts i na musi cal ride. ('alt~. i tu (\u003e,1w~ t \\Iîiîar (îllege enlgaged in phlysica] exercises. c r,' 30' a ~.",
         "TrHE 1914 WAR-ILLUSTRATED German guns abandoned by troops of the Kaiser during the battie of the Marne. The guns were captured by General Frenc's \"Contemptible little army.\" Developing the Organisation of the British Land Forces by Creatlag Armies: The Commandera of the Firet Six Armies. A ne w army order announces the further developnent of the organization of the Land' Forces by tbe creation of Armies, each of which will consist generally of three Armny Corps. Sir Dougla Haig, born in 1861, has won hiîçh praise from Sir Jo hn French during the war. e sad served under himn in South Africa, and under Earl Ktitchener ini the Soudan. The remaining five generals portrayed above are ail famous for the dis- tiuguisbed parts they have taken in various campaigns. The Canadian Transport ini a flooded road on Salisbury Plains. lriving ýfield. Comrades of Garibaldi's grandson buried on the battlefield in the Argonne. General Garibaldi bas five other sons servin g in, the ,Italianýïvolun*eer contingent of the French Foreigo Legion. Celebrating Mass among the French troops at the battle front. A Royal Gift. The motor ambulance unit, comprising 45 niotor vehicles, 5 motor lorries AH!repair wagons, as well as 12 miotor cy cles, prescnted by 'Maharajah of (-walior t,) ,His Majesty King George, 1aradiiig before Lluckingharn Palace. Trrainiiig an anti r aftt Vickers' machine gun in the field for use against German flying machines.",
         "32 THE 1914 WAR-ILLUSTRATED- First Women's Valunteer Relief Corps Organized by Women of Great Britain. Nat ta be outdone by the male sex, who are doingi gloricus work at the front, there luas «ust been organized by women wha are desiraus of proving ta their country that in times lof war, women -alsa may, in manifold ways help their government, the Wamens Volunteer Reserve. Tbe abject of the Reserve Corps whose headquarters is in the Old Bedford Cag, London, is ta turn over ta the war office a body of trained wamnen, skilled in first ai, ooking, sigîlaging, telegraphy, marksmanship, carrying dispatches and driving and handling horses. The photo shows a clasa receiving instructions in sending messages by means of the telegraph instrument. Marti~i law in Egypt. Examining passports at Partý Said and S-uez. Excited Turks listening ta the proclamation af war on the \"«Oppressors of Islam.\" .A cleverly concealed buses. agun hiddeil Tlelgian cavairy look-out climbing ai tali tree near Ostend. S;0nme of the. 10,000 recently captured Atistrian prisoners marching through a Serbian town. Windmilll used hy \u003cCelman sharpshooters. T1his windmill on the Nietiport-Dixnitide o proved a very colivfliunt ý;hcter for a detail, of (.,crmjaIl sharpshooters whose purpo..u1 was to pick off as nj4ny of the Allied 6ighters as~ got withiii range of their gun S. A d\u0026t til ,of Briîikh soldlierz riisbed the imnprovis;ed fort and captiued it and the Gernian inark-rriei, tLxercising conv-le.eernt animaf a t a British veterinary camp in France t t",
         "THE 1914 WAR--ILLUSTRATED German engineers busy removing obstructions against their advance. A tunnel was blown in by the Belgians on one of the main railways of the country in their attempt to check the advance of the Germans. French and Belgian convoy at Furnes. A scene in the market square, on their way to the front. British commissariat wagons bringing supplies to the forces. A batch of German prisoners being brought into Furnes from Nieuport. British troops snatching a brief rest in a French town. Ruins of an auto factory after the bombardment of Albert, France, by the Germans. All thats left of German aeroplane captured by the British royal flying corps near the battlefields around Meaux. Drawing heavy French artillery into position at Dixmude. n. ere has n times \u003elunteer ledford illed in driving essages",
         "THE 1914 WAR-ILLUSTRATED Canadian Contingent on Parade in England. *A fight in the air above Dixmude JR which the Germnan airerait cornes to grief. M.. M1ý Indian troopa at the front with their pack mules. 1 t. Frencli infantry bringing in German prisoners aiter a stubborn fight. Egyptian troops w ho ~ Uî.r Turks. One cf the regiments of well trained native soldiers with which Engl'nd liotes te fi ustrate the attempta of the Ottoman Empire. k; ~ w, . - .~t ~;, 'I",
         "THE 1914 WAR.-ILLUSTRATED Red Cross workers in one of the mmcnd streets of Nieuport, where the fighting was flercest. Gernian shelîs were stili falling when this photo was taken. Belgian refugees leaving the town of Ostend by the road, protccted by British s\u0026dera. Germans looking at their handlwork: a ruined church. British wounded attcnded by a1 Frenot hosteau. Wounded Algerian sharp-shooters arriving in Paris from the north. British Red Cross motor ambulance capable of carrying six wounded men. German device1 A regiment of French, dragoons resting after a long march to take up an offensive position. Sonie are wrtlng, saine are cooking and others cleaning. for evading barbed wire acroas roadways at night while travelling mn motor cars. British artnored mnotor c?\u003e carrying maxim gun. Note the protection of wheels and body of car. -. ~ i - - 4 * .4-~ - A British marine making friends. soldiers e.",
         "WLtJSrrRAT~» British hospital shiPRohilla, foundered off the coast of Whithy while on her way ta Dunkirk ta, take off waunded Belgian and English saldiers. An exciting incident in the town cf Senlis, France. Mfter belng in oeccupation'of Senlis for three days, burning the town and sbootlng tbe mayor, the erans were suddenly surprlsed by a dash of Turcos, who whlrled into the town ini taxicabs, and after a ferce fight drove out the invaders. Weaterners waiting their turn at the Rifle Butta, Valcartier Camp. French burying 300 German, soldiera in a trench. In this skirmlsh 300 tel! on each aide., WIIIll I 1M Ppe fMohammedans Y.lrHoy War? On'tse attitude of SheU.-UI-lslam, thse head of01tbo Mohtguâodan Church, deipond thse 1iv aud.ouuity of the. Chriatiana in Turk!y. Wbile hia fojow.r. ut present are wavcring auaeo whlc h Md. theY wf£ollow, all.eyez (chmltlkn and 'Uobammedan as wçll) are tamned to- ward tise Protpb. tof hi, church. Shoul4 he dc.a. Hol War, the resmit woald b. apiâql g. Should h. decide te be n2eatral or leaf a tifile ton mach tcward thse Allies, It may b. tisat popalar feeling .will b. tronger thau çhurcis tiea and affiiationa. If the latter be the case thse Holy War la Inevitable. Refugees fleeing tram Turkey reportg rave dange even now te the Chriatians, and gay that brigandage, murder and attiocitbes . are belng ccmmnitted againat the Armenlan Christians. Fighiting King of Belgium and French President Poincare reviewing Allies at Furnes. In the rear seat cf car the King isa t lef t of the President. Leopold Dewau, who was bayaneted by German soldiers and afterwards forced to march in front of their troops. I ~ The Germans in camp near Ostend. This picture of the Gemman camp behind the fighting liues between Ostend anid Dixmude aerves ta ahow the type of German aaldier the Allilea have ta overcome in the battle te determine the possession ot the Belgian Coast,. Steers brought into a French camp ta feed ane cf the brigades.",
         "THE 1914 WAR-ILLUSTRATED Effect of FIrintg on'Cuùwaa Top dotted line shows the lin. cf fllght off isiee hwltsel of cupela, the exact range having been ascertained by the 9 declared. The bottom dotted lines reprebent 11eId-sun firea Scupola. Bard work with the suppty wàgons là- new Firsft Sca Lord, Admirai Loa4 Fisher, whose motte is: \"Bit first, hit bard, and it anywhere.\" Russia before war. Women When th'e men are mobilizcd. Typical children on the reaping near the frontier. A female bricklayer at work Austro-Russlan frondier. ln Finland. The. British Motor Ambulance Corps mobilized and drilling. Englsh ed rossVolnters. Making woolen shirts for a hospital ship H1. U. the. Empress Eugenie, widow of Napoleon III congratulating one of -the. wouWudd British soldiers convalescing at her beautiful' hqme \"ýarnborouegh\" Chisichuret, Eglanid. wbich she ha» converted into a military hospital.'- The eied Emprus hbaot adme\"n vicissitudes ini ber life. She became the bride of Napoen III on Jaqiry 3th. 1853. Five years later, on jainuary 14th, 1858, Orsini attempted te assassinat. the ruler of France by flinginq two bembs lite the carriage conveying him and the Empress Kugenle te thceopera. Netther vas scvcrely injured. Th1e greatest criais ini her lfe vas thre eath of th.e xiled Napoceon at Chisieburst, ber home in England, January 9th, 1873. Erfglish Red Cross Volunteers. '",
         "THE 1914 WAR-ILLU'S1RATED Belgian wounded arriving at Folkestone, England, in charge of a British Nurse and Boy Scout. The Belgian reception in Great Britain was one of cordiality and affection. A German trap for British military cars. Broken glass is spread upon the road that the tires may be punctured and the occupants of the cars held up under the enemy's fire. Enjoying a game of football in the Cardian camp at Salisbury Plains, England. German prisoners captured by the French at Arras. v Canadian soldiers returning to quarters after a ard morning aeld practice on Salisbury Plains. C? .1 The Ca The King, Queen and Lord Kitchener leaving Bustard Camp, Salisbury Plains, Englànd, after reviewing the Canadian soldie! The King is seen almost directly under the sign post Lord Kitchener is at the right of the illustration. I 'N 'N il",
         "THIE 1914 WAR-ILL'USTRATED 1I ý Germans guarding Belgian Prisoners in the market square at Malines. Madame Patti, the world's greatest singer, visita woun'ded in Engallah hospitil, The President of France on ihis way to visit the troops at the front. An Antwerp fort destroyed by Belgians before evacuating. 'Army Service Corps distrlbutlng bully-beef to die. firlng lin.. Ille Canadian contingent marching across the parade grounds at Bustard Camp, Salisbury Plains, England, where they were reviewed by the King, 'Queen, Lord Kitchener and t4e late Earl Roberts. 7-7-'",
         "THE 1914 WAIý-ILL iUSTRATED The type of Air Figliter used by the British Armny. Maharajah or, Mysore Maharajah of Alwar 'ents at Valvartier Canip riýn over rout. ami one-hlai miles Maharajah of larocia Valcartier Camp. TypIcal Cook Camp Thre Cavalry Non-Com. looks pleasant l spite or bis change of steed The affectionate regard of the British Tommy for his mate will le a kindly memory of the present fierce struggle. Each for ail, and ail for each, is the splendid inotto. Canadian Oflcers at Valcartier Camp",
         "A ~ -i ~ 3 s f. THE- 1914 WAR-ILLUSTRATED Canadian Infantrymen in the Mobifization Camp al Vaicartier. Passlng over a p ontoon bridge constructed over the Jacques Cartier River by the Eigneer Corps is pleasant ln )f steed o)f the British le a kindly erce struggle. eacb, ie the A Bugici of tMe Jt Winnîipeg 1tîfleýi souniding Revelle Members or fi Compaîny, Strathcona Horse, Winnipeg Body of Stratjhfona Ilorse, oif Winnipeg, on parade at Valcartier C1mnp VIcartier Camp. On the outskirts or the lines, sbowlng groc ery store, type or canteen tln use Y.NM.C.A. Camp at Vaicartler",
         "trHÈ 104 WA1R-ILLUttgtRATED, Alongside the Transports. Canadian Expeditionary Force took Borne fine horses. Some of the troopers are here seen preparing to load their horses on the transports. Note the 4.7 gun mounted on the deck of the \"Montezumna.\" How the horses were put aboard. This interesting illustration depicts the me!thodýq employed in loading the horses of the Royal Canadian Dragoons of the Canadjan Expeditionary Force. They ernbarked on the transport \"Laconia,\" which is seen alOngside the quay. -1 f4 Canadian Field Hospital No. 1, which accompanied the Canadian Force ta the front, on the narýh frgm 7âcartier ta Quebec priar to embarkation. The Serious Buçinesq af Moving an Army Division. Over 30,000 Canadian troops with lull equiprnent have been safely landedjin England. Embarkatinn of Aiherta Horse. The arrival of the'Aiherta Horse at the Quebcc wharf ready ta ernbark on the transports. Canadian Expeditft\u003enary Force off ta Old England. Ilis Royal Higliness the Duke of Conraight reviewing troops at Edmonton, Alberta, prioi ta their entraining fur the front. In the direct rear LieUt,.Governàr Bulyea. Ruinutl. eWý,ian Bridge repaired by German Engineers. 1 42",
         "M4W P-rTSr.lË Vaicartier Camp. Recruits at, rifle butts eethod.q -anadian iS Seen Valcartier Camp.' Getting ready for Sunday Service Showing Bridge Guard, near the Camp Ilth Battalion, comprising men or WinNiipeg, Saskatoon, Regina, Moose Jaw and Prince Albert rngland. Valcartier Camp. Section ofA Itith Battalion rcturning fro\u003emnt ie practice Valcartier Camp. Artillery crossing pontoon, Jacques Cartier River. Poiltoon is 350 feet long. Was constructed ln four hours by Royal Canadian Engineers, Major Bethune Lindsay, or Winnipeg, ln charge This wvagon does awnay with Af reriiselncinerators cannait handie at the camp TI C intense Ioyalty of Canada to the. Motherland was quickly shown in the Northland, \\' k sx ýithin two weeks of the decaration of war 2,700 men gathered at Edmonton, N,1 -thern Alberta's military centre, and entrained for the front. Further troops are now b eilg mobilized. The majority of tbese men were veterans of other wars. To enlist some of these men came four hundred miles tram the interior where as yet railroad lnes have ilût been laid. They walked some of the way, and came some ot't-c-way y river steamer. Valcatier Camp. Showing 60 poundier 4- -",
         "44 THE 1914 WAR-ILLUSTRATED Famnous Parisian Race Track turned into Pasture ln anticipation or a siege or Paris, whicli, so rar, has rortunately flot occurred The Monuments, Waterloo An Armored French Aeroplane Armored Howitzer used by French in pursuing German Army The French Monument, Waterloo The Mound, Waterloo Rer ugees wi ti)i Tlig' naklng their w~ay out or France",
         "THE 1914 WAR-ILLUSTRATED French Marines welcomed by residents of Ghent. The Marines are seen marching through the streets of the Belgian town. Boiler Works Converted into Hospital for Wounded French Soldiers. French Infantry attacking Cermian position in France. This was one of the richest farning.Jistricts in France, but now ravaged by the Germans. Since this picture the 9%cenc has somnewhat changed and France is once more in possession. In the FIring Uine, of the French Army. -A soldier defending a wounded coinrade and at the sanie thie obtalnlng a firmsupport for hi\u0026 rifle. A scene otten witnessed lu the present struggle. A hospital wrecked by German shells at Lierre, near Antwerp. Six wounded soldiers were killed in their beds. Peace and War in the Champagne Valley French soldiers marching throuqh, a vineyard in the champagne country of France, where the peasants are pcking grapes for the famous sparkling wmne. Wotunded Frencli So1diers, from the Battie of the Aisne. The first captured.German Gun brought to London. 1 1",
         "J t. - ~- --t A t't V 1\u003c THE 1914' WAR-ILLUSTRATÉD !r Pri ffP-P i Ilr ti i Ilé 'I ý MMuî iîlg \" ljttl i 1)0l ' r'ent' .t11'ti \"'tibi s r oîîjîU iiîri Gencral .loeph Joffre, Commande,' iii ('lite r iMheI'r'ench Arniy 't I I t f \\E U(11. (1 lk «1 -1 f- 1 11 '# :1 1!1'ý 1 1ý,1 '(ý1 1i1 , 1-,);l(1 1,ý 11;1 i\\Jiîi'i'-tr i i i ttii U )ait b i i i ig fi ) r t r'îniji i' t iiiii 1lo n wa' z Itt'Jt~t ,t W '' ti i N t,, J, t i ttdi 40 i~tt' ~1t 1%\u003e t ''I 'lu',, t'' \"p 41 ~) tl~i h s'' i. t'; Il",
         "THE 1914 WAR-ILLUSTRATED 47 tAz 'huXXng Niierc a Gernian Zeppelin Blerb drnpped fnto Antwerp - or Illhe 1Town iiall, hLouvaini, Iiigîî,î. Ille h;ithi hvhlat as lesh iioeil vh 1 ii î?Ii a;îî \u003cm Rigian viîîe'eu it fi, rrin hlîeir AIM e-1-p C [iv iîîîy i:l uIo *-I-t ;feti*iiais I.. ý k 1 ý 1 ý f.ýr 1 , 1, lý - ý 1 1 1 ý , ý 1,,ý , 1 _- 11 1 if, - i i, t 'f. 1 ;fý; ý! t'Ili A ý,fIj,,",
         "THE 1914 WARt-ILLUSTRATED Thec exodua cf refugees f rom Antwerp passing through Rosendaai in Holland. Fllght-Lleutenant C. H. Collet' of the Royal Naval Air Service, who dropped three bombe on the Zeppelin shed at Dusseldorf, Germany. One cf the 100-ton German Siege Guns. Officers of the German Staff considering miessages brought by aeroplane scouts whicb resulted iii the Germans being obliged to retreat. Wearlng hie stole over hie military unlform. A French priest on active service conductlng a comrade's funeral. Siege Guns, lent, to Germany by Austria, to assist in the Belgian campaign F 1 Germans in Antwerp. The Germans did flot treat Antwerp as badly as the did Louvain but on the alightest excuse would sacrifice life an1 property. BJicltýia Staîndards tattered by German Shelis. n n. ni",
         "THE 1914 WAR-ILLUSTRATED MARCH SONGS TRAMP, TRAMP, TRAMPI THE BOYS ARE MARCHING In'thç bivouac I sit, Thinking, rnoher dear, of you, And our briglit and happy home so far away; And the tears they fil my eyes. Spite of ail that I can do, Tho' I try to cheer my comrades and be gay. Chorus: Tramnp, tramp, tramp, the boys are marching, Chéer up, comrades, they wiIl corne; And beneath our country's flag WTO shalLbreathe the air again, 0f the free land in our own beloved home. 2 In the battie front we stood, When their fiercest charge they made; And they swept us off, a hundred men or more But before we reach'd their Uines They were beaten back disrnay'd, And we heard the cry of vict'ry o'er and o'er. Chorus. WREN JOHNNY COMES MARCHING HOME When Johnny Canuck cornes marching home Hurrah! Hurrah! We'll give hlm a hearey welcome home, Hurrah! Hurrah! The men will cheer, the boys will shout, The ladies they will ail turn out. Chorus: And we'll aIl feel gay When Johnny cornes marching home, And we'il ail feel gay When Johnny cornes marching home. 2 Cet ready for tlie jiibilee, Hurrah! Hurrah! We'll give the hero three times three, Hurrah! Hurrah! The laurel wreath is ready now, To place uipon his royal brow. Chorus. 3( Let love and friendslîip on that day, Hurrah! Hurrah! Their choicest treasures then display, Hurrah! Hurrah! And let each one perform his part, To fil with joy the warrior's heart. Chorus. JOHN BROWN'S BODY John Browvn's body lies a-mould'ring in the grave, John Brown's body lies a-mould'ring ia the grave, John Rrnwn's body lies a-rnnuld;'ring in the grave, His soul is marching on! Chorus: Glory! glory! Hallelujah! Glory! glory! Hallelujah! Glory! glory! Haleujah! His soul is marching on! 2 The stars of heaven are looking kindly lown\", The stars of heaven are looking kindly down, The stars of heaven are looking kindly down, On the grave of old John Brown. Chorus. 'H'sgoetobeasodirinth rm o heKig He's gone to be a soldier in the army of the King, Hle's gone to be a soldier in the army of the King, Juis soul is marching on. Chorus. 4 John Br-o%%,i's knapsack is strapp'd upon lus hack, -John Brown's knapsack is strapp'd upon his back. John Brcyvii's knapsack is strapp'd upon lus back, His soul is marching on! Chorus. 1 IT'S A LONG, LONG WAY TO TIPPERARY 1 Up to migiXty London camne an Irishman one day, As the streets were paved with goid, sure every one was gay, [Square, Singing songs of Piccadilly, Strand and Leicester Till Paddy got excited, then lie shouted to thern there- Chorus: \"It's a long way to Tipperary, it's a long way to go; [girl I know! It's a long way to Tipperary, to the sweetest (Àood-b)ye Piccadilly, farewell Leicester Square, lt's a long, long way to Tipfierary, but nmy liear1t's righit there.\" 2 Paddy verote a letter to his Irish Molly 0', Savling, \"*Should you not receive it, write and let me know! If I make mistakes in spelling, Molly dear,\" said he,1 \"Remember, it's the pen that's bad, don't lay the blame on me.\" Chorus. 3 Molly wrote a neat reply to Paddy ', Sayin g, \"Mîke Maloney wants to marry me, and so [blame. Leave the Strand and Piccadilly, or you'll be te For love hlas fairly drove me silly, hoping you're the same.\" Chorus. MARCHING THROUGH BELGIUM Bring the good old bugle, boys, we'll sing another song, [along, Sing it with a spirit that will start the world Sing it, as we used to sing it fifty thousand strong, While we are marching through Belgium. Chorus: Hurrah, hurrah, we bring the jubilee! Hurrah, hurrah, the flag that makeg- you free. So we'hl sing the chorus te our Allies by the sea, While we are rnarching through ýBelgium. 2 Proud the fame of Belgium's name they wept writh joyful tears, When they saw the honored flag they had net seen for years; Neyer could they be restrain'd froni breaking .forth in cheers, While mie were marching through Belgium. chorus. 3 So we made a thoroughfare for freedom and hier train, [Main; Sixty Miles in latitude, three hundred to the Treason fled. before us,'for resistance was in vain, Whiile wve 'ere marching through Belgium. Chorus. WILL YE NO COME BACK AGAIN? 1 Bonnie Charlie's noo aw-a, Safely 'o'er the friendly main; Mony a lieart ill break in twa, Sliotild lie rne'er corne back again. Chorus: WiIi' ye no.corne back again? Will yc no corne back again? Better lo'ed ye canna be, Will ye no corne back again? 2 Ye trusted in your Hieland men, Thiey triisted yeni, dear Chiarlie! Thiey kent yotir hiding in the glen, i)eath and exile braving. Chorus. 3 j-nghrjsi.'hrilws es re a' in vain, Tliô, puiir and~ puirer ive maun be; Sil I-h. ('1111a hiiv thie lien r-t That ai t ht';ts '«arm for tline and thee. Chorus. THE SOLDIERS 0F TEKING Britons once did loyally declaim, About the way' we ruled the waves; Ev'ry J)riton's song was juat, the smre, When singing of our soldier braves. Ali the world has héard it, wonder'd why we sang, And some learned the reamon why. But we're forgetting it, And we're letting it ýFade away and gradually die, Fade away and gradualiy die. So when we say that Englard's master, -Remember whor has made \"her no. Chorus: It's the soldiers of the King, my lads, Who've been, my lads, who'veseen, iny lads, In the fight for Englandîs glory, lads, When we have to, show thern what 1we mQ\u0026U And when we say we've always won, And when they sask us how it's doue, We'll proudly point to every one 0f Englands Soldiers of the King. War clouda gther over every land, Our flag is thrleaten'd euat \u0026n, wetr Nations that we've saa«s by the. ha*d, Our boTd resources try to test. They thought they found us sleeping,.ý Thought un unprepared, because. we Lve o--our 'Buty nglsmen uute, whe S rty wurs; nte hn hyr dltt Thke battie for Old Englanes'm onioause, The battie for Old England'. conimon causa. go when we say that Zuglanfflsmenate, Remember who han made bar mo. Chorus. PRIVATE TOMMY ATIEINS' Oh, we take him froin the ity or the plough, And we ariR him and we drem hlm. out soi neat, W. teach hlm to uphold him manly brow, And how to walk, and where to _put hie feet; It doesn't matter whoh. vus beome, Or what his parents faucIed for hi\u0026 nains\u003e Once he's poketed the shilling, aud aLuniforân he'min ing, We caîl hlm Tommy Atkins aIl the smre. Chorus: Oh 1 Tommuy, Tommy AÂtkinm, you're a \"good un', heurt and hand,\" You're a credit te your eahlng and *Il your 1native land; Ms.y your luck be never failng, miy your gai be ever tria- God bleas you Tommy Atkius, here'm your country's love to you. Now in finie of peace he hearm the bugle cmii, In barracks, frai» \"Revally\" te «IÀghtseout,\" It \"Seutry go\" and \"Pipe-clay\" ever nali, There's always plenty mreofwok %bout. (in leave o'nights you meet hlm In the street, As happy as a achool boy and as gay; But then back he goem to auty, al for Englaud, Home and Beauty,, On the noble suni of thirteen pence a day. Chorus. 3 Then in time of war it's \"Tommy to the front,\" And we ship hlm out ln \"troopers\" te the scene; You it at home while Tommy bereý,e brunt, A-fighting for hie country -and hW Klng; And whother he's on Indla's coraI straiid, Pr pouring out his blood lu the Soudan, Juot to keep our flag a llying, he's a doing and, a dying, Every inch of hlm a soldier and a man. Chorus. 4 So it's Tommy dear we'll back you 'gainat the worid, For fighting, orfor funning or for work; Wlierever Britain's banner is.unfur led, To do your beat and neyer, ýever shirk. We keep the warmest corner in our hearts, For you, my lad, wherever you may be; By the Union Jack above yoù! Yes, we're proud of you and love you; (bd keep you, Tommy dear, by land and sea! Chorus. ollet, of the who dropped elin shed at ny. outs which Lmpaign",
         "y' t. ~r * r\"-,r- 7rAy - 4L -UM FRANCE-w r-SI GErk r-. JAPA BEL~uM RANC GERANYAUSTRIA- IlAL"
      ],
      "title" : [
         "The Western home monthly. : The 1914 War Illustrated"
      ],
      "type" : "document"
   },
   "version" : "0.4"
}
{
   "doc" : {
      "published" : [
         "Winnipeg, Canada : Home Publishing Co., [1916]"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Monthly"
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "k WINNIPEG, CANADA v APRIL, 191 THlY",
         "This Automobale For One Dollar Looks easy, docsn't it? Andit is justas easy as it looks. It is a real 5-Passengcýr Ford Touring Car, latest mode], and will be dclivered to ncarcst railroad station of the person who wins it.. No freiglit charges. Read the Conditions This automobile wlll be given to the person wloio lrst sends us the nearest correct estimate or the number of keî nes in four pounds or wlIedt, the estimates to fie accoin- panled by one or more sufiscriptions to THE NOR'-WEST FARMER for flot less than one year. The sampie of wheat was seiecteci by the Chier Grain Inspector's Office, Winnipeg, under the supervision of Prof, S. A. Bedford, Superintendent Manitoba Demonstration Farms, and seaied by hlm. It la a good average sample of No. 1 Nortlern, perhaps hair Ried l'ire and flair Marquis, weighis 64 Ifis. per mcasured bushel, and has been depositea In the vauits of the National Trust Co. for safe keeping, where it wili remaiin unti June 1 st, 'when l wil be opened and omiciall y colunteci by Prof. Bedford. Ait subscriptions rnust fie fer bonailde farmers living in Manitoba, Saskatchewan, Aberta or Ontario west of Fort William, .but inyone ran send thtým li. REMEMBER: Estimates wIli flot be coedited unlesa the eubecrfptIone aacompanylnig them are for bonafide farmers. How Many Estimates Do You Get? The regular sufiscription price of The Nor'-West Farmer is $1.00 per year; Iwo years, $1.50; three years, $2.00; four years, $2.50; flve years M3.00. A Stibseription for one year earns one estiniate, tMo years three estiniates, tijîce years ilve estiniates, four years sevea estimates, and fIve y cars tea estimates. The Nor'-West Farmer 1.9 Western Cauada's olest farm paper. lt. spublisle i innipeg on the sth and -)tl of eacli month, ad 1las tho only farm pàp;ër covering, thisfileld wv.lîoe subscription price Is not more than $1.0(0 per ear. Larfi issue is fuit or valuiable information of Interest tu every Western farinmer. PROF. S. A. BEDFOID Supt. Manitoba Demonstration Farmas, Chairman Provincial Wceds Commission, who selected the 4-lb. sample of No. 1 Nortbern Wheat, and who wiII open and officially count, it on June 1gt,. Contest Closes June Ist How to Make Vour Estimate ln making your estiunate It is flot neresary to cotînt every kiruel. T:ake one ouince, or fiaif a puund, count the exac t nuinber or kernels and iIoni tliat estiniate Sthe nuinfier or kernels ln Our 4-potund sample. BOYS AND GIRILS I Here'e a great chance for you to wln an automobile. Get the subscrîptions THE NOR'WEST FARMER LTD., Wirnnlp and senti ln yotîr estimiates at once. The Enrlosed please fInd ........... uIrst nmost îmarly correct estimiate that wo receive up to June i St ill get the auto- MI mobile without further expense. Use the ................. Coupon. If IrHro t .Il mie l. rprii s~iî.,seè1d ilu rvn ewîi namesud ,tim.nj U.Province ......... au to tatomnîflîle faii to whiiniest i jruta . colt,, d . 1h.e Nor'-Wost Farmor Ltd. Winnipeg, Canada peg, Canada.W... .for whicli sendiThe Nor'-West Farmer to . .P.0 . . . . . . .. . . . . . . . .lefl ..y as 1in esac h tti flI . ~ l iAiminîbile Contcst as foiinw.s; lc rd . . . . . .... . . .. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . A \"a t k j s- - ' Ask for thé New Packet In future, BLUE RIBBON TEA will reach the consumer in the new air-tight double package. This is far and away the most efficient method of packing tea. But only the largest packers can use it- as the process involves extremely costly apparatus. In place of the old lead p a5cket - easily punctured and fiable tQ rust - a dou ble thickness of absolutely ctust-proof, air-tight, ouled parchment and stout cartridge paper is used. The combination makes a perfect preventive of the slightest de te riration. In a word - a perfect wrapping for a perfect tea- BLUE- kJBBON i i i i M i M M M i i M M M M M M M M M M M M i i i M i i r j V V",
         "The Westen Home Mon thly Win . ...m..n.... 11m1n16.111\"n ..... n ................ m u,,n.rm . mm . , n e wt nn n .., . WetenM nhy Vol XVII. B Publlshed Montl, orte oePublishlng Co., Ltd, W innipeg, Canada. No. 4. w ... . ........ I.............. .......I n.................. i i i i i i M M i i i M t M M M M M M M M M M M i i i M i i M i i chOat witth \u0026Er Rme ACONSIDERABLE number of subscriptions, tocThe Western Home Monthly /Xexpire with this issue. To aIl whose subscriptions expire with this issue we have sent by, mail a subscription blank ais a reminder of the fact. Naw, we wish to ask if there ie a single -one of these rniny readers who regrets that hie or she subscribed for the magazine a year ago ? Haye you not received, ln instruction and entertainment, many times the value of the emall sum of inoney you ai s for the magazine? Has not the magazine been ail that we prornised itishould be, an.d.althat you could wish or desire? 'Have you natbeen pleased with it ever since you became a subseriber? We earnestiy hope that every individual one of those whose subseriptians expire with this issue *111 send us a renewval. of hi. or hier subscription for the corning year, and thet as rnmany as feel dlspoeed te do se will get up a club, mnd thus secure one or more of the valuable and useful rewards we offer. Remember, that if you get two frièzidte join you In subecribing, thus rnaking up a club of three, cadi will get thie'Ïagazine a whole year for a total cost. o f only, two dollars. For larger clubs we give fine prerniums. If yen will send for aur CopesOutfit for Getting Up Clubs f'or The Wflstern Home Monthly, wliich we send free you will receive our complets Premnium List, describing different articles given upon remarkably liberal terme. The grawing appeal of* this popular periodical le'due to thje fact that we embody in it the characteristies of a pubiain above ail indispensable ta the home. While it is primarily a fiction magazine, its various departments are of a high order of excellence. The Westepn Home Monthly is more popular to-day than ever before in its hisftory. Rarely does any one ever hesitate to subscribe when the magazine is once celled ta hie or lier attention. We do net wish te lose a single one of our present suhscribers, and do not see why we should. Trhe magazine costas uch a small suin that any one can afford to take it. Please send lan your subacription just as soon as possible. Do not put it off; do notneglect it. Rernember that for the modeet price of a yeer's subseription to The Western Home Monthly you provide yaurself with wholesome reading for a whole year te corne. LETTERS PROU OUR READERS The best of all Shall I çoiqfess it? 1, the busiest of housewlves and mothers, with four babies to care f6r, do love the \"stories\" best of ail., I enjoy every page of aur Western Home Monthiyd I read it 1roniý cover te caver, and receive great help fïoin its splendid departments. It seems that,, from gratitude alone, I should be moet interested in, the helps for busy mothers. But I verily believe that I get more réewl god froin your cean, wholeaom e love stQries. That \"aIl the world loves a lover\" is true of al l whom the milk of human kindness and \"interes3tedness\" in others bas not drIed up completely into pure selfishness. And then, we need just that recreation, a pure. delight for the tired mother ta drap down into her big, comfortable chair and wander away for an haur into io blissful land of lave and romance; ta came back refreshed in mind and body, ta bie mare tender and loving ta ber awn loved anes, ta feel afresh the thril of ber own ramance. Lave is, after ail, what le best. Let us have plet fgoprhnft lave Atories. .. let-àof god,-pur,.ha-e. 3fe .K. Alliùi, Modes Jaw, Sask. I think your \"varigus household'departments are the best of any of the similar.departments instituted by your competitore. The cantente lways show a careful seleetian of the rnany letters you are bound ta receive. Probably this letter froin a man will not receive the attention it would if written by a woman, therefore I will explain. My wife died four years aga, ,and, against the advice of neighbors and acquaintances, I deeided ta raise aur chiid niyself, and as I miss the help and assistance of a mather, I naturally turn ta any advice or suggestion that rings truc and sounds reasanable. And right here is where I need your paper. The discussions and suggestions contain genuine heip for one in my position. While the other features in your monthly stand out praminentiy when com- pared with any of those published in the journals which seil for flfteen cents, none dlaim my attention as do the departments ta which I, as father and mather ta a grawing child, offer my thaiÏksI e g .eflSsr Kingston, Ont., March Sth, 111116. Editor, \"Western Home Monthly,\" Winnipeg, Man., Dear Sir,-Being very much interested in Western Canada stories, which hatve sucli a large place in your magazine, I arn taking the liberty of writing you a few lines of approval of your magazine. It m'as only calied ta my atten-, tion a short time ago. by a friend wh6 knew how interested I arn in th ings Cana:' dian. A serial on the Peace River was just beginning, and I have folIayed this with absorbing 1n~terest. Please let Jme say, and I arn a reader of a good many magazines, many of which are higher priced than yaurs, how much I appreciat.ed this. Certainlv '.%r. Dickie's writing ahiiity is on par with many writers whose work I have heen foilowing in the largvr American magazines. Ail in allk your publication seems ta me quite equal to the American migazines I have been repading in the past. Hoping I have not-taken up too much of vour time, 1 arn, Sincerely yours, Mrs. Il. E. Bradbury (A Canadiaii Anicrican.) CleanlIfnesj K* tchen MADE IN CANADA Write Io Cudahy Parking Co., Tôon. Canao\u0026 for our bookiet\"a 'iS oHosoI* s. -I. #diade ln Canada by Lever 1Pothepe Umlted, Toronto.. mi' - J The Subsciription Price of The Western Hame Monthly is1.0 year or treyas for $2.00 to any address in Canada, or British Ilies. T he subscription E ta forcign countries is $1.50 a year, and witbin the City of Winnipeg limita and in the United States $1.25 a year. Remittancc, of small aums may be made with safety in ordinary Jettera. Sums of ane dollar 1~ more it would be well to, aend by registered letter or Money Order. Postage Stampa will be received the samne as cash for the fractional parts of adollar, and in any amount when it ia impassible for patrons ta procure bis. Change of Addres.-Subscribers wishing their addreaa changed must atate their former as well as new address. Ail communica tions relative ta change of address inut be received by us flot later than the Joth of the precedingr month. When You Renew be sure tg sign your name exactly the same as lit appeara an the label of your paper. If this is flot done it leada ýta confusion. If yau have rccently clianged your address and the papier bas been forwarded ta you, bo sure ta let us know the address on your label. 7 .......er ,t ,\"a ,ao oi i11r ieMl at'allo l1. ale iIiri nt nt i[l le n irn ii l r m ln i i o nIii iltr nna iIinti l l Il ii« l oilt a0 l Nor. r Il m. ner ta Dentali or New 'ystem eeth, without plates;. crowns, i layal kinds of fiEngr extra ctions or any other farm ai work perfarmed for you by the mast up-to-date methods. Sampe of aur wark shown and estimates given upon. request. No Porson tee Norveus NO Werk tee Dii out We SoNde Didficuit Came Where Other Hame Faid New Mothod Dental Parlors Canada's Best and Meut Up-To- Date Dental Office OFFICES; Cor. Portage and Donald WINNIPEG For @-Sfle Everythlng frmm an apple tre to) a strawberrn plai, Rhade, ymut, or,,am.ntal and ovI.mg,-en tnea Ornamêntal shnibs and vines.. rose, hardy flowering plants bulb, aaparagus. Ouaranteed storkat reaaonahl pricen. oetalog free. iliver blac k lnxes DOWNKAM BROU. Bax M. L tratbxoy, Ont.",
         "i ne western e monthly Save $85 to $.100 By )on P EASTER PIANO BELL Just at the season of the year when music is most ap- preciated. Here is your opportunity to secure a really high tgrade piano at this generous reduction from the genuine prie-and on the terme that are inost suitable to yourserf. We afford you the' opportunity of making your selection from any one of the forty different styles of pianos we hande- only showing here five makes that will doubtless prove the most popular. .Any responsible person on the mnarket to purchase a piano may apply for membership. By joining the club you are not only entitled to these great money-saving advantages, but to ail the other special concessions enumer- son ated below-and remember it costs notbing to join-merely fil out the coupon, have your name registered and then make vour selection before May l5th. CLUB CANADAPIANO CO. L Rgular club mSl $285j This Ofter Good Only UntE m..m.Um. \".. A. m . IbÉbC I.f»GERHAR -EfZM ANM IV ra K 7 K8iUk £ le 58E78yl8Eu i M Western Canada Not only that; but we guarantee saf e delivery of the instrument you choose, to yournearest station. We will deliver your piano immediately on receipt of your request to join the Club-and give you our unreserved guarantee as strong as words can make it. If after you have had the Piano for 30 days and aredissatisfied, we will give you your money back on return of, the Piano. PRIVIEGE 0F EXCHANGE BiniELOO-MANNIXGI Privilege la given al club members of ex- chaniging, within one year, for any flew piano sold by us of equal or greater list value at thec time ex- change is made-ali payments made being placcd to the credit of the price of instrui- ment for which it is exchanged. t rE c WINNIPEG PIANO CO,, 333 Portage Ave, c O Please send me more information about vour Enstor Piano 0 à (lub-also memhbership blank. catalogues,. etc.--as dtscrila.du i n the W estern Home Monthly.u P p O Na me....................................................o0 N Adrcs:.......... \u003e....................... ............ Regular Price $450 Club Pli, IMay l5th ManySpecal Advanýtages 10 NU y Club Members To ail Club members we give free a beautiful piano bench with music re- ceptacle to match Piano. To the family of any club member, flot in arrears, and dying during the life of his»con- tract, we will immediately'send a re- ceipt in full. Other 'advantages are given only to those taking advantage of this special offer at this time. Only the héavy co-operative iDuying that we anticipate could enable us to make you such a proposition on such high grade instruments. Terms to Suit You Through our long and extensive deal- ings with the people of Western Canada we bave Ïbecome well acquainted with the ternis of payrncnt mnost favored, and have divided thern into fouir classes-any of which you mnay adopt in purchasing: A Terms, $35 cash, balance spread over 36 monthly payments. B Terms, .$50 cash, and 12 quar- terly payments. C Ternis, $75 cash, and 3 Fali pay- ments. * Ternis, cash-less 10 per cent discount. E Or suggest your own terms, and we will ar- raing E GOURLÂT Regular Price $450 Club -Primo $365 i -J (--l 'Lt 0-e~s Mav 1.5th. There will be a big 000 ' dla i for mîbrlïiw hich must be liirited litai I 0(\"'t ar-tan'k TFkv wchances. Sign the attachcd lii ~ ~ ~ i Y0i,111î~ ig ra i\u003ei nover bave a btter oppor- a Iigl grdepiano on sucli liberal terms. --t... v - *~.~-s-. r I. ~ Ro*uBr Mcb Prim AsEaonea l nueena il ieFRE oClub members, FR EMusic of estabiished reputation. This instruction xnay be had FRby mail if desired. Tuition includes regular lessons togetheri Club Price $325 1 lwAmý ommr Ipubm iY6 . i %pli KU M L. ice 5 1",
         "The preparation of boys for life will begin ini the home. Parents who are wise and loyal wilI think of service in the home, in ,Society, and in the state as well as in the e%,ocation. The time lias gone by for men to think of themnselves and their families alone. The conception of brotherhood muist be broaden-ed to iielude ail mankind, and particularly ail of one's own nationalitv. A writer in a.magazine published in a neutrai country Points out that -even if the motive behindi German unity is tunworthy, even if it is brotight about through misrepresenta- tion and, in a measure, by coercion, the unity is still there. Eacli man lives not onlv for hiniseif but for his state. Possibly the writei- xxas here thinking of the common p)eople, for no one wiIl accuse the ibureau- cracy of Ge rmany of being other than SnIPremIeiy- selfish. To themn the idea of Germian supremacy means uitim'ately their OlWn Personal gai n. Yet, the idea of a -whole people interested in eachi other and W\"ýrking for a C\u003c'lmion a(l\\-itýa.ye, lias its iessons 0o 11lý. -1here is no doubt«but that in the enaý it is a uinited people x'ho wiii attain to true ge1-aties35. So in the home this idea -f the -rcater brptherhood shotild be emiplizied. i;iîvdévotion is fold, even partx- iovaity o. onruendable, but ighIer and mo re lcr- tlian either is that patriotIsm wliich Q 1je~every mari to consider flo)t lii own tibttthose of his neighL 1ur. t iS easy The ltefoeiaIum T~ HAT which was predicted lias taken J.place. Manitoba, has decided by a two-to-one voteof hier maie popula-. tion to close ail her saloons. Thes; will remain closed for ail time. What this will inean in increased happiness and wealth and in improved moral conditions no one can estimate. Recently a member of the cabinet in Saskatchewan said that'the closing of galoons in that province meant a gain of $15,000,000 a year. Think what the saving in Canada will be when the whole country goes dry. And the saving of money is the least thinig about it. Men and womnen are freed from the awful dread that their chul- dren will grow up exposed to the powerful temptation of drink. Vice and crime wil be les seneçI by seventy-five per cent. Hap- piness wiil visit many ,,iomes that have neyer known anything but misery and desolation. The taking of' a vote does not -end this matter. Administration is everything. The people of Manito'ba have confidence that there will be no failure in this respect. The mandate wlas 50 pronounced that it is com- paratively easy. for a sympathetic govern- ment to insist upon absolute fulfiliment of ail the conditions of the Act. 0f ail the happenings of the past year nothine was of greater importance than the decision of the Manitoba electors on the l3th of March. Well may they afford to smile. Weii may they praise the referendum as a principie of good government. týTJae Traintug et YeuUa. I Tis more necessary than ever for our country to consider seriously the training of its Young people, and more particular- ly the boys. Thousands of Young men have taken up armns and, judging by happenings Up to this date, many will nmt return. More thian thiat, it is the younig men of courage and spirit :and of strong loyalty who have gone, while the loyialty of some of those who remain behind cannot be depended upon. It is n'ecessary that an earnest effort be put forth to develop in growing boys a feeling of responsibility and power to carry on the work ustialiy entrusted to men. Life can neyer iagain, in our time, be as care-free and as purposeiess as it was. We enter into a new world. Training in the Home ôEdit6rha in the home to develop the spirit of co-oper- ation and kindliness. The parents who neglect this are no true friends oftlie state. Training in-.the School The preparation of the home is continued by the'school. The scihool is not primariiv an agency for teaching, reading, writing and arithm.etic. These should be regarded as mere incidentais. The school muîst -build up life and prepare for life. These are its two missions. It must toudh the boy on 'al sides of hià being, and look towards service in ail fields of ýendeavor. On the one hand there will be an attempt to develop the phvsical, the intellectual and the njoral natures of the pupils, and on the other a The Mth.w - My lieart was too full when hie told nme, Though I scarce could sense the blow; lie came where 1 sot in the firelight, And said lie feit hie must go. And I knew without the aeking Where lie muxst go and how, -- For the music and drums had beat'it Into, xny soul-and now 1 \"And'why must you go ?\" I flashed him, \"TO join in a crime insane, \"'Patriotjsm! \"-I sneered it, \"Mad sentiment, etript and plain. Why should we place it higher Than inotihier, child or wife? God gives us these to cherish .And we throw them aside-and life!\" WelI, God forgive my anger And the things I eaid to the lad, As I tried to quench w1th doubting, The highest desire lie had. For the glow that lit hie features -- Died out; lie turned on hifi heel. A son can never fathom Iiow deep a mother xnay feel. But as I thought in the firelight, I somehow came to see, A mother can hardly reckon The man lier son may be. - A.nd I eaw that Patriotism - Waz more than a fancied spark; 'Twas a fire, without whose burning, The world would go back in the dark. I had wanted other motheKs (God knows îthey bave hearts lik4e mie. To let their sons gyo dying That the freedomn of right ehould be; - That 1, and those I cherish-- Might reap where we did flot sow. Then 1 honored my son for feeling Wliat it took me so long to know. So 1 oalled the lad to the fireliglit, Sullen lie came and slow. I told him liow proud it made me That lie should bie brave to go. Then lhe lauglied aloud and kissed me - When ho saw that in pride was real - Tis well a son vaniiot fathom Iiow deep a mother may feel. -Margaret Minaker. methodical attempt to fit for the duties of the vocation, land for ail the duties of life. Ex-en ini the ele mentary school, the activities of home and society can be.had in mind all the day long. In such activities the exer- ciscs of. the schooi will centre. The school garden will prepare Clor better home garden- in,-, the, school reading wiil lead to home rcading, the study of civics in schooi will look to co-operation among the members of the community. Book s t1uY, nrelated to life, xxill not be the sto$-în-tra de of thie clas-romEvery dep«tment of life will be cnriclicd, and bettered because of the wvork- donc in the school. It will be a truc atixiliary to ail institutions and educaýive foirce'; in the cominnity. Training Outside of School \\rnnn- tihe fîî)rc ý;oîîtside of sclloo(-l t1int iiiav a~~ i in 1ail~fi-!-:- cIn îîin h lt fe, Nowadays we have not many good things to say of, Germany--that, is Germany as a military power; but there is a story told of industrial Germ.any from which we, and al the people of the Empire might well Iearn a lesson. One of our great corporatiozùs re- quired a great number of steel shovels of a certain type. They wrote to one of the largest mantifacturing concerns in England asking for prices and terms., The- answer came back to the effect that the firm had been makin g shovels for forty years, and 'if the kind o f shovel it was producing was notgood enough, the order could be placed elsexvhere. The corporation 'then wrote to a German firm which immediately altered thec form of its shovels to suit the demand. The storx' of the rapid commercial develop- ment of Gcrmàtny may be partly explained by stich an incident. It is for us to profit l)y the illustration. In. the world, of the future, provineialism in thouight and action \\vili i)c suici(lal. Our reading, our schoois, andl ail otiier fornus of culture must uinite to give us the braeroitlook. This does not niean that every Iocalitv may not have its, own individnlalitv and charm. It is hopcd that these will n-eyer lie lost. two are worthy of special consideration. First, there are the forces inherent in the, life of the community and expressed in its institutions. The characterýdf parliamnents, courts, counièils,,tràdes union-\u0026. church life, is reflected in the behaviour of'both old and yoiing. \"The forces operating through the social milieu are prdbably greater than those proceeding from any other source.\" The best thing a man oan do 'to help his family and his own affairs., is to enter wholeheart- edly into the social and political life of the conimunity. If these are wrong, ail wiil be wrong. In the second place, there are things which a community can do by organized effort 'to supplement school and home education. The community is wise that includes public play- grounds and recreation centres, public libraries, and other public necessities, as a part of its programme. The whole commun- ity rather than the individuai home is \u003ethe real unit for purposes of educatiori. The greatest need to-day is the cultivation of a community spirit. Even if for no other reason than seif-defence it is necessary for a mnan to consider the children of bis nei\u0026h- bors. Community provision for\\ mfmunity needs is just as pressing as family-,rovision for faiy n'eeds. This should be regardedi as axiomatic until it is generaily so re- garded, or community life cannot be con- sidered as ideal. The W.rdi VIeW yT is' said with some degree of truth thât J.Canadians are quick to adapt themselves to new conditions. Pioneer life makes m'any demands upon both men and women,. There is one sentse, however, in which pion- eers are the siowest of ail in the matter of adaptation. - On the social side they are necssailycompelled to think in ternis of the looaIity. They are the last to feel the pulse of new movements in civilîzation. They carry on churches, schools, homes, and other social'organirations, as if the custoins of a past genemation were to be customns for ail time. Nothing is more certain thian that the war-- wili make necessary for ail people in ail lands a new order of life-economnic as wel as social Men and women can no longer be local, provincial or even national in their outiook and their sympathies. They must b *e chiidren of the Empire and citizens of the worid. And so it miust be good-bye to the oid scthool, the oid church, the oid conditions of triade and industry, and the old modes of culture. It remains to be seen whether iCanadians will be able to get otIt of the rut and ad'apt themseives. to the new order of 1",
         "The Western Home Mon thly ____ I r IL The most famous skin treatment ever formulated Lather your ivaslîcloth -elwith lursFavial Soap anld -warni w~ater. .ApplY it to your face and distributte thec latliir thoroughly. No-w mith fthe tips of vour ingers wNork -tiiis cheai- eing antiseptie lather ibte youîr skiln, alwuî» s w ith ai flpNvîaiil and olutwiard ]notion. Rflise Nwilu -warlltawater, thon witlî c 1 i, the colder the bettèr. F'inish byN rubbing your face foi' a few minutes with a piece of ice. Alwy epriua odyyu skin well. l w y epriua odyyu Every day tbf s treatmnert frees your skii of the tiny old dead particles. Mien, it cleanses the pores, brings the blood to the surface and stimnulates the sinall mnuscular fibres. It is very easy tb use this trcatmient fo-r few days and then neglect it. But this -will neyer niaIke your skin -%vat you wold love to have it. Use thle treatmnent persistently and in ten days or two weeks your skin should sbow' a mnarkvd iniprovenent-a promise of thiat greater clearness, freshness anid charm whiich the daily use of Woodbury's wHll brin*. A 25ec aIýe of Woodhury's Facial Soap is sufflicient for a month or ,,,i weeks of this \"skin you love to totîclu\" treatment. Get a cake to-ilay and begin to-night to get its benefit. Send now for \"lweek's size\" cake ro)r te mw wIll send a cake or Woodbury's Facial Soap large enough for a xvoeic ofthis frnoîî.\" skn Ure,îtilent. For ioc, saniffcs Traroufhids cake as a reminder to ask for Ilr Wîy V~ alial soap, WVocdburY\u003e-s £odayai pour druggists. Tiouk -A kîn Vnîî i w teif K W0-f Tojîci\" aniL saut; 1\u003c , (orile (,,'04'1 Wrr y i he i'JLI Andrew jer(jens Company, Ltd., 663 Sherbrooke St.,: Perth, Ontario. ïr n -FACIAL SOARM!!!il For Salc by Co nadian Dru .,gi\u0026.s frottn Coast to Coas t -. ~ ~ ~. t ti u o tc ai th ea D *~1 1\u003c4 k; ,~I IF not, yen do not know liow beneficial a soap cani hp. Fnr thirty years, John H. Xoodbury mnade a constant stu(ly of thie skin and itA needs. H-e treated thousands of obstinate skin dis- cases; he made countless skin tests, always eniphasizing to every' one who wa nted to improve some condition of the skin the following big fact: 'rou can make'your skin what you would love to have it Your skin is changing every day! As the old skin dies, new skiuî forins in its place. This i's yo ur opportunity. Your comldexion .Icpcnds on liov yoin take carc of titis new skin. Yoit can keep tIhis new skin se active that it cannot hiellp t.kiing on the greater clearînes, frjeshn.ess, and cliari ilvuu want it to have. The bcst Nvay to do this is by proper cleansing -with a soap prcpared to Suiit the nature of the skin. It was to niet'the ineed for suvh a soap ilhat .Tolin TI. Woodbniry. ont of his longl experience, üvolved the formula for Woodlbur.vse Facial Soap. Begin now to --et its benvfîts for your skin. Wliîat- ever condition is kceping yoiir complexion froni bving beauitiful it can be changed. Start thec following Woodbury treatient to-niglit.1",
         "The eWestern iforne Ilonthly Borne of Our Aivantures In PuiuzsuU of the tF±nn~y Qies ý iii 'I Dog Fish flan the haw, driving if up again- then thv Iiiîge rolboér sxvcpt up at'tlîe end of a I 'je' etirve directîy beneatli the hlawk, arn ',r an instant fthc eagie seenîcti ti b\u003c i-i down striking at the bre,-t Of osprey witî ifs long shari?. talon-. in-' itlvfbe hawk *droppefl tic trout. an' . as' mstantaneoully the aggrcssom 2Ycastlc Dale iefcll like aflash through the air and cai 1- th falling fishi on-tlie surface'of the wa sl vTn y it flapped up onto a great fir deibrately tore the fish to pieces. a robbed osprey sailed up to - the n beside which, the female sat eating 51trout. Did she divide like a _good, I wife? Not a bit of it, for shè thrc'w h ler wings, ruffled bier neck,- whisi ashrilly as an urchin. schoolward boi eand drove lier lawful mate off the fan stroc. As we dcscended the very slipp path to the shore, we saw the nat land a salmon. Here is the place ail my inland dwclling readers who w 3real fishing. If you ever corne to, Coast, be sure and try the salon trout off the shores of Vancouver Isia or any island in the Straits and Gulf Georgia. But Fritz and I this day 1 our mouthsa ail made up for a fecd the very tasty end, so, we igncred. native's catching two more salmon a paddled out of the Arm, groundingc canoe on a littie reef. In a few morne: We were afloat again with a large tin f of huge mussels; these shell-fish ma excellent bait. Off we paddled ur we came to a littie deep bay 1 knewq wbere the tide makes an eddy in a pc and the lower places the haunts of sevei different kinds of cod ecd seemning more brilliantly colored than the oth( Once we snubbed our craft-the crevi I passed. the bow rope into had been t] burial place of a Coast Indian, for tie: By Bonn, WWE WRE standing on top of th, high red stone bluffs ,that en- compasa Saanici Arm. -Througli the powerful binoculars we could sec two races of animaIs fishing-a man in a canoe, and an osprey, or fish hawk. \"l1'1l bet on the man,\" laughed Fritz. \"\u003cAnd 1 on the bird,\" said I. On mighty pifions the great fishing bird fioated. It was an old bird with a very white iead, ail its well oiled plumage glittered in the sun, its breast was as whiite \u0026snow. No wonder it fished there, right within our line of vision, low down, near the shore lime, for, on a tal emlock, we spied the female sitting in a great tub of a brushwood nest. As early as this late i' rch day she was setting or laying, an d tTimunseasonable faîl of snow must have kcept ber on, ber nest. Suddenïly the mnale whistled shriîly. \"'You win, Fritz,\" I cried, \"thc man in the canne lias a salmon on.\" Intently we watched both mnan and bird. Again, as thc fish leaped in full Pight, th@ great osprey whistled. It knew full weil it dared mot dive for that fisi so lose to the canne that ield the dark figure. We saw the Indian pull in bis trolling line band over hand; he reached for the killing eticIc and gaff hook combined; there was a mighty turmoil in the water alomgside, a higi-fi ung body of a silvery gleaming fish-and tic salmon was off, free once more to face the swift tides and hunt its daily prey. \"I have another chance cnrning, laddie, \" I laughed as we watehed the pair of fishing animai~s. Off set the native paddling slnwly against the low spring tide--off sailcd the fisi hawk on great curving circles. Two whistles, the fernale on thc nest, ton, caugit sigit of the school of snielt that made the watcr boiT, but they are too smail for our noble pair. Now sec the gulls 'darting down as a sehool of tide fishing cut-throat trout are eoming into thc Arm. Like a flash the fernale quitted the ncst, descend-ý ing with folded wings lik-e a plummet; the male uttered a short,1 sharp eaU cre hie headed dnwn, but they struck the water together. Each disappeared in a mighty upthrnw of spray and foam and both cmerged with a struggling trniît in its miuth-good, big fish, ton, they seemed-. over twn -pounda apiece, from ail that swarrning mass, in that infinitesirnal fraction of time it tnok to dive. Up, up, up they both mount tnwards us the water falling in shining drops off 'bth fish and bird. \"Look; I've not won yet!\" AUits tîme 'another spectator of the fishing sat unnnticed and, witi a rush like the roarL of a great mass of flame, the dark body of a great bird passed over us, falling towards the water of the Arm. Instantly the female osprey changed lier coursew ani swen)t into the shielter of tic hernloclcs; w the male, outmanoeuvred by the swnoping ti eagle, was driven out over tic watcr. t Down wcnt tie Baldhead, down-lower c IIAI. ý 1 à; hi Ofi sti a sli I if an of fil( tcr nf alI a -it ec on, doý t li 'fi p*01 mTin agit ater; and Thle nest, kind out 3tled und nily iery for Fant the and tnd,t f oft hadn offa thec itur But we bave- caught muci larger fish. saved nur lunch- thero were apples in ýnts out here than these biard fighting cut- fie basket-was thc oilskin coat tirow full throats. -We have five kinds of so- over if, and the timid deor are' afraid~ ke called salmon, and one big trout-the of any unusual tiing or scent like tiat. itil \"Steelbead,\" this latter being almost \"Lot us paddle home along the outer of,' exactly like the Atlantic salmon caugit Kelp and a tch a big Falmon for the )G'l off Eastern Canada and Great Britain. inlet people,\" said Fritz, so off we started ra1 Look at tic two B. C. salmon fishos and on the ton-mile stunt-tiçie and ligit air gly the magnificent specimen of a Spring or alI in our favor. As soon as we got out er. Tyee (Bigehief, as the Coast Indians to the \"Kelp Banks\" we saw an Indian :ce caîl it). This is the fisi called the King, ]%-elp fshing in their midst. This strange lie the Columbia, tie Sacramento or Cali- work is done under an immense ' 'bat\"I re fornia salmon-cacli locality bas ifs owvu a 3big as a parasol-tbis envers boad axýd shoulder as the native beans over thle aide of the canne and gives a good sbadow for moving objects bclow. In bis hand ho bad a copper spoar-one I would dearly like to own, -aÏ feel sere an Eskimo badl first made it in far off Arotie sens and hdfled it into a whaie; the sligitly injured animal had carriod fthc easily dctacied bead many thousands of miles, and finally anme cring flot illa of natives bad surprised it and hurled their seaT- ekin buoyed spears into if until if died, and bad thon cut out a spear head none of them. cnuid fasl:.inn. We watcbed until the rigit arm cf the hidden figure stiffenied, the dark red sin and muscles strained, uj wcnt the big brown fli3t clown it oh water it splashed, up raised fie dark figure,. and, just as we pull a water bucet up on a polo, passing fie p ole up tirougi the hamds, sn this Indian brougit up the big struggling salmon, instinctive1y le reached into the canne ouf \"vlew h killing stick, a siower oi blows and bie Iiftcd a twenty-pound Spig into bis canne. WeZ left the nid dusk7 fisiernian welI buried under bis \"hat\" and trolled off. ind maainland in distance. From Mt. Malaat, B.C. We made some miles swiftly without a strike, and just as we wcre turning ''Sea Urchin Rocks,\" we gof one fiat made un marnme fnr this truly great fs-and runs loti drop paddles and get very busy. ýi to over 100 pounds in wigit. Wer\"alo The fisi was on Fritz's lime, so my rod thave tic Sockeye, Colin, Humpback and must lie taken mn-if soemed to take a Dog salmon, enumcrated according to long time to mccl in that bundred yards- value but the Spring and tic Coin I had twice ton muci out by inattention. are tLÏe nnly ones that take a lure, or Thon I lit my pipe and watched the lad reven a liait excepfing always the biard struggling witb a great \u0026pring. Every tfighting steeihead trout, as we will eaul it. turne le got the fighting silvery tbing fo Weil, your humble servant and the fthc stemu hoe wasiriy engulfed ini showers eer fait iful Fritz were standing at fhe'of sprayad omi\u003cfrewsabtoa mouti of a brawling mountain torrent,' sea. on bore. I saw bis cyco flash as be a(rirng tic great snnw-crnwned crest cauglit tic \"s;uperior\" smile on my face, fliat arose far off up tic river. We had but if wnuld have made a cat laugli to sec boom wafching the shore rats fishingr and a biig fisi meatly'catch up a pail of watcr scarnpering alomg tic rnek.s,,. savago, and dashiti in tic npcn-moutbed face snarlimg littîe beasts, firat ettusin to our of your assistant, who spat it out and bomuse r-s iig ntef~h that die in shnok bis hoad for ah f the wnrîd as if th 'tran if the squaîling gulls donmot hoe ton wcrc another water animal. (I find thcrn first. We had also found tic have scen loti seals and sca, lions shlako nests of sorne stiekîebackLs-tiny spined their heacla in open-eycd, open-moutlied fisb that build a nest in tic stemsa of d ism a i*h irîgceteo epn under-water weeds, just as a wrcn. doeasclseoof salman.) 'l, between pulîiir!, ini the. swordlike laves of tic fiags. W e and yamking and having its bond sor 1y iad carlier left our canne at tic mouti eîoute\u003cl with a big cedar spear haft *flic of the strearn, and splashing and turnlîing poor salmon finally gave, in and aîk wrd along had walkcd several miles tirougli thc boy fo tow if aîongside. Do you tlhc underlirusi and over tic mossy, know, hoie ould not lift it in then-it Flippc(ry rockýs, fryîing in vain to catch muist have c-hu over forty pnunds; v:e Onie of the dLainty fawcA fliat fcd witlî hailTo tas s nd vcry few men evcr tliýir motliier4 on tfli tcc(p 1anks of tie tliinjk of wvigling a fish out home, 'tis wafcrcourse. Once, mlien a ferrialo Black- caf chli tini andl ive fhem aNvay as en(cri taiT doc and fawn essaved fo clirnl the as voii c:n-o I suliT owards fthc Iow Uanlc, Fritz das;l i) p ftcr lier, and aI- aivit îix.t hr, lY flic:iîd îof thle t ido anti-c r inosf eatiglit lier \u003cciai yoi]nister mi liiif-, xi* , ppi Tlt uf litige siivvr. f ltiiig f be * y bot h pîsliulandi s-r airrbied lirougli i io ft 1ig I cti-dr log a~ ne d nloff N' t1j liibreTla-Tikc grow%-t Ltof rmots t titf i v ' îib le-g:t hirirmg dusk, iit h stîukopf ov-er fbelc o f tic, ciff. Fritzi fl( t-e, ' \u003c : Iigswctîy ovcrlierdc f \u003cic(l thlicspot ted pet more thaTi on(,:11i rf1w in~~ircc.fdiatoms flarning but could flot close bis gras;p. 1 laugl., t \u003ciutîr akî- andi paddle strokes, to fiat so liard at flic contorf ions of the fat lad, dearî 'v oved spot, this wanderimg animal and was so blimdcd by the torrentný 'J mnaUL caTIs hoale s,ýriftIy, and right up in the very midst of this will rise a \"tide-rip.\" (Pour water from a pitcher into a basin and see the turmoil rise in the middle, and you have the action of the Pacifie pnuring its mighty tides ixitn the fiords and inlets of the Coast) 'We padUjcd slowly up tide into the' Pass. 1 eould hear the \"i ip\" bellowing and I intended only to paddle up far enough so that we could see it, and then throw out our trout trclling spoons and sweep, fishing' back dnwn t he Pass- but the erratie \"rip\" took into its mind tosweep down the Pasa too, and the first thing we knew we were tossing and tumb- ling about lin a current that ran and lcaped in cvery direction. The lean angr~ waves feU3 splashing into the canne an, really, I di-d-n\\,çt know just where or how to steer, as thç durrent and the wind wcre against oné another, and the \"rip\"~ was fighiting bo'th. We in the centre wcre fully six feet above the sides of the Pass. Wîth a sort of expiring gurgie, the tumultous mass 3ank down and rose again away below us, so out came roda and gleaming spoons and soon wc werc catching \"cut-throat\" -trout as fast as isand and dlay he sent down that I was perfectly useless, so, after we both had regained our breath, we stumbled our vvay don-n streamn and ate our simple lunch by our canoe-not faiing to note that deer had criss-crossed the sanda about the bom- with their atrow-pcinted hoofs since we left. The only thing that licid Of a tYPical B.C. Eiigle. .s~' ~ - - Saanich Arm in foreground, Straits of Georgia ai were tic band choppcd boards, and the white glcarning bones of one who, in Âmnes gone by, no doubt drew froi out Iîis very pool tic ancestors of tic very od y'~ seck. Wif i due respect for tLc ;nctity of the ancient burhul Place, we Irw off acrosà flic pool, and no sonner id tic lad's baited lioolz struck bottorn ian hie got a mnost violent tug. Up lie îrnped, muci disarranginjn flic balance ) tic none ton sfcady craft-niglit and nain hoe rccîed in, rni,-ht and main lie truggîed witli fiat fisli, and puiled up Sgreaf big dog-fisi-one of fie losser harkis, a perfect J)est in f lese waters. ciwe caugit about a \u003cozon of fiese iîsances-sornc as licavy as fifteea oun\u003cs-before we liookLed our first cod. wisi you could have seen fiat fisi- was a pale grassy green, il spotted id marked with robin's egg blue, one fthc rnosf wonderfullv coîorcd fisli in e Norflîern Pacifie. We got sorno with ,rra cotta spots and rcdisýli fins, sonne Fa deep sponge color witih iglit iHue ots-a rnost 0(1\u003c collection of cod, but [ goodl,-i f0 caf. Final,,ly Fritz cauglit big st rawlsIrry slia deti starfiýI!_-a raf Tittîn-cnfive--pointel tl:lig, itout a:iwslimli and w~it h rnyria(l feu-t, Aamiii vi wif a sucticri flisc. \"Couic , lic lauigicc ouît. 'Wc have flic :gs and O ic codl and thc stars, w-cil got le noii and tflic, otheýr t liings up at flic [lerei, as ttlmng 1 want to w-arn naWW ,ners- ag:îijnst -ilii- is crie cf tlic nmu 1fr: uigel-ý cf j*eJXu1îfe.Moîjt of lsf Td t o 'iii T an iii waves iina ing t lche lt y, but homo vou rnay have a nortlî ýd with a tide frmintic souf h running",
         "The Western Home s The m Q ~EDWIN. LEY~n lay dyi me mn, hav ore t are permitled eaofull Io.aving ah;yntle emile upo, 1feture, *Iavigtoo, mourners about lhe bd ,B.......... oM014Hay seemed sli Of app h. Peojule aihe had bee tein on hie feet foý,Wèeka-paet, and thi th nd, W*hed. it \"did corne, would b Painful alid, lon~g .',dm\"w out. Thei opinion '.ras justifie4 by thé- fact. Not] mg 11W *a.kee-thelireqf life bum in thé,e obeolfrme, but %Vle indomit able spirit of thie-ax-thaï spirit tha ho iade hMm wCIhe h .succes and wealth h1ad beon hbl-sôl 4y tbrougl hiu own efforts. Love and aEçctibdn lit h\" Scaroely known, being 'tbo bus3 makigIe casties-in-Spain materialize Thon, realizing at lest when it ,waâ toc lat, tlt atthe gae.edge ged ie c no accpunt, the eld man's starv*d hear beantoeéry eut for the only l4ing he nad ever loved-hie son Gilbertî Self aeeking friends there were ,aýjpen but these,' together with the l* a the servants, had been ba èd ' fren hi eaoence. AU ieho n wwas Gilbr\u0026-Oilbert, the scape' Who\u003c wuaS rviaig a trm of years i iepeni- tentiary ton miles away. Alicèé9ilbert'a wifo,stleO in4nd out of the rocus êpcaeion. aII, ut01' sley would a~oe her. 1 \"GilýP t-bring me Gilbem I\" lif wol rraising himseof h bed tpoint a tromblig forefiger at the girl. Thon lhe WId fail to whining and y moing i~senue, heipless wratli, do- rmndingtoenw why his child coulca ut bi brought to him, -and hie claw- ade would revert to their almiost ceaseeu fluttering over and clutchig of- the counterpane .one of the 2uee harbingers of the approaching dissolution. Alice Harley, wbeýn certain that hie could net observe ler, would drop into a Seht by the ire, where, with lient head, she would moodily watcli the flames, as theugli searching there for a solution of the problem. How te' get Gilbert! CoUld hoe be brouglit from the prison by EPecial -permission? No, not even ril *Edwinllariey could purchase a few hours' reepite fromn a stern sentence such as GiErt's was. He might start up in 'bed shieking-tbe old mani, with a face like a mask of death-with hie cavern- like' black Oe glowing fiercely, almost as i health and strongth holiemiglit cry Out maledctione upon aà~ and sundry. There wus no u8eoitrYing his old master- fui methoda li a situation auch as thie. Thie law in invicible. \"Sic had to acknowledge that tho law waa right xi tis -case. Neverthelese, she had alwaYs borne a guilty conscience over that terrible affair of a year ago. oek et Gain lith- G. Bayne tempered brother, pretexiding she Iiked aWalter beet. How criminilly fooeish ) she had been! Yet she had atoned 1in sofar as she.could, for she had marriod iGilbertC in prisn. Was that not teât' enougli? The world,' after that, cQuld rnot , cal her a trillcr. In lier heaxt she iknew that lier liusband had net intended, te kil his brother that dark niglit. It was Gilbert's temper, and, alas, Gilbert was paymng the penalty. So of wliat use to say more? Alice rose from tirne to time and crossed the room to wliere a cradle steod just iinside the door. More lay Gilbert junior. iIt was a comfort te the girl tis lonely Christms Eve te, have the infant near lier, wliere she could watch it and lier other charge at the'same time. In the pauses of ministering te lier aged fathcr- in-law, sho would croon softiy te the chiid wlio was awakenod now and thon by the old man's high-pitclied querulous veice. Witliout, the storm liowled fiercely Swirllng snow was whisked mementarily against the windows of the lieuse, and ,the -branches of a. bare oid thorn tree sredand ceoaked against the roof, liean angry spirit. Alic Harley wae glad te be indoors upon sucli a niglit. Thie wae one of hie lucid moments when ho remembered the peculiai significance of 'a mark on'Gilbert's forehead. It was bÎit a smail blood-red biernieli that was quite hidden under his hair at the top back now anid the$skàes dIo not sting îimi i the face. Still, it was cold-witîia numbt)i.g chil-and the brave capt.iin waa-hungry into the bargain., Tie hopi d fervently that ho wias approaching a tý- 1or village-or failing theso, a hospitabi. 1farmstead. *lien one lias been accus. torned for menthe te the mild air of old Engiand, the piercingly keen cold of the Canadian winter strikes riglit te the centre cf ene's bones. The liglit came on, it grew brighter with every step, adresentiy lie saw other liglits. Yes, it was a village, thank heavexi. \"Ill stop at this first lieuse, it looks hospitablo, and tliaw myseif out,\" I said the captain te himef. \"And lil tie you up, old pal, in seme slieltered nook,'\" li went on, troking tlie horse's nock fendly, \"andiptl9 a littie liay for you.\"I The rider dismeunted sifyand cusy-for hisfingers were liaffrozen, tetliered his beast te a poplar in the lee of a smail slied. Thon lie appreached tlie lieuse door, staniping bis feet te start the circulation. It was a srnall lieuse -and the lower roome were in darkness. Oniy one liglit shone fromn the upper sterey, and it was a dimi one. \"The good wife wiil think I'm Santa' Claus,\"l chuckled the captain, as ho knocked. on the door, after trying te ring. (Tlie bell was mufflcd fer some reason.) Long moments passed and thon after lie had knecked again lie heard feotsteps within. Tliey seemed te hlt in their appreacli, as theugli their owner dreaded openig the deor. It waz clese upon midnight. But at laet .lingera fuxnbled at the leck and the knob turned., A- wornan's siender form stood faintly eut- iined in the dark littie entry. \"May 1 have shelter fromn the storm, please?\" spoke the captain. \"I've lost my boarings a bit, but if you wiil ailow me te sit near the lire for a few imoments and thon direct me-.YI .\"Corne i,\"I said the wornn opening the door quite wide. \"ýWlat ananight te be abroad.\"I The captain, leoking like a huge polar ar, ontered, shaking as mucli of .the sne from lis garments as lie could. The wernan turned te a gas-jet on the wall and turned the tiny blue flame up rntil t he small hall was liglited. \"I have a lire in the kitchen,\"I she aid, \"Ify ou will just stop eut.\" \"Thau ou\" was the gratefui re- spense. .Thedcaptain pulled off his fur cap and uter coat, disclosing beneaththe uniform :f a Canadian soldier. It was at flua moment that the woman turning, with )ne arm holding back the portieres, met is glance, dirccted steadily upon her. Onef long moment eaclî gazed inte ftho ~es of the ether. The woman was first to find voice. \"Walter-my God!\" she breatled. 'iIs it you-or arn I out of mny head?\" She had whitened to thec hue of death stoed clutching the deor-frame for '-lîe---asJ iv!Whiere arn 1- îo(e bous- V4(floved'-jtst :tfter-l \":Andl--ou live herenow?'' ,'Fathber is living witli us. The big 'uise ut N-~ is closed. He couldn't ar-we eouldn' t bear it-aff or the-\"I \"AntI whose lieuse is this? Nt- OîP rt's lieh asked, quickly, catch- Tflarried j bim?\" of hie brow. But a foolieli nurse, and nxany other sensation-lovinjg people, lad dubbed it tlie mark of the first murderer, and so it had clung te him-this aneying frayed-out bit of superstition. It haci bothered him at times when ho thought The Giant'Douglau.FUB of Britishi Columbia At timea hi seemed te lier that the old tree was possesed cf human biands that implered entrance and would net ho denied. She liad worked herseif Up te a pitch airneat cf terrer at the sound. \"The mark! The mark!\" slirieked the oid man, suddenly. \"It was but a \"\"'J j, t \"\"\"St Wh-r the IordlY salmon are caught Gilbert had gettexi off with a mucliligliter sentence than wouid have been the case had ail the ovidence been fortlicorning. She had nover rcally ioved Walter. She had aiwaqys. enjoyed taunfing and teasing the yeunger and more passienate and bot.- 7birthmark and meant nothing. I tell you mv son is ne murderer! \" Alice winced. She 'shut lier oves sliuddering zit the appeagrance of Olà Harley, iîn up there in bcd in denunci- atory attitudu, bis white lip:s sbaking. Of it. lI later years ho had almeet forgotten it. Thon wlien ho had ieft Walter, hiseleder brother, lying there se stilli nd white on the edge cf the old swamp, Gilbert liad reoelected. But te do hima justice, lie had 'given hirnself up. The police liad not been oblîged te, hound him down. Out in the storm this Clriàtmas Eve a solitary travoller wau making but p cor headway againt the elements. Lilce a great white wall, the seething blizzard seerned to shut eut the wrld and every- thing therein frorW'the pathway of maxi. Every moment or, twe the rider would hait hie piunging herse in the drifts te listen for sound of human feet or voices. Nothing couid be heard but the wind and the gusty breathing of himself and his mount. They had been travelling since noon and tlic early December dark- ness had clsed down at four e'eiock, while thy wcre stili on the open prairie. eow, hia-vng entirely lest lis bearings, thle rider Ivas, te say flic least, nonplussed. Aiarm lic did net yct feel. WVas lie flot a soldier and a captain of soidiers? Since noon lie had roun(led up an(l enrolled fiff v reeruits for the ncw eompany whielh Wvas te refill the ranks of the slamiin the gallant 90tli Regiment. Se what wonder that there w-as room for littie cisc than exultation in tlic rider's hieurt? But this getting lest in a prairie blizzard- lie that was prairie-born andl prairie-bred -savor'(lSonewhat of the luclicreus. ''I-a, a Iight1\" Drawingu-jî\u003e thle reins again lic prcssed iis beust forward. So mny- tirnes this niglit lie lad, faacied lie san, a liglit and The starry gicam w-as but a fint nebulous sort of speck off te thc righit. Ho drew-shirPlv, on the riglit-hand rein and the hrse' s-,erved aside and strted braveivly a for this promiQing point on tlclh'e ~ The snow stili came thickly dowi, but the wind was on hi'. I 01 l\"bly -r B.C. scSery",
         "The Weâtepn Home montrn Inot ating im cold-wjtih a brave captlin à[., Tie hop dC ýaching a towrja - ~~~~~WESTRN IANiAflA,. 1UAUtnI- M - -- ~ 'J '~.5bflm.L.Ea~L ~%UWIi MIlITXm FlMcKENZI lE S S PCIALLY EL]ECTEJD a hospitabi. been accus. Id air of old 1 cold of the ight to the rew brighter ntly he saw 'illage, thank use, it looks f ouf,'\" said And V'II fie tereri nook,\"l horse's neek for you.\"I tify and haif-frozen, \u003eplar in the approached his feet to 'as a small is were in shone fromn dùn one. I'm Santa' ain, as he f rying fo 1 for some f hen after .-d foofateps It ini fheir ier dreaded close upon re fuxnbled turned., A- aintly out- the etorm, \" I've lost will allow w moments n1, opening a night fo huge polar ich of tfhe he could. jet on fhe flame up hen, \" she -ateful re- Lr cap and noved his ie uniform is at thîs ýing, with jeres, met con her. 1 into the 1 voice. ýathed. ýy head?\" ,of death rramre for arn I- The big couldn't the-\"ý SNof- Y, Catch- '-J E M E 14 M 'I I r INSURANCE: Every mani beileves in both fire and 111e insurance. Why? Because o f the pr o t ec t io n t affords. The first step toward the lnsurance ot a good crop I5 the purchase of good seeds. Can gou afford fo -be with- Lettuce out this Insurance? Why take the rlsk when tie poeto Meeails is largely within your own cholce and keepiné,? po~ AU Seasons rWRITE FOR OUR CATALOG TODAy-TE \"RD GUIDE BooK\" FpOR TEE WEST AU quotatlone on frolght shlp- monte are F.O.B. Brandon andEx Warehouse, Cagary. Bagu contain 2 bu.each,ç.x..PtOats-21 bus.) Pie. oed tocks, 100 iba. Each, * PFLAX We have magnificent stocks of Fa-deean, Pure, hlgh germinatjon and bright, fine appearance. It is immune from the ravages of 4,ireworrm.Thrisaoo akefr F'ax.the demand usuallY exceecis the supply. BricïlIper bush. BadnCalgary Corn-on ....82.66 31 See g, atl pae 47, for new introductions of Flax. WHEATr-OATS-PUAS Price per bush. hea~arqlsx~s oldBrandon Calgarir WhatMrqis-LMg±, âi*cte * d'1 8 SJ1:'8 Wheat-Mrue elotr. P350er7 10o Ibo. 3.50 3.75 Btrain ... .... ... .. . ... 0atsGaror i22 .......... Oas-arlyMoutai .. IIELD PEwark-.................8 Golden Vine.4 Caadan.eg ....... . e Pr ssanBle.. .......... Blac~k Aye Marrowfat .......53 White Marrowfat...............50 h * Oe f te PRINO RYE One o themost profitable crops to grow. Possesses the double advantage of being used either for hay -la green state or for grain. Many farmers sow Rye nas a ceanin crop, seiiyt eradicate 'WildOat. The cot, compared with its enoroug yield, hlgh quality of feed and case of cultivation, is trifiing. 1Y2 busheis sows an acre.1.35 1.50 WINTER RYE The coming croP of the West. In- creasiuz in popuiaity by leaps and bounds. Can be sown with advantage in .une and July, thuspoducing abundant faPasturg the same year, and the eriiestgren pasturage the follewln spring, and ill stili produce a grain crop. W e recommend ordering early-Our stock Els !extra slected and re-cleaned 1.40 1.45 A Pcomt Co.-d iVOIR bris,1 Se'.c Aýfents feor Planet Jr. Oultlvators, Drills, 61 Soedeas, Hoos - - n.ir Ag c»tUI Read about the McKENZIE PHOTO COMPETITION Page 3 0f Cats.log 'Tour Garden milU be gay and profitable by sowing McKensil'a eeds. Thousands of deiighted customners lestify te their superior qUalitY every year. $1.00 wiil keep a family of air in fresh, green vegetables ail the sumrner. VEGETABLES BEAN, EcE', Golden PktL os. Lb). WaxE........... Bo........4 5 C niGM*Wln-50 .25.. ningstadt ...... 50 @0 ... CAhROT, X .K 50 .3 heut...Bo .5... Mer aowaP ....25o 3.25 ... Plume......... CORN,arly July.uo4 CORN, MoRsB White Co MEyi ~...... .. Log Green..... 50 2014 LETT C, VàPrai-5 2014 rie %ueen..........50e..... Oxé,mecl'. Yilow Globe ...Bo .02 0 ONION, Mcl'. i 5* * 2.0 Wethersfield......0 .25 2.2 PMA, McK's Mnfod9 o pUA, in .Prosperity. l. IRADIE, cXl's osy TOMATO, Mcl's lirst ~ .01*1 of All.,............10e .40.. Three Speclal Good Thlngs for 1916 SOLANBERRY-Quite new; better than the Wonderberry. In sealed packets con- TOMAO-Alacrty-The e 50tYcà, in the world. Pkt., 100; YÏ oz-, 300; 1 oz.,... .....500 RADIER-Giant -The Inrgest, whitest and best flavored ¶ixdisih jn the West. Pkt., 100 o 2 9; \"COLLECTIONS\"' XcEKenuie's Farmers Gardon..0 Mclenzil's Bachelors' Homestead.'** McKenzsls Plower Seed Collections- Comprise one packet ench of the best and gayest flowers. McKenzie's 'Sweetheart\".. .8 .0 McKenzie's \"Ail Colons\"........5 See Cataiog, page 5à fpr articulars. SwEîT PuAs The Grandest Creation eft h.ePloyer World McenlesPkt. Oz. Y,\u0026lb qlb 1lb. Spencer'o...100 30o 80o1.50.i Laura Bell Su e r b brida i .ei6o 540o .8510 Cupld Mixed. o........... Galforaaî10. 250 750 1.25 2, 0 N.B.-AU Drnces in this clumn are postonia Pricu quoted on Gr\u0026ainr for qubuti\" s0f 10 bus. or more ex- eepting PIWd Poau and Cora whloh e fo Ibus, r m ore. 1ï r le. quantities aida 5: per bus. VIELD CORN Unfavorable weather oondltion sprevalled e t msveting time, reultiugj la aim t entire cro f silure. Ou nmay stocks th eoW dl net return th. equivaient of Med Planted. Our, stocks ar epedbe Prioe.per bush. Improved Leam ngTeow Brndon Calgary Se.~~ ou.ed aao pge52E,,fr o t T urBeandçn aifa b..12.78 25.00 13.76-27J Grown Aut- Llsce; b 13-75 3 3.0 0 1 . 5 36 0. ... 21.00 40.00 21.50 42.9 COVà .....33.0098-00 33.5000S. .....r 10.6032.00 1 7.09-33.4 Med Clover \"3ke Clover: 1ils 818.-88 11:98 1:1 Western lIWO BrOae ... ledTO P Grau ..... 10.7621.00 11.291 2.0 Blue Grs. 10.75 21.00' 11.25 211.00 canadien Blue Grae 0.25 12.00 7.25 14.00 ILLUTS, Pedfled Saz- 'lyseletec! to rodce hemazmulietortfod for aul kinda~ (S ofsok SCatalogks I IUNGEL-mol'. xmtobikGP. t lbla i lb...................4 Agents fer Cyhpe.s Infoubateas, Sasedors, Heovers. Etc. À BRANDON) MAN. WESTERN CANMADA 'S CREA TEST SEED flOUSE cSZE lD ______THE BEST 0F EVERYTHING FOR YouaR ANDa\u0026nZ 100 :00 .00 .0 do, ~p p rA Pcoe* Oci dwiII Uncuabator Cmtmio« AIE TOUR DEAIER L'very Progressive Merchant through- eut the West carrnes - - .- - - - ---.- ~ - ~ K .4 i I E i .1 B I A. E. McKENZIE CO.-'Ltâ!. 1 Brand 50 lba, 'l\"00 lbs. Calgary 50 Ibo. 100 lh\u0026 ý lu\u0026 .00 il il CALGARYALTA. -jaL\"J\u0026\"AL 0 UI\u0026EATJSbT BEED ROTTRE",
         "orne 8h. noddd gain an drw lerto serose lerh ie.Worase d ar spoaiin acriais such a tbis.O vait wondez, iiluminated lier face. W wu 1aive-end Gilbert waà freel \"Whrowlireis lie? And niy fat how i i? \"Your fatiier is dying. ,fHe le upsa aiDylagi\"p criýd Walter, slisrply. «Dýithese pust two weeka. Héie bMc calling for Gilbert tül I coud \"Ile wau away?\"I Alice. Harley paused and bent anc LaSMupon the captain. \"Tlien-you ddn't knowi?\" Re looked more bewildered than ev 7liat lie-be la serving sentence for- a e tarted. \"Not Ithatt Not murderi\"' Bhe nodded. \"We thought-everybody thoughl that lie bad tbrown the body mnto f Wstoe afterward. Tbere was no tra cf it though they dragged-l \"dâoodLord!\". \"And your cWp ,4nd coat, bloodataine were foud- » It wus Walter Harley's turn ta pale. \"dAlSin e'ma-gitier man tlianpo Bort,. Liten, il ell ou-no, ta. me ta my father. Expanations wi wait.\"I 8h. sent a glance of inquiry, at h tifllfrm aui e led the way upatairs. UHow long have you been-I meai \"Ju$t'% got ta Wnnpeg - ast Frida3 IM liere ta druîi le reeruite. Wler la Bet, did you !ay?' Ai ê tppe., fnger onli. \"Nfeï - wtv;;oiW fatlier,Wsalter. .Th --the guard from the prison is liere, toc Th.y Wouldn't reniove bis handcuffs an, fithoâr doen't recognizo bis son-af te calig for bim so long. I A sali caugit lier breath. Ilsent for 'him earlj this evening 1 kew he nd aa ot ar off. At firs tlrefused, but I narned a big prie, rdth.y consented under the circuit stancese.-A,,d now- \" Shestped as a sliriek from abový lent the air. Walter etarted. Uit le your fatlier-calling for Bert Comae,lWt us -go in softly. Hie nia recom ie is ther son.\" They entered the sick clianber. .Old Hlrlex ,bad fallen baqk axnone là. piUoils again with bis fast-dirnming flxoid , ul.apatliy on the nigit- Bi the bedside, bent over it, Mi dkhead bdwed linliis hande, was G011 bt.At the table sat the prison-guarc bâdfly r«ua newspaper. ';.GombuWdant lok up at grat.Alice, *t4p i ~ ta hlm, touched -hlm softly e n req= , r. \"Bot-I-I have a surprise far'you. LoIok iup I lie sad. Gilbert slowly raised bis head. Ai firet bis eyes took in nothing but the faci that a soldier waa ln the rooni, on the opposite aide of the lied. A rather bandsome youug nman, Gilbert's face ai this moment bore a striking resemblance ta that -of bis sire, wbo had been a dis- tiuguiahed lookiug mani in his,day. The face was pale, the eyes were dark and mfournful, yet with a piercing liglit in their depths. Closer inspection revealed the fact that the liair of the younger nian, scarce thirty, -was streaked with grey. He looked acroas at the captain, wha returned the look wth a tremulous smile. Gilbert rose unsteadily. His- eyes cloeed a second sud lie passed bis hands -manacied so securely-acrosa bis brow. He flashed )a bewilçlered look at Alice, who stood trembling, ber cheeka gaing red and white, at bis side. Then falln back iuta bis seat agalu, lie moane É dropped bis liead iu his banda. \"Gilbertl\" cried Alice shakiug hlm by the shoulder, \"It's Water. Don't you know bim?\" \" Why do you taunt nie sol!\" cried Gilbert, wildly, brushing lier aside, impatiently. \"Do I not sec him- every niglit, yes, evcry bain'? Must ho liaunt me to my death? See him- knaw hil! Let me be, 1 tell youl' Walter advanced and staod by his brother. The dying man iu the bed, preternatùraily keen, with the keenness of those lest moments before death, lay watching. Ail mists were now ob- literated from bis sigît. Clearly, lis 'aid eyeR saw bis ehidren. Walter took one of the wrinkled hands in his, \"Father,\" lie said gentlY, \"tell hlm i i VI. ?à Gilbert started and glancedu. Then rswiftly he stretched out bis hian% to feel the other. Yes-it waa asolid apparition! It was his brotlier in tlieflesh!-ý \"Boys,\" said Old Hsrley, in a strange, tinu /vowe, \"I bave not 1lo-nake it up. Alice-is it Christtmas morning girl?\"p leefore Alice cauld bend forward ta uod b er ussent, lie had bis anawer. Faiutiy and fron far, away came the sound of Christmas liu on the frosty air. Borne- wlire downstairs a dlock struck. There ,was silence as the twelve nieaaured etrokes resounded tlirougli the bouse. \"Gilbert, niy son,\" said Old Hlarley, bis breatli comiug uow iu labèred gesps, ai give yau-my bleseiag. You .have had your lesson. Walter, rny bleesiug upan you, too. I kuow not-if Va- have risen froni the dead-or where iu this wide iyorld-you bave been for the past-thirteen nionth. \", Walter was about ta speak, but the aid -ian beld up a trembling baud. ait matters nat uaw. Alice, farewell. Farewell-all of you. It is flnislied.\" After ail, popular opinion had erred,î for uow that lie bad given bis biessing, Old Harley drew but onelong, fluttering sigli snd pasaed away, peace upon al bis features. Froni the cradle i the corner came a sudden in'sIstent wail. The watcliers started. Walter sent a auick glance of iury at bis brother. Gilbert uodded. \"Our son,\" lie said simply. E I uIamn going ta beg your forgivenews ,Gilbert snd Alice, luMi yturn'IwZi confes that I have acte the part of a cad. Bert very uearly did for nie that nllt-but not quite. Get this riglit, flit was not premeltated on Bert's p rt My'superciliopa air niaddened Pmn. We quarreiled over you, Alice. \" Aice hid ber face aver that of fier child. \"It was bl6w fgot blow,\" lie went on. rwthem oint, ont. C.N. ty.. I Rainy Lakes, Ontearfo ,IUhIIWfllUi.............. ..........l..b. Ra4ny River, Ont. C.N. Ry. - \"I too, have a child,\" said the eider brother, softly. \"I married a swect English girl last Christmas-.\" -Alice brought the infant over to lay it in its father's arms, but stoPped sudden- ly. Motioning to the guard from the prison, she waited till lie had removed the handeuffa. Gilbert then took bis son upon one armn and held out his hand to Walter. In silence they claqped. After a few moments, m-hen they had moved away, and the guard lad slipped from the rooni, Walter spoke. \"Hie must have left me for dead. When I came ta I remembered nothing for a time. There was blood-well, neyer mmnd that part. After a while it ahl came baek ta me. I staggered up and, taking off my coat, I left it with my cap niglit there at thc point whenc the swamp runs beiow the rocky pramontary. Be- yondý that le deep water, as you know. I am flot ane who easily forgives. I dcciqed ta let Bért's conscience pay the penalty-to let hlm think lic had killed nie. I -Il neyer thougt-.it did nat occur tô me that Àt would end with a charge of murd4 and a prisan terni. That niglit I enbisted, aud aur company was -seat across ta Ëngland almost at once. \" \"And you neyer heard?\" asked Alice, iooking up, bier eyesïfull of tears, whcther of joy or sorrow it was bard ta state- perliaps bath. \"No, I saw fcw papers.\u003e' déThey faund a-I mean the body of an unidentified man sixteen miles down the river. It~ was sometime afterward. Father neyer could be brought ta believe it w'as you, tholi. Thcy had dragged for weeks and found notling until then.\" Thcy wcre silent for a moment or two. TIen Glbert spoke in a voice that sounded firin and resonant once more. \",You hiaK- beexi promoted ta a cap- taincy, I sece liv ur sleevc, *ý-ait,\" lie began. Walter glaneed witl s'oidierly pi-ide at the in-igija and nodded. \"Have vou ayvcnisi o compatnx an vacncis rot \"V7arax -'1IShould sa v so. I1t i over hiere lui. the Very PurioQS C f tfiiug thei. hae fftynow, but I want I\"\"hEnàmyyname down,\" said Gilbert. Walter stared liard at bis brother. \"lYou m ni \"Imean i aih going to enhiat. \"iln t ~r ?Y) \"Certal.\" \"You coul1puchase a commission. There le plentyof money.\" .\"No, Iar going as a private.\"y Gilbert spke flrnily, and straightened bis shoulder. One band went ta hie brow and lie passed bis fingers o ver a certain spot under bis thick hair, i the centre of bis foreliend. .\"There la a littie mark bere,\" lie said, asthough hle liad just discovered it. IlIt bas always been againstnie-that, and my temper.\"ý Alice endeavared ta interrupt him. \"«No, let nie finish,\" lie said witli a huniorous littie emile. \"If the mark of Cain in upon me, I arn going to t tri out on tSbe Germans.,0f vWlat use is\\*1 flgliting blood if it canno e brougît ta serve one's country?\" Walter reacbed forward and gripped Bert's band. \"Bully for you, my boy!\" lie said. And if there were tears in Alice's eyea, she hid them bendlng over Gilpert jumor. The Partind Iry Frank C. Steele Wounde\u0026 lie lay in the thick of the fray, Pierced by a Teuton bail; In the midst aI thé fight, striking etrong for the Right ITe f ell were the braveet fali. -A comrade kneeled near, in bis eye s hane ea tear As le bared the bleeding breast; Their love, .Ah, 'twas grand, and as broad 'as that land Far away lu the great, vast We8t. \"I'm dying, aid pard; My Godl but it'e bard Ta leave yau, Bill, like this; I stuck with you tight tiil Deatb boys lu siglit, And, Bil,, he didn't misa. \"We met on the trail iu the teeth of a. gale, ' Just north of the ILittle Bow; And we beaded the brutes for tleni %belt'ring buttes eRising black in the whirling snow. \"And aIl niglit long with the cowman'e We hl fie ~ maaning lÉerd; Till, morning gray\"found the stanm at bay And the cowman's senses blurred. \"'Twas a terrible niglit, but we won the figlit, And I won you, aid \"nn; And now in a trance on Itthffse plains of - France Ilive it al aven again. \"We've mastered the breed at the 'Peg Stainpedc, And tied the wiMg~st calves; Wne've eiept on the range and sufferetI with mange, And plas.tered oufteives with salves. \"We've \u0026te the sanie junk and shared the sanie bunk, And oft in aid Medicine Hiat Wc've blew ln aur wad, tien bit tlie hot sodl For camp-way north on the fiat. \"Goodbye, Bill, I'm weak-it hurts me ta speak- My throat's aRumli' up fast; But, Bill, tell Jen, when you meet lier again 1 was loyal to the last. A gasp for breath-the sweat of deati- The stare-a Iow. voak moan; And the battlc's surge plaved a soleun As~ liq, soared hore-Sweet Home. In a foreigu land his grave is fanncd By- fire;, for the war-god reigus; PII IliNs sul is light for he died for Cie. .\\îîl Jen-Âis Jen-of th. ue is IE J-joili .ýM..,1 ........... . 1 ................ . .....",
         "The Westepo Home monthly v, but I Wftnt e down,\"l said his brother. a commission. jrivate.\"I id straightened 1 went te hie finge rs over a Ak air, in the boreIl he said, )vered it. \"It me--that and Srrpt hlm. e said with a f the mark cf oing te talé~ nhbat use i' \u003et b e brouglit and gripped 'ou, my boy!\"I n Alice's eyea, (3ilpert junior. thick cf the 1; ght, striking b ~tfaîl. la hiis eye breast; and, and as rast We'st. E4odl but lt's his; Death hove .e teeth cf a 30w; S for theni ling snow. ie ewman'a ie storm at blurred. Lit, we wonl se plains of ud at, the nd sufferetl th salves. snd shared at en hit the lhe flat. hiurts me meet lier of deatlî- oan; a eolein Home. o fanned eigns; ed for the \u003elains. 4' 4 By John M. Hargreaves TELL you what, boys, I wouldnt \"Jb. out on the prairie to-night for a. athousand dôars It's twenty.. feve below, and a snorter of a blizzard blowlngIl and the speaker, who had just entreJ the room ini the unpretentious building sevhg as postoffice general tore and mneetmng place for al die gossi s of the littie western village, shook tgle snow from bis f ur coat and cap and tok up a position in close .oximty to the roaring stove, around weh a haif-dozen or so of farmers, villagers and Ilbuxnmers\", were already seated. «cItl' a freezer, ail right, and 1, fer one, amrighty glad IVve only ter _oter the xBet b[ock fer My bed this niglit,\" spoke Camp Life, RanY Lakes (9It happen *dithe eighties, as Ised; one of thgShardest winters I ever seen, and 1 hev bin in the West more'n thirty years. .1lTht ear1 edbin knocldn' around all over thecountry, and doin' most any kind cf a job that corne along. The fail found me in K-, a littie one-horie place i Saskatchewan, and I wus cursin' xny luck fer leadiri' me ter sich a forsalcen hole, when I dropped acrost a feilow one day in the only saloon in the town. 'H'ev a drink,' sez he, by way cf interducin' bimself. 'I guess I wil' sez 1; namin' my poison ter the barkeeper. \"'Stranger in the.4 part eh?' he went on, flmngin' a five-spot acrot the bar. \"' es z I, as I poured the whisky \"'Well, my naine'. Phil Mawes,' the fellow sel, sippin' outer bis glass. 'I keep bach on myplace, twelve miles south, and I woZd lie ter get hold cf someone ter help me look arter a hundred head 'this winter. If yer'll cgme ll give yer good money. Fil Up yer glas and Lbink over it.' \"Well, boys, ter cut things short, it took four glasses ter help me tbink mat- ters out, and then I concluded I niight dloworse thantale a spellon afa .Se I got my traps tergether, andle own with Mawes fer bis place. Phil lied one of the slicket-placesyer ever clapt eyes on-stables, anl bufit in a bune , and Pithers Point, near Fort Francis, Ont. C.N.Ry. I' a voice, the owner cf which sat with both feet elevated on the fuel box, and .U. chair tilted back at an angle which stained its two back legs te creaking pint. ý\"Aye, yer're riglt,\" exclaimed a third nember cof the group, a big hulking slianty-mail from tlie camps away north, and a stranger evidently, te tlie réât: \"I ougliter Èiev taken the trail ter the camp ter-night, but I guess F'i wait till this blows is-seif out. Gee! how it dees Sfort,\" as an unusually strong' blast ecreeched around tlie building, rattling the stove Dlpes ini the chimney and whirl- ngthrough evéry~ minute crevice around the door frame stréams cf snow, dry and fne aà pewder. \"Sich a niglit as this,\"I the stranger went on, \"reminds me cf that record cold winter, back in the eghties, when I wus baching it on tlie fQvrm.wlth Phil Mawes, who gev me this mf 'mernbrance cf hlm, as the tombstones Say.\" Here the speaker pushed back bis cap and revealed a long, deep scar a cross his forehead. \"Tel us the yarn,- boss,\" cried several volces in unison, while the postmaster and storekeeper combined, wliose at- ~pntion had been divided between lis uties and the words cf the strafiger, exclairned: \"'Yes let's have the story! It's elosing time, Lut I don't mind keep-j Mfg open if you'll tell us the %yarn,\" and lie tosscd more-wood into the steve and seated himself among the group. \"Wlboys,\" began the stranger, \"Im i flot inuch at sprnnin' a yarn, but secin' as ver want the story I gueslIlI et yer bey it. Indians oýi Rainy River. C.N.Ry. ha nd straw piles around 'em fer a winnd-break. i ose wus bujît about thirty rod away, and ail done up in style -panier and picters on the walls, carpets and ileclotb on the floor, and a pianner in the parlor. I \"When I hed bin with him-ab ut a week lie kinder Jet things out a bit, and told me lie wus gemn' ter geL marri ni the spring. He lied known the girl fe years in the Old Country, and when hie concludcd he'd corne out here ter get rich quieker, she told hlm she would wvait fer ever fer him. \"Ile had blanked bad luck arter gettin' here, and twelve years slipped away afore hie found himscîf able ter send fer the girl. \"'That's her fuittergraft,' sez he, Ipointin'-ter a big pickter over the pianncr, 1~ The J. B. WILIAIMS COI., Dé\u003e!. A, Glastonbury, Conn., U.S.A. Add A.\u003eÇniàldng louch Io gour \u0026hmnwiih wiIliama' -uxurIom aTal\u0026 Poodi, Wiliam8 made shaving soap before creamn was (hought of and the soothing. refreshing. enduring lather that has mnade - Williams Shaving Soapa famous for, 75 years is in~ Wiliamsi' Shaving Cream. Your nearest dealer can supply you. Howto make Wet Matches fire with wet D. BIRMAN, apparatus for chem eL a-iiid. Jut your- 1141fa fl Itch w edll \u0026ii suer of Marriage Licenzeg and t The U.S. anutae rý,er y, H.)x j61gary,,Ua. ed i irIii vvý D 0s b 's r Sick, Powdoe, Ce. li Send 12c. in a aps fora wral size of a Il four forSa. and th.a clecide whîch you prefer. or send 4c. in stamps for anyono.",
         "The Woen -Home Monthlyý Have Corns * Now, ett àe £rmtign. Iapply a Blue- jay. And 1 neyer leel the corn agaul. - \"lu twc trea \"\"And it coits five cents in that way to ,end. acoen forever. \"Now 1 neyer have a com. In years Sandi years, 1 have neyer let a corn pain \"1For your own salce, go get Blue- Blue-jay Ends Coras 16C aMd 26C at DruggLsts EAUER \u0026 DLCg CWOucaco w.4 ew Yok \u003eLk fkers of SuNrlsreslngs.ae. Sheri Y, t -r--- ock - anning Agents Write us for catalogues and priees. Complef c range of pianos always on hnd. W d freglionaU estrnCanada orders.ý Trerms: One, two or three 333 PORTAG VNE -N4PO WbenwrIUg mvertiserl Please lîlontion lTle Western home NMonthly. pthe triM in no time. ywonder. I got honp. ter thank the horse fer beast fer- keepin' the What.witli jerks an d drifts, :the- pour 1uing out, when we puiled u fi th sables. Jbwlin'ail over the nd some of '-em hed stack-yard. :I looked ut couldn't oee nothin' See a liglit ini the house dwould let up fer a iugli I yeiled myseif t nake in hear. 1 stable and made tracks, onderin' if Phil knew ken inter the stacks. .the door I knew some.. r the parlor wus ltu the pianner and sin3jl oor and crept in, quiet rt n the kitchen wua bfrom the parlor, and floor and peeped inter all dressed fer goin' out, ail on, asittrn' at the id singin' one mainute eryin' the next, and ýrgraf t of bis girl ail ie jumps, up sudding, ianner witl i hu face 1 - y--, J, s o days i cçmpletely chsappears ied ta paretbem les Lused haxsh mitments. 1 did ail that you have doue. 'But whats the use? \"A Blue-jay always enuds a corn without amy ibovememce. It is simple, usientific, .Think What You Can. Buy With the $100 We Sve-You 1. The $100 we save you wiIl buy rnany other homïe com- forts and your piarno wlll be ;the best that time and money -can produce. You take no chance in buy- izig a style 75--Chippendsi. SHERLOCK-MANNING 2th CENTURY PIANO m~eue tcres to Yeu with apitivo urne o a ers. Its vial parts are the best that .,ony an buy; this include ati ing andhaers Because it is the beet; yet sails for lully 8100 legs, we are iustified in. elainiing it to be ftCaniada~s Dlggest Piano Value\" If You imuat spend that $100, why hlot put it into néew ruge, handsoiw furniture, et rtnlits or other use fui articles. BU3' a Sherlock,-Manning 2th Century Piano, and haveé,ýl00 ofry rnoney lof t for other purposes. Cet Handsnm. Just write Dept. 14 a postal for our beautifully illustrated Piano Cata-. logue \"A\", whjch f ully explains every point of the ontruèlion of Ait ..a.oigue Sherlock..Manning Pianos, and tells how we are able toesave yoYu $100, FREE yet give highest quality. THI SHEELOOKE-MANNING PIANO COMPANY, 73 LONDON (No Street Addrea sNeceasary) CANAA and, boys, she-wus a. peacli. too, with a and arnothered up buncli of bak -haïr,- and big eyes that \"It's a niity folered yer aflovertlie ï tom at .91, and 1hev1 \"«Myt Pü hi lought a piU.fta girl, it, fer a better1 and no- wouder, fer sire 2sRi purtiest trait I never see. creattre I, ever.smen. It wus mgh the plungin' through nnddle ofî Novrerber that I went with wus near played c Mawes, and fer about two weeks we at dark in fronto lied nothin' nich ter~ kickabout-not \"The cattie wu much work ter do and plenty of time p lace fer feed, au ter do itîn. broken inter the \"The weatlier lied bin grand ail fail, the round fer Phil bu. cattie feedin' out où the prairie ail the of him. I could s( turne and we thought we were in fer a when the blizzard stic tirne, when a sudding change corne, second, but, aithc The sun corne up bright and warm as hoarse, I could't usual one mornin', but about noon a put the horse ini thei big bank of clouds roiled up front the fer the house, wc north-east and specks of snow began ter the cattie lied brol faIt. \"More 12 opened1 \"The cattie hied got wind that a storm thin' wus wrong, fer wus brewin', fer I lied gone off arter and Phil aplayin' t] dinner ter round 'cmn up, when I met 'em like mad. two miles off comm' home. By the timue \"I opened the dc 1lied got'en. a orne a big snow-stormn lilce. The only lil] lied setin.what corne tbrougb \"Phil lied gone ter town afore dinner, I crept acrost the E and wlien lie got back, at midnight, ciglt the room. rnches of snow smotliered everythun', d \"There wua 1Plilà peltin' down bader'n ever. fur coat, cap andi \"«Next mornin' wlien we got up, the pianner, playin' an( snow lied stopped, but tjuere wus a thnlrin' ande liowlin' blizzaàrd on, which- lasted four lookin' at the fUttE days, scoopin' the snow off the prairie, the tirne. Then hf and near buryin' tlie stables. On the leans over the pi fiftli day the blizzard let up, but tlie near touchin' tlie glass went ter forty below zero, where ataikin' ter it. it stuck fer nigli on a week, while me and Phil worked like niggers aclearin' the snow fromt the stables and stacks. \"'We lied no sooner got the yard clear of snow, so's we could walk around decent like,ý than another blanked big snow storrn and bzzard corne, driftin' up the yrard and banhin' the stables worse. \"Phil near cried wlien lie saw our week's work ali un- done in a day, but I swore goo and liard and went at the job again as soon aP the stprrn jet up. \"'AndL soit went on, boy., al througl tlie long winter: snow storma and blizzards every few days, andF blanked cold weather1 all the time. Wef cidn't care a cent,1 thougli, fer ourt selves, fer we h'nd A scene of great natural baauty in B.C. a warm bouse andl plenty of grub alwayst on hand. But Vlien the mniddle of ter the samre place wl .lanuary cozue we concluded weyd bey \"Then lie dashes ter shut down on the cattle feed'a bit. and reaches fer a re Then, about a wieek later, we cut their which we ailus kept 1 feed down again, fer the stacks wus dis- \"I1 pulled myseif teri apnearin' like greased lightnin', and'Pijil quicJ,, and sprmngs ti began ter look uneasy lie. ' t and scoots outside \"However, we jogged along fer some hîm after me, sliootin time, cuttin' down the feed dloser and Gosh! how 1Iran, ands, closer, until the cattle wiîa only bunehles plungin' through drif of bones, and would stand ahl day lookin' keep on the patli ýer at the feed and a-tryin' *ter break through guessed if I could re the fences-ter get at it. Phil I miglit slii him \"Phfil lied gene al ever the country in', then take a liorse fer Miles tryin' te get feed, but it weren't, \"The path, thougli, ne use; everyone wus short that year. Iseen lost it, and wt \"At last, near the end of February, fer havin' missed thý tbîngs got' desperate lilze. Since New lost in the blizzard, wi Year near, the cattle hed bin keein' ever the stack-yard fence, one ýy one unfil, when Mlardi corne fair sing. Then I b\u003ce round we lied hauled over fifty bides me andfeels a bullet m on ter the prairie. Poor Phil, about then an awful bellowf this time, began ter give way, and ter the stables, tie other look queer at times. Hie would go inter yard. ffic parlo1r after tea, and sing and play \"I loks round and fhe pianner, in the first part of the figger in the blizzar( winter, but lie gave t ail up now, and wards me, his fur ceat would sit until bed tîme starin' inter flear every step. thec stove, and never say flot lin'. \"I1 sees him raise1 \"No wonder thec poor beggaî fclt doivn, flash, and a bullet bits after Alavin' allf bose vcar, and then ter me. 1 ducks doçw-n 0ec bis caf tic dîn' :îlI round him. fruitcfnelk \"1W.], tbîngs corne fo a bead mighfy face anti tearin' my fur sludding one day, and 1I 4m11 never fer- on tlchrs yfi g et i f. b le tl r u g h flic h e tl \"a htned li ni f owîî L f lie fu oon, and n, ear t he fence, and .as ear bfned ct Oildy t. ,to Iddt etof fthc snow hle 1e enre fer't , 0o101,91tgl, but whcn 1 ter grab mc, buIt 1 o xv-us abotlit bflf wq:\"y5borne oeeof iffl)e yr c tcc e werst Il,*.,.. u',,r1: ovrtook tue t uicg ferLt hik , flue v m- mý \"ci'rn mcorin, hli sez. 'I'm comin' to yer, dear. Oh, how long the time lias bin. Twelve long years! But now the time lias passed, and our meetin' will be ail the sweeter. It's a liard winter, and ail MY Cattie are dyin', 'but what do 1 care, fer 1 shail. soon see yer. Seet dear, I amrn tartin' - new ter meet yer. Oh urlseter comin'! comm'! \"kdiThen, aforeI knew what lie wua about lie dashes tlirough- the doorway inter the kitchen lungin' inter me ana sendin' me on the Jloor in a heap. 'H'ello!' sez lie, 'urrised lik e. 1'What beyv you corne back fer? I thouglit yer'd Icft after starvin' ail the catf le. You want ter kil, more, do You? VUil fix yer, thougli. JIU rend yer tere yer've sent 'em.' sacrost the room petron the wall, [oddfer kyotes. rgether, then, mighty ter tie door, op ens 9inter tie blizzard, n' and yellin' awful. sweated, and panted, Ets and tryin' fer ýthe stables, fer I .ach 'em ahead of and bide tiil mern- \u003eand scoot fer help .. wus ail driffed. uis cursin' my.luck ie stables and. got vhen I bashed inter m raldn' the wires iars 1. shot behind whiz past my head, from a steer up at side cf tie stack- makes out Phul'a rd,, flounderin' te- taleggin' hira ever bis arnis, then a sa fence post near. then, and goes Smad, duttin' my ir ceat ter riblons time I had scram- kcd wire Phil was I 1wus gettin' htp ,s ever the wire )oted quick aerost I fenée, and goes",
         "4Tbe ,Westepn Home Mfonthly A brail in no0 tuie. ider .I got borne 1831k the horse ff fer. keepin' the at:-with jeks an\u003ci 3, the-poorlut hen.we puled Sstables . - p irlin' ail over the )mne of -em, lied r-Yazd. I1 looked ildn't see nothin, [Iglt i the house ild let up fer a I yelled myseif [ce hin hear. 1 . and madle track4 n' if Phil knew iter the staclis. o)or I knew Borne.. parlor wus lit p inner and singin, id crept in, quiet the kitchen wu$ i the parlor, and ind peeped inter ssed fer goin' out, i, asittin' at the gin' one minute the next, ana 't of bis girl ail :ips, up sudding, with hia faceè ter, and starts 'Imcomm',' lie 'I'm comin' te dear. Oh, how the time haa Twelve long il But now the lias passcd, and rueetia' wil be ie sweeter. It's ird winter, and. Env cattie are 'but wbat do 1 fer 1 shal se0 yer. Sec! I an startin'.- ter neet yer. arrvtsweetbeart- hon, dfore wliat lie wus' lie dashea. gb the doorway' the kitcheà x' inter me ana ai' me on the. in a bnap. jeUe!' sez lie, ised lik e. 1'What ,ou corne back' 1 thouglit yer'd Fter starvin' ail te. You want :ii more, de VUi fix yer, b.,l'il send yer er've sent lem :)st the roorn r on the wall, 1 fer kyotes. r, then, mighty e door, opJens the blizzard, vellin' awfui. ýd, and pan ted, Mn 'ryin' ter ,stables, fer 1 'em abead of iide till mora.- scoot fer help. ail drifted p rsin' mny luck bics and. got :bashed inter in' the wircs shot hehind )ast my head, a steer up at cf the stack- es eut Phil's )underin' te- ,in' hlm over rnis, then a ice post near, and goes ciittin' my b tem ribbonis 1 had scram- ire Phiil was 's gottinl tup ver tbe wire quick acrost oe, and. goes '-I THE DESIRE FOR HAPPINESS Every human being desires happiness. \"A merry leartf*i doeth good like a mfficine;\" therefore every one wlshes a rnerry heart. To be joyful, te obtain happiness, is te, fulfil at least a part of humân destiny, for enjeyrnent expands ail our capacities, our abilities te play, te work, te love. Yet often we wish too greatly for bappiness that may add solely te, our ternporary ease of mind that may 'help us te forget wbat we ouglit to wish te -remember. Hlappiness that la an anodyne, tbat merely stilîs pain, rnay become a posi- tive evil. No one bas the riglit te wish for'happiness at aay cost. Every one Who ia living a decent huanan if s will bave some measure of happineas. The modern world recognizes in happiness a. pronoter of lealth, and a help te the apne and syrîetrical development of, The. suffering, the besson that ehould Mimd. bite into us as acid bites into a metal To be happy may become a\" duty, but plate, we wish to avoid or te forgct. there i- an attitude toward lappiness, In the pursuit of pleasure people lose a craving for .it, that is -an cvii. De inany pleasures. That is what baâppens Quincey, wrote,1 \"Shall I speak ingenu- with bappiness. In,. worlçing for it at ously? I. con fess it, as a bWsetting. àaay cost, i being unable te compare infirmity of mine, that I arn too mucli its present value with the benefit de- of an eudemonist; 1 han ker too mucli rived from suffering or sorrow bravely after a state of liappiness, both for borne, we ]Ose muet . Most ef the ter. myseif and others;, I cannot face nmis- rible habits that injure rnankind have ery,, whether my owa' or net, with an corne as a consequence of craving for eye of àufficient firrnness; and arn ittie happiness, of desiring te forget at any capable of eacountering present pain for cost. the sake of any reversionary benefit.\" The force tbat ernes with moral 'bat is1 on@ way of describing wbat courage, the deveiop'nent of our own may ho e alled moral cowardice, which personaiity, knowledge of life, atrong la what the eraving for happiness love, self-control--ail these values \u0026a Mioretimes means. We are net strong be ours only as we are willing te paye eneugli, or well enougli discipiined, or for them' and we must pay, if need be, obedlient enougli te bear pain. W7e think with the bappiness for ýwhich we are we must find an escape ia bappiness. weakly craving. e\"SoonasuI gehe other aide Phil ir again, and I feels a sting wliere thiascar is, but I thinks nothiji' of it at the time, and scoota fer the stables as if old nick wua after me. \"lPhil then bangs away fer ail he'a worth, and I hears the bullets whizzin' ail about me, se I ducka clown in a drift and looks back, fer I gueaaed li e bd not lied time ter get clear tbrough the two fences. \"I couldn't see nuthin' of hlm, fer the snow wua flyin' thick, and it wus pitch clark, but 1 could see. the flash of bis gun, andI kalklated lie wus somewhere's in the stack-yard and hed the second fence ter get tbrougL daore ho could reacli the stables. \"He muet 1ev flled bis pockets with cartridges dfore lie left the house-we silua kept a lot near the rifle-fer lie kept blazin' away at the stables bebin wme akin' that way. Soo\u003cn I hears big smash of glass up at the stables, then an awful bellowin' émong the cattie shelterin' in the yard, and then tliey cornes stampedin' riglit past me, rushin' inter the fence and tearin' the wire off the posts then cliargin' out on the prairie like mad. \"Phil startsa ayellin' and- a-larfin' awful, and I just cauglit a siglit of him scrambiin' tbrough the wires and follerin' after thecattie, blazWn away at 'en ail the tino. \"I gets up outer the drift and makea fer the stables but I hedn't gone a rod aforejI grows \u0026ai0 like, and topples over in the snew, where I lies fer a minute kinder dazed. Feelin' somethin warm runnin' clown my face I puts ny band up anxd finds this gash wherIgePh hed bit me wbilo e u crawlin' tbrough, the fence. III drags myseif along,tlien, as weil as Icould, on my bands and knees te the horse stable, opens the door and goes in fastenin' myseif in with a liook on the inside. I crawls past the liorses, spek' ter 'on as I weilt fer tliey wus anortin' se, wenderin' wliat the rumpua wus, and lies clown under a manger. III muet bey fainted or sonmetbin' soon after, fer wlien I comne te it wua daylight, anxd the liorsea wbinnyin' fer grub. III gets out fron under the manger and fanda I could stand Up ail riglit.M cpwu@ glued ter the cut in m aneas, dtbng-oo o Iges Idhe bled ter death-leastways the doctor ses so afterwards. \"I opens tbe door a little andpep througb the crack fer signa of Phi, but 1 sees nethin' of him, and there wus no emoke comin' outer the bouse chimney. A lot of the winders wus smashed, in the stables, and about ten steers Phil lied shot wus lyin',around dead and covered witb snow. \"The rest of the herd lied corne back after stampedin', and were feedin' i the stack-yard. \"Well, boys, tbere's not mucli more ter teil. I give the horses sorne lay, then took one of 'em, bitclied hlm. ter tbe. cutter, quiet like, in case Phil wus around, and drove ter town fer belp: \"While I went ter see the doctor-about a dozen feilows went down in a sicigli ter look for Pl, but tbey couldn't see hlm nowberes. \"The bouse door wus open, j ust as lie lied left it wben lie cbased after me, and the kitchen lied drifted balf full of snow. Three of the fellows stayed ter look after the place and searcli gangs went ail over the country after 'Phil. About a week afterwarda one of the gangs sees a bit of clotb stickin' outer a drift ciglit miles frorn the bouse. Going ter it tbey finda Phil ail froze stiff in the drift, with bis gun near hlm, and lia bandsaai gashed witb the barb wire. 'The council wrote ter bis folksa in the Old Country, and toid 'em ahl about it, so bis brother and tbe girl Phil wus to bey rnarrjed corne eut ter sel up the farm. Wben they saw the kind of place it wus they took a likin' fer it, miade tbings up between thenselves ter rnarry and settle,on tbe place. .i \" Last I heard of 'ern they wus stili farmin' ,and doia' 'nazin' weli, witb a littie Pu ter belp 'enrnilk the cows. \"That is the, yara, boys, about this gasb, and yer bet I wouldn't go through tbat bizness again fer ail the farms in the wvest. Good aight.\" IF hrass or copper, after Clegtnsing, E ru'bld with soft newspapers, it wiil 10ol- much brighylter and keep înuvh The Plantsi at Walker*vife-your guai' antee of QUALItY and Quick Serice Si-Cylisader Mode\u0026a Ne man can safely Invese a dollar ln1 a car until h.e knowm what Stude. Touring Car, 7-passenger - $1430 baker, one of the ndustry's lsadru oflrs.'And we urfge every nan tg Readater, 3-passenger - - 1425 methià SERIES 17 FOUR--the biggest value tIatinAs$'Made in cana\",* Landau-Roadster, 3-pauaengoe 1700 F. 0. B. Walkervil. Foun-Cylinder Modela Touring Car; 7-passnger - $1225 Roadater, 3-passnger - - 1200 Landau-Roadsater, 3-pmasenger 1500 Stý2debaIer Ideals 'of qualty aftd the GREAT Studeba1«, plante at Walkervile-these aire your guaroiteeu of qualty in Studebaker cars. And especially, the Walkerville plant\u0026. For they represent one of the- most complet, automobile manufactories that any country know-a guarantee not only of quality, but of Quick Service. This new EIES 17 Studebmker POUR la te.suprema effmof aithe» great factoriea backsd by al ef $tudebaker'u reacurces. Dollar for délias of the price, it gives more reai, actual VALUE than anyoéther 4-cyllnde car on the markt-FORTY horse power-room for BFVEN-112-inch wheebase-34 x 4 tires-upholutery of te fineme leather-DIVJDED front seats-and scores of other Studebaker refinements that uet tuAs n.w Studebaker ln te very forefront of the market.",
         "* 12 ls. Wet GRAIN C\u0026-.,COBO GRAIN EXCHANGE, WINNIPEG. W. handi. Wheat, Oatai FEux and Barley on commission, obtain.ng, best rpoeiblç grades and prices. Our work ia prom t, accurate ani reliable. let us)-b\".YOUR ahipment. thio season. Da2ly or weekly rriaket letter on application. 'y. Rgffremm: Bank of Toronto, Northern Crown Bank aud Commercial.Agencies Wheat and:Oati are ini strong demand for special shipment. Write us before loading for best destination and secure advantage of any premiums that are going. Caeful checking of grade, liberal advanoes, prompt adjustments. R8tabliahed 1857 Ucensed and \"~ded James'$ Richardson \u0026 Sons,. Ltd.\" Grain Exchange, Winnipeg The Report for 1915 0f The Great-West Life Assurance Company is now in print, and will be mailed to any interested person on request. It records a year of remarkable success -success founded upon twenty-three years of remarkable Resuits to Policyholders Over $1 19,000,000 of Insurance is now held in force by The Great-West Life Assurance Company Hlead Office - Winnipeg zuMd the e rns is done Yôur seasn's crop destroyed, and your time and ZmOney wasted. Los-A etaggering Jasa. Your noighber waswiae. He insured againat losa.y bail with The Canada Hail Insurafice COMPany masure NOW with -a Company known throughout the West as the BIEST for fair dsalixig, low rates, positive protection, prompt oettlemeçnt, full payment of lasses. Fal inforpatton from our Branoh Rmording Offices: P.O. Box 366, Regina; P-0. Box 232, Calgary, or our Local Agents. cagu w wLus eo'rWHM8lamrnp UNION à\u0026« S UILDIIG, WIN Write for boolet and circular, ternis, etC. Featherstonhaugh \u0026 Co. Fred. B. Fpathcrstonhaugh . .C., M.G. Cerald S. Iloxburgli, 1B.A. Se. 209- 10 Datik of Nova Scotia. Portage Ave 1 (Corner o fGarry) WINNIPEG Home.,Monthl.y peaee ]River MPleoeretlo91 SBy Q. Fairchild. W ALLACEWÂRD had experlenced the lure of the more settled parts of the west and after a re turu egst and 14s mafriage, he -flt even more certain Vhat only in the west 'hW. coulil satisfy Uis full belief inu his capacity of \"make go)odi,\" and use hi\u0026 knowledge of logging and sawing Ioarnt in the timiber lands of Quebec, to be the first ta set up a mili in the new country opening up, and known as the Peace River Distirict. To Ada Ward, the west meant nothing ibeyond a vague idea of roling prairies, wheat, horses and \"getting ricli quick\"' talk, but to, offset ber merciful ignorance of ail before her, she bail a good stock of common sense and .daptability, and an ail-round knowledge of household and fanm management. Bot'h young people possessed healt'h, and with that es'sential qualification, they had a little nioney ta etart out on. After the wrench of parting front the old home, the journey to 'Edmonton was full of interest, ai.d it was not until leaving the train that Ada realized the only'connecting link with the life she knew was varnihing, with the trail aniole.. A few days rest, and on the pioneers etarted by train ta 4'thabasca Landitie, for the autumu was rapidly overtaking them, and Peace River Cross- ing stili te be reached by auy and every menus they could command. Wallace was coxnmencing te have misgivings as ta how a woman would stand the rub- bing shoulders with all sorts, and the difficulties of securing any privacy [far as, Mirror L«nding, where shore 1lodgings consisted. of wooden wiudowless eaMIs of bedroorna. From,~Mirror Land- ing, Vbpee going further. on, drove'over a rougli portage to Sauiteau, but nO boat' having-yet arrived, Waliace pitched their tent, and arranged their belongingta and food; it was their first western \"home,\" and such as it was, it afforded hospitality to travelling companions less fortunate than themselves. Crowded on the steamer once more, they huddled about the boiler for com- fort, until Sawbridge was reached at the lower end of Lesser Slave Lake. Across its broad waters the boat ploughed al the next day, and it seemed exhilarating after the intricacies and uncertainties of river navigation. Grouard, at the opposite end'6fî the Lake, ended t-heir voyage, and from here to Peace River there was ne one to look to but themeelves, to help theni on their way. AIthough Grouard boasted of be- ing a \"town,\" with shops and, etreets, ta the Wards their own tenit again seeni- ed a much preferable shelter. After two d'ays bargaining, a pair of 'horses and a buckboard were bought. Wàth tent, blankets, groceries pots and pans, tin stove, gun and small trunk packed on behiind the buckboard, they Ïtarted away from rouard,--no one knew them, ne on1e cared, and a mile ont they might have been Adam and Eve, so alone were they, but for thie companionship of the big dog bounding along beside thein. A night alone on the trail! Wallae amnotrced that it was no use attempt. ,JI A Pcace River game bag wuetravélling. R'ît Ada 1auglhed at bis fears and reminded him that sho was now an oId marriod woinan. Athabasca seemed quite a centre of eivilization, and there was enough ex- citement in the arrivals and siartings out of there te keep up Adais spirits, and niake ber feel that at least she would have human companionslhip, even if only tlxit of thse oid saying, 'tMisery likes eompany.\" No heavy luggage having overtaken the travellers, they decided to trust to luck ta, getting it forwnrded, and bouglit a supply of provisions, as uothing but actuial transportation could hoeounted on from Athabasca ta Peace River. A fine collie dog shared their fortunes, but roligh as the conditions might ho to his owners, to him anything was boýtter than flying express trains. Thle Athabasca River steamer was crowded with freight and passengers, and its navigat iin the low water re- niinded the wards of \"Old Tineis on the M3ýissisýsippi,\" and the leadsrnan nmaking the soun(lings should have called out \"Mark Twi7n.\" OnI' the lazinless of the South waslarlckig, and thie re vere no plctîîrem lite darkie lonfers to amnuse thlem. Faft-' also were behug floated down on -vhie1î \"I-ukîeberi*v Finn\" and \"Old Jimn\" nig-ht have lived Freio'ht was liiloadle( at lotiely spots, wvlerei somo ssottier xvas eagerlv awaiting the P.rrivai of soniftliîiug taomke lfe mo learabie. At. 1i]utile boat \\Vas tiel up to ile silore, aiju thle PaýýelgerS w ho laid il im uiiks irrang*\u003cýl i) sivleas ie;t they oîd At moo-e Por-tge taeln od tions d i l iîoLi iprove, for the ril ver here, grew ~ alw',ani a more d.prt Packiiig i, er wa a l (avta get ail OuB ' a ii a:îIr a:î ing to rach the regt house; kept for wayfarers, and they must ýhurry te male camp before darkness overtook them. Thse work of preparing a meai, kept Ada from thinking of tIse loneliness of ber surroundings, and it was not un- tii rolied up in hler blankets, that the dread of lb ail seized her. The snufflings of thse tethered horses nearby, Beemed comforting solunds, but \"Sport\" stirred regtlessiy at thse tent door, and once far awvay Ada felt sure she heard a weird cry. Tears scalded ber cheeles at, the thoughts of homo and their conceru if they could seo her now, but 'Wullae, poor fellow, was so tired, eie had not thse heart ta wake hini. Breakfast next morning in the crisp air was the most appctbizing one ever eaten, while, the horses got thoir por- ridge too, for there was nothing te add to their grazing, but a feed of \"Quaker Rolied Gats.\" -Prairie and poplar buish, poplar bush and prairie, for eighitv miles, marked only by thse rest or \"1bunk\" ihousee every feui miles or sa, kept by haif breeds, or a white man siink toa the level of 'a haif hred wi..e. MWater, wood and fodder for the horses couid be depended on at these p)laces, but travellers had ta cook their own food, and put up a screen of a blanket ta make a domestie divi- sion froin others occupv)ýing thse room. Thue inl 1, pictuiresqulie featureS of thse wo~nsxere thse big open fires, in thse inuid oliinneys across thse enids of lise .calbins. oor as these sýtoppilig pliipes. fee ile ' v ere eagerl 'v looked forwvard I o tflie- end of the daY's journey. and flore wils a qileer -atliering lu ofpea- j)o froill the foin' coriners of thse earth, al 1nuehl exelhange of experiences. Siiiitnes froin shieer delight at being \"x 0(2a nal'owd a-àiin, the young 4 .ESTÂBLIS H.ZD1.94 J. H. MI. CARSON. Umnutacturer of ABTIFYDIAL LIMBB 3a8s Colony st, Wlnnlpeg, Establàiiied 1900 T» Latet là lip Socet. Satlffaction to ke Af Tai pi an îne ir, V-in ta, pli sei aif oet is of 011 fa",
         "The« Western Home Mon thly mnen danced together to thbe mugie of Inuth-organs-the following morning the trail swallowed them up. The Valley of -the Peace River. That the Wards might gaze on thle country êpreaio ut below, -the tired horses were pulled up beffre making the descent Qof eeven hffnd.red- t4d the \"Cros*dng.\" AI- thjough the scéies were new to i-hern yet it seemed as if they had arrived in a horneland. The waters of the'Peace end Srnoky Rivera were like silver atreaks, while the his and dark ever- greens rerinded Ada of hier own Lauren- tian lis i far Quebec. Down, down, the horsew went until the level of the river was reached, and the main street here shore windowless irror Land- droive'over i, but n'O lace pitehed belongings it western, it afforded )anions less once More, mr for coin- ched at thé ike. Across loughed ail xhilarating rtanties of Bnd-\"'ôf thé from here Dné i-o look ~m on their 3ted of lie- nd, etreets, ~gain seern- ber. Af ter of 'horses rht. With and pané, ink packed ey started mne knew e out they re, sô alone riionship of ýside them. I! Wallace e attempt. of thbe little i-own building upon its banks. A bank in a wooden shack, hotels (of sorts), a smali mission churcli, stores and a few houses formed the nucleus of a place predicted -o de- velop into an importantly placed towuL \"when i-he railroad came.\" Thçi 'Teace Ilotel\" opened is doors Food seemed at famine prices to one accustomed te the plentiness of an east- ern farm, but on the other baud, the arnount o.f garne eeemed marvellous. The Peace River was the highway, a river steamer plying betweeu the Ilud- son'sBay trading pots, whiie t4ejn- evitable Hudeon!s Bay store' was tJhe centre of life at the Crossing, and f. few Northwest Moun1ted Police heid their wonderful sway over their district. The firt Ohitmas came and found Ada anxiousiy pacing- the floor as Wai- lace was days overdue f rom hie. last prospect.ing trip. What couid have hap- pened? Only something serions i-o leave lier alone on s'uch a day, a box from, home badt corne, and the dinner was ar- ranged as much like old times as Ada could do it. A neighbor begged Ada i-o leave the house and corne to liers, ut no0 coa.xing could prevail, iu case Wal- lace sh*uld arrive et a shut up house. The afrternoon passed, then niglit carne, and Ada wasthankful for the company of the neighbor's chiid. Two days later Wallace drove in with a dead lame horse, and the tears that hadl not. corne during thle agony of uneertainty, :flowed for joy at WVIalaoe's safety. The poor Christrnas dinner was warmed again, and eaten as a thankasgiving one. ?New Year's Day was i-o be a grand event in the annala of the Crossing, and 1a wonderful charity bail wasto lie given at the dotel, to raise money for a cot- tage hospitaL The littie town was full of men in for the holidays, in parties, or twos and i-Lrees, but more of lonely men, dcspe-ately lonely men, deterrnined though strangers ail, to have as good a Hae~.uWo, Pay 57. riHv¶ e ud o wish to invest for one year or five? ¶Have you any4trust money you wish to put in a afe' place?, ¶Have you surplus f unds which you wish to lay aside from your busin~ess for a timet ¶Have Yeu money on deposit te meet nmre future payment? ¶All such monnov a mve entrusted -to the care of The Empire Loan Company and ern 5 per Cent, while f ully secured by rnartgages deposited with a trustes. THE EMPIRE LOAN COMPANY UNION- TRUST -BUILDING WINNIPEG OÉ. CANADA Secure Prompt Returns Through Union Banik of Canada D)rafts When yo hip vrlivestocké grain or dairyprdeemr prmtpa\u003e'ment Dy putting through a Union Baink. ofCanada DrZton the Conuignes. This ite biu1nàuliike w\u0026y, ad will '1111 I Bave YOU d iaydpayments and smnetitnaIon. t i n oll riing-ace the Manager about it. Ovii er0w315 Brace-Manioa er4 akatchean om tgo: asila 3I SANOHES in BS M M N lia IlAbbey Adanao, Pjmask, Arcola, Asqditb, Aunibola, Bouty,. Bruno, tuchanan Cabri, Canora, Car%le, Craik Cpar, Cut Halte, Dinsmare, bummer, Bust End, ~terhazy, * mtean, Eye- brow, Fillmore Gravai bourg Guernaey, GuIl Lake Herbert, Hughton, Hurnloldt. Indien heud, Jansen, Kelfield, kerrob\u003cirt Kinderaley, Landis, Lang, Lanigau Lawson Lernberg Loverna_,. Lumaden, Luseland, MaUklin, Maj or, MapLe CreCk, Laryfield, Nethenhill, NeudorÏ, Ogema, Outlook Oxbow.ý Pense ]Q- pot, Plenty, Prince Albert, Qu'Appelle, Regina, Rolir.Rc- ville, Rosetown, Saskatoon, Scott, Sceptre, Shaunsvon. SImpon Sintàluta, Southey, Strassburg Swft Curreut, Tessir, Tboodoe Head Office, Winnipeg Togo, Tompkinh, Vanguard 'Veregin Viceroy VidorwapIll Total Assets over 390,000,000 Wawoa, Watrous, Webb, 1Weyburn, nwilkle, Wlndhor;t, Wole- LDeposita ovr 372,000,00 ley, Yorkton, Zealandia. i-o the weary travellers, who felt it would be botter to gét te kinow every- one as quickly as possible, instead of kéeping more -aloof in i-heir own camp. .Afi-ér a few days prospécing about, ar- rangements wére made i-o rént one of i-be houses for i-hé winter, as the owner was leaving for Calgary. No btter piecée of luck could have befallén i-he Warde, as with a comfortabie fixed up bouse, i-bey could endure inany of i-hé inter discomfort's of théir surroundings, and were much envied by othérs who wvere rapidiy pusihing into th-le \"Cross- W'allaceecould have had work from first, but réfused i-o be i-érptéd by the hig-h wages offered, feeling that be rmust, keep bis'own i-m and object in view-4- timbér limits and a milL With a corfortabié homne te réeturn i-o, -and good harsés i-o drivé, thé'Wards pusbJed on ta seé Dunnegan for i-hem- selves. Thé country was very fine and qlite parklike woods were driven through affording a good supply of fuel ta i-le Oettlers who had aiready -studdéd thé irail with i-heir log cabins. Thèse new homes w'eré just what the difféent types of wonen made i-hem; some were dé- eoate, 9tbers, wile posessing no more ~vrdvgoods, kad an air of comfort. Iu aone cabîn, i-he 'Wards found the bouse- ivife lîad made~ curtains and covérs of ivell washed bagging ecalioped with (\u003eigit wool. Punnegan in spité of the fair prophecies forc it,, seemed vèry Uxii, kand dreary, and with only a wo- nalis instinct i-o guide bier, Ada urgèd W\\,allace i-o settie once for ail at Peace P iver Crassing. After rei-urning tiieré, WV:illace oftèn takzing a mail witli him, i' t for harder itips,c and Ada's was i-be Or rae of waiting. Neiglîbors offèved. tu 1',ehi(pfLul. the majoity of the women Luiig ha!l breéd wives. tirne as possible lin te young apology of a 'city. A great baking and cooking vent on for, days, and xnuch scouring. around for chairs and crolckery. On the day itself, the littie church vas crowded with those wbo went for many reasons, and -WitIF~feelings oniy known ta themseives, but there was 110 doubt as ta i-be attraction i-o aIl of the familiar hymne. But the affair of the evening was to be the cerentingofferof friendship by -the citizens of thé \"Cross- ing\" ta the strangers within their gates. There vas a trernendous furbishing up by Vie guests, and searching of longr stored haggage. No one could boat an entire newv outhit, but a new tie, or a pair of aId evening slippers for one, a colar last laundered in an eastern city, or a fancy veet, made qui-e a fine effeet, while the oniy concession one man couhi make for such a\u0026 \"real pari-y\" vas ta shave off his beard. Theé squawe. and haif breed women were gaily bedecekcd wtith ribbons, qui-e eciipsing the half dozen white women and Ada, who had looked in vain for the arrivai of i-he long delayed freighit boxes. -No one vas verv inuch. -be worsc for -bhe gathering, and rnanv were very niurh better,cfor i-hé atternpt 'io do as i-hose iii choicer surroundings ere do- ing that very same nigl)t. The dancing ~vas fast and furious, and thé \"gruli\" disappeared like ineiiing snow lu a bot sun. It wasn't much, poor fellows, i-o nieet with sucli a generous response, but it would bave taken a great deai of enticernent \"back East\" to have cieared three hundred dollars. About i-he middle of winter, Walhe was cornpletely discouraged in -bis at- tempt to find thé timber -lirits hé need- éd, and he decided tihre vas nothing to bé done buit go uown to Edmonton and seé the provincial head of the crowNn FARM ERS You wiil get good satisfaction and the best possible cash iresults by employing our services to look after- and -dispose of your canlot shipments of Wheat,Ots ]3aley and Flax. Liberal advances against shipping bills at 7 per cent interest THOMPSON, SONS \u0026 CO. 700 W GRAIN EXCHANGE, WINNIPEG Little Things Counat Even in a match you should consider the \"Littie Things\" -the wood, the com~position, the strike ability, the flame. Eddy' s Matches are made of strong d ry pine stems, with a secret perfected composition that guarantees \"'Every M\\atch a Lighter.\" Sixty-five years of knowing how -that's the reason. Ail Eddy products'are depend- able-always. Land Bargai.: O. Crop ýPaymo.ts or Exohamgo Write for our big new liet of lands for PÀle, exchange, or cre Pavments, in Manitoba, Saskatchewan, Alberta and Brit1ish% Columbia. It is sure Io contain a desw*riptioni of a farmn such as~ you are seeking. WrIte THE WALCH LAND Co., Northern Crowmt Bank Bidg, Winnipeg * t House boat on the Peace River \"Caboose \" in which the ward travelled kept for hurry i-é overtook g a meai, loneliness Ls not un- that thé snufflings y., seernéd t' stirred and once .e heard a cheelts at Ir concern: Wall.ace, had not thé cnisp one ever ,hem par- îg i-e add '\"Quaker plar bush mark\u0026l ses every )rééds, or vel af a id foddér [éd on at 1 i-o cook a seren stie di vi- lie room. of thé 's ini ihé s oftflîe 'g plappe forva rd fey. ind Sofpeo- le earth, wriences. at being ce vounoe0",
         "lae Western Home Monthly lani, nand ~' MMWlat'bnDtee l e, olld ta Put througli the doal. Tho weather wao int«muly oold, but theiesnow did mot lie deep oni the ground as the W#rds had jîcen ýccuetomed tg aeeing it at hom,yet the thought of a JoMmy over tlua.o desolste waut4o of euow...wa ap- pallng, but on the other band, -Ada had had ue xperience of what it meaait ta 'wait alone -for day, ivht it would be for menthe sh. couldff't allow hoee1f 'oeventhinkof. Betterathouand tinmes 4to go with Wallace.to, share sud help him through any hardehipu. When reading aid tales of- prairie achooner dis-yso la 'te' Western States,, cf the. pionera' terrible oxperienees cf burning »un and thirst and terrers cf -Indiari atacke, Ada .ould never bave believed thet ini 1914 ae would travel li a winternseliooner on runners with the temperature at 50 degrees below zero. The \"building cf the ark\" the Wards called it, as (Walace made Mie platforni on the sleigh and the upriglits, over which ta stretch thie canvas. Into this ehelter was placed a cot bed, folding table, tin stove and provisions. A win- duw a foot square was eut in front ta alow of diving while standing up. Withi layer upon layer of clothing, socks, mocossins and sheepskin overboots, the Wardes started their outward trek cf threer 4iundred miles, over what seemed like thie steppes of Rusia or Siberia. The tiny room was never really 'cold, and turns were taken at driving. 'When off dnty, there waa nothing to do but lie on the cot and try ta read anxd for-i ge't 'Me monotony, or once or twice a] day take a. brisk walk behind Mheie schooner or \"caboose\" as it is called ini local language. a woman on dock, were the river trad- ers coming down ini cances. Hialls were exebanged, and some of Ada's good home Inade food for any game they lied.* For those Who loved the wildness of it all,-it was an ideai summer life until the cold weather warhed thém to make 'UP \"tinrfore the Crossing.' 1 Two years passed. Logs were cut and drIven down the current, a homestead Was secured, as well as towu lots, and the Mill set up. AdU pulled thie first iog up ta tJhe saw, and its buzzing scream as the teeth pamsd th-rough, was the most -beautiful music the Wardse had ever beard. The first board lias been put aside until Whtllace has time to maice it up into sornething for the home. The miii cannot work qulckly enougli for tJhe waiting settiers ta have the grandeur of a frame hanse instead of a log cabin. A rough life lt niight seem to those Who care for nothing but city lif e and its SO-Cafled culture and great offerings Of art, imusic and 'literatu!re, but ta those pioneering in the still unopened furt'her West, nature is the best art, the sweep- ing wind and rushing watere is as music, and literature la in the making, for the romanceal and adventures of the people about one were more wonderfnl than those of flotitious eharacters described by tie ablest peu. The growth of their town -is of greàter pride and intere\u0026t te ite aitizené than if they were mayors of a ready-made city. The Clanadian Northern Railway is nxJw necir enough ta, fulfil al opes and promnises cf what itg coming la ta mean te the Crossing of the Peaee River. Ada is ta have a trip home from lier door La that of the one she left so bravely The~ Peace River steara boat T. li..,Surplus \"dHercules\"' Foot Scraper Mode la WlnnIpeg Cmi Floors On 1,000,000 Homs nd Business Houss De you know. that this scraper will save more money in one week thari what it eosts you? It re-. moyeu 'the mudl as efliciently as the nnow, and has a Heel Piece which la very effective. Prios ý$1.00 delilved to the nearet M. B. station or Pont OMfie lau m,aSuk. or A4berta. The Westen1111u1\u0026 'Iron 00., Lt. fnaufotoeor' authorlsed Captai Winnipeg Cànea Grouardwasresehedontho now frozen' (LeSer $lave Lake, over whieh a fine, road Wasa kept. At the smail placesi whre the boat toudied li summer andi the rest honsei, the Wards madle short stops, while homesteaders eeeing them ooming, gave them tiroir western hospi- 'tality, until Athabasca brouglit tliem into complete touch with civilization again. The horsee were pretty well play- ed ont, but had ta ton eomehow ta, their well frned rest- ln Edmonton. Wheu standing ln a street with droop. ing heads, a eheery stranger eeeing thein, stnck his head into the \"cabooe\" and said, \"MIell, friends, la it ~Peace River or bust \" \"No,\" answered Wallace, too amueed ta resent the intrusion, \"it is Peace River and husted.\"1 The sieigh was dismantled, and now that the ttip was a thing of the past, Ada could think of it as an experience Rixe would not have uissed. A few months of ýweary hanging about offices, and Wallace finally got the coneessii~. he wanted, and with the return -of spring andi fresh liopes, back 'Mie travel-ý lems dravo over a trail now growing famillar ta them. The short time they hiad been awiay :madle them sen thîe strangers, ao xnany people had corne ta the Crossing. and after the lonesome. ness of a large city, thig time the Wards feit it wa.s a home-coming. For the sake cf its boilere, a little steamer was bought that Catholii mis- sionaries.had used, and en lt 'the Wards started up te river ta the timber berth. No captain of a C.P.R. 'Empress\" was prouder cf his ship and crewv, consisting of One man. ]i'et-eeu higlixshores, the beautiful waters rippled and eparkled wi th ever chianging lights and ellades, and withln the boat, 411 ivas snug when a êtorun lashed it awr-anchorage. Across the prow a frighten.ed moose sometimes s'wam, whule bears -%ere so numerous thlat Ada seidom walidered far from shore. Equally as startled ane'the ani- male ut tâe sight of a steam-boat and but she syeverY m»le the train peaoshe w,,, wonder what liard- eîhis ad loelies oter pioncer wo- men endured aà they came westward. The Returo o1 the Birds First the Binebird cornes, With his nodding plumes, Builds his home lu state For hie joyoue; mate. Quite a songster lie In a minor key. Then cornes Robin, dressed la his crimson veet. He's sancy and bold, And his wife's a scold, But bright heraide they 0f the springtime gay. Hear thie Catbird's note, Fiee hie handsome coat! In the iilac tree, Such a mimie he. We are sure of spring W'hen wc hear him sing. We shall have a treït. Mien the n('xt we greet. JoYous melodv I Sw~ectest symphony! Every one: I think, Loves dear Bobolink. If beauty you prize, rTheri openi your eyes Anîd Or*iolo .viQýw* lucre Posing for you, In orange and(1 lak () wilIgs ali(i01n ack. The littie Thrush Shy, The tiny V'x ei spry, Sparrow and Tomtit, Bllackbirdi and Linnet, And Lark and Finch and Quiril, Not On,' -' Ihem fail Eac ý n-timne to hail. ---l1:tta Xlarshall \u003e'tLaufï. $MiNGs T O OraERNOW: UNNamistywustera Grown. Write FENCING * VoyousMd Earb Whe ooeMW *img, ladow at your station POSTS Ulft or Round DVrOd Prime on application. PAINT 01., VAWDIII, etc. a grat avin inprIce. jGOPHER POISON ~at~,c.sI pres.lusful trade discounts for qstts.Write for pri\"Cu. ]PIGE, TOU 0*1 BAYE TEE NEIEEER M M UE T MCOST ON TWO PAO. ~ ojh SIu Loal sscat The Saakatohewan Grain Growers' Association Moom JAW BA8OATORZWAN Makos Old Razors. Shave the odold-fashioncd rorf or esyshavlng,iflt i goud coondition y eg~ular honing- stropping alone la not enough. Anexpert bar hasnln teda hone that makes honing easy. It prevents !'wire-edge\" caused by OVER.honing. Von can tare ybur dullest old razor and aharpen It onu Mii Perforated Houe- THE HONE WITH THE HOLES. Juattike you would eharpen your pocketknife- back and forth * or round and round-any waY youilike solong as you keepIt flat to the atone. No uilu needed; you simply can't go wrong. Those littie round hoies ln the hone trizn off the roughnese or 'wire-edge \" and leave a keen smooth edge that le a wonder even to barbera. WHAT MEN SAY ABOUT ET It madenewrazors out of niyoldd!scardedon\u0026 Shavingîsnowa \u003eleasure for me.' -Milton H. Douglas, Bath, Maîne. '1 had an odraor Sad laid asi j. I could not getitaharp. Now its saves aew las a new razor.\"-Re. H. W. Mcrtur, Gaineavi lie, Ca. - I have fmxd lu Borne old razors that 'wouldnt cut softi butter'and theyshave fine.\"---RobertLakIng, Kearney, Ont. Thousandu say Miemre. TRY ONE 30-DAYS Then,if youdon'tgetthefinest shaves Four ever had .11 It doesn't maire your old razor l'~1-~4Ishave like new, %ve gladly re- Sudize .0).ts Lrgeae fud ze 50 cents (Ldarge or byrmail, prepaid. Write for Bookiet *Hong Made Easy.' Perforaîed Hon. Co. LmnnMa»s. 1 llorders shipieuffrom our Casadian Foctory. Wlien writlng advertIsers please mentilU Thé Xý:\\\\ IP.rn Homp nh\", 4 -' 4, Let the Sunlight in, Mhen your bedroom wmam r covered w\"d S~NITA L COVERIN S there is no danger ai the design fading. Sulih means heath - so doco \u003c ANITAS dom nfot coflect dust or germr-SANITAS does flot fade, crack or tear and you can wipe it clean wilh a danip cloth. In your waIl covermngs yajz want beauty, har- mony, adaptabibity; but you want more, you want efflciency, healt- youwat SANITAS. mac i il pattera, the. c\u0026Ziricb soft the asfe i hraly. l0inmmo.,,bedroom p0.iy r lutchea.lu Se. the new SANITAS destuns SwlY befm y ou rdéoorte Yom decorator uan sow diem toyou now, or=yo can write to us f or SANITAS bookiet -nda-e of yaus aearest \u003cester. Modernazeyoar walls--ume SANITAS Write for yous b6\"Wetand sample dei~ion day. W. nraiabM a udk cf 4-ooad«oWed In SANITAS in 1he CroiswmnBuild- ing. at 6 Rosi 39#h StrSt eiw York am M- M Ma m mMMM THE STANDARD OIL CLOTH CO., lac. 320 Broadway New York, N.Y. Dept. là Smai. -o\u0026IhméWh dmin \"SAMTAS dm di he niddsamet 1d»iaucamimr NAPd............................. ADDRESS......................... Mq",
         "Wýiter 6jy H. H-. Pittmani Winter! The very ward lias a chily saundi and makes one think aD'reciatively of furcoats anid of evenings by a glowing stove. In -the coun4ry, it ia, in a way, welcomed, for it brings a period (if ère- laxation ta the farmer- a rest after the work which hiAs had ta be rushed an account of the short season. In the towns, howeve, the snow and biting winds are dreae, for, after ahl, comfort tends ta create \"saftness,\" and a drap ini temperature that leaves the farmer unmoved bas a painful effect upon the townsmafl. SQn the great plains, f ar away from tbe cities, the changes of the semsons stir a contemplative mind unaccountably. They are so great, s0 immun~e, that man's Baird's prairie dcer-micc mightiest efforts ,;eem paltry in1 com- parison. Humboldt, 1 believe, once wrote to the effect that the marvels of Nature had a tendenicy to sadden, but surely only a morbid disposition would be affected in this way. For most of us, perhaps, \"awed\" would be a better way to express aur feelings, for who has not experienced a feeling of awe or reverence for the master hand behind some won- derful creatîon-whether of man or Nature? The conntryman is generally drawn to Nature, although often unconsciously and studies the movement of the wild life-the animnais, the birds, the plants- with the interest the city person bestows upon bis daily paper, and who shail say the resuit is flot as beneficial-mentally? November is the first winter month. The ground becomes too stiff to plow and the air is pleasantly crisp. Snow is general, and the merry ringing of the sleigh-beUls relieves the silence of the plains. Frequently the first snows are melted and disappear during a mild Epell,making the animais that have changed their coats conspicuous. During a drive after one of these warm spells, scores of jack-rabbits can be seen, and bush-rabbits found in every patch of scrub. The we sels, wbich are the firý,,t animais to turn Iý e are not so notice- HEALTH AND INCOME Bath Kept Up on Scientifio Food Good, sturdy health helps one a lot to miake Monley. \",ith the loss of health onie's inconte',ls lable to shrink, if not entirely dwindle awav. M'ien a young lady has. ta make ber own living, good health is hier best asset. \"I arn alone in the world,\" W-rit*s a Toung lady, \"dependent on My own efforts for my living. I arn a clerk, and through close application ta work and a boarding-house diet, I became nervous, and got so bad off it was alînost impo§- sible for me ta keep up in the office. \"A friend suggested ta me the idea of trying Grape-Nuts food wbich I did, naking it a large part of at least two neccis a day. \"To-day I arn free f rom dvspepsia and fie'ilis of an overworked and iimproperlv florished brain and body. To Crape- Nidts I owe the recovery* of niv health, and the ability ta retai ypsto n iliome\" \"her'sa Reason.\" Nm given bv Canadian Postum Co., Windsor', Olit. Ever read the above letter?. A new one appears fromi time ta time. They are genuine, true, and f ull of human ilterest. able because tbey are smafter and live in hales, although they seem to iead rather a wandering life during the cold months. CThis month the hast of' the migrants- the ever busy wood-pecker--lies, from bluff ta bluff on bis way ta a more con- genial dlimate. The jaurney of the wood-pecker is typical of nearly ail migration. The immense journeys of the birds are, not direct fights from cold ta, warmath, as the older observers believed, but a series of gradual fliglits from one feeding ground to another. south in the fal and'inorth in the spring, along regular routes t4iat have possibly been foilowed ever siice the world has been ini its present condition. Our fore-fathers marveiled at the long distances covered, but in reality this is simple, altbough we have yet to, explain the underhying guiding instinct and many other pr'oblems. December is really cold, but it is far from. being a \"dead\" manth. 1 have seen; bath in Manitoba' and Saskatche- wan, one of the smallest mammnals known, the _pigmy shrew, running an the snaw- erast ini December, when the theçnometer wùs many degrees below zera,',end my cheeks and nase were' frozen, and mY hands nurnbed and useless. Other smal creatures are about also, and the tracks of voles an\u0026f field mice are plentiful- a fact of wbich the great, snowy owls seern ta be aware. The shrews, voles and mice, the prairie bares or jack-rabbits, the bush-rabbits, the weasels and the wolves are the prici- pal animàls ta be seen this mont, 'but there is other life about of an unexpecte kind, for sometimes badger tracks can be seen in the snaw-proaf positive that aur knowledge of hibernation is limited. With the coming of January one feels that the back of the winter is braken, although the weather is generaily colder. The wolves draw nearer the bouses and ýcan be beard bowling in every direction,' ~articularly if any dead horses or cattle ave been dawn out ta the sloughs. The borned larks and snaw-birds are bolder and feed araund the f arm buildings crouching low ta pratect their legs and feet with their body feathers. Thxe sharp-tailed grouse leave the, stubble and straw piles and also candescend ta visit the farm-yards, quarrelling and running about with erected crests in a peculiarly restless manner. There is something very likable about these birds. Tbey are sa independent, scorn- ing, one feels, ta descend ta subterfuge by changing their plumage in order ta harmonise with tbe surroundings. They make no attempt ta conceal tbemselves, often settling right upan the roofs of the bouses. In February tbe cold is still generally severe. An interesting fetiture this mont is the action of the wind upon the snow. In cold weatber the snaw falis in single crystals, and when, towards the end of the winter, a slight crust bas been formed by the increasing warmith of the sun's rays, the wind carves out fantastie and beautiful designs. Wben pressed upan, too, snow, will \" pack, \" and the tracks of the sleighs, human footprints and the trail3 of animais stand out in relief. On fine nights tbe wanderful Northern lights appear. Sometimes merely a vague indefinite streak, and at others a gently- quivering lemon-yeilow liglit resembling the lower edge of a constantly maving Snowy owl the desigu k - o does coflect * dust es flot fade, Man wlpe it 1. In your bcauty, lia- you want ,Y, healdih- diii ricb sOht 3ou, bedroom 'Sebathrooza. -designa doeorate deu to yon - SANITAS ust deae. SANITAS and salnple odwowmed ion Build- New York *o mmm. rH CO., mnc. f.Dept. 12 Shave 50e akea honing caused by r dullest old rated Boane. 4OLES .ket-knife- '-any way o the etone. t go wrong. tri= off the itve a keen ta barber. T IT :ardedones. -MiitonH. mn old razor r Now Re .LW. have fxed 't eut soft e lame. -DAYS etthefinest had,li ft r old razor ! gladly re- nte (Large ur dealer's, .Write for jfaddEk sy. Fmn, mas ase mentiog Goit Standard Manuf acturing Comipaniy Wi nnipeg. Lancet\" describes àt as \"Mr.' BeuWrs admirable preparation.\" Benger's Food is distinguished from the others by the case with which it can be digested and abobd BENGER's FooD IS FOR INFANTS AND INVALIDS., and ail whose digestive powers have become weakeniedý through iliness or advancing age. Mcte 1n nerse persons arm requested to write for Dooldet, 1EenWs Iood. andlow to Use h.\" 'ihis contait,. a1\"Concis« Guide to thse Reaing of Infants» cMd practical Information on the cr of Invalids, Convalescents snd thse Ae. Post frec on application ta Dený;rr'% Food Ltd., Otter Worlcs, Manchester, JE 9: VengWo Food M i. d in lins hg Vrugglufs, tc, es*a'gaihue. The GIBBON PLANT PROTÉOTOR WILL SAVE ALL TOUR PLANTS. The cut worm la the gardenerso worst enemy. Last ,ear from 20 to 80 per cent of younj pleut growth wals destroyeid br It. H'nesla asimple and f noxponsive Inventiois which PMsI- tlvely stops this destructive pest. Tihe Gibson Pleut Protector abeolutely protects yotir plants lrom cut worms aud othar ground pests, which \u0026te mont active Immedistey fertrnsauUnd. while the ground in loose and . s Xw er int. t sures water as a cuplui poUred Into each ppr cylinder La suilicient as al itis goee directly to thse foot of thse plant: The Gibeon Plant Protector will birlnde99 per cent of y0ur Plants to maturity. It sa made ln two qualitiek-No. 1 conte 50e witis 25 wrappers, by mafi toc extra. No. 2 conte 60c wlth 25 wrappers, by mail 15cenetre. Additlonal wrspp.1 25M j4r 100, by mail Se extra. Descriptive literature wlth tsMi.i. wiil be malled free on application. If your dealier cenuot iupply you, write direct to thse patentees and manufacturera and your order will be malied thse cseadey It le received. THZ GIBBON PLANT PROTECTOIR CO. 394 Lipton Street Winnipeg Pstented lu Canada F;eb., 1916 Pstentd lu U.S. Jan. 1916 ~, I. curtain of flame. Occasianally there is a single lime of flarne with the oscillating curtain above it. Tbe folds in the curt ain--ever changing-are marvellÔus ta watcb, yet impossible ta do justice ta with either pen or brush. Towards the end of the month zild sunny days occur, and the cheery sang of the little borned-larks (dellvered from the ground) is beatd, particularly welcome after the silence which for so long bas enveoped the snow-covered",
         "3 Grand Varieties--Goo)d as GoId -Refuge Wax-Pods round, lear mnd transparent and of hond. Beanso e P, e;ane.atedr,\"'verýy productive, free lrom matandI sýtands r ..hrwe.11.Ylb. 15.., 1 lb. 5. b.#.O Poatpaid.45.ôIb.e.0 - 'a-Golden Rantam-An early, liardy, productive variety, 01fifnesli Con quality and delicious flavor. Tt is a rieli, creara yellow, deepening .oorange-yellow when ripe. '/ lb. loc., 1 lb. 80c., 5 Ibo. .11.40. Postpaid. Pe 4 -ruce's Early Settler-A grand extra early wrinkled marro'w Pes variety. The pods are largo.,ddeep green, and filled with 1Arge peas, possessing the ricli lav'or and qualit yof the best late Vwarieties. lt attains a hieiglit ofabolit 1i feet and ia very *productive. Y,\u0026 lb. 15c., 1I lb. 40c., 5 Iba. ý1.75. Poatpaid. If ent by Express at purchaqkr's expense, deduct 10c. per pound. BRUCE'S Seeds are the cheapest, because they are the boit. FREE Our handsornely illustriited 128 pagt' catalogue of Vegetable, John A. Bruce \u0026 Co., Ltd., OnbliedSttar ea landscapc, The grouse' begin to cal and somne of the hares commence to change color, aithougli most remain white until well into Mardli. Ma.rch \"many weather,\" thç oid sit.juùs, but one is tempted to regard ita-the'first month of Spring. Bare ispots dppear on the prairie, and here and there littie pools of water. The goÉhers awaken from their i~ong sleejy, the first birds-the crow-return, stray blades of new grass appear, and there is an indescribable feeling of elation in the air. To the observant, particularly on the mriie, there are no \"dead\" months, f every month, every day, indeed, has an interest of its' own. This article ie brief, for I have omitted many things- the wonderful snow-shoes of the bush- rabbits, the elongated scales along the Sharp-tailed grouse sunning itself on the snow toes of the grouse, the excavations of the badgers in the snow-drifts, the occasional visits of the red-polls-but it may show that winter on the immense prairie need not be duli, and that a person living away at'the \"back of beyond\" is not necessarily out of reach of al'- uplifting influences, and that the cold months need flot really be dreaded. \\ý- The Redskln's War Bonnet and What it Means The typical Indian is always shown4 with a war bonnet, or war cap, of eagle feathers. Everyone la familiar with the look cf this thead-dress, but I find that few know its ineaning, or why the Indian giories in it 50. In the days whcn the red mnan -was uncbanged by white men's ways, every feather in the brave's hcad-dress was awarded to him by the Grand Concil for some great deed, usually in warfare. llence the 'expression, \"a feather iii his cap.\" These decds are nowv callcd coups (pronounced coo), and when of excep- tional valour they were grand coups, and the eagle's feather lad a tuf t of horsehair, or down, fastened on- its top. Not only was each feather bestowed for some exploit, but there were also ways of marking the feathers so as to show the kind of deed. Old piainsmen give an exciting picture of Indian life after téhe retuirn of a suc- cessful war party. Ail assemble in the Grand Council lodge of the village. First the leader of the part.y stands tip, hold- ing in his hands or hiaving near bihî, the scalps' or other trophies le bas taken, and sa vs in a loud'voice:- \"G reat Chief and Counciil of niv Na- tion, 1 daim a grandl coiup beeatrse I went alone into the cuîemv's camp ami( hvarned abolit thîir plans; anslvi hn 1I camue awav I met oiie of tlienm and kilicd 1i11 v tin ls ow'n camp.\" TIica if aIl tue 'wi tiiesses griunt anil say, \"lin!\" or \"IIow, îowv! \" (\"So-'it i so\") the Counicil awards the 'xvarrior ail cagle featiier with a red tuft and a lar'ge red Spot on the web, wvhich týeli w~liy it wvas giveni. The -warrior goes on: «'T. daim-grand( coup because I slapped the cueni.v S fate with iny hand (hrlxanîghmaî increasing the risk) before I kiic1d hum xwith inîv kiife.\" A l1(111(1chotiiof \"Ilow. lîow, IIVXV- frini ec otlier. smmtahis hinii il hei, ''J thiiiîi i )iii(o i b ause îT c'iitlrî's lis lo1.-i xx'ile tOti luî' I l,,, 1\u003e i-. xx u. 11(10, iaii1i1tiat lie :l,(, ad iltiiil iii O t. H - i dip !e. al milax 'e -11, arce ili ' vo tUp. butiii t 1 1leî i- xvtli bl' i H f. iit X t i t f t. t .th : is awarded, his due honors, to be Worti ever after on state occasions. Ail awards tare made and ail disputes settled by the Council, and no man would dream of be- ing, so fooiish as to wear an honor that lad not been conferred by them, or iii any ivay to dispute their fiing. In thelight of th:s we see new inter- est attaclied to the head-dress of soine famous ývarrior of the West, when he is, shown with a circie of tufted feathers around bis head, and then, 4ýeed to that, a tail of one hundred br more reaching to the ground and trailing be- biind him. We knowv that, like the rows of medais on an old soldier's breast, tlîey are thle record of wonderful past achievements; that everyone of them wvas won, perlhaps, at the risk of his life. W\"ib7at w onder is it blhat traveliers on the plains to-day tell us that the Indian values his head dress above ail things eisc. Hie wouid usuaily pref*' to part -%ith his ponies and his teepees hefore lie will give up that array of eagie plumes, the only tangible record that lie bias of whatever was heroic in his past. From \"The Book of Woodceraf t.\" By Ernes Thoinpson Seton. Pubiished by Messr . Constabie \u0026 Co., Ltd. Price 6s. net. k _________ On another page of this issue will be fouad an announceement by the Western IPhonograph. Co., whidh should be of in- terest to our readers. This company are the distributing agents for the famous Emerson Phonograph-a very low priced machine, capable of playing standard Pathe or Victor records in addition to à special number of records manufac- tured by thc Emerson Company. The ad- vertisement contains full particulars, but any further details wvhich may be des.ired can bd readily obtained by ad- dressing a post card to the Western Phonograpli Co. A smail boy who was sitting next to a very haughity lady, in a crowded sub- way car kept on sniffing in a very annoying manner. At iast the lady couid bear it no longer, and turned to the lad. \"Boy, have you got a handkerchief T slic deaîanded. I Thle smali boy looked at her for a few seconds, aind then, in a dignified tone, caie the answer: \"Yes, I 'ave, but I do-n't lend it to stx anget s.\"-New York World. Ever Think of It ? Somne folks go on clogging their systemns and drugging themnselves day after day with tea and coffee - haif- sick most of the timne. They wonder, what balks their plans and keeps themn down. Suppose you stop tea andi coffee 10 days and try POSTUM You can then Iearn wbxat a c!fference it makes in body and brain to quit tea and coffee, which contain the drug, caffeine,. and use the food-drnk-Postum. \"There's a Reason\" SoId by Grocers .lu 1 far arn of .bol 1 far lias Sen do fan a ci eveî on thai larg ivinl houî east bein, end drai~ joyE the \u0026lwa lies faci: if, the doiv le 1 deIa\u0026 milîs cari as shou uap0 clea 'w II\\",
         "plus fer Cembortable adAttractive Pm n ome be worit 1 awards 1l by the m of brj- for that ni, or iii rg. w inter- of somle en hie is feathers Ltled to r more ling lie- he rows breast, L'ul pat themn his life. ers on SIndian 1things to part hefore eagle that lie ýis past. 't.\" By led by 'rice 63. wiil bde Vestern Sof in- iny are famous r priced ILandard tion to anufac- J'he ad- iculars, may be by ad- Vestera iext to ?d sub- is very e lady 'ned to chef ?\" for a ignified V. Horwood f 1The plan sho$\"n this mo nth, le for a home, 3and as a fatner's home is bis place of business, a section, of the grouut floor ie laid off, se that bueiness fis flot brouglit into tie home portion of the 1bouse. Tbe office has an entrance from thie rear and business *Elth the men, marketing the produce, correepondence, Letc., can be attended to and ail the faci- lities for this work eau, have »heir pro- Sper places. IBx V.W. IT is a commo'n eaying thiat a man must plan and build fliree bouses before le ie ll have a home; but thig farmer, espeially 'the farmer Who lias arrived at comfort by the honorable toil of producing food, will have hie mind mnade up as to the requireenent e of bis home. The planning of a moderaft cost farm home requires considerable thouglit. The farmer by hie own labor can build with lese epenseo thani the City dweller who lias t employ higli priced labor for ail lis work. The first question is the site. Sentimental reasons have sorneting to family wlio have progressiveiy lived on a certain spot of land will dling te it, even if it is flot just adiaptàble. Build on rising ground if poss4ble; build se fliat -the sunlight wiil comne into your ~wnaeWork roome. 'The man's work ie outeide. The woman'e is tq a certain ewtent, inside, and s0 thie kiteben has a large window f seing soutli, and in the winter le the brighteet room dun the house. The dining ro= h'ae a south eastérly exposure giving liglit wheu niost deeired in the early Inornings and being cool in the evening. The first Win- dows in early Vîmes were simply holes, and without glass. Mhen the winter sun ie low on tlie horizon and the days drawn in, good sied *Windows are en- joyed, especially on the south side. On the north side avoid toc, much glass, and alwa3-s use storm Windows. Thap-.ame ap- lies te, the doore. Xever bave an entrance facing nortli, as lowcver you protect it, it will be cold and creary througliout tbe wintcr. Use stock doors and Win- dows as much as possible, as they eau, lie bouglit ut lese cost, and witlh les delay. In tihe Catalogues of the lumber miille are aIl kinde of windows Wbich. can be made rto suit the 'purpose cqua;lly ne wefl as deLailed ones. The floors should always be of liard wood as it is impossible to keep a eplintered floor dlean, and carpets sbould bc tabooed. poses by means of the inany compres- sion pumtpe or windiinills, but if neither water nor \u0026ewvage ie possible, in the winter a sanitary clôset eau be installed , with ventilation to the outéide, and by this means avoid a greatdeal of îhe h4rdshipand sickneïs eons5quent on go- ing out± in zero weat'her. A small store- room i±V aiso at thle rear. There is, no direct entrance from the outside to the kitchen. Many farm lhouses have it, but -%hen the wife is dcing lier cook, inig and bouse wiork flie frequent open-, ing of the boick door keeps the floor cold and snow cov'ered, even if a porch or shed is attac¶hed; se this entrance ie separate but couvenient. The mou have an opportunity of cleaning Up before going into tie house. The wood or coal box je filled from the %vash room th.rough a hinged lid. The kitchen lias a, service'cupboard wirth bins'andi drawers, Nvith also a slop sink under, which can discharge, into a screened barrel out8ide, The window facee south. If no basement ='.x be put in, the wbvole space bciffd the rear4«f the stairs eau be made into store ro \u003cm nand closet. lTe stairs going up can be used f rom the kitchen witliout going into the living room, and if wislied a very effective decorative scheme could ho muade in the living rom by building a screen instiead of a s~oid wvall. Tho fire places are of brick, or if field rytone eau lie obtained, use it, but be sure and bond well. The main outrance is iute the living room, and a large screened verandeh goes across the\"-house. The d4ning room is next the living room and kitchen. Upstairs are four bcd-roomsand abath room. The bath rooem slould, be provid- cd, even if water je nt piped for. The fndshing of 'the bed-roomsg can lie dons as required. Clothes eupboards for each bed-room are shown, and also an ampl1e linen closet; a.nd a sewing or sitting 'hall NOhere the sewing machine may be kept. Ifa basement ie built an outside en- trane is provided and a furnace ahould be put in. (Continued on page 20) M The Heating- System 1011 Should Investigate \u002b IMPERIAL BOILERS, plus HYDRO-THERMIC RADIATORS, equals ce FORT The grounti loor andi first floor planis lere are the same as ln the article on this page, Showing the Anstallation of our heating system pianneti by our experts who are at yoiur service ln ail matters pertalning Io iieating. Heating by the EmperiliHot Water Bolioe andi Hydro- Trhermie Radatoru Installed, ln your new, or present, home, according to plans furnisheti by or experts bear our'ab- solute guarantee Io heat your bouse coniortably during the most severe weather. IIUPERIAL BOILERS are construrted of the best materlal and Iflutet andimachined tbroughouu by skilietiworkmen. Every houler is guaranteedti t be perfect In materl andi workmansliip. IMPERIAL BOILERS bave an overhanglng arched flre-pot -andi the sections are joineti by ineans or cast iron npples andi no packing of any description is uiseti ln joints. These sections are so arranged as to secure the maximum lire travel and take every heat unit out or the coai. IMPERIAL BOILERS are fitted i wth a properly adjusteçi colinker door enabling one to rake the surface or the grates wltbout deqtroylng the flre or wasting ruel. HYDRO-THERMIC RADIATORS are abgolutely suipertor tu the oli-fashioned cast radiators, both economlically andi artistically andi are more sanltary. Brings clown the coflt wlthout sacrilling elliclency. Oniy one-third the watea Used per square foot as compared with cast radlators, Whtch tiecreases the ronsumption or fuel andi respontis Io the tkarnper reguiation more proniptly. *Occuple e esu than haffthe apte@ of rast lrnffl ?sIators or correspondlng size anti on acrount or its light weight Hydre-Thermie Radiators ran lie îtiei ther on legs or sus- pendeti from the Waii on rmncealeti bravkets, the latter doig away with cutting the carpels anti also gives free acces for sweeping. Write to-day for our hooklets descrIbng the many' Im- portant fturfoundi ln ouîr heating system also free Plans, and i sevill atious Inecluding priv for IMPERIAL BOILER, HYDRO-THERMIC STEEL RADIATORS,' the neces- sary Ping, Cast Iron Fittinge Nickel Pisted Radiater Valves anti Air Vents, Nickel e'iated Fioop and CelIing Plates. Caa teeî heat a houîse constructeti on plan ThiS-huse co also e hestd wiloL\"Wu rm i .ra# Estimate and plans of srne wilI b. Iurnished fréeeof charge. Claie 'Bros. Western,Ètde Dept. H WJNNIPEG, MAN. Y v.' Terear entrance lias a wash room 80 that dirt will not be taken inuto tie lieuse. Next to, the wasi room ie a winter cioset iu case draina\u0026e is not possible. Wàter pressure eau alwaye be laid i lie ha ouse for ordinary pur- it to GRouND oojt0 FhIST FLOOq5 àee (Continued on page 20)",
         "Home monthly Wk.t tii. W,rl te Bayi Sum.iag It Up bete;ý.\u0026ew York Sgln.\u003e Rut N.b a N*nzo-Iern - Kamrhas.llïved; to,.xeeý, another birthday, bùt;,a-milion German goldiers have not.--Tbronto go change Whatever '01iwaeuterod thiq. warlwltbh pen Ô asd\" liîr monti , vet1 griiiy shut, and 'that la stili' the yostio! \"ax Hrald. A'Poor Fit It la. being demonstrateà thatý hyphenated .\u0026meri. ,oacs do -not- fit- véry ,.ploiely linto the iiatiopkI life e 1the.Vnlted States.-Vancouver Province'. fil th~ e eat Wor4s It jUgý e paspouto ta'this: If w e are prepgred we. ewjil hé .ready; if, we are 'not, 'we woei'et be, and, it e1b. too late ta begin.-4ittaburg Dispatch. The, Welgiit of'Wealth ln'Chl2la Àdollar's worth of Chineçe, maony.weigliý* e1glit. lidpcunds. No WQonder so inhny -uof; the nmonqyVrd las of, China are bowleggeà-Victoria Times. Kachm. Speaker. Some -day Mrs. Speaker wifl be giving ber rulings i4f the Manitoba. legislature-and Wn most cf the o.ther legllatures of the Dominion.-Toronto, Globe. A Grotesque German Faluehool For grotesque 'absurdity nothing bas appeared oince thé war began ta equal the story that Great fititain would seek a separate peace with:Germany. .Parla Journali'des Debats. On the Street, Cars. in Rerlin * -n yrtbree tliauiffd.woniýen are serving as street car coiuçitors In Berlin. But'then they don't bave *o yoj, ~Mkeroom therein f ront-ther's ro for two 'nmore l-tatod1epn * Coati\u003e' Eeyoni Calculation uýOU Kaiser is, a déar mn\" wiè em a4hoolirl in: the Frankfort Gazette. Gorinariy will b . lèia av ry dear m an by the t*i e th e 'A1rî' ý _is lapresented.-Kanai Cty Star.' \"* Tii Kaluoe's Gft \"to the Sulft..n Thé Ra iser. has sent a jewellèd sw ord to : the Sùltah of Turkey, a littie set of thoughtfulness è4mPiaràble 'only to presenting the foreman of 'the\" abattoir with a* manieùre- set.-Ottawa Evening The. Kalaer's Proeut to Elmsecf On bis birtbday the Kaiser released'ait jail pris. èiners between thé agea of 18 and 55 sand forthwith drafted themn into thé army. A valuablé birthdav preaent bestowed by himself upan Mmsef.--Toront' Mtal and Empire. - Elitia Cavefl ' In the gardens of thé Tuliieriés the French na- il' will éreet s statué af Edîth Cayell. ThVre will be mauy heroes of thé Sreat war, but' thé chef h0roine of it la sure ta lié thé géntié Eùglish- nurse. -Amsterdam 'Télégraaf. Quit. So Wé should have in New 13runswietk a. recruiting orginization juat about tén timeà kas effective as thé arganization of eitlier political party lu' any of aur moat kêenly conte9ted geral' letions-St. John (NýB.) Telégrapl. As ta Copper lu Germany \"Geruiauy lias suchi iinense stores: of cepper as ta auffice for years to came,\" said thé dhancellor la. thé Reichstag, sud thé dheers that grcetéd this atatémeut alumot drowned thé saunid outhte work- Vn men's hanimers stripping off thé copper roof.- Wall Street Journal. A Comlng Russian Avalanche In thé apring Russi opes ta hé able to put in thé fleld an ariny of, seven millions, iiicluding aone mnil lion cavairy, aud 10,000 pièces of artiiiery. Japan, thé United States, sud Britalu are daily furishing large quantities- of rifles. A spring avalanche, lun briefi-Victoria Coloniat. In thé Land of Obédience Thé Vorwaerts déclares that public discussion of food pricés and the coming additional war taxes is ta be forbiddéu lu Germany. 'Evidently the Cavern- nient doea not désiré thé people ta lWe'renindéd tua ofteîî of tîmir 'iifortunes, which k-cep on growing in éxteut ail thé tim.-Quebec Chranicle. A '\u003cSociety of thé Lusitania\" Cleveland. Ohilo. lias a \"SocietY of flhe Ln'.!fanila.\" Thé menîhers wvear a hutton Nvhichx bears flic amis of Germaîny disflgured bliva giest ré-I nlatî'ýiî and thesé words tîppear hehiti. \"The Blot 9'hul Woi't Camne Off.\" ('amît ilemastorfl', fthcGermnamaiî; ' char at Waoiî.fn uglit ta see about this.-Wooil- stock Seiîtiiîîel.Review. Wi.lm'a Dsargain with the.Turk It linsele-s ta look . tao ermÏny.ta exert a re- \"training influece upon its ally Turkéy in thé mat- ter of massaeres.oýf Armeniaift, for 'the- simple resn that àbenevofent'blindness,: toward sucli domestie matters was part of thé priçe paid frGerra~in fluèe n lu Tkey.-Springfld Républican.. A Sldelight'on German Foodi Supply *An':iùteresting sidéîight an thle condition of Ger- ianty 'as ta food supplies is '.vifforded by the facta that praètically aIl of Holland's, her.ring catch for thé seasan bas been sold ta Gérmans at twénty-niné *dollars a barrel, as compared with seven ta tén *dollars of other year.--St. Thomas Journal. * The Importance of Crops lu War The, Frenchi Govenment lias movéd ta have every availsîble parcel of land piaced under culti- vation immediatély sud 'will sée that whatever labar irequired . as upplied, by thé military authorities if necessary., In a long and stera war of big pro- potins crops are néxt iu importance ta men, amn- * muitin sd mney-LodonSaturday Reviéw. * Canadian Adaptabiity Thé theary frequently urged that wc bave loat thé adaptability of aur pioneer ancestora is finally dispersed. Al vacancies for Canadian récruits for thé Briti'sh naval aviation service have been f iled, sud now theré is a big. rush of young men able ta haudle motor hasts, ta, get positions on thé. Britiali. motorboat pAtrol.-London Advertiser. Trembling fer the Doctrine Does any aone tbink -that if Gérmany la victor- loua she will hé iu no condition,ý if aIe is in thé moad, ta. attempt ta make largér that place in thé sun which success ou the continent wili insure lier'? -The étruth Is that s German triumph will placé ýtIc Monroe Dotrine lu preater péril than at any other* time sincé it was firat formulated.-Philsdeipbia Ledger. - . . BelglUms Outlook The -Belgian minister of war dénies indignantly that Begium i NdUld cons ider a, separaté -péace. Bel- gium. knows that bier chances of obtaining indemity *.for lier wrongs dépend ou stieking to thé alliés ta thé lait; sud she may reasonabiy argué that whén Gerinany begins ta thraw out bluta about a sep- arate peace, thoa\u0026_ chances are ]oaking brighter.-- Djuluth Herald. The Wearers of the Khalci M4any a lad who because of ménial occupation wé ignored or tréated patronizingly IIOW holda aur sincère respect aud admiration. Thé khaki sends a man'. ahoulders back aud lis héad up, mentally and pÉysically. It givés hlm wlat wé for lack of a bétter term caîl \"casas.\" War tends ta levél al, vêt putting on the' khaki placea a man lu tha.t iplen- didly exclusive set 'which plays thé chef and moat heroic part in thé conflict.-Arnprior Chronicle. Austrla's Aniazlng Démana Not being a lumorist, Sir Edward Grey made a rather ineffectivé réply ta that démand uftfhie Aus- f rien goverument that thé British guvemument make adequate provision for thé safety of the \"bettér cli's\" Austrian passengéera an thé steamer Galcunda lu thé évent of lier being attacked by a sulimarine. It would require another Jonathan Swif t or a Mark Twain fa havé done tufl justice ta that demand.- Landau Tinids. 'Undesirable Visitors Recret service agents of thé government, as weli as thosé employed ia seit-defénce by the large mu- iîitiuu-making firmai are' making it very hot for fjermau plottérs lu the United States. Are any of thèse dangérous characters being smuggléd over the long boundary Uine into Canada? Tliey might cou- aider tN*ýjselvessaster lu this country, wliere flic guard la down, sa fa spéak, than iu thé Uniteil States, whéré évents have compelled close officiai vigilance.-Montreal Mail. Xeaning of \"Germany\"l If we can neitiier trust nor compel GPtmany ta keep the peare, whalaiope is tiiere for thé fui- turc? Tlhe answei ta titis lies ini the neaning at- tachied f0 tué word '*Germany.\" The Germait thtat mibody can trust la ftliéCérmany fIat lias revcaled itselt lu this war, thé Gernîany that acknowvlecIgcs nu law or obligation uit lieu- own intcrests, ilic (lemmany that fears up treaties, iilers nan-VonI- butants and neutrais w'iolcsffle, plots ai-'.n and outragea and crimes of lviolenc(e iii tii ttal (thit i s, triendly) countries, that maltreafi risiîiet-s of war, and violates even the tcw stt'iu'L nile'. of warfaî-é îînconcitional laid dawn la its OwnN levaha(;l war- lbook, which allows alniast cver * tiiiniv wa\\- of exception under thelic la of iii'eit Saiag as thiat CPiriianv, reniains on flih a ni Inail in thtat sf ate ofÉii itd, litere cati Le 'ne r,';îi1[leacc. aîî\u003cl ta0micgotfitc with lier, cithcî carî' anrllate, is tao lose thé wvar lu effeet, if not lu appearance.-Niiît. tvecitliCentury.: \"'Nourishefi, Sustained an. LInspired.\"-by Hatred \"1As aur worries inerease,\" says thé Frankfurter Zeitung, e'so day by day grows our natural hatredl againathé lienem1 who la responsi1ble for this mflsery. This hatred is 50 potent that it; wi - nouÙris_ an sustain us and i'hspire us to liold on until enally we hack'our way .tlirough, even though we, have drawn the beit so tight around aur bodies that the mere act -of breatbing becomes a trouble and a weariness.- Frankfurter Zeitung. As to the Value of Bachelora Rev. 17. M. O'Neil, of Ebenaburg, Pa., in a Ber- Moui on the interésting aubjéct of bachelors, declared that thé unmarried man was usually of littie value ta any community, being generally selfish. Blache. lors were rarely found at* the head of the great gov- eruments or leading iu work for thé benet of the eommunity.. In tact, they seldom acconiplishied much iu life. Perhaps the reason for the latter fact is that thé unfortunaté féllows who have not familiés ta support do not have ta \"do «thinga.\" Tbey, havé no drivers.-Montreal Gazette. What the United St ates Owes to the Britiuh.Navy We- owe the cantinuance of aur eustoms revenue te theé ses-preparedness, af Englsnd. If Germany had ben equsi ta Great Britain on the higi' seas, no ship flying the flsg of a nation engaged on éither aide would have been safe, snd neutral vessela would almost crtsinly have heen sa hsmpered by searclies and seizures .that they would bave,-quit. The customsa might' have fallen toalsmost ndthing. As it is, we get what thé Allies seli, and we get what neutral countries seli. The màueh-talked.of interference by England 'with neutral trade isamali, hy caniparison with that trade's total volume.- Broolyn Eagle. .M. Cambon's Sumtinery «On the one aide are tranquil, couiage, faith in an idéal af justice, and -the will. ta emplay only legiti- mate méans of defence. On the other, thoughtsý of lucre, forgetfulniess of ail the principlés af human'ity. thé destruction of an open town, the taking of in- nocent lives, a sort of perverse joy in théea'ccom- plisliment of evil, and a plan,. pursued, with, cýildisb disregard of scruple, ta dominate the world hy ter, ror.\" This summing up of thé situation by. M. Paul Cambon, ambassador frant France ta, Great Brit .ain, miglit hé employed as' an effective reply. to thosé wh6 ask what the nations aie fighting for.-Miné. apolis Journal.- A Confession from Berlin 'We must look the fact iu thé face fhat we are dealing with a nation of masters, wvhielh for cen- turies bas neyer knowu what it is ta yield. It la not ta bie expected that England, though she may have been at fault in lier calculations in this war, wil[ show any weakhess. The nation, even in spité of its leaders, if need be, will hlid out ta the ut- Most with iron wili. Germany and England have bath under-estimated the possibilities of develop- ment of wbiéh tiîeir forces were susceptible. After eighteen montha of war we nu longer engage in feints, we are aware that it la a question of figlit- ine~for life.-Berlin Tageblatt. Great Peace Work in War Time The British government lu India lias just opened thé greatest irrigation-canal in~ the worMd, greater than that of even the Nile system lan Egypt, and alone watering as much land as the whole of the twenty-five irrigation-canal systema of thé United States. This la the Jhélumà rilver system, in the northwest of India. It lias 322 miles of main line (about thé length of Lake Ontario and the\"'\"t. L~awrence, from\" Toronto ta Montreal) and 22j645 miles of subsidiary chiannels. It will watér- two million two bundred thousand acres of hitherta arid land. Thé cost direct and indirect is about $70-000O,000, but the wateréd land will produce crops .worth at lasat $13-00,000 a year. This is the sort Fi~wr ritial idme docs in India, and which war 4loes not stop.-Paris Matin. Wilhelm the Ail-bountifu! flurrali for Kaiser BiIII! Ré is an opeu-handed spénder!If li as the giv-e-aiav, privileges of the eartli! lie lias jiîst ofi'erecl ta give Gibraltar ta Spaini! Ife lias also uffe(i'ed ta give all of Finland to Sweden! -After lie lias given Gibraltar ta thé S'panisli people thé kaiser miglit turn around and present the Panama canal ta Switzerland for thé use ut bier extensive mercliant marine. Then lie miglit give Niagara FaIls to 1)cniaî'k. Tbink ut the Park ilidu.'.t i it git stîppar)t. A few- ather tliiiiîgs Ï i('kiI2'îîî(l atingî ii îliaîd-v fer tue Pvrii' i i ant (),, a'tl tl\u003ca'. t ac ]p wolll i c thc Pvranîd', fali î t ,t' s a pler-w%%eighli hyTurkev. fic ho pliîx for Hollaîîd, witlîthe Nnrtit Çea tlirown ni as a lt -\\11Ynvtijne le V woitl\u003cllik,' fa bave flic Mettlnfor Brazil . ent ment will have i miii I Ixi te 'itlke ()\"('of aur greit a's i'Jîn ti leNîfi loie left. ,\", nt (give it la li (1~ o Itnfllitcore l landy for the r - The",
         "'--by Hatred - WeFrankfurter natural hatred 'or this mflsery. ve-have drawn. tthe mere act weariness.\"- lui. Pa., in a ser- ýelors, declared of littie value elfish. Blache- the great gev. benet of the mplished much latter fact is e net families .\"They have British .Navy stems revenue SIf .Geriany the high'seas, aged où either eutral -vessels hampered by 114 have *quit. meet n6thing. I, and we get nuch-taIked.of trade is,. mali tai volume.- ue, faith in an )y enly legiti- r, thoughtsý cf c f humaniiy. taking of in- [n the accemi- .with, c?ýiidish world. by ter- !n by. M. Paul Eireat Britain, eply te thoe fhat we are iei for cen- yield. It is ugh she may îin this war, even in spite ut te the ut- England have c f ýdevelep. ptibfe. After er engage in tien of fight- 'ime s just opened ;'oiîd, greater i E gypt, and whole cf the f the United stemi, in the cf main line and 22j645 1 water- two hitherte arid ,t is about produce crops [s is the sert ià which war open.-anded Ileges of the Gibraltar te Il cf Finland ,altar te the around and land for the ie. Then lie Think of the other t1iuîig, 11111 foc tic' offld be thce t hyv 'urkev. i Sea thrown to bave the ent wvill ha.ve 1 aqround thie V not give it tndy for thc Tue Weateýon Homie Monthly 1 ÉSTEELEBRGS muci ttetin, l2t rtan coox he bsqua utlh ooes econo, s i the nh that we re firm i n tebeifthee a f lo t ing to ane-uthe tdable i9 o f 5ta6 an u ffam ralamsi.Th many t n d whi f esor - t h~ i hhda-re nou ar ong and by rad, w ihth ry d arg odsand pesae f deaius favo er. ark geendoubeausk e. cPBea t e ardyand aey beplntd elic d ias tihaor. A ZZrt t i i tt e rn. t i s th fr et beo s«.ue cra oppr an ecally sut da h W u theW 50 to55 dys, r mblin theil dligh t ygower wh ar ernf dent t a nt fit , og.owla b carce wants ~A f ne w arly c rop f t e oiea ullof ru einkld eas.it Thsua ln es hsen.a ety d le thy il isalospcat suiabre frpln telg at eras nting tsuccsin ra therle a roet 5 e . dy tmpaiig b 1h8 ifrd n cntas ipp n ly. esi ha fA eiani i.ipoeetan 1 no élmr Wondr anP'Nces, btir ff ero oum kimis, Pacvines: P ret \u003ck. Posiandi. y roi bu Snteele, Brlg, barigsmre' sthepoilanghbry nced fohan oit nSeei te l iai Rotw Seeds, whae ftrqu. lrgathé e mrichdrgen oar e lngae mnd o pal ins *Ouithvy larg CUBOUIB wththefinat toka-rueto aie sd ur eavl est ad Teilsie thefWe st. ceptional met that ito prc.T bt ouseftfre utcale neaw.edte tolnisedpéu o5erro t o 55ownwhich ro- is na in er R il 'eo it ropta growerw aecnienjhta ataigoesbcm waducesaseilargaan amount per thecie tqua ity ond qua ltyae ies44 '. U*Jt W seaý«tyad oimtth wjtrfeingalsecPiz a m- MMb!fr lniga ntrasi ucesodo thrvreis meth LongoRd ngacntndte Healea rppn ugrBe Ch utiaiofvetwotou cKnw. I soulMd e, grewn Sebyt IV EVERTHIN 1H TEEL, GINT eL-a B uliefml k and jmpa uhrts 9 ot Sed an uhlspracreldhavebeedà every fee fMlah Cnst haei mrmWébv 0 gron. RIomS' t h fns caustncrae nse anthe -yelem e LOW OVA aL mANEL, theat rc plasatfior to d ctmniryn M 07in@W V -~ STraICn.BRG RZ A-STECELE BIGGS' \"ROYAEL E FILD AN TLE BRGGS' GliAr snoT INý UA ZT h GADEuIces qualtyarg e a y yiterd r untt n uaiyae a creo éial tefoor desni. can et ber s b et oed an eul Above retiegs, he PieManc he35 pe l crps s c pre il* SOc.ar b.e - ph ong tedpan. paspaa E WRITE TO-DAeder of Mave FodderlCe- Northrly rown ropscf ~ caush e it eaîle the a tiso run supplyIGs vey I at nd arîty o ikadiprs9 EVERYTHNG IN LW spleMndi socs f he arfollowîng laortod Nerhne llow ad e.........70 -.20 UM.60\" \"D Per 100T lb\".yFerd100 Corn Ëi orte...grwn*12.00 N rtWestern DnRy iete Gra s Exta cf U. Alflfhare'nieg ksoft he......100Bome wigas\"xr lie 20 CA TA OG UAfinnFontana3*............2..07.0 Brome $13.50rn Rye i i.ed120 Ali fal NorSleth e....... ....0 Set2..01.60prbs.(0bs. jPLID I Alfafa, rn Y ........t....... 70.0 vr \"T m ing lown\".. ........3.00 MrngR.5 11.340 rha.(0bs TN.ithD\"ara te............ 00 2.25o 13r) Ou q ,Bado il Ees sRae Brsoad La nglesOL Timoty, Grass ............$11.00 hWest ReGra \"Extfra1ls Timoty, \"tter.........10.0 Es e ap...o............. $11.00VVNNÏEG WSten RyeGras.. ..\".... 12.3.00 B81.30ass«forn\"100)5 Bagaatncluded nau 10 r racs. \"ExtraSEED Oji.1î.12.0A Pasturiug MonRaa ........27.0 rPeas -4rnRe id120 lAlso Swet Peau..... i. tu.e70 et0 cataoguR e .1 e f r us.(t0ôn bus. r....e1)3\"00E-ITS USE erg on re\"qLion\". (Ta ot- -e\u0026 olOc per copy.) WI.N.....N1.0IEse RpeG CANADA ,Engish ni 111 n ni 111 I utUlt l1LUJIIUlUUI1I itîî h W!!14 eL l\" .......... 111 1 ONLY lu 111111îrvr'- ii iriiit iU t11111LIliiu i i an î u tmii î:î.aIII:Iiî.î:îwI",
         "The -Western,:Home Afonthly- Special Easter'Bargalus in OGANSANDPIAlNOS Rire le a partafat'of our Bâtier » argains. 'Write to-day'ana secure the one yo11 wat, or 111 in coupon and mai it to us for coxnplee ligt of bargains in, the kIud of instruments you want. Every inistrumient is guar- aLnteed-yoU talce no chances. Write to-day or it will be to@ late. Ye Olde Firme. HEINTZMAN \u0026a COMPAINY, .LUMITED TrHREE SAMPLE BARGAINS IN, ORàANS XARN, five-otave organ in oil finushed wvaut case, hw1gh top wth music pocket, cylinder fallboard, Iamp stands; has 7 stops, nçluding V. Hum aa Forte, Diapa- son, etc. Grand organ and knee sweIll.in perfect condition and akýsnap a .... $35 DOMINION, six-octave or gan, walnutt ase with imitation pipe top; has sliding faîl- board, Il stops, iîcluding Vox Hulmana, Couplera, Iliapason, MIelodia, etc. Grand organ and knee swell. A sweet-toned Instrument, -very suitable for a small church. Special at .......................................................... ... $49 BELL, 7-octave organ, piano cased tmodel,'rosewood'finiish-, has rail top with mirror, sliding fallboard, 3 panels in top door, lanip stands; has il stops, including Bass and Treble Cou plers, Vox Huniana Forte, Diapason, etc. Grand organ and knee swell. A 7-octave organ is out o the ordinary, and any kind of music can be played on an instrument of this description. The tone is very rich, and the or an as in perfect condition. Is a genuine snap at.............................. 82 SQUARE PIANO MAROINS 1 UPRIGHT PIANO BRAN JENNYS à SON, New York, square piano, rosewood case, octagon legs, harp scale, 6-octave keyboard. This instru- ment is in perfect order and bas a very sweet tone, and would make a fine little practice piano. A special bargain at .................$52 MILLER BROS., New York, square piano, dark rosewood case, handsonc carved legs, fuI!lmtal tiran eWith long over-strung scale; ý7-oca yboard, 2 pedals; bas been carefull overhauled iand renewed ini every part, both inside and out, in our own factory. The tone is very rich, and this instrument is a snap at........................ $89 NEW SHOMER, Boston, cabinet grand upright piano in polislied xaogany case, colonial design, Boston falîhoard automatic full Iengtli music desk; bas full metal frame with hushed tuning pins, overstriung scàle1 7 1-3 octave key- l:'oard, 3 pedals. This is a sample in- strument, and bas been carefully tested by our experts. The tone is rich and sonorous and this piano will give splen- did satisf'action. Regular $350. Special bargain .9 .............$255 HEINTZMA. \u0026CO. cabinet grand uipriglit piano; in handsome polislhed rosewood case, folding falîboard 3splain panels in top door with cnrswing music desk, long over-strung tri-chord scale, 7 1-3 octave keyboard. Has been carefuliy renewed in every part in aur own factory, and is practically as good as new'. Has gcnine Heintýýman tone and tbuch, and is offered special at $285 ONE SPECIAL PLAYER-PIANO BARGAIN AUTOPIANO, New York, Player Piano in .liandsome dark rnahogany case, over- strung scale; plays 88-liqo e rn n ic and LsiildS o hlie player piano equîpment. The case design is plain but artistie, .aad this piano has an elegant touie. Regular prîce $650. Special bargaini price------------------------------------------....$450 W. include $10 worth of Player music avid bench, frce of charge. PAY A LITTLE AT Mail this*ýýCoupon A T IM EHeintzman \u0026: Co., Limited Pay a few dollars now, then Please mail me é ome)ýete lit of bar- just a few dollars a month. . gains in ...................*....t1'a your adiniiW~estern lHomc Mlouthly, ,Apr . HEINTZMAN HALL Nanîr -.............. 1115A Ynge St Toronto Addr ess.......................... Don'lt Buy a Cream Separator Untîl you have secn thîs special proposi- _ t ion, as it means a big saving to you. _____ The Judson Cream Separator, the separ- ator that's buit to do the work. Bond for our specisà1 proposition to-day. We can save you inorney on farm suppliets of all kinds with ou ncw spring cataloguîe. Copy sent freeo n request. C, S. JUDSON CO, Llmlted, Wlnnlpeg N v rit n t nt îl:.. ite(nt inn Tlir ''l n Ilen, M lilth1 Plans for a Comtortable and Attractive Farmn Home (Çontinued from page 17) in the living ronm ýhe finish of the ma11s 4'uid '0 iýde very attractive bv- using a, wall board. -These boards 'vikh ar. niled .n trips or even on the stud, come in different widths and lengths, from four feet wide to tweive feet long. ?ver the joints nail a strip dividing it into panels. Thtis is an inexpensive wvay of finislîing a boine, when it is bard soimetimes to0 have a good job of plas- tcring donc, in remote parts of the coun- try. The board can be painted and d- corated afterwards or' papercd. The exterior witli its Iow picturesque roof lines and ga' le ends w.oul l it in, and harinonize with its suiî1rounJ ings. If poplar or oak trees are niear leave them as much as possible, until trees that willl bear cuitivation eaul be devciop. ed. Tlhe outsidc couid be buiit of cither sitingles, clap-boards, brick or stone. In this plan, large one-inch by tcn-inch boards are used outside, eft rougli from the planer, and stained, not paintel; roof shingies, five incites exposecd, and left to weather. The foundation is pos- sible of field stone, weil bonded and flic cbimncys of brick or fleXi stone. The bouse slîouldnuak-e an ideal farm home, warm inwintcr, cool iii sumner, and if the Éurroundings are carefully considercd it will make a picture to gladden the eye of the fraveller, as welI as comfort the itcart of the dwel- er therein Essentlals for Success Mrs. 0. 1B. Staples. Thîis is tlie beginniîg of mvttir-ti \\'car raîsing Ch icketts and[ n îîig]îboîs say I haive \"cnuarvellous luck;\" but I believe it is only thte result of careful reading of gond pnultr-y literature, good attention to the confort, cleanliness and food of rny flock, and a genuine love of poultrv. Believing titat thte first esseitial i ,good stock I started -witlt twelvP fuI! t tatirei WiteteJullets ait-L Athe very best maie bird 1 could finti. I quartered titein in a dry' . stinny, roomy bouse, thte soutit sido covered only with w-'re uetting. Adjoilîing tliis is a narrow room foir laying anti sitting witit dean, r()()\"V ilcsts-. Tlthitbouses are kept e: ean by reinoving droppiiîgs fre- quttîrV, sprinkling limie abolit tite floor anîd riiosts freî l-ac:ionall.v, as a p'vvi ut ve inea'.îîre, TPgO over everv incht Oif cadei slied and rtest box 'vith a blaziîîg forcit made of rags soaked in keiosenec' aIndti hus keep free' of mlites, lice and IlatIlld i lii. it lic busv. active lien is the lien fliat ImYs, so 1I provide a oîod ca ît gpeil. Tilis is matIe W'. Im a l i itg Il p a pla ce aibou t six feit square anti pililiitfîtl of tat :w or ltNtves. I thlî w tlle liiri i feed of sîtî ral.il ito ttilii lii ai tue lhuit, ile'.er '-top w î i luit il ev'. iv Ca«u* foîuid. 1.PMli 'Vo ct gq i le ttifuliand\\VVte (011 i-o lti ve t iii ii1î).\\le- îîîîU li. Ni l o îv : ' , , t t, u îi l î e î î \\ -1 IL . 4 à20 and green food fromn the garden. By October lat they have beautiful, glossy, snow-white coats and begin their \"lay- ing songs.\" I then begin to \"fced for eggs, and I have every single hien iaying and have dozens of eggs to -seil whien they are séarce and the price biggest. The food must bie ample and variedi. Keep, in mifid \"the four G's\"-grains, greens, grits and grubs. Also clean water should be provided always. Their morniîîg feed is chops, a q. - to twelve h lens, fed in litter. At noon at mash, composed of equal parts of whcat bran, shorts, corn mca! anti about haif the quantity of cotton seed meal, is fed. In this put a little sait and powvdere1 charcoal and mix with skim-milk to 'a crumbly' mixture, neyer sloppy. At night I feed a. good feed of shelled corn, altern- ating with oats which have been soaked for 12 hours. Before them at ail times is kept a bowi of clabber, abox of oyster shelîs, crushed charcoal and pounded-up bits of broken china and crockery. I scald ail water and milk vessels several times a week; and during the ,winter xnonths feed fresh beef scraps ground in my food chopper, or green bone eut fine in a small bone cutter about twice a week. Thtis furnishes pro- tein, in place of insects, worms, etc. A large patch of green oats pianted in September furnishes green food. My chickens do not have colds or roup because 1 put a amail lump of copperas in each gallon of drinking water. They do not have choiera or bowel troubles because their food and quarters are dlean. At 'the first sign of sor.ehead 1 paint the spot with iodine twice, which always stops the trouble. Scaly leg 1 eau kili by one application of coal oil. I provide a good dust pile of dust and ashes mixed, always a popular resort for the chiekens. I set mny hens'as early as I eau after Christmas. The most vigorous chiclks are hatched in January and Fiebruary and are my earliest layers in thlecfal!. llowever, the hast two years, pullets liatchied',,n April and May were pushed to maturity rapidiy and were laying in five montits. gV4 I feed baby chicks on good eg r bread, dry bran, and crushed charcoal for three weeks, thea feed commercial citick feed and chops. Each little brood bias a separate coo-p, whi cl ean daiiv and disinfect weekzl. I get 12 to 14 out qf every 15 eggs set, and hardly ever lueA a chick. Every fal 1 eull my fiock, eating andi seiling cockerels as rapidly as they reacit the proper size. Every lien that is not \"cpaying lier board\" or up to tbe stand- ard in shape or size, or is over two ycars nId, goes to market. 1 seli eggs the year through; seli many sittîngrs in the spring at faney priccs wbhen mnarket eg-gs are low in prive. Sornetimes 1 seli a flock of baby cbic1ks, a good cockcrel for breeding, hiens for roasting, or a flock of pullets to somvoine wanting a start. I liave sr-nt a crate of puilets as far away as Spanish Hondultras andi 1 ain not a proiessional eitlipir, bt an ex-m':s,.ic teaclîir living in a sinall town, with oiuly,,a large bail yard, and who, uintil tw'o years ago, neyer handled a chiciken. 1 have neyer advertiscd in any potiltry journal, and have spent very little for ny cîtiekens outside of feed. 1 got t1iw riinl ock in a trade. I niake in*v coops of boxes, and rny only real outlay -%vas for the bone cutter, wbich I bouglit cheaply secon(liand. It is planning of titis kind, couliled with carcfuil execuition, -,ýhichs bas. madi possible the success of titis venture. At a ti:t liii , like the present, pros- pet ar god a:t c apc.r bbe at the dawn of an cia wlen prosperity will be abroad titroulitout the land, it is pleas- in.\" to peruse that highly optimistic 1publication \"N1,ational Pro ' ress.\" Tlie Vlo11nia.iv issule i', certainilv cbovk fil]] of iii i v n:t11til -, înatter- -ood Stilgtiill, ~î~îîlin a imaliuer w1ih (ii eo1pel s voir a tten t ion. The cdi- t lSbae Ueeîei in obtainincy con- !il llioaisfroni Soîme wxeptma!~ 'l d sriters 111111 illiet mîîist eccrtalilv I f igatlte l in rin frorntiieir t O d- o . fi:tîilverilv .breathes the o i f tipfi iiuin.",
         "The Western IfPeMn ly rden. By ul, glossy, heir \"lay. \"fced for Lien laying seil whlen e biggest. id variedi. \"y-grains, Js0 clean Lys. lt noon a' of w1lcat bout haif 'ai, is fed. powdere1 nilk to 'a At niglit -n, altern- cn soaked ail times of oyster ainded-up ýry. k vesseis uring the ef scraps or green ie cutter ishes pro- 3, etc. A Lanted in 1. ýs or roup copperas er. Tlhey troubles rters are )r.ehead 1~ ce, wbich aiy leg I ceai oil. dust and ar resort eau after is chiclks February ille fail. ~,puluts *e pushed laying in eggVaýrn charcoal mmercial uatc coep), t weelJ . eggs s8t, dting and hey reacli at is not lie stanîd- ;wo years 3cil many -y prices in Pl-ire. )Y clielýg, hens for seI1loide crate of [To ni iras tier, but a sinall. ý'ard, and r liandled *rtised in peut very f feed. 1 and uny rie cutter, and. ycouliled las .ma da turc. rnt, pros- )e at the y will be is pleas- ptimistie ;s.\" Tire -k fuIl eof ýer-eoOd iniiicr Tlie edi- mig con- ail v w'ýIl cci't ai nI oni thieir [elkieved. ai1 fli)ru thes the The WO 'a Q et Beur By E. Cora HinJ This is the day after flie referendum and -Manitobalias gone dry in a most unmietaknible fliafner/3ndi( in 2 and 1-2 rnontdis we may 'hope tu sec flie bars closed throughout flic entire A Dry. province. M-Vlile the women ,Manitoba were not permittêci Lo vote on this particular issue, they exeroised au enormous influence and did an amaziflgamount of hard preparatory m-ork and did yeomen services at the poils, particuiarly in the cities and large tow ns. M-e have reason to belicve that the go vernuient wilI make evcry effort to en- force tlhe law and if tley arc ever flic least inclined. te go slac!g at tlieir task, the knowledge that the women of ftie province have votes and' that the ma- jority of etlîem are in favor of the pro- hibitory iaw will be a great heip. Per- sonally, 1I bave not been able te sec there is any tlîing gained for enforce- mient of tlîe iaw because the men heve abolis'hed thle liquor traffic themselves, indeed to my mmnd it carnies sometlîing of a reproacli, as if they couid do it ini 1916 tlîey couid -have donc it 20 years ago. Thougli ne man is likeiy to admit it, I believe that the niere fact that the women rould ha voters in'the next edcc- tion ias had a very stimulating effect on the mcn working bard to aboiisiî the tfrîjflc. The \"eternal masculine\"~ is very fondi of sliowing flic \"eternal fem- wlîy it wvould be desirabie tliat it shîould bc. Iliousud imdd r flîjs oe roof tiiere coulàbeb the bflber siîop, the town library, the publie felephone station and uîîany similar smali publip utilities. Iiere nmust be a dinin-rioom of a good size, and fliere is ne reason 'why tîjis room slîouid not have a good floor suit- able for dancing. The dining-room couId tiien l)c uscd for social gatlierings and tlîe fact fliat there -%vere otiier rooms available for flic use of the guests woul make if mucli more convenient tlian the ordinary hlal over a store. The liotel parier couhli 1 frequently. utilized, at a very modest rentaI, for tlie various meetings of women's organizations in tlîe town. It wouid he quite feasible at manv of these places, fo establish at the village hotel publie baths on a imal scale. *W.here present buildings are utilizel it'wogaid not aiways be possible to have a ggiJn, but even ameng tlic present buildingà,s, in many of tlie amail towns, there is a piece of land easilv Hotel available, and wherever newv Gardens buildings are erected this siîould, ýe a part of the agree- iment. A garde Wlot 'witli a few trees and a tennis iawÏn wouid make tlic hotel a social centre for tlic summer as weili as thle winter. W'orked in t lus way Currant River Falls (Port Arthur Ont.) C.N. Ry. imine\" what lie can do - busy. llowever, how thlieel immateriai, it bas come ar4 to stay, and as long asm bodies of soldiers training it i, a matter ofetg-af tlin t1is particular form of feu move froîn theun. when lie gets there w-ould ha absoiutely no trouble in cuange camïe is xaling hotels withiout liquer pav. id it lias come My own jdea would he fliat tle vani- we have large ous femperance onganizations tlînoughi- 1in our midst ouftflhe province shiouihi form a big e- nkftilness fliat operative or jouut stock cornpiany f; lic rptation is i-e- sliarcs sbouid be lial at moIest price and t'lie number fo be lîcld bY any one ini- * * dividual limifed. An onganizatioit of 'flic whole niatter of hotels wiii bave fo be re-adjusted under flic n\u003cw regime and I ami taI. ing fuhis opjîotunitv of ru- 'vngasuluJeet on, wlîclu I wrote a iengtli in tiiese columns a The Hotel number of monilîs ago, Questioh nainelv, the duty of flic feun- pei'ance peple, 'andi e-pecial- IV oftheflc \\oînen, in regard to hotels ani placýes of accommodation for flic travel- lin-~ public. 1 feel fliat acconmnodations of rliis kind, l)ariculai'l in fle icsnaller texuns and villages, slîoîîld be v'e :V laigeixly in tlie bands of woinen. ýtl tîme bars eliminated the hofel eft'hli sinmll counfry tewn or village is nofbiig in -anîd cerfainly sliould net be an yý- IL gles, tian a flîorougrhly conîfor- riboaidiig lbeuse %w-lierê the cr1ests rP\": t, bv the w uek or fle ic liit as t r' iiiîuss requires tli. Witli tbe 'N\\i-atino' drink afmospher'e dispeil,l - o rsnem reason wliv tlie local hotu1 \u003ei11dlot Ire the soci1al \"cur uof ti' Zue and there are verv mianv reasons luotels flirougliouit flieProvince. * * * * * Thl iofels -%itliout liquor should lit undur licunse jîîst as m-uchu as thic licensed Louse, fliough, of course, at a muchl ower figure, and tlî'vshioulil bu regeula nyuand tliorouilv uîî1.1- Women spected andi fli inspertors Inspectors ahieuki 1w uffqustionably women. If a cempany fe luandie the bofels for ilic prolelmoviimn'î r-' î¶t feasiblu if slieuid af ieasf iuc fea.ihi)e for eac4hsli mIl fowvn te have a eenipany te icarr'v it.', oNvnlibofe], or' it miglîf lie done b ,flhe hoiml1 leuel ikcliet els wifh tflic tii 'il\" tuuiit-, tînt afvii'? e ii ileiiti\u003ciied :1 tire', ai iti' w'ould prox \u003c'\\trn'îel vut-t to '01t1e1i\u003c ' oîv t'te u blic mw1l0 t ra vui on b11:Snu-'SlS 1it te the ever inrr- reaiigvolume oif fourint trall'ic. Mn r - itoîna liiîds it'elf .Ipleiill v to ilî r - irg and more, and more every year peu. K - 64No -Not This\"' «\"Go Get Your Owm Puffed Wheat\" L'very child lias dainties she dislikes to share. You did and we d:d. Chljdren always wiIl. And in every home that serves Puffed Wheat, that dainty is among themn. W'e have often watched it. With, a reat big dishi, and a package ZDli wiig oi ae to share a taste. Flaky, Flavory Bonbons These bubbles of wheat iook and-taste'like'confe Ctioms. Chljdren love to eat themn like peanuts-carry thoem in bags wlhen at 'play. Acidin- cream and sugar''akes a breakfast dish with whIicli nothing else compares. And they are about as deliejotis as a good-nighit dish, floated in bowls of milk. Another pleasant fact is that any hour one may eat bis fiUl. Fcr tlie-e t'iin, crisp morseis are' simply wiîoie wheat ptiffed. Everv fond l has been exploded. So, bevond ail other grain foods,7ïffed WTieat easily digests. It is quite a misiakc to i\u003ec sparing of a food so fascinat- in- an d so lbygienic. Puffed Wheat Puffed Rice These are the food s i n wlîicli IProf. A. P. Aiid son soived the probli)iro perfect cooking. grain foods are cooked o l)aked or toasted. 'fhus p)art ofÀfihe food ceils are. broken, h aif. Except in Far West 12c 15C but rarely more than [n Puffed Grains àlone is every food cell exploded. Over 100 million steain explosionsr; are caUse(1 in each Ptufed Grain. Thus every afom of ev'ery elerné ,nt be- cornes avaiiai)ie as food.l Your de'cîor will fell yoti.that wlicîàt and rice, ini every w~ay, are best wheni serve(l iin pffed f\u003crjm. The. Quaker Oatso~mpany Sole Makers Peterborough, Ont. Saskatoon, Sask. I r1251r ~~--~v~t : mmarqaL",
         "wM seek te motor through the prov. and give good public service wouid be for pleasure. ,,The mere fact that one of the greatest factors in the sue- nt, eomfortable hotel accommodation cessful enfoicement of our nw temper- à be obtained in any smail town ance legielation. Id inerease this traffic immensely. Housekeeping for the family ba\u0026--long itoba has very mùuch te offer in the been recognizedas wemen'as pecial busi- of ýbqýty ln the aummer and the nes life. We are beginuing tounder- wledge that dlean bedo and good stand, that~ she has a duty4à the ,,cii lawait the motor touriste ne iât- housekeping alop, and this housekeep. wvlere niglit overtakes themn, would ing for te benefit of the travelling tlate travel of this kind. Public le quite as naturaily and legiti- * * * * mately lier Province, and she should lose iere is a housekeepers' clame at -thé ne time in leoking after it. toba Agrictltural College and this I 1shall be very glad to have readers 1 be enlarged at ne additional exý- of the page take this question up and ete include special training- for discuss it. .Any letter along this line housekeeping in emall hotels. ,either opposed or in favor of it will be atiug There is.no reason why this welcomq, and riglit 1 suggest that it le ehould not become a de- miight, wth profit, be discuesed at meet- \u003eers sirable and reaeonably re- ings of home ecenomie eocietiee, home- m2unerative _profession. for makers clubs.and klndred organizations. women. Active Intereet in the working out of some sucli sebeme as this and -the counsel and support of the temperauce people te the hotel man who -hon2stly seeks to meet the changed conditions Whipped cream strongiy fiavored with cucumber juice, is a. delicious sauce for flsh. The Graduate Baby By N. Phullipe \"Oh, you can't guess what Baby did tozday! Baby lias learned a brand new trick; lie 'can-! \" Tie 'two d the'ee years of babyhlood bring to parents lnany deliglitful ýlittie surprises, but these are only the sha-. dows cast before, some of tlîem not so very delightful, that corne whien the littie one lias stepped over tlie thres old into carly childhood. Vien it is, \"You can% pos- sibly imagine whit that youngster was Up to this moiyng_ \"I'm utterly dazcd at the traits ny littie girl shows! M7here does she get lier ideas?\" Mucll is said of the vital importance of the years of later childhood, of adoles- cence, bV~t no years can be more vitally- important than those that follow close upon infancy. Then the ittie one bc- cornes an animated, never-satisfied in- terrogation pont, for tbis je the learning time of life as is no other. \"He je ai- ways hungry, both mentally and phy- Buster Brown stockings for boys are made in Black and Leather Shade Tan, of the best long fibre cotton specially twisted and tested for durability,. with double leg and three-ply heel and toe. Your dealer can supply_ you. Margest filnttq £uugaurriloanaba f#amttoA(Ontar MILLS AT HAMILTON AND WELLAND, ONTARIO Abo suakors of the. celebrat.d \"ltti. Darling » and \" littl. Daay \"! Hosiery for Infants and Childrexi B pie w Iee deceî touIc woul mail way know meali terw aLimi The Manit coûld pense Eue Bouse KEu\" A cleaning fluid thiat will remove grease from the meest delicat. ejîke and ,chahis is made of o-ne pint of distilled benzine, thrce-eixteeniths of an ounce of tluid cioroformi, one-eighith ounce of carbonate of ammnonia, one-eighth ounce stulphtiric ether. It shoifl be bottled and corked tightl'v. and kept from fire and lighit,, as il.\"S very infliammable. y, \u003ct si'cally,\" says one. Hia. developing teri. dency to put two and two, togetlîer- combine facts and impressions - leads Mîin to draw wvonderful1y original con- clusions, some of which will stick like burre ail through life, in sipite of ex- 'perience and education. 'In babyislî crudity his'individuality begins to asserr itef-temperamnent, special gif te,tastes, inclinations. The clîild that lias eeenîed te be quiet, docile, innocent of serjous faults, perliaps develope a fIglting sel- fishiness; .inanifests a passionate teniper, or is iunaccountably reticent, alinost sifllen. Juis imagrination runs away with bis wabblv judgrnent and leade hii into strange fields, so thiat hie p-oqpee-ts for upriglit chara ter seem to be shôt flirougli andl through -vitlî iintruthful. m-ss, dishonesty, scheming purposes. Fie bcg'ns to realize lue own riglits, and de- fenîds them in cruel, alinost savage ways. Witllal, li j a bundie of feelings, rcady to go Into higli tragedy at a word, or shadow of a frown, or imagined neglect; or to be made happy by equally slight causes. Heie j naturally religious, asks many questions whose answers are of great significance to hie soul weifare, and at the same time lie practices adegree of faith that eliames hiseleders. Hi j \"out of one thing and into another\" so rapidly that it inakes oider people dizzy - hp simply wili be busy, thougli hp bas ii1 way of telling innocent fromn harmtui busy-ness. Honesty, hi o n o r, trnith, purity, courage, personal cleanline,ý.. \u003cindness, reverence, gentieness-these îî- thieir opposites ail begin to eprout durinq this period, and in due time *ill becoine fruitful of best things, or worst tlings, according as lie is wiseiy or unwiseiy fostered and trained. Because tbiese are the years of inany, înany new and mn- censely interesting e':periences, disonv- cries, also years of rapid mental and moral unfolding, they are years of habit- forming to a far greater degree thaniiFe usuaiiy recognized. What are the mother's - rather, mne arents'--duties and opportunities at thià Uie? Who will dare try to tell them il? They are legion. A few general rincipies seer to assert themeelves, owever. The\" old rule for making a Dod rhubarb pie je to put in sugar as lng as conscience'will consent, then shut Jie eyes aud prit in some more. A new jaby may be making luimseif very ii sresting, or set up mauy daims to at- lntion, the fiedgling child may seeni to )e doing very well, or may be inde- ýendeut; yet, in dealing with the later, \u003eve's hopeful, watchful, sober, patient, iudious sympathy canuot be too freeiy Irawu upon. The young child je nothing )ut a tender, growing, sensitive, un- immetrically developed human beiug 'itl uîany of baby's limitations stili figing to bis life. The only rational response to hie ,aseless activity le not repression, or isapproval, or punishment for honeet nistakes, but painstaking care to find ait ways of ]etting himi do thinge worth hile, a gréat variety of them. Fie is îly trying to get his bande' on iife's indice and find eut the \"1hows\"' of Teryday doing, wvants te feel himself n it\" as lie secs the world arouud him. ýecause he lias qucer ideais, hot ini- gntosad\"silly sorrows,\" is in- hîced to origrinal action, wvise or unwise, is niecessary for his God-appointed uides to re«alize liow little of aduit oninon sense\" he lias te work ivith, ow much of feeling, eniergy, junger foir ppreciation, ambition to-Ja4ccompl islî, iminates in his tîny world. Parents m'uet stoo1) te serve the child liysically, se tbiev miust learn te sec 1m the child's meýntal and moral stand- oint, analyze bis real needs, aud se bielp iii approve and chloose as beet lie cau ith bis owNNIchildishi ability. One lotiier bias apily called tbis \"feeling ound te ind the hest way.\" Sureiy feling around\" ie silnehine and moiet- e and ricli soul for the child with hie )unflesse needs and capacities and pos- bilities. 1 OMNOS -J BROWN STOC (£,,** Llintitrb",
         "eveleping tell- wu, togethei.. ýsions - leads original con. v'iIl stick like spite of ex- .ln. babyisît ,gins to asserr 1 gifts, tastes, Lt lias. seeîned nt of serions fIghting sel- :onate temper, cent, ahinost ris awav with 'ads hini into p'-oszpec'ts for to be shôt i tintruthful. purposes. Ie ghits, and de- savage ways. 'elings, ready 1 a word, or ined neglect; qually slight ligious, asks wers are of welfare, and ,s a degree of . He is ',out r\", so rapidly dizzy -li à hpo bas iii om harmtui i o r, trut, ss-these ibt« prout durintc *ill beeonie wost thinge, or unwisely se tjiese are tew and m- ces, disc\u003c'w- mental and Lrs of habit- iree thanig rather, mre îities at thi o tell them ýew geileral themseîves, niakingý a [n sugar as t, then shut ire. A new If very igi- iims to at- ay seeni to y bc inde- i the later, er, patielit, tee freely is nothing sitive, un- man being Mtons stili se te bis ýression, or for honest tre te find ings worth ým. He is s' on life's \"bows\" of tel himself round bii. S, hot ini- 's\" is in- or unwise, [-appointed of aduit vork wvith, hjinger for tccomplislî, Sthe cbuld ,rn te sec iral stand- M1( so lbelp ost lie can ity. One s \"feeling .\" Surely mud moist- i with bis Sand pes- iremeve silks an(l f distillecl 1 ounce of ounce of -hth ounce ottled and i fire and le. The Western Home Monthly nke Y.unj W. ndoHr Preblem By Pearl Richxnond Hamnilton Womanly Poise form ef mental' consumption produces 'ýaught in the toils, cf .alsehood!\" I, physical bondage. thought as I entered a ward of unfor- 2Mr .MLuhi as tungte girls-one evening. A sob in ene Witliin thyself some 'dormant .seedling cerner, a ruban in another, a sigh in an- lies, ôther and a stili pale face at my ide-I Just waiting for the tillage -of thy wili stood for a moment stunned by the aw- To aid its growth, from which some fui torture, of suffering girlhood. Then day may rise 1 went over te a dauglter tbat ene A harvest worthy of the reaper's skill. nmotber must have loved, and as 1 took Within, thyseif there lies some latent lie hand in mine she said: \"I placed my power, trust in that which Was false'-and here As potent as bas ever comè te liglit; am! arD ut which awaits the ceming of the *The next day I met another girl in a heur, store. She wa s looking for aposition- Mben thou shait set it free before always when I rneet ber she la iooking 1 man's aiglit. for a position. Nobody wants ber. Rer Then te be a moving influence in life, hair is loose and untidy, her waist is oue must face the b\"oad open stre'cli soiled and pinned carelessly and lier of her future, picture bier ideal and skin la not clean. I have ofteni met bier ciimb step by step te tqîat tbrone. This time she lifted bier eyes ne higlier One writer says: \"Each one walks ber than my collar-ah, then 1 knew. I tried eoul pathway aJonc, guided only by the te lift those eyes higher, but could net. star of Bethlehemn beckoning, 'Foilew A year ago I tried to 1f t that mind thon me.\"' The train conductor collecting fares in Paris In the strikcing sketches of life in Paris-under war conditions, M. Sabattir lias doue well te include a vivid presentment of the conductor on the tram, for the tram is very impor- tant, an indispensable feature of daily life. In London we have already grown familiar with the sigit of triin women conductors; and tleir unobtrusive civility, tact and care are machl to their credit. In Paris the trams are almost as popular as our own system, and the voien ernployed have quickly shown themsclves capable substitutes for men. The work, too, is net se onerous, and passengers have shown theuiselves cager net te add te difficulties. (From \"Illustrated London News.\") higher but did not. Lift your mind Illcavenwvar(d, girls, and you can leok at anvone frankly. Èvery trec and sljrub on a mountain grw upward as if te communicate with God. The great mountain itse]f directs man's impulse heavenward- Points te greatness beyond the seope of pre-ent vision. The secret of poiver lies in vision anti rev'er'îce for tlie invisible, and few men or w (ilion are successful who de not re- eogn iz/e it because bunian power-power I Oiliasize -is but the expression of tii0 l\u003e%ine in mnan or woman. ryact of kinduess, everV honeat 8111le of loN'e, 'everv -riglit iimpllse, tVery flipuil. had lasp is the reflection of tieligier Power in the soul. Witbin ee ilis stored the powerof tboug-ht. I :*takes into ber mind nourisbing f'-li food shie ill grow in pewer, if, 011 teUther hand, she indulg-es in men- tal 11;i on lier niind wil shrivel aud this1 There is ne event 4ir\\çircumstanee tbat can 'hinder yent in re\u0026ching yoîîr goal-except yourself. Poise is power and it is only wbenia is in harmony with a higlier power thiat slie bas calmn confldece-tibat surety of purpose that bas nothing te, do with verveus tension. Womanly poise is tee deep te waste la outbursts of energy. Trifles bother women. A strong, mov- ing put-pose in life lifits weman altove trifles. XVe sec so manx\" women fail in life because they are slaves te thieir nerves. Ini their effort 'te accompl:sl tlîings theyv exeýrt thinselves tee mnucli and thus make impossible the power of ma stery. The iîndertone cf life's hiarmonies buo v eue up. A cahîî. mental balance capable of wegîfg orces an Il placing each co in ils proper file cives one a ýision cf courage and hope. 'No' girl bas [xet reac'hed the lhuit rcf lier mental and'spiritual expansion. ThL jWho'S Yo.r Doetist? Consider carefully your Dcntist before you employ himn- sec that lie is undisputably well established and has the name of delivering only the bust in Dental work-the materials used in Dental work go a long way te -make that Dental work lasting-again the price thati the Den- t'st charges should. be in keeping with the times--herete- fore my charges for Dental work have been in keeping with'!he quality of work that 1 always endeavored to give my patients -To-day the public can reoeive the benefit of this higli class work at a price heretofore flot believed possible in Western Canada. Whalebone Vulcanite Pl.t6 ...... $1 Oel Fit Ouarante.d Crown and Bridge WAo.......... $7.\"O MatuIaIs and Work Guarmnoe T-eeth Wihout PIait' o perTo~iu. $7 Dr. Roblnsonu Dentîst Blrks BIdg. SmiIth and Portage Winnipeg, Man. ofTaFAT Free Trial Treatment They mà 'laulleaks la an uutml-tl.5etfreust. Am)formy \"payWb. Sb ,cperntW ~btatbPO ~ t\u003c. I te.My tr'Rtfnutlki. rdUc,5 thm i ayure, il s. ed \"et.. teosjud y adoay. sroitib, .mPl~ nyf*e P ,o nhiO n L IPni xe'.* i,'iuOy a],ai uti\"tK for ami g. e. Czlt u',st'rd y.u IProut ut u.y expense i~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~~~XR GoltO3f.OetBCiigodOt ER. NEWMAN,LIcoss.d nwld Con« o X S. o.,Dep B c ().t. taWew Y ,k.30 ait TIrd ât ý NI w 1\"rk, Desk Ali3 When writint advertisers plea3e mentio.à-4be western iiome NMontbly. p\". -r- i o UR «0CFILDREN'S A N UNUSUALLY AT - TRACTIVE ONE-FOR THE LITTLE TOTS WHO LOVE BRIGHT PICTURES, AND FOR THE OLDER ONES WHO LIKE PRETIrY VERSES. W. are oudl.igit ouin the hfpl that it Winl fumkh many happy momaus for le. Eitie os . ato whoa 6\" ist isplaoed. lt iain a way. dedicaied to their uajoymeuik, aujif k p6ase in hs 1o. . Sond a 2. centat mp, with Yourmmm ainid auus m.md wewâfonvari ca 1 et0 mtOn D. Ri Dingwal lewebns WINNIPEG",
         "Q ogto Decorate? if you'are going ta \"#do\"# the dining;room or the -edroom, or even the kitchen, this spring, oau trates in photogravure, in colors, rooms done with bastri.. It contains suggestions and idee.s for coor mohemes, anid it shows how yau can da the. work yoursdlf ArtiýStiç Wall Tints A cew cof \"Hom.$ Heaithful and aeautiful\" mme but 15c. \u003ccoin or uaanps), but if it savu you frai\u003e mak. Iig aven on flOdnsale-ud tière. s noth. is eaipta rias.tham istakes In calor -will itnfot pny for Lself à hundred timei omer ? Then tend for ir now and uiudy it b\"lt you start houwcIezrn\u0026 THE ALABAMTNE COMPANY LIMFTED 48 Willow Steet Paris, Ontario A Woman's Pro- fusion Learned 1at Home whlch wiU avh tremendoue poblent of an Incaprne loi thousandu and thou- mande of women is told clearly and inter- estingly in a charmn- ing book caiied Dreesmaking Mgde Easy.\" It ie for you free on request. and telle the stary of the wonderfui new WOMAN'S INSTITUTE of Dom.stic Arts and Sciences fmoded as the lister Institution ta the wot1ld-famous Inter- national Correspondence Schuols.wblch fot 25 vearu bave beso helpint men ta train themmelves for advancement. Courses aie olered coverine Home and Professional Dress- making, Tailoring and Mllinery-the simplest, most economical. practical and complet. lever prsented. Yeu need not leave vont home, there are no books ta boy, no one need know whatyvonare dolng; ncorda your age, sewing experience oi enviranment inatter--you can poltlvely fit yourself. wherever von live, la spare time,,Ita airna sbcd iaccrue. These books explain the faclncrdng methodi by which von can now learn Droemaldng and. Mllinery The dressmaklng course teaches von not mnerely plain sew- lng, but the whole art of fashionable dressmaking-how ta dirait and maire your own perfect-fittlng pattent, bow Ia design and plan garments of every kind-waists. dresses, sois, lingerie, sklrts, babies' and chldren's clothes; 1\u003e0w ta buy and use materlals, how ta renovate successfully and ta maire over the clothes of paît seasons. The. mllilnery course la equally complete-botb have been prepared bV experte. Ether couse will qualify you tomake asuccess in the. profesion ar ta maire *Il voar own and your childrenij clothesar hatsat ane-halfwhattbeyprevlously have coet yoii. 8.nd fer One of Tii... Books Tode flandsame illiustraîed books $have been prepared telling al about these couses. Write a postal or letter teliins us which sublect Interenas von most and we wili send you the ight bock at once WdbMAN'S INSMIUTE, lac. De.pL leD 388 Fiftb Avenue, New York The W\u003cJ8tOPflHome Teontly more a girl gains In m 1and spiri- iAat they think they willi have a better tuai growth' the more wLe realizo' st;anding socialiy, have short houra and possibilities ahead. good wages. Then ahe refera ta some Never bias there been a tinie of auch who, cheat in their examinations. She great possibilities fer women as now. says such teachera are in the wrong Opportunities are opefiling up- fpr ,wo- place-they do not understand chiidren men ta tako the place of men and wo- or *huM4,ýi , She speaks of gregt iead-, men wbo woÜi be capable of efflciency, ers, great statesmen, poets, and. authors muet bave mental poise. who had a bard tinte because they were Work âud faith la O'ne'* undertakffl~ misunderstood at school. is the onIly cambination that gives one The young woman tole th~e experi- satisfaction of conquost. encea of several children. She saye: \"I It is the spirit put i#toa girl'a work paseed through the school grounds t'le that determines its bleesig. other dnyand saw a lit tie boy about Do you go ta your work tired front seven years aid witIL Mhi book in bis late boura, of the evening before?1 Do band ail alone with a nervous laok on pou watch your houre an\u0026 compiain if bis face. 1 epoke ta i kindly about you work a minute avertime? Doeg the his book and said 'I lelieve you like te matter of dollars outweigh duty in read.' Hlis face brightened as he re- your estimation? If so you have not plied: 'I like stories, I kn'ow a-lot of oaugbt the spirit of your work. these stories but teacher doesn't knowv The womnan at the bead of any' great them.' The next day when I passed. enterprise wbleh, her individuel efforts tlhrough the lad was there waiting for bave ereated, la usually broad minded, me. Why do chljdren dislike schadl? The generous bearted, pleasant ta meet, kind sensitive child never makes headway ini hearted andi, sympathetie. Why? Because sehool; some 'teachers do not make the ber work bas cailed forth the best pow- work interesting. They do not point out ergs'within and that bas deveiaped the beauty in what they teach. They remind woman. 8h. will suifer perhaps bitter mie of macbines. Ilaving beionged ta the antagonlant but these pin-pricks nearly rank of teachers, myseif, I feel interest- aiways como.-f.om an underling Whbo is ed and wili answer thia young woinan working on? a smal alary-auid whose by quoting front a famous addresas te mind bas been centered on 4uch sma!l teachers.\" details that it ia not broad enough ta Biahop E1untington once gave an ad- grasp theapirit of te big minded wo- dresa on\u003e \"Uneonsciaus Tuit li.\" Dy iman. \"Unconsciaus Tuition,\" lie said, \"I mean Only Wamnan Saldier in the. French Arrny The French army can boasf ai the fact thaf in ifs nanka there is one wornan llghter. Madame Fatimah, the lady in question, can likewise boast that in al of-the French army she la the only woman ta bear arms. She is shown at the ight with ber husband who Is a lieutenant with the Tirouilieure Mororains (Mbrrocco Sharçshooters). They are presidrng at a distribution of rice to thec soidiers. Mme. Fatimah's husband bas been decorated twice (Miiitary Medal and Cross of Legion) for con spicious-bravery. Mme. Fatimah Lt entitied ta bear anus and she accompanied the Tirouilleurs cf ten on the battlefield. 1I bave seen big men and women suf - fer so much from, the cancenous bitings of littie minds. The very strength of a wonan's de- înand upan lber power witlîiîîdeter- mines 'liser attraction for otiser forces. Eveî\u003ey girl lias an atrîsospiiere-a cer- tain radiation 'whieh attracts, intspires, depresses, or repels. AUl growth. depénds'on tise sou ard at- inospiiere, sa do girls grow on tise fer- tility of the mind and lier environnent. One writer says thene are two kinda of people-those wbo lif t and those Who lean. Individuality is too ofjtn quencîscî by criticism by tîsose w~ho have no pur- pose in life and have time to throw' stolies.\" Riiglit principles brirîg rigit resîtîts. If a girl btiilds lier work on trttth strength wilI he given for stres.. Remnciber the unforttinate girl wlîo saî\u003cl: \"I placednyv trust in that wlsic1i4 w%ýas false, and hi-ee 1 arni.\" Amn I My Pupil's Teachen A letter caine ta nie recentlv fromn-a young woman wlîo le itereste(1 in cchil- dren. Shie sVînpathizes Nvitîs the sensi-j tiv Av ~ild atid savs lie dovs not have a1 fair- chsance in scîool. She sa vs înanv glirl s taXe up the profession of teaching, -not, because thev ivant ta inistruct the1 young, or ta improve the n2ticn's wel-4 faxe, pr because they love chjîdren, but1 because they are clever and pass their1 exaininations. Site says furthermno 1 that part of a teacher's work which sho daes when site seersnafot ta be do- ing anything at hier work at ail.\"' Schooi noom. impressions are powerfui. The possibilities of the teacher are limitîes. There is eomething very affecting ia the simple and solenîn earnestness with wlsich children look into titeir teaeher's face. Sanie one bas said te face le. the publie piavgnound of ail the fainies or imipe of passion. In this same sddrese tIhe bishopsaid: \"The human caunten- ance le the pain.ted otage and natural robing room. of the soul. There it le tîsat love pute on its celestial rosy-red; tiiere Iovely shame blusîses and mea--n shaane looks eanthly; tiiere hatred cars- tracts its wicked White; thiere jealous * picks fi-ori its own drawer its bodice of settled green\u0026 tiere anger clotiies itseîf ln black, arsd desîsair ini the grayriiess of the dead; tîsere it.pocrisy pluniers thte rest, anrd takes ail tlieir dresses by turne; eorroW ,and penitence, too, have sack cloth tsere; atIff gen lus anîd iii- spirtiicn, ir iimortal lîours, eiîcincttrrecl t here witli the urîsotiglit hal o, st~~i forth in tflicsupreiisacY of liglit.\" Cai a teacliet expeet a healtlsy seîsool atnios4licî]e if se enfers -withi a face bîneker tha t fli black-board l? I lba%-e sueii boys andi.gi1l1 dodge as if stabbeîi \\%-leuî their teaclièr lu at tIser». A teaciier lias oiily partiafliv compreiicleý! lier- power xiiîen slIe lilas left out tIiei,oi,-s c f lier owîii cotîn- tenan ýe. \\~' ina(le lier ctttiftemltice to rdIleet ',iie spirit of lier lite. HOW 1 IRED, NWY CATAIIRH TOLI Il A SIMPLE WAY Witoq Apartus Ihuior, Suves o r Ectrc Hleals Day and Nlght Tt La a new way. It is something alita. luteiy dîfrn.N toS, sprays or 'sickiy smeIliing salve; or creams. No atomizer, or any apparatus of any kind. lgNoýthing ta smoke- or inhale. No steamiigorrubing or injections. 'No eicctricity or vibra- tiror massage. No powder; no. plas- tes 1no keeping in the bouse. Ntigo thét kind at ail. Somnething new and differ. -.-nà ,.5.r- 9=====» ent, so!nething delighttul and heaithful, some- ting instantly succesaful. You do not have ta wait, and linger and psy out a lot of money. You can stop it overnight-and I wili gidytel you how-FREE. 1 amn not a docto and t La la flot a so-called doctor's pre- scription-but I arn cured and my friends are cured, and yoti can be' ctrred. Your suffering will stop at once like magie. 1 Arn Fr@-You Gin Re Frs - -aaa - - - - - My catarrit wae fiity and loathsome. It mnade me iii. I iulemy mind. It under- niined iy. health and was weakening my wiil. The- hawking, coughing, spittngrmade me obnoxious to aIl, and my foui breath and dis- gusting habits made even my Io-ed ones avoid mne secretly. My deliit in life was dulied and rny faculties impaired. 1 knew that in tinie it wouid bring me ta an untimeiy grave, because every moment af the day and night it was slowly yet surely apn n iaiy But 1 found a cure, and ian readytoiteli Vou about it FREE. Write me promptly. RISI\u003cIJST 1, CENT Send no money. Just your.,name and address on a postal card. Say: \"Dean Sam Katz: Please tell me how you cuned y aur catarrh and how I êan cure mine.\" That's aIl you need ta say. I wili underatand gnd 1 wil Write tai you with canifiete information, FREE at once. Do nof de ay. Send postal card or Write me a letter fa-day. Don't fhink ai. furningf this page until y ou have asked for this won erfui treatment t h t can do for yau what it has donc for me. SAR I KA174Roem J2869- 142 Mutuel Street Torento, On.. SACRED SECRET KILLS abhairyecovsringon wsy armec. Evé,ry thlng trled, iscudîsjg 1tieielettrir itrîdie, ouly made it vorse. Finaiiy. luy hUsbaii, a iortei British Anny officer, se-red froin a Native Hil- dn Soldier tis ciosey guarded se- cret of the AMoltammeilan Rteligions iwbich forbido rte Hinidoo womsî. uof indita te have even the alilîkst trace of Supertitlus Hair auywi.ere on the.r body. i used it gud lu a few daye nîy bair.growtbs bail su- tirrly disapprareci. To-day nlot a trace can liefound 1iwili sentifre Z. nanti SeoRend me yüur iiam andni r Mis s , Whose Soldie -a W a2 cet ,tsanp for bsndt BrveryAddress, bMrs. bands Brv S- ý1ý1drlcaHudon, Suite 914 cuted the SacrdH n l t osn ~ Btrinig. -- m..mmpeu@wu.th wZemneto Co.. Dept 65.h \u003eaaeW BE A taENTR * -derith. Sed,etc. Imr' rispeq.r.tte. Ber t'. s d i. u -yo 1-od,..t îl eNte RtLOPle. e F a nSr f imou h \u003ciCa... thlier.ai. seys e 0ils s toni le. W aSrfulInention. Slietwth full d;,ecîîî.\u0026 lmtbock \u0026\u0026Ast of VENTRILOQUISM... ail for io,.4for Si,. Write oda,. TEL. COr.,13aX 49 HURLEY VILLEO N. Va Fine Camera and eompleteoufr FREE I't for seflng 20 Large Coiored Ar ffl e t ~~\u0026 ltligluPi oFi 2B'w s Ptadai0eeets ob. tai. i0 ~t oi o n..7rturned. \u003ede ouelotdy UleS Mia. èo.. Set. 341 * CIrcu* HOW teo fnefatla Bol WMU 0 akee ne-tir, it, ou.",
         "'n Home mont hly The bichop fjather stateis that on can reconstruot lier featuree. The face that reffocte power is the only kind of beauty that is producible. When a~ love- ly seul ahines through the face it is beautiffll. .Another uifcoflscious educa- tory forc4s the voieb. The veice dis- cosetei disposition *of-,the heart. Elizabethi Fry quieted a raging maniac by the tones of lher voice. The voice in- dicates the moral coloring ,of character., Another force in the rnaking of a teacher is manners. Good manners is the finest of fine arts and can corne only from a kind, heart. Sir Phillhip Sidney was the pattern to ail England of a perfect gentleonan-he was thie hero, wlie on the field of Zutphen, pushed away the cup of cold water from bis own fevered. and parching lips, and lield it out te the dying soldier at his aide! The street car was crowded the other night wlien an old lady with hier soldier son got on. A young wornan Ïincdiately rose and offered bier seat. The old lady at first hesitated but accepted the seat with a amile when the young woman said: \"I cannut remain seated k)ffle the inother of a soldier stands.\" Thlat was good manners. That was the kind cf inanners that one does not learn from a dancing master. T'here is a differene between manners and polish. Manners act on the springs of feeling. A noble attractive everyday bearing coesi of goodness, cf -aincerity, cf rèefinernent. Children are not educated till they catch Genne Sisters Many prorinent ricli woenen in New York city wilb not Wvear jewelry, rich furs or expensive suité, i their shop- ping tours or in any place whero 'they may corne in contact with the poor girl -lest they, have'ab1andin ber temptation. There are very rich women who, ex- cept when engaged in euch social duties as take tliem arnong their own class, Wear the simplest and plainest of cloth- ing, cotten stockings, and plain, sensible slioes, witli ne jewelry and no frivolous accessories, noV because they would net enjoy wearing the clothing which their purses cculd weIl afford,0 but because in so dressing there will be ne covoetous eye travel from their elaborate apparel te a temptation which promises like luxury. These same women, toc, put the rnoney which migbt ctherwise be spent upon their own dress, into the homnes for working girls where soins xneasure cf that social life may be had for which every human being longs, and which is denied se many liôneless ycung women who Work for their living. It is a temptation'for a girl te serve wornen ne prettier or better than herself be- decked in jewels and laces and velvets and furs while she must stand and miîle and serve, (her wages but enough te buy the poorest necessities of life. 'Magistrate Henry W. 'Ierbert, a night court judge cf New York City, in.an in- terview written by Richard W. Wlinans, Rainy \u0026River, Fort Francjs District, C.N. Ry. the charm that makes a gentleman or lady. .A coarse and slovenly teacher lias ne place in the scheol rooeu. A teacher belongs te the most 'sacred profession in the world for she is en- gaged In tlie moulding impressionable minds cf boys and girls. 3Besides these channels through which the stream cf this unconscieus influence flows, there is a total impression going out from char- acter-through the entire person, which ive cannot wholly grasp in any analysis. There are teachers with a presence cf such true character that they inspire every pupil with a thirst for knowledge. In eveî-v sehlool there are duli pupils with brains that text bocks torment. The i-ital teacher can create an interest in thiese pupils that will be remarkable. There is ne grade of intellect that the teaclier with a seul cannot reacli. I knew cf a boy wvhose teachers kept him in the saine class for years. He was the dunce cf the sc'hool. Finally a teacli- er carnme who crdered bhis thurnb worn 1bculýs b rned and a new set in a hi- ber g rade à~i purcliased for bini. That.gave theboy fresh inspiration, te-day lie is a «Well edlucated man. Only a heroic tone habitually high will win character. The mensure cf real influence is the nsure of general personal substance. If 'e mean to train children cf char- acter we must have character ourselves. Like produces like. Tea(l1]ng mnust net be mechanical. 1)((- vour work deglenerate jute, routine? 1111111an service is paralyIzedý by routine. Teachiers are the, masters cf imîniiortal reairing. These thoughts taken from Bislhcp I{untington's address may be helpful te ýofl1C cf our teachers. Guide well the af- fc'lioilatc and aspiring seul cf child- liood. in ithe National Pclice Magazine, says: \"If parents would keep a closer eye on their girls and the ccmpanicns cf their girls during the danger period they wculd save many cf tluem. They should watch their girls' assêlm tes. The \u003canger doesn't lie haîf Bo nmue /itlithe beovs the girls go -witli as w th-e other girls. A good girl will net le~ a boy or man get beyond the flrst e ance, she is on lier guard, but she dn't watch the otheÇ girl se closely, tliere is I!ie langer.\"ï There is a subtle influenceocfa4àr corrp::::: on that is imore important 'bn parents realize. I remember in my own girlhood a very dangerous girl companion thiat I waxa determined te be with. To overceme this hunger for something in the girl mind the borne life must be plan.ned te satisfy these cravings for coxpanionsbip, social interceurse, and some degree cf excite- nment, adventure and thrill without any cf the dangers wiceh attend those ne- cessary emeotions outside cf horne in- fluence, and te in and keep the con- fidlence of ber girls the mother muet in- strurt thiem in those principles.cf life m-ich will arrn tbern against danger. MNrs. Lutes says: 'The girls -%bo prattle so innccently to-day, will, in a few short years, he dime w-ouen w'ho wýill be-where ?\" .Tudge Barton, cf the New York night cotirt for ýwcinn, says: \"The reason grirls find tbemselves bere i., that th)ev wvre net taught what will happeru te tbem if they take the rirst rtdown. Are you trying to make motbers -iunderstan\u003cl that ?\" be asked. turnin- to a woman ejitor. Coarse pbres _annoy women tremen- dously. Steaming the face tee often makes pores unsight]y. A little tincture of benzoin used in lukewarm water, witli which vomen bathe their faces, will tend te make the skin botli smootli and fine grained. Vegetables should be carefully cleanei and nieely washed. flu tlem in plenty of water, and drain them the moment they are done eneugli. If over-boiled. they will lose their crispness. Bad eooks somnetimues dress them with meat; which is wrong, except carrots with býoiled beef. The Weber e ER ZPiano FIIAMC\u003eStyle $\"A\" Mils lu onu f 0f ta au.l u lnathat cmn bu obtulned frm teHu of McLean. au nov Im d'rovd cauwnth\" uifr plate. Double veue.n@gd l Mahogany. Nuit iungth awingig maodesk. brepdi. Suaig \u003ed. toln ait cntiuUe bing..tbruhout. Ticord o,«u-trung scae. Maffle- t'e. atent noisulose pudal action. BOLI\u003e O MRi ES UES Write for Catalogue of nov pianos, peu and terni. Evry instrument-sold under a guaran eof alaoo. J. J. H. McLean \u0026 Co. Ltd. ,Wlimp.g'u Gretatmuniea Rouie The Homeo f theý EMntaman \u0026 Co., Pianoand theoVictrola 329 Portage Ave. Dupt. W. Winnipeg., l. Great Subseription Offer!, WESTERN HOME MONTHLY AND WEEKLY FREE PRESS AND PRAIRIE FARMER BOTH FOR ONE VEAR ALSO THE LADIES' MODEL FANCY WORK MANUAL AND 150 FAVORITE OLD TIME SONOS ALL FOR $1*2 5 THE 'LADIES' MODEL FAUCT WORK MAL This book embodies ail the lateut ideas ini needleok rcekitn and ernbr. er.It contains designs n ietin o nking eaiyfity dlfl'r zt Pit knitted laces, many charming cdrochet patterns, aise instructions for making May. .ul articles of wearingapparceand numerous articles for home decoration, among. whleh are tidies, chairscaf, doyiiespurses, table-mtshpigbags, le,%p ïh«es,,mbawlu; , Afghans, toilet sets, counterpaneR, sofa cushincarcvers, pîn-c sioniý, dii liprbabies' socks, etc., etc. Full and complets instructions .Mz~ay . oaçh dm ..gn togetewth anepaaino*h trsuehnkitn and crochetting, etc. it aig contains fult and copiteinstrucrtions inp the art of embroidery, with nurherou beasz'i*u1 designs. The whole is illustrated by 95 handsome engravings, and the wholo ubjétof! ladies' fancy work is made so clear in this book that with it *à a guide -one ma Com an ndept in the art. It is a book of 64 large double-coiumn pages neatly ,und in attractive paper covers. 150 FAVORITE OLI-IME SOUOS WIth Words and Mluslc Cesuplete This is a splendid collection of favorite oid-tirne songe and ballads. Sonos that touch the heart and recali the tenderest memnorie3, inny of them hbaving been popular favorites f or forty or fifty years and J ust as dearly ioved to-day as when they were written.. Eaeh song is puhlisbed in this book with both words and munic complets and M. question if there has ever been issued a book containing as large a collection of steiline favorites. WESTFRN ROMNfr MONTHLY, WT'\\NIPFG I - Enrio'ied find $1 2 Send me The WcMtern llo ni 'Mont hiy and Weekiy Free Pressj - r'nd rr-nirie Firm.(r for one yc'ar, the 150 Filvorite Songs aend The Ladies' Model -afncy Work Nlanual. N.UiE .................................................................... XISDRESS .................. . . . . .. . .. . . . . 1; j. » YEAT CK\"DEn t IemoNtCAN ^f bakvq moata Iequth hid suppry the, necessaa'y flourisaiment to the body. RWJusa sjmTmjuTS LW.GILLET COMPANr UMEID ED .WAY y Ighit ething abso- LYS or *siciçYo Notilin to or rubin or vira. lT; nplas. rand dîffer. ttiiui, sorne- le net have it a lot of -and I will amn net a locter's pre- friends are ýur suffering le Fros bsorne. It It under. ng my wiUl. malle me oth and dis. one aveid was dulled ew that in eygrave, n.d ni gh t iy vitality. eady te tell remptiy., DiENT name and 'Dear Sam rured yeur . Teat's rnstand gnd uformation, iend postal Don't think casked for do for you nteu Ont. AIR iii ioNlrîlad y art,,,. Every ig the, electrie ffurse. Finaily. British Amny l Native Htua. y guardeil se. xlan Religion iduoowomneî of the sU1,htst [air anywhere 1 it gndinu a wtbs hail on- To-day net a wJii send free FREE ead ne .your desttng 1. or 1i,11 kt stsinp for idress, Mes. son, Suite 9114 )IL BuIldig, k91.'e0iothoo b MAT ALWAT5 vtVIïe TEEM il yen:. voie@ la thé. 80m, de:. 001ws, ribede. De a A girls Okla U»s IL kilo bock \"Art et 260. Write \"Yi\u0026. ILLE1, Ne y@ eompletelout- Large (Jolored Mir ce 2î0 vkgL L.c",
         "The wester'n Home iwon:iiîy !T eAD doge, Ile gresat; muoiciAns, ai I.born, not made. To the Eskimo an SIndian residing ini the vast wildenneE ~tretches of the Canadian Northlanc àea dogs, are more preclaus than golè o oore treaaured then wives, more hope or thaonsno; for even though the wheE \u003cqog be lazy, or some of the rest of th ,$eambei1acking of brains, ail such handi hoewilb ovorcome when the tear itraio- -af the traces bohind a trained 4*lr1erce, tbiriking leader. ~ ould you chance to travol amang th4 imoe and Indians of the Hudson Ba: di4trict' you might purchase ordinar3 train doge for from two and' a haif t( ton dollars in trade, nof money; wbic] means so maay pounds of tobaccc flour, bacon, or perhaps rounds of arn munit ion. But to buy a leader! Thal is a task! The natives, especially th( Eskimo, may ho poor may ho oven hun. gry, but hoe will seîd4om part wifh thi member of bis team.- If hoe doos, if if only for some very precious thing of thE white man, such as a rifle--and if must be a good one. There is good roason for this.* SucI a wise animal, like the boforo mentioaed musician, besides hein g the rosuif oo careful. slection, le the productfoo mQnths, even years of painstaking train- ing, begun *hile if still moved witb infantile canine rail. If bas probahly been selected from ouf of evea a dozer litters, for of only the finest stuif are ' lead doge made. Mis is the keenesi mind; the one most susceptible ta im- pressions; the ono which learns and stores away the -vast_,ànowled\u0026e. of the lare ai tho trail. T6, hlis more powerful ai build, fa9fer of movement quieker witli deadly slashing bite than the rest of the team, erabling hiMmta, keep in subjection those whom'ho ieads. This also is an essential of successful leadership, for hie lives in harsh region; a land'of snarl and fang, where, might makes right, and only the fit survive. Thuis a. lead dog in 'the Canadian Northland is abave al fhings. most valiant; and most valued by the men dwclling therein. Thus the members of the firsf mounted police force fa Hudson Bay lcerned when they camne ta the couintry on the explora- tion ship \"Neptune,\" in the year lü0O3. The littie band of mea needed dogs; but even ordinary ones thcy had difficulty in àgetting. This latter wýas due ta the Hudcson's Bay Company's factors. For over two centuries previaus to thie eoîning of the police, the Factors of' this great fur trading organization had gov- ernedflhe land with iran hand. They wvere sole rulors, supreme, fearod'and obeycd by the Indins, dealt it h anresp'ceted by the Eskimo. The comizkg of the mouinted police was a distiurbing clernent in the trader's seheme of lifo. Aecording to thoir reasoning, the police were -nof needed, for there wvas liftte ci'ime. The H1udsan's Bay had :dways ruled wcil and wielv-there w-ns little crine; sa why shoxîld tue 1pviieebother? Then, bot\u003e they were aid fashioned in their ways of thinking, and in many ways chorished, thei»r supremacy in f bis littfle world of their own mtaig, they decided upon a campaign of discouragement. They sent word ouftfa ftho natives of the region ta seil the new-comers no doge. The word passed from Churchill ta Fuilerfon, the t wo postas where ftho police were1 locating. into hum nofta bite through that thin trace. This training is a fine art wîth the aborigines of the Hudson Bay and Labrador counfries. And Mike's was no different from thaf of any weil brought up husky. When Mike was a few weeks aid he was fitted with a miniature harness, inuch like the shouldor braces on round- s3houldored men. The end of the harness came f0 about the middle of bis back, where a single trace-the Eskimos use but one--extended from if. Thus rigged ouf, and with one end of the trace tied -ý Au Eskimo Dog Tramn atarting for a long j ourney h But the police though new ta this d particular part 01 the Norfhland, wer( ,f dofermined mon; ail of themn had Been if service in other parts of ftho wilderness, - 8 this apposition leff themn unmoved, hWithout comment, even fcignig ignor- rance af the hostility of the fur traders, jthey set grin-13rta work est ablishing e thcmsclves, and, by cajolery, bribery tand force, succeeding in procuring dog - feams, which at many a future date sput ta shame the teams of the fur mon. f 0f the two dot achmeats of the mounted fpolice-mounted in name only-thaf 1settled in the Hudson Bay di-tricfi 31903, thîe haif dozen in of the Fart 1Churchiil one were mesf fortunate in 1having as a starter a lead dog namcd Mlike. Miko was a Labrador husky, sfrong of f rame, fierce of ap)pearance. Yet though ail the t)hybÏeal characteristies cï wolr,-h itneestors showed in his makze.up, Mike u'as strangely ditTorent. from the usual suispiciotis, snapl)ing train dog. Some- w-hero perhaps far back, yet mnaking itself feit tiiough many ages of bis family tree, a strain of finer blood had been infusod by sanie \"outsidc\" dog fron linder land. It showcd in.Mike in bis liking for human 'companionship; in bis permitting himsclf ta be approached and petted b y he mon of the Post-ail such actions bing diametric:dty apposed ta truc husky nature. In spite of al those thinps, Miko was stili a husky whcn ainong his kind. He oufouglit and brougi into subjoction fh si.- other dogs of the train which the police had succeedoîl in gathering. And M.%ikçe as,a lbon idor, phsically and nxonatty. Froiiii ti:ii lav in arly ~uppylhood when lus kiooxvncr ad placed a minim:itlire hiariîuss îipon hini and tied oa n (ifml uie single trace Io a firmly driven stakv, Ïil bai beon in- 4sinct in Mike ta serve. lau, liko iiif we'll trained sleigh dogsu, /bu Lii it driled1 a ta a tightiy driven peg, Mike was lef t eta bis own dovices. With short legs i supparting a shambling body, faf and furry, the pup's ambition ta see the world toak farm in the bcginning of a jaurney ta ho sadty eut short whea hoe reachedc fho end of bis tether. When the sht4rp jerk of the trace broughf him up short, rinstinct bade him pull. Pudgy legs dug in, every nerve'aad sinew of roty-poly body leaped ta ftho fray. Wif h al bis mighf ho strove. A long time the cont est wcnt on. From every an-le did he pull, but ta no avail. But I%,ik-e was of I ho Lwolf dog breod; in bis sf iii youag brain ;there sf ii lurked some of the age aid Lwisdom of the wild. Streagth cxhausfcd, 1cunning came ta his aid. A stii, smal voice within whispcrcd anarchist coun-;el: \"Why, you littie fool, what are you straining sa bard for? That whicb holds you is strang only wben you pull againrýt it. W-here are your sharp littie teeth?\" Sa cunning spoke. Mike sat hack. Ouf of bis funny lttle oves ho uvoo the thong appraisingly. Thon bis mouùthi opened; the baby fangs closed upon flic trace. But what was this? W'ith a yelp the puppy lot go, for dosconding upon him was a xrai by maxn with kecningi whip-lash that sang ani bit intobis furry hi\u003clo. The wvise Eskimo tramner bafilheen watching. As long as tlie ~ppconfinoul1 itself ta tuggîng, hoe inade noa incvv; but1 with that first ît tempi ta sever the trace,1 ho was iipon bis canine I)IIpit, moting1 out harsliost, punishnivnt. In the ulaNs and weeks fhat followe\u003cl whboa like «spent hoxirs pegged(-oiî ipont the Aret îe t tndra,nany tinigs xware iinpîing!eîl uion lus slowI-y (lo\u003c)n)fl mentalit.v. lie caine ta knoxx Ibat it1 w'a 'good ta tug upon the tr1 uii at toast ini:d bt iblrouglit no paini of\" wvbipl.LA'u: 'diiir, awa'witb h li i ing1 af bis traicane a boat ing. So 1h\u003cwl bût rriaîxdit his inind f' 1iaî $5 Thie Phonfograph of rdsPckt$ 0,Wef, i eerud have belleved I. ~doe4sor. XWi htmce pisys the, snteeit worth 5.0but if ou don't think it j, worth tiewa o s o t EWL REFUND 'fOUR MÔEY ITHOUT ARGUMENT, and psy filcags The idcal birthdaygf t for youna ôr cold.ý Pin a 35.00 bill to this advertisement to-day and you wi]I fifld a iLeltejoyent for te ong wnter eveni ngu. Etra records 20c each. 100 diffrent selectiona ln estock. Mail orddrs a speity. THE CANADIAN DISTRIBUTING. CO. 125 Pkciie Avenue, Winnipeg Ph~one: la. 8782 Aget. and derier, the bout monev m-Ir yet. Every purch\u0026se la not only satlsD.ed but heips you aMIL another. Write immedistely for Particuleru. VouCÇan Buy:Th You Can Seil: trnhos , Ltd uyorgrau. nsand. whotber buyi llin g Th ou REGINASAS\u003c ala.receivo Quality, Proniptnesu VIflfhIXYlYkuLuU abd Servke.npe -M niob pain with the latter action, t111 ho nno «longer attexnpted it, and althr0ghthe years to corne that meffn0ry remained. By the time he had grown'old enough to be harnessed to a real sled, the training of puppyhood caused hlm iÏtinctively, ~to s!irainat tbe\u003e. Ughtening trace, thus makinig for an eternal bending of bis strength to the inw of the trace. But onae thing that Mike - oui of a suporior wisdom - did learn was to tbro'w bimsolf out of bis harness. Using one trace oh each dog, t he Eskimo fastens the other end to a nain toggle on the sleigh. Froin this the team when in motion spread out fan-wise, each one exerting his strength individus lly. upon bis own trace. 0f these, tFe leader's is, of course, the longest, allowing him to run ahead. This systein is opposed to that in- use in the Mackenzie Rliver and other sub-Arctic districts of Nortbern Canada, where the double trace systenm is in vogue, the dogs moving in single file. Both ways have their recominenda- fions , but ini the single trnce systein of the Eskimo there is less snarling of harness when the dogs get to fighting among themselves or wif h other teams, and the unsnarling afterwards is coin- paratively easy. Mike learned to get out of bis harness i a peculiar way. Running at full speed, hoe *ould suddenly diverge to one siee, turaing blimseif clear around as hie did so. The resf of the team, sweeping an, naturally carried the end of bis trace forward. When if tightened, the whole harness was carried over bis back and ail the pressure of the onmovinig team eiterted to draw it forward against the collar, which enabled Mike, by sorre peculiar twist of bis neck, ail bis ou n to slip free. He bad learned this trick long beforo hoe came. ta Fort Churchill tci serve fe mnounted police, and thougli the moen tightened Lis collar almost to choking, Mike always managed to accomplish hià freedom whnhle so desired. He did if only on rare occasions when seized by some strangely corne whim, and not off on enough to count 'aglainsf bis value as a leader. So the men came fo ailow him these littie spacos of freé.- dom, for though bis pulling value was for the time being lost, he still kept ahea4 of the téam, turning fa right. or leff at the driver's commiand, thus successfully performing Fis duties as a leader. Inspector llodney, oficer commanding Fort Churchill mounted police post, sat in bis office loohing ouf over the frqzen expanse of desolation thaf stretchee-' away froin the shore of the Bay to the tree lino beyond. If was a fair day and win0less, and the Inspector, nofing thîs, (lecided on a couple of days' hunting. Foilowing the thouý:ht, ho arase, went in search of Doctor Mortimer, the police surgeon. In an hour the sled was loaded. As the Doctor and the Inspector wcre about f0 depart, Sergeant Nîclin, tCe recond in. command, accompanied Ly the rcst of the nmen, came in w-ith the second dog tcam drawing a load of wood. Seeing the party about ta depart, Nichlin came forward inquiringly. A short firre previaus hoe had gone hunting with the doctor as comnpanion, on whieh occasicn Fe had perceived that the doctor w-as are of thoso unforfunate persans utterly lackmng in the sense of arientaticn. Rodney, hoe knew, was aiso lacking in this respect. With this in mnd, Nicklin,. rnuch experienced in woadcraft and travelling in Aretie landîs, vcutured: \"Botter take a nativewù,-h you, ' 1nowinr that with an Eskimo along temo td no chance of getting lost. There wcre half a dozea EsLimos wor]:ing at the post, any of whom wcre available, but Rodncy, inexpericnced though hc was to wildcrness ways, was ani egotistical autocrat, oçwing bis position ta political preference rather than ability. C'onsiclcring the Scrgeant's advice in the icght of 1)resumption, coming as if did froi an inferior officer, -lie dfl not deign o innwo; nteadt called \"ducet sizz\" to thie (ogs-the EsFuma word of com- ir.nd-and startcd off* If, was the intention 6Pthe kuntcrs fo n\u003eake camp w-bore the cairibou were -)nlt 1\u003c\u003eo [a piflt sonie twenty miles fi-on f bu Post. '11e going beihg hcavy, hol h inen trax'elled aihead of the dogs9, f':kn rail w ith i heir snowshocs. ib» inïning in front, theox covcred some n il\u003e 1 efoi-e, lhappe)nin'g to look back, 11ieý n' c-l that their lentýmdpTrovisiofls, uIt fiiinl\u003cpiiflnce(l doctor, Mik: An u.mlyet Huukyulom By Francis J. Dickie",
         "tii! he no through the y remained. loId enough the trainiig rnstmnctively, trace, thus ling of his oui of a Lrn was to mness. tdog, the to a nrain us the teani t fan-wise, Lndividually, these, tEe st, allowing 1 is oppoSed ,nzie River )f Northern ace systeni 9 ini single comnienda- system of inarling of to fighting hem teams, Is is cor\"- his hamnes full speed, one side, he did s0. ýepîng on, his trace the whole back and igteam gainst the % b sorre ring hefore serve tfe the men choking, mplish h%~ ions when ne, whim, At against men camne ýs of free- iralue was .ept aheauj or left at iccessfully ider. nmandin g Post, sat he frqzen stretchee-' 9ay to the .day and ýtmg thîs, hunting. )se, went Lhe police tded. As bor wcre klin, tFe uiicd Ly wvith the of wood. b, Nicklin iort tut-e with t he occasicil was ore utterly entaticn. Lcking in ,Nicklin,. aft and 7cntured: L-nowirg icn stood om were ýerienced. ays, was Sposition ri ability. ,e in the is it did tot deign ýt sjzzz \" of com- hi:ntcrs \u003eou were uty miles g heavy, he dogs, owshoes. 7ed some ok, hack, ovisioflS, 1 (loctor, J The Western Home M ont hiy bad .lipped off. It was already two in and vehicie were swailowed Up in that the afternoon ini a region where darknew opaque, whirling gloom. feUl at four. Not knowing how far back 'In tha4 moment the dogs knew they the lest artiles miglit be, they decided were frW. With the realization there e t nloadWhatthfej had. This done, the sprang sinulaneousy in the irain of O live the doctor, turningrthe dogs, started 'on They knew how close 'it was, for the the back trail to recover the outfit. doctor had corne within a scant two miles Presently the darkness began to fall before finding the dunnage. Knowledge with an carliness unusual even at this of the Fort's nearness o'vercame the-firt Northerly point. Now -and then, as desire to lie down here in the forest. - they ran, the doge whined apprehensively, Swayed by the homing instinct, Mike knowing wit,h the strange prescience of turned about, headed' for the Fort, wilderness t hings of the coming storm. nin rapidly even under the storm. Thinkine they were homeward bound, AMile the team ran. Mike, wise old leader that hie was, quick- Deep within him stirred ancient strain ened bis lope to a galop, and the seven of foreign blood. In hie brain celle does« settled down to the rhytbinically lurked memories, traditions, instincts of ewmgung, mile devouýing stride of the civilized forebearer utterly at variance runming wolf pack. with every impulse of husky nature. Quickly for the team's pace was fast, Now, froni away down the corridors the loat dunnage came into vicw along 'of the past, from time infinitely remote the trail. As the sleigh rcached it, the they callcd to this running dog, demanded doctor called: \"A-aaaa,\" and obedicnt allegiance to that man back ini the snow, to 'command the team halted. Swinging standing symbol of a race whom'that the load aboard, the man started to ancestor and ail hie kind had served turn the tcam. As he did so a faint littie., unswcrvingly since the dawn of time. E i -wind came jsighing tbrough the trees, Desire to return, to stand by the meanH REi stirring thepnow and setting into motion being, tbrilled Mike, Labrador husky, T gang wIiic the sulent 'pines. Hearing it, and with creature of enari and fang. Yet he rer'lwmae the fear of the blizzard in bis heart on; for bis was still the brain and the pO ae Mike balked, wbining nervously an\u003cà sinew, the ways and thë thoughts of*the bottoms, no ny kept on iu the direction of home. But Wolf. Still this strange thing kept calling smnall sections.' Mortimer swung the lash, and the seven within. Above the roar of the Arctie n iootr ] doge cringed under its biting sting. cataclysm, despite the sting of ndsi-bttm Always had they bent to the will of man flakes turned by ýçLe wind to leaden up any size of pli to the tune of this snapping scourge that pellets, came this eall of an aCe old duty. and this flexiblE sent burning pains even through their If rciterated and repeated; towering ganf plow, of any Mike, an arýomaly of huskeydom thick bides. So now,~ reluctantly, they turned away from the haven of the Post; with dragging stepe began back tracking into the teeth of the coming storm. Again the advance guard of the blizzard came snooping down the aisle of dying day, a long moaning note that 'hurled ittie flurries of snow from Ôverbumdcned branches and set the stunted pine to whispering. The sky bowl crept close to earth, seeming almaost to hug the sway- ing tops of, the evergrcens creaking warningly in agitated air, as yet but a breeze. Then the mother of ail winds nurtured and strong froni the frozen desolation that lie forever about the apex of the pole, sent forth her battalion on battalion of icy blasts. Sweeping for endless miles acrose the frozen tundra the windleapt upon the tree lime and the moving man and dogs. The snow, a moment ago serenely stili, became ail in an instant a flying chaotic mass. With startling suddenness the wind increased frorn a ten-mile breeze to a twenty - mile blow, then thirtv, then forty and faster and faster tili it drove along f ull a mile a minute gale. Under the pressure of the wind, the snow leapt from bank and bush and barren stretoli. An ever thickening mass, rotating and resistless it moved on, obliterating all the worl. The doge cowered, would have lain down and curled up in the snow till the storni had spent if self, but wNith curse and lash Mortimer drove them on. ,Then the wind ceased bloving againet th\"un. It began coming from every direction. Wind met wind and shrieked and roared and threw the snow now i the man's face, now in bis back. With the wind no longer eoming frorn ane direction, which had assured bum of the correctness of his movement the' doctor became bewildered. Tiding ci, lhe sleigh quiclvslowed bis hlood circulation, cooling his body. Now the inten'se cold numbed him. He stepped off to wal-. UAinir% econd tue dogs above the impulse of primitive brute it struggled for mastery. The distance to the Post was but a matter of a hundmed yards, when suddenly Mike faltered in bis step. The dog run- ning behind was upon him. With a snarl it brushed by. As it went, Mike leaped to one side, about faccd as he had donc so many tumes in the past and, in another moment, free of collar, wvae bounding back in the direction from whence he had come. Meanwhile, after stumbling a few hundred yards, the doctor, blinded by the pitiless beat of the snow, had dropped to bis knecs. A long tme he remained thus, whilc the cold crept up and up in hie veins through which the blood pulsed ever sloweru from suspcnded action. A listlessnes crept over the man; hie every limb and muscle secmed oppresed with a vast heavinees. A duli lnguor followed. Hie whole being cried to rest. H1e slipped forward, cuddling down amîd the drifting snow. Then suddenly -out of the mist closing around bum leaped a furry body. Run- ning with head low, hcld close to the giound, which bis nose told hum had been a trail s0 shortly beforc, Mike came full upon the fallen man. He thrust a cold nose inquiringly into the buman face turned haîf toward hini. Mortimner stirred fecbly. Te movement incitcd Mike to fresh e-1,de7avor. W'ith rough tongue he licked the immobile features. Like a drowsy chld annoved by a ligbting fly, the doctor raised one band fo beat off this dimly realized tornrent that strove to bring ,him out of such ethereal dreams. Mike drew away The man 's hand dropped limply. bac k. Again and again did the dog repeat the action, whil-each time the human band rose and fell. But gradually this action of the man t arted to moving a littie hie sluggish blood. Presently Mortimer sat up, in bis eyes the ight of retuirning reuaon. Qnlly U ulinutçe it ý5kQwed; lie, CRBSCENT CREAMERY BRAI Ship to an Company, Limited ' Winnipeg BUTTER MAKINO PLANTS AT MDON CARMAN, YORKTON- iy poinit you wish and get Money Order by return mal",
         "The Western Home Monthl'y,* RESTOREYQUR '-HAIR ~TO-YOUTHFUL COLOR Lai Mo SeulTe. My Free Preot Tht Grey flar On' se Rütred t. Maturai Golor uni Bucty No Dyu or Other Hormful Mothods. Roeults ln Four Days At 27 1 wam prmaturely grey-aad a failure because 1- lookedeOld. T oday et 35 1 have no trace of grey hair and I look younger than 1 did eight years ago. I resto rniy own grey hair te, its matural color and beauty of t yoUth-and arn a living example that grey hairs n.d no longer exist. No dangerolus dyes, SI stains or ote forrns cf hair paint are acces- ci sMa to keep your hair young.w i c OUd and Greyj ai 07 Founaand Hapm jai S5 Lt me ,iend yo frne fùl Information that will enahie ),on to resttre yor omil leUr fe yoîthtuI \u003color no Otha;yoit iîwtd never livite lir aiin, no lmter whit yuttr se ter Unie caume o i yîîllgriem,, or liow long voit have h.ieîsfriey or huw rnamîy tllnge have ihlen. I. ir iceoffer lmoî.ýn t11,11 and woioenalike for a fîwdi s 1îî-. Send noinooney. Juittwrite ie to-daygh-u îrm c ansd addreua plaiffly. stating mwhùthcýýr \u003e. lIi r. or Mdis8) aiti enclose two cenat8titînp forreuo1îîoa m ,111 Bl sod \u003eîu fufl particollari thtlt wilI emmîthle you t' re4tore tho illtural coorfyontitbto yottiir, nkingltitf , naturni and easIy mnagedWlIte to-daty. Addnimse trs. Mary X. \u003c.llpman. suite 384. ianigan B14., Providenuce. K. CURLY HAIR 4\"WAVCURL\" lmparts Beautiful FER- MJINflTý CURLS. Ono pîicket sufficient, hoiv- everitlemayourhair. Ono testimommi a aya: 1%l hair soonhorainea musas of waVy etfl\u0026\" Reauit certain... Price 2/9. Special redu ion for few weelkn. Senti 1/6 only for largo si 2/9 p:icket. The New WavcaiJCo., 67 Croîîuirll Houmme. Fulwead Place, HoIbot, London WC.,England g~J7- and léirAIRGU vent to4le down ap aa~ h dog leaped forward. \u003e.#he reýSatg Wolf jar ecl4ed* upon one cloth protected wriet. But these long fangs, terrible for their crupbing, tearing force, did not sink in, onl ~ok tight hold and tugged and tugged\\ ith legs vide, apart, braced and tese, Mike pulled, and unçier the force of hie attempts could flot prevent hie teeth from now sinking ni a ittle. The muan cried faintly, a querulous protegt,'causing the dog to desist. Again, however, Mike took ho1I, this time sinking his teeth into the g e of the man's koolltang. With teeth tightly clenched upon the tough caribou skin, the dog dragged the body inch by inch through the snow. The coat, pulled as it waa with the grain of the hair with the snow, formed a rude natural runner, and the dog began to. move faster. But it was an awkward losd, and Milce, though he had drawn hie six hundred pounde of load many timee, found tis present weight an entirely different a~nd very tiring procecding. Presently hef stopped, wearied by the strain. _ý Then, onc 1e again, the man moved. The rough motion over uneven ground had started his blood pulsing faster. In hlm 111e fought for rehabilitation. With an' effort 'he raised himacif upon ail fours. He would - have hslted. here; but Mlike, gladdened b y the mQvement, caught once more at t he loose7folde o the coat and pulled. Slowly one of the dotor's hands moved forward, then the other. In unleon one knee swung into tis primai gait. The other followed in turn. Presently the man's crawl became too fast for the dog,4 EBÈ ' ne 'À iupon thé inspector snuggly enseonced behind a snow covered windbreak. Often in théeinonthe that followed the doctor catight glixapses cf Mike lying ful qtretched and still before the Post, hie gréat head tu raed out to sea. Theré motio4les hé remained for long hours ata tine, eyes staring away out over' idreary waete of toseing, lonély sea. And sometimes, comning upon him unawares, thé doctor thought he saw réflected in the béast's brown eyes a strangé iight, an alien sométhing, weary of thé stérn harshaess of the frigid Arctic shore, a longing look for other dimly compre- hendéd things of kinder lande. 6\"Homnes Healthlul and Beautlluil Thé above is tnie sugg(,esitiie title of a -beautifully il\u003custrated bok n laterior deccration, just issued by the Alabastine Co., Limited, Paris, Ontario. It is ose cf théexnost ambitious anid artistic pieces of coler printing that lias comé to Our notice for \u0026ome time. The ahove roomsin colors, have been dle- s-igned by élever artiste, and these are illustrated to show the various coier schiemes worked out la perfect taste. The outeitand.ing feature of these rooms is tiheir quiet simpiicity. They form ai- together a liberal education in the artis- tic coxabination of colora, and thé pleas- ing group of furniture. À copy of this bô0ok bas been supplied to alimoet every de. 'dr who will ho glad to let custoxuers look through it for suggestions in the decorating of their1 hoimes; or it cas, be had of thé Tpubiish-e ers for the nominal sum of fifteen cents.i McKenzie Lock (Fort Francis, Ont.), C.N. Ry. tuggiag and moving backward at the same tin?é as hé was. Letting go, Mike turned, teck new hold, and swung into stride along sidé thé man. So théy moved on; thé man by blind instinct froré rvived wri1l to live; thé dog, son cf a hundred generations cf wolvée,' swayed by that one jot cf finér blood, which, throbbing hrough brain celle la an all-conquering food had béaten dowa thé strain cf al thosé wildérnéss years. At thé cnd of pérbape two hundred yards thé man halted. The dog let go, stoed staring inqi:iringly. A little 'hakily Mortimer reached out a hand, restéd it upon a fnrry back. Thus aided hé- got sglowly te hie feet. Once more la standing position hé took a stép ahead. Mike trotted a coupfle of etepe forward, stopped, stcod waiting for hie human i1 confrère to catch up. Running and stopping thé dog led thé way with unerrimg instinct teward thé door of thé Post. Whcn it was a hundred féet atway, Mike, uaabld te eonaia himsecf any longer, diashed forward barkiag loudly, bringing te thé door thé anxicus eyed members of thé détachmént, already ahtrmed by t hé returnéd dcg team, but helplese t-e renier aid till thée term sbould ahate, which time, for Mertimér's sake, %vould bavé beea toc late. A minuté more and tht' doctor caime stumbliag in, fel l it o ' ln ims t at carried hini within the I-eti' And Mike, becanîse hé toc belongt-tIo c tiviîizîd things, followed, to cuti up ini a turnier fartlicstfroni thé stove ani f:tll :isli'cp. 11e slept for a long time, 1111rtuisctl b- men, going to the rescue ti i' 1 1w 'l or. Once more in bornesbu iv e is ic : over heavv snowed trail tu :îîlîq citîîe Physical Culture ln Middle Llfe fly Elizabeth Sloan Chesser, M.B. 1 Physical culture enthusiasts have said 1that life wouid be heaithier, happier, and lonîger if wé but exercised judiciously thé varions muscles of the body. This is especîally true of middle-nged people wiso, having givea up thée manifold sport ilîterests of their youth, are incliiîed to allow tlieir muscles te enter thé ranks of thé unemploycd. They have net tinte for physical culture; they have net thé energy ior the désire te play gaines. Thé average middle-agéd man's mus- cular exercise consiste in an oceasitînal gaine of goiJf; thé average weman lias ne physical exercise at ail apart frôm tlhe neag-re amount of walking slIe gets tlîrough ia thé tweîît -four hîours. Wliat is thé resîîît? Letlîatrgv, al)atliý-, and graduaI lose of energy; tléie -in ail- mneînts cf mîiddle life-gout, rbeuînatisin. and digestive disordérs; aIl tîjesé are directly or indirectly causcd by insuffi- ient exercise. ind, as hcvalth cf bodlv and peace cf mind are associated inevit- ably together, nioet people'voit]lI find tîjat regulated phvsical exercise in ntiddIle life wemîld ceontribute enorrnously te tIhei jey of living..1 M'lyvare senany middîe-agcd peoplei frequentlv depressed in spirits for no a ppar-elii îusc ? Simnpiy iter4micu'froin lack cf iel-coise, poisoins are a llowcii to aceînjmLa t e iin the blood to a ITeet foîriie 'Worie fttlv rain and nervoîls s y - encm genill I. iBti s re la r'_, lv (le t o1 iitsuflieieint e\\ecise comin el witii irrors iin it. If i- a had tIiili.-foi -,in'-v man to cat iliait-t- tii\u003efie tniI~ icr caiting i, ýt ijmtre fruitfui , îuiîî*ce ef iii- hieaitlt l inoîM-110 lo eoiniit ailothere GrandPriasPaamm-Pacifie Expeiionl, San Franp -~ciçco,.1915 Grand Prizs, Panama-Cai- -' mna Eipoation, Sant DRINK BAKEISc COCQA Fmr its Delicoua lvoil\u0026 Excellent Quaity and ItolHih Food Velu%..- M lofoMr products sold in Canada are made i Waller Baker \u0026 CoLlmlted MONTEAMCANADA DORCHETER. MASS t-. us il j, 26 physiiologleal sin in neg!eoting to exer- cise sufficiently, every day, ail the year round. After fort eare of aîe the tendency Ws to exerose less and the resulting \"weakness\" or décline ini muscular forceý is laid to thé charge of middle age, whcni in reality men, and women tob, should bie at theï, best, physically and, men- tally, in middle life. Apart fromn setting aside a definite part of each day for physical culture, it is most important, also, -to avoid the~ defects, the bad habits, the muscular sins that middlé-aged people habitually commit. The man who stands badly as a regular thing, the woman who sits in a defective attitude whea sewing or reading, wili. not correct the evils of such habits by any physical culture in the form of exercises. ]3efore decidiag upon phiysical culture at ail, the importance of correcting bad habits already formed mnust bie realized. Criticize severely how you stand, hov vou. sit, and how you walk along the street. Ask someone to point out aIl your defects of position aad action, or at least as many of tbem as you can receive with polite equanimity. Not one person in a hundred stands straighit, or knows how to sit in a chair, so as to get aIl thé support and the rest that it is possible to obtain. With regard to cor- rect versus incorrect walking, we have only tf observe the passing throng to realize) te inlierent lack of grace in our felloUcreatures. The dash and energy of youth cover a multitude of sins, but ia middle life muscular defecte are sadly apparept if one cares to look for them. Too m4ny men are -the victims of an un- becoming adiposity in mniddle life; top many- matrons degenerate ixito the floppiness, the dowdiaess characteristic of the aftermath of youth. 'ihere is somethinig inexplicably satig- factory about a middle-aged mnan or woman who bas the energy, the physical alertness of youth combined with thé ,poise and dfignity of maturity. Thé habituai physical attitude indicates very strongly the mental ouitlook, the châracter of the person. And the con- verse is als981-triie. If tve take the trouble to acqui're physical well-being, to cultivate our muscular system as we should, it will reaet upon our mental power, our character. Try the effect of a few weeks' re-Ular physical culture' if proof of the assertion is desired. Practise tlie art of correct standing, with' the shoulders braced, yet so thiat the Uine of the body is so straiglit that thiere is no bulgiag forwards below the waist. Stand ini profile before a mirror so that you can observe anv defeet of position, and watch carefully and con- L!nuously until the habit *of correct, easy, graceful standing is acqil;red. Mdany people appear old before théir ime, simply because they allow the hack to droop, and a round back has a peciîliarly arueinoe effect. Correct stand- ng- has an enormous influence upon bealth and good spirits. Anvone who habitually stoops Js not allowingy sui- cient room. for the lungs and ieart to act casily, the circulation is consequently inpeded, and thé vitali.ty of the éntire sYstem is affected for the worse. Correct stati4ingr in the ereet position, on the other hand, increases the capacity of the chlest, and thée pace available for lie abdomninal organs, the liver, stomach, and intestines. HabituaI stooping, a defective position in standing or walking, ricaîs that uiitiatur-al pressure is exertcd n aIl the organs, causîng tlîem to ««sag\" nd to drop forwarils perhiaps an inch or two belowv the normal. The resulting ss of toné makes thé varjous organs able to disease. Whlat exereises are likeolv to influence orrect standing i n midldle lf? Breatliing exercises are perhps the iost iînportaîît of ail. P'ractîse deep )rathîîîgu for five minutes nigbt anid orhî,try to bhreatfîe deeplv as yoit a 11k alî,înghetitI P alft take a fv h rvatits jl lVa:, ou sit at and vonî areetaisîn a habit cxriigthe lui ',,s ani the chest iis-1t w idiHo orni of so-callod ëffîaI altilre tain boa t. The proper a-te ])\"PathIl' i;te-standI straight and -ili ile armi-ýt tftile side. W'ith illoiffi h cht, tak-e a deep breat\u003e, i- ior telleen~ and thea slowly Y11-11.1 c",
         "Her Unouaventlona Bufflow 1..ý'By -Edith G. ]3ayne ~,~\\ICIALAMBRT ws th eldst Girls, girls, stop quarrellingt Herc's of four daugliters. The Lamberts Pstie,\" interjected Mlrs. Larnbert. \"Go Alived in a.large town-q-ne of thosê to theý door, Pat.\" towns that aspire to be d city' and canoaiapers-and ohic letter,\" sang ,out quite make it--and, as ie usually thaeccase Pat, returning. in towns of that kind ,ail the rno de- \"Who's the-letter for-me?\" înquired Oirabla young men had either gone /West Felicia. or be p re e pt d ( at i n o«iy) b N o , M iss S ra rty . T h e le tter is fo r g-Sm eo3 la Alicia, and it srnells (sniffing the missive) \u003e Alii a o approaching ber twentym- -smells like spring violets. Who's your piith mila-poot, with the speed levers perfumed friand, Allie?\" pressad and the clutch thrown wide open; therefore, it was deemed advisabla by Alicia took the letter rather languidly. ler widowad mother and three sisters \"Blest if I know!\" she ejaculated-,I that thare should be sornething doing. then froîvning a bit over the superscription It .was high time she was settled and out she finally gave a gasp of astonishinent. âf' the way, for were there flot Patricia, «\"Wh1'*\u0026it's from Elaine Grayson, I Felicia and Justicia to be brought for- do) beleM\" e .1 ward ini their respective turns? Besides, \"What!\" çhorussed lier hearers. Mrs. a gipsy fortune-telaer had once told the Lambert addmng. \"The Graysons, of giris that Alicia would be the flrst ta Hamilton? Thosa nice people you met marry-this being a fairly safe prognoati- at Burlington Beach two yeaxs ago?\" cation on a *ips's or anybody else's part, because Alicia was the best-looking Alicia nodded and, inserting a grape- of the lot. While flot aetually beautiful, frit kmife under the flap of the envelope, phe bad \"lier points,\" tha- chief of whieh drew out the enclosure. After one hasty wara two dimples, a most engaging smile, perusal of the few limes sha pursed up ber gud hair of a pretty, red-gold shade. 2.Jfuil red lips and gave vent to a ragular Yu ought to land something this «o-oihle itr miorning, as tbey sat over a ralàlate nabrah breakfast, \"and I think you might hurry Alicia tossed the sheet of heavy cream up, too. None of the rest of us have a notepaper across to Patricia, who snatched look-in whila you're on the stage.\" iteagerly and read ' éoud: ing to exer- ail the year ;ho tendency ite resulting iscular forceý le age, wh n tob, sheuld r and mfen- a definite 1 culture, it avoid the emuscular habitually as a regular a defective ng. will. not dits by any )f exercises. 1culture at *ecting bad be realized. stand, bnv along thre int out al action, or s you can r. Not one rtraight, or ;o as to get that it is ard to cor- ,we have throng to race ini our ind energy 4f sins, but 9' are sadly :for them. is of an un- e life; top ilto the aracteristie !ably satio- d man or he physical with the [ty. The indicaies d the con- take the ll-being, to Pm as we îur mental le affect of culture'if cd. Sstanding, et so that aight that below the a a Ifirror defect of and con- ifcorrect, acqtl;red. fore their ýv tihe hack ck has a cet stand- ,nce upon ivone Who. ving, suffi- 1heart to rsequently the entira ,se. L position, e capacity iable for stomach, ooping, a r walking, is exertcd i to \"'sag\" in inch or resulting us organs influence 'haps the 'tise deep ight apd y as yon ke a u ou1 sit at a haUit he echest so-called ie proper light and e. W ith ) breath, mn slowly \"dtYep,\" agrecd Justicia, who was adicted taslang. \"Pat's said\"it! Betty Norris was just spieling something yester- day along the samne limes. She said it was funny nobody had failen for your crowning glory. Ahl the men rave over that goldenish-chestnut shade.\" \"Yes, but you forget there are no men -here,\" sighed Felicia. \"'Oh, I mean men at large, you know.\" '\u003cWell, the city is full of men at lir\u0026e,\" isuc.gested Pat. \"That is, sorne of tWm are at large and the rest are rnarried.\" \"Pat!\" chided Mrs. La\u003eribert, with a. glance of mild disapproval. \"Don't est on solernn subjects. Marriage is a holy estate entered ito-\"y \"Don't preach, mother darling! 0f course we really are serious deep down you know. But as 1 was saying-\" \"Oh, what's the use,\" Felict eut in, \"without rnoney, what caa we do? We couldn't go mear the cty \" \"If Alicia could--or would-marry mnoncy,\" sigheïd Justicia, who alas hawl an eye to the main chance. Alieia, who had flot yet spoken, now sett dlown her coffee cul), pushed hark her vlhair a bit, and faced the last speaker. mYurercenary iittle Nwretch!\" she Sal I. Whvrnst I contract a rnioneye(l ail iae r',\u003e Ain I1flot free w'hite arnd Pls\"began Pat, rnaliciously. \"The Elms, Hamilton, May 29th. Dearest Aicia:- I arn giving a week-end bouse party for soine cousins of ours who are gong abroad and I wish you would jomn us. Let me know ify ou can corne on i riday afternoon next, dear, and the car will ba sent ta meet yau at the depot at whatever hour you shall nai. Lovingly, Elaine.\" \"Gee! Wish it was me!\" criad Justicia. \" Just our luck! \" groaned Pat. \"Here's your chance at last Allie,\" 'observed Felicia, with emvy in Ler eyes. 'Oh--shail I go?\" murrnured the lucky sister a trifle wistfully. 'Whly not?\" dernanded Mrs. Lamnbert. \"Go? 0f course you'll go! W'hy, wbat are you thinking of, child, to refuàe?\" \"Clothes, for one thimg,\" returned Alicia, ruefully. 1Ili ban you rny peach-colored char- meuse,\" offere1 Patricia with sistçrly generosity. \"Don't worry about frocks. Your white crepe de chine stîll looks nice, and ''11 meet ail sorts of lovely peol,\" Felicia put in, \"ail the swagger set and -perhaps 'the man'!\" A tout ensemble of sighs fromnthe un- invited sisters. \"I hope he's blond, ' cried Patricia, who wvas brunette. \"I adore fair-haired men with blue evca!\"' 1-.,eneral Gourard assumes oid command with empty siceve General Gourard is probably one of the most popular mnen in the French army to-day. He is the idol of the men of is command, having made a record on the field for bravery. Ii an action in the Champagne district Sept. 25th, hie led his men toward the Gerinan trenches and fell wouinded. He was carried off the field and hiad one of his arms anspttated. Great was the ioy of his soldiers wbien recenti hie took up his old coniinand withi an mt~ sleeve. The photograph shows GeneraIlGotrard tapping a captain on the shoulderena ter having decorated him for bravery i",
         "Store Your At Fairweather's Protoot them- agaînet fire, math and burglary. And et only a nominal cot: Before placing in storage for the sBumr, we thoroughly clean ail fizz, thu. greatly adding to their euture life. W. pay efpress on furs sent in for Fil Out This Coupin And let us tell yau how littie it out@ you to have this. absolute protection for your furs. Fireather \u0026 Co. Limited »7-MW Portage Aveu, Winnipeg Duar Sir:-1 * I am considering stor- mg onwhieh 1 place a total vautionof 8$......... =idl advise me rgrigthe cot fstormng fame, ...................... AD................... Fairweather \u0026 Co. \"1-2» Portage Aveu, Winm*peg Tonoto WINNIPEG Montreai Postage 15 onuta extra Switches Hair Goods Ladie, end un your combings. We methmup into switchez at 50c Pe\u0026 Ounce. We wil a4d new hair -as desired to \u0026:mens tfom82.0uward. Elite Hairdressing Parlors MOI Enderlon uiding. WInnipeî Catalogue Notice ,Send 10o in silver or stamps, for our up-to-date 1916 Large Spring \u0026 Summer Cata - logue, containing over 400 designs of Ladies', Misses' anid Children's Patterns, as well as the Iatest embroidery designs, also a concise and compre- hensive article on dress- .maiggiviÙg valuable hints- to the home dressmaker. Western Homne Monthl Winnlpc When wrfting advertisers please mention The western Home monthly. \"Noneenýeel\" nifled Jueticia. \"They are too, insipid for anything-.eort of *milk-and;wateriah. Me for. the dark and romantic-looking cnes.\"I \"Wel-he'il only be brother-in-Iaw to you anyway,\" observed Pat, \"so don't get excited. -ItIs .AIie'e. funea.\" \"Yoù girls talk as -if it wer a sure enougb tblng. Suppoe-le. \"Wèl-suppoee what?\" \"Suppose, after ail, there is no man.\" \"Horroasi Don't entertain the idea for, a mute. Tbere's gat ta be a man!\" Pat leaned farward and' pretendcd to faint, then rcvived slowly. \"Alle gives me a weak turn. Hanest ta, goodness, if it wcrc I-I'd-well I'd sec that there was \u0026 man. And wLat's more, I'd fetch hlm home bere after the party and introduce hlm ail around, with a fliorish:'Mothcr, dear, and sisters three allow- me ta introduce-' Oh, no, rd have ta present you cach in turn. Oh, 1 can fairly see the expressian-w on your faces! Envr, struggling wth dehight, and so on.' \"Remember what 1 have always said\" began Alicia, a little primly. \"I havc't cbanged my sentiments in regard ta-\"l \"Oh, she's going ta rake up ail that!\" moaned Felicia. if\"In regard ta, the manner of meeting If ever do meet a man I could marry, ï wouldn't want it ta be in the common- place, conventiona2l way-in a drawing- rom, for instance.\" \"Oh we've heard ail that befare,\" Patricia retorted. \"But my dear yau'il juat simply have ta takze iim as he 'cames, anid be thankful for bim.\" The Falla (Fai \"It muet bea vcry unusual sart ai meeting, \" Wnt on Alicia, dreamily, ber grey. eyes fixed on the lim oftulipt borderrng thepathway outsideteFrynch window. \"We must came together as though by Fate s own hand, and see and recognize eacb other in a soul-fiasb, as it werc. Our life-lines bitherto runnn far apart and seemingly unrelatcd, must of a sudden converge and fuse-\"; \"How do you mean-unusual meet- iilg?\" interruRted the prctical Justicia. \"You mean yo-'d 1ie hm ta rescue you ia distress or sometbing like that? If you were drow-ning, for instance?\" \"Well-er--yes,\" asscnted ber sister. \"But not drowning exactly. I'd look a. friglit wet al aven. Besides-\"l \"How about fine? Couldn't you man- age ta drap a lighted match somewbere near some gasoline?\" a\"Or get lost in the woods, \" suggcsted Pt. \"Anything-anything! Be a sport!\" \" Or you could choose the occasion- tbe psycbological moment you know- and faint away like an early Victonian heroine. Men like that kind of ivomnan\" Fdlicia nodded with an owl-like ex- pression oI wisdom on ber a irntd, but sligby freckled face, as sbe spoke. And you may bave my satin elippers, q3d dean, \" suggested Justicia irrelevantly. ''\"But dan't dance the soles off.\" \"Thanks, love. You are ail dear and kind. I just hate ta go and leave you A bebind, btit-d--uty must be dame 1 suppose. \" \"Good! She's beginning t.o look at it, in a sensible ligbt, \" said Patricia, witb aSigb of satisfaction. \"And remember, Allie,\" subjoincd Felicia, «'if ail else fails, this le Leap Ycar y'ou know! AIl things arc fair in love' nd war. \"1 «Let's fil aur. coffee cups again nd drink ta the health af-a-ur uinknown brotber-in-law, \" cried the youngest sister. Mrs. Lambert srniled indulgently as the cupýe dinked tagether. \"Here' haping!\" murmured Justicia. \"That b as .odles pf it,\" ftished Felicia. '-, UG Like Miss -Matty in, \"Çrnfrd,\" Alicia neyer went ta bcd (in a strange bcd) without feeling somcwbat nervous about what might be la hiding under the bed. Miss Matty, you 'ivil recoilect just cauldn't bear ta stoop down ana1 perundcrneath, sa she used ta rail a bail under. If the bail came out at the other side--wel nd good. But if not- she had ber hand rcady ta the beil-rope ta summon aid.' . But nowadays of course, beil-ropes werc out of datcLand it was not always possible ta travel about with a bail. Sa Alicia had bit upon a rather novel seheme. For twa nigbts now at \"The Elms\" she bad moumted a chair and dived into bed from it, snapping off the light after- ward from the switch above ber bead. This proceeding, whilc covardly, bad at least the menýt of ariginality and tbough she spent the first five minutes or so i listcning with straining ears for an y sounds which might'corne rom beneatb her, she soon dozed off and al ber fears were forgatten in sweet dreamrless -lumber. It was Sunday nigbt. The day bad been a, quiet anc as compared with the twa preccdinig 'G and the guests bad retired rather Alicia and ber hostesse-and severalyof the other girls Drt Francia, Ont.). ,fhfad cbatted themselves isleepy in Elaine's rdressing room and separated sbortly after seleven for their respective nests. Alicia 1 occupindi Elaine's own bedroom, the slatter sharing ber mother's bed. 1 \"'Nighit, dear, sweet dreains,\" said Elnaine, kissing Alicia, at the door of her- bedroom. t \"G ood-nigt,\" and Alicia yawned lux- uriously, \"same ta you.\" Alone, Alicia stood for a moment, gazing up at a framed photo wbich hung b esid e Elaine's dressing-table. It was 1tbe pictune of a yaoung mail. She could not bave stated in bold words just wbat there was about the young man that arrcsted ber attention every time she happened ta glance up at bimn. He was not bandsomne. Yet there was a rugged sort of cbarrn about bim she could not define. He bad whimsical eyes and a pleasant looking, though large, mouth, and broad shoulders., His taste in cravate' seemed rather extraordinary. But after ahl that was a minor dlefeet and easily cured. The ane be was weanin-g in the picture was a large-pattcrned affair. Sbe boped the colors wcrc quiet, for the stnipes certainly werc not. Tbey fairly shouted at the passerby. \"Looks like as if it lhad been'cut from the side of a zebra,' reflected Alicia,i \"but, ob-hasnt lie got the loveliesti eyes? lIl ask Flaine who be is first1 tbing to-morrow.\" i And with this dctcrmination in ber1 mind, Alicia Nvawned agaiin and, stcppingv out of ber blue,-ilk mules, began ta drawe a chair over to the bedside.t \"l'Il sav iny prayersin bcd to-nîglit,\" Y sbe thouglithif giiiltily ' \"and I suppose V'Il bave to put in a word about comfort C for detir old inother and the girls, for it ccrtaili- in to bc a huge disaippoint- Ji ment for them- when I go ho'Ze TueBday, without any-prospe.je She 'sighed and began to slip off hier isilk dresslng-gown. To think that ifter ail there was ta be no brother-in-law for Patricia, Felicia and Justicia! -The Men of the house party we~qie 6f caurse-that is, the most af-ýthem. There was a grumpy oltl bolanel and a poker-playing 'member of parliament., ghe didn't care for either of themn. Of the younger men, ail seemed ta have already given their hearts into the keer:lng of some fair damesel. The testy colonel had escorted hier ta the theatre the flrst evenlg and sat beside bier ahnust tangue- tied \"in the party box. At the picnie the following day the M.P., who m-îs addicted ta poker, sat beside ber in the car, and afterward stuck ta her dloser than a brother or a burr, but ail his conversation was of kings and aces, and \"full bouses,\" and \"flushes.\" Cn the Saturday night at the bail Alicia had had many partners and a falrly good tmbut somehow, when it came te fancye any one of that çuta-way- coated assemblage -sitting opposite ta ber at the breakfast table each morning, for the rest of bier natural life-well, Fer rather vivid imagination just couldn't picture such a scene. Sigblng again, from the very deptbs of ber beart, Alicia mounted the littie gilt-and-satin chair and, placing her bands togetber in the attitude of bigh-clivers, counted one-two- thrce-go!-and Ieaped into the bed., Crash! For one brief startled second Alieia tbougbt that an eartbquake bad oceW~red for the sback had been sQ very sudden. Then, Iaughing sbakily she tried ta regain lier feet. It was tÈen that another sound broke the stlness. Common sezise told Alitia that the bedsprings bad flallen, but-gracious heavenf! bad ber. èars deceived bier or did she bèar-a m.ah's voice? Gasping faintly, she managed to si up and clutcb at the bed-rail. Horrox-s! Something was moving underneath the rnattress, samething huge and squirmy! A man? Nonsense! It was a dog probably, but then a dog would bave elped. What an earth was it? Alicia's eart paunded. Somre live thing assured- Iy was pinned beneath the debris. \"Help! help!\" she called, weakly. And then came the sound once more- a cross between a groan and a laugh. Words followed. \"I say, would you mind-er---just getting up you know, sa that I can-e- oh, tbank you so, much!\"l 'The lest five words were'uttered in a aone of obviaus and immense relief. Oct up? Oh, ycs, Alicia would get up, it vas no vcry great pleasure ta sit there holding down a man. deHelp, belp!\" she quavered again, as bhe made haste ta get ta the door, but ier voice seemed only a wbisper. Her limbs trembled under bier. She was afraid to look back. She snatched up ber (lressing-gowil and donned it bastily. PIïèii the manl spoke again, in a hall whisper. 1I say, migbt I beg of you flot ta cail or ring, or anytbing, until I explain?\" Alicia turned about. One of ber bands was upon the knob of the doar. The ther was at ber cheek baif covering onc Eye. He had spaken politely. That Tas perhaps what made bier pause. But 'en Raffles was polite, tao. She sent tburried glance in the direction of tbe )ed---or wbat had recently been a bed. A mail-a man in very truth - was ust emerging fram beneath tbe mattress! le was breatbing what sounded like malediction on bedsprings in, general. \"Don't alarm the bouse, please,\"Ilbe uffed, as hie stood up and brusbed the lst from bis clothes. \"'I can explain .llv.,,l lie spoke in a low, but confident toile. \",Explain?\", Alicia's tone was icy, but still she Lused. Then, as bier eye took in ber nwclcome visitor, from bead ta foot, e could not forbear a fleeting smile. 1w-as toa ridiculous. Before ber stood Raffles il tweeds, a rumpled-haired, rofotindly apologetie Raffles. His face as red (thougb wbctber from bis late çriions or bonest shame, she could not ý1), and hie was tall and quite yaung- ,t more than thirty, certainly. \" Sa good of vou tao wait,\"Ilbe murmured. You ,ee, it was tbis way- Il\" Hie glýeced up and vitupht ber eye, and id the grace ta redden again. 4 -* xl;'",
         "-Il know this ie awful,\" he began again. 941 know yeou won' t ever forgive me. But if you'Ill nly believe mei---\" Alicia turned the deer-knob. idWait, wait! Please listen. 1 promise dû my honor not to corne a step dloser. you see I was just trying te play a trick ôn Bubs. I-arpived unxpectedly-\"l \"IBubs?\" t\"Er-Elaine, I méan. Used to cal her-Bubs yeu know.' It's a pet nani-\" \"But-\" \"She'iý my siter.\"' Alicia'made as if to open the door. III don'beieve yeu. It'e a pretty tgllstory. In the first place yeu don't âgembleEMaine in the sligbtest, and in oe second place she only bas one brother e1d he's a respectable man-a profcssor qf science at Yale. Hie hasn't beenxbome fbr years. \" \"Oh yes-bad cess to him. Tbat's was home this room bere was Bubs' doom-and that one adjoining was ~r dressing-room. She must have cbanged things round seme.\" 1\"CHow-how long have you been- ài here? \" \" lNot more than ten minutes, on my hon or!» * 'If what Yeu bave been telling me je realy tre-\" Il \"As gospel,\" vowed Raffles, bis -band on is beart, while bis eyes appraised Alicia wtÊh undisguised admiration. ten minutes ago, and crawled under tbý* gum-foozled-er--I beg your pardon. 1 lways did hate those brass beds.\" \"Does-do you tbink anyone knowsLer suspects that yeu are bere?\" .\"In your sleeping apartment? Goed bavens! I hope-nfot. Hlodge (the 1\u0026ar- 'adener, yeu know) knows 1 amn in the house but beyond the fact tbat 1 was going to sprmng a surprise on tbe folks, he knows notbing. I lcft my suit-case witb bim, 'and now I tbink ll go and claim it and -er--come li, in the conventional manner.\" Alicia laughed eoftly. \"This is certainly a meet unconvention- al-\" she was beginxaing and tben stepped. Her face grew bot. The mem- ory of the last time see ad used tbe phrase recjlrred te ber. Raffles, bewever, did. net appear te notice ber confusion. \"Wben.I slip eut,\" be said, \"yeu can ring fer one ef tbe servante te cerne Up and fix tbe wreck ever there. Or, tay, shail I try-\" \"Ne, ne! Go, please.\" \"Very well. Tbank yeu se mucb forî understanding. Se many girls wouLI bave takzen hysterics. I'm ever se mucb ebliged. We'll aÇree te Bay nethingc whatever about tbie, shlill W% \" Decidedly. \"1 Rie searcbed for and feund bis eoft bat under tbe bed, and tben gently lifting tbe windew leading ente the balcony, disappea.red. rhe Tuesday, \"lip Off her .k that after er-in-Jaw for LI ;y wqç. nice, st --of-,tb'm. )lenel and a parliament., f tbem. Of ed te bave the keepixag ýesty colonel ,tre the first neat tongue- the picnîc Wbo M-i:s Sber in the \u003eber closer but ail bis, and aces, ishes.\"\u003e Cn 1 Alicia bad fairly good it came to b çutaway- Epposite to ,h morning, --well, Fer et couldn't iing again, ieart, Alicia ,satin chair Lher in tbe e-d one-two- be bed., ,ond Alicia ad oceW~red ýry sudden. B tried te bat anotber ~nmon sense bad fallen, ber-. èars r-g m.ab's tged to .sit .Horrors! rneatb the 1I squirmy! It was '.a would bave t? Alicia'e ng assured- bris. weakly. ace more- 1i a laugh. I--er-just can-er- 'tered in a elief. Get get up, it D sit tbere 1 again , as door, but sper. Her She ,was atcbed Up it bastily. in a hall flot te call cplain? \" ber bands beor. The vering one ,ly. That Luse. But She sent [on of the en a bed. itb - was rnattress! tided like i, general. ease, \" he uisbed the n explain lent tone. stili she \u0026 in ber te foot, ng emile. ber stood 'd-baired, is face bis late ,ould net Young- uirmured. eye, and \"But-but why in the werld did yeu choose this peculiar method of- \" Ah, ye-t be sure. It is borrid for you, Mut then bew could I knew of your existence? Ï tbougbt te give Bubs the surprise ef ber life. She is àlways bonsting about her fearlessness you know. Says nothing can take a fizz eut of ber, from highwaymen te higli stakes on a losing herse. Se I bet ber!\" \"Bet? De yau bet?\" Alicia rernembered the betting M.P. and sbuddered. \"Neyer,\" returned Raffles. ''I'rn a rntin of haif-decent tastes and principles, thotagh now is net the moment te bonst of them. I arn keenly aware. But 1 dc:irly love a jeke and 1 bet Bubs I'd scare ber eut of a year's growth the very Text time I came home. So-\"y \"Oh, I'in beginning ta believç you. Itlaought \"'[biat 1 was a burglar? Naturally, Yota would.\"l Raiffles looked penitent indeed. Alicia's engaging srnile and twe dimples carne inte H ow did yeu get in without anyene's knlle-,Idge?\" ('imbed the veranda rail and came iite the balcony band-ever-band. T11liu when the coast-rneaning the La;i-was clear, I dasbed in berc, about Alicia stoed for a long moment wrapt in theught. Mien she clooed bier eyes. Finally she held eut one plump açm and pincbed the flesb until it was blue wben bier fingers left it. \"It hurts all right--se I suppose I arn net drcaming,\" Flie said hall aloud. 1 'And then, there is that bed ever there for actual proof. By the way, were- wbere bave 1 seen bis face?\" That picture! Alicia flew over te the photo of the yeung man with the triped tie. ,\"dIt is bie! \"And tc-night he waz wearing a most awful looking yellow-and-black (lot ted one. I suppose professors are proverbially careless ef artistic effects. Professer! Who could ever imagine be was one? Whcn Elaine talked ef ber prefessorial brother in the States, 1 always pictured a bearded old bighbF!row with fusty-dun-ty manners and a mnulehd voice, and spectacles and a cane.\" She pendered a marnent or two longer, looking stedfastly at the young rnan with the nice eves. iiHe's a perfect dear,\" she said, and thea turned te the mrrer and looke 1 berseif ever critically. \"Well-I didn't look an absolute fright at any rate,\" Nvas ber final verdlict. (Cent inued ou page 33) Do You Know About the Advant- agles. of InternaiBathing? The Dangers of Auto-Intoxication Explained In these days of super-activity in business and social life, when we al-men and women - -are burning tîp our vitality and nervous force in the endeavor to keep up with the taxing pace, it is a welconae sigai that men aind women are entering i on an cra of common sense in the care an d preservatian of their physicai selves. 1Les ad les do the giest mass cf intelli. geiit people place dependence on nostrums and drugs. On every hand, often in aur own intimate circles, we wîtness cenvincing demnon- stratiena of the uselessness of hoping for real relief from such harmfully stimulating, un- natilrai aneans of comhating the hundred and one ailments 50 comman. Yeur physician will tell yeu, in case you have net yet reaiized it yourseif, that prab- ably fuliy 90 per cent of the ilii and diseases fron which we sufer are due to the clogging of the system by waste and peisanous matter that shouid rightiy be eliminated immediately if we would remain in health and escape even more iasting cvis. fly the way in which we live Our lives, the demanda of unnatur-al convention, the forcing cf aur bodies ta try te adjus't their activities and functions te the oeil cf personai cenve- nience-the forming of unhygienic habit. in short-is yeariy exacting a terrible toli in suffering. If jeOu are run down, tired eut, lacling energy and vim; if your nerves are \"ail gone\"; if yau are biliaus and headachy; if everything is a Lurdcn and an effort; if your phyaical condition tells you ail tee plainly that you are even mare seriously affected, you may be quite sure that you are paying tbe penalty, eili er-directly or indirectly, of a systena tbat las been mismanagad. You are ne longer pay- ngyrself dividends in heaith- you have ne sngur i n vtaity-yau are exAauting your And aIl these thinga because you, like nearly everyene else in a similar plight, bave paid the lcast attention te' the part of yaur body tl.t needs it most, for, as Professotr Metchni. kof the world-eminent scientist, states, it àa the insidious heaith-destroying, disease-breed- ing germa generated in the lower intestines that gre the chief cauue cf our premature old age, aixi of course are rcsponsilie for the tmany badily disorders that cause it, by reasen of the paisons that cause themn to deteriorate. Your own physician, when he cornes te yen in illness, first makes sure te thoroughlyý purge you'r systeni of the accu'nulated waste-he- knows he cannot help you until hielbas done so, just as bie-knows that if you had kept your in- testines hygienically clean there would have' becs a» need for his services. And that is why the Internai bath Iu the! naturai, the logicai, the ideal way to eliminate, this waste matter, and by eliminating it re-., niove the source of most cf our juls. It doe3 flot drug your syatem, it is 'net- a violent.) system-racking thing, but a pleasurable, scien4 tific, efficient adaptation of a curative method thae is as cid as civilization itself. It correcte thé very conditions that give the blced a chance te absorb these poisons. It keeps yo y clean inside by removing waste matter, pr.- venta the blcod from having a chance-to carry, them te the organs and tissues of the body. infecting themt and tarting that lowering of bodily efficiency and vigor whicb makes us miserable and unhappy even if it docs flot pave the way for more sericus ills and diseasea that endanger if e itacif. This lmproved syatem cof InteraI Bathing ia naturally a ratiier difficuit subject ta cover in detaii in the public- press, but there lsaa physicien who bas made this hia iife's atudy and work who has written an lintereatlaag bock on the subject cailed \",The What, the Why, the Way of Internai flathing.\" This ho wifl seed on request te iiyone addreaalng Chartes JIU Tyrrell, M.D., Room 251, 257 College otreetj Toroaito, and mentioning that they hav.e a thia an The Western Horne Monthly. Like ail really warth-while thingu, the ia. ter nul bath is as simple as nature'earcêsmet aiwaya are. You wil find in its use a neW freedomtfrom the %-ffects of drugs that at beat can but temporarily, and then oaly-jartly, Mid nature in freing the system of ta waste. l la above aIl else thorough and ratioas ani right5 and in accord with the lawa of bealth. And it ia something beyond even thia. -It la the meana cf keepisig ycur body at p when you are not sufferlng 'fromtaDy Par- ticular organic disease. It enablea your sys- temt te do ita work fully and freely undhr -aIl conditions. It lsa wonderful'tcnc- tonte that braces withotît artificial stimnulation, or any harmful results. It keeps yeu free fromn the riak of disease that Sets Ita tart f rom accumulated waste; and by keepinu the intestinal tract alwnyahygien ica ly cdean pro. vente the blood f rom absorini polsdns that otherwlse reachi every organ -of the bod'y through the circulation. It an neyer become a habit, aomething one can et saï for drugs. What the internai bath ha@ dons for a., rnman)r thousaA~ds of grateful men and womcn it ran d for you. We hclieve you will bc intereatui in reading a mnre tlîoro,gh diqctsion aof the subject thon is possible or advisahi hore. rl.ý 1=,pn IIn AN'T-BA A,\u003cl GA 4 AL 3U t - MI.lL li tu==iUUWJ as.30 Dava' Fiee Tfai -5 Vear quarate Wsglv.Oda tial idasigiod Iyawgusantn.Bond foi ouistro u ît C e pacia ords, mt t.eGÂ T~ILU\u003chcb cad!uÏeti.gbttbbadu.iis0 VI \"Bnd fer PARE Omo cGalbes TedagW PuW ow wgîte ln 30 thiutu.anisd m . ue lliey have thesane Jul i uiKtexture and fit ae the be. lime, colla. and wo' 9wilt or crack '*Challenge*' CA6 ca b, cleaned with a rub frou iwct cloh. s lwayu unart. alwaYsabmY If )-udeaer doeuot meliiC \" , 0 'aaa New Style Bock Sent Pree on Requeat The Ariington Ca. of Canada, Ltd. 54-6 Fraser Avenue, TORONTO, Can. W%ýhen wrîtiriîj advertsers picase rmecntion tie westerii home NMofthly. A- .5-,., A Prend Daddy The ahove greup shows Corporal Cathcart of the Dauphin Detachmcnt of the 226t01flatta. lion, and Mrs. Cathcart with tlîeir eight boys, tlhe eldest of îvhom is a hugler in his fatheri regiment. This good Canadian family goes twe better than Sergt. Aldridge cf the Wcst Kent Regiment, photo of whose six splendid beys appeared in a recent issue of the Winnipeg Free Press. Truly the Canadian West is playing its part in the prescîit struggie and in Empire Building.",
         "TRie TOMmmandaxMe sPr*blem By J. L. Gordon UZIMAL VOlIES W. are living ini aspiituel universe. We arm sur- rouuid4 bY invisible intelligenêes. As the célored folie uad to * ing: \"There are Angées Hovering IÈOwid\" Thmr are SPiritual forces surroundlng us. To b. k tUIae with the infinite and in touch with the invis\"ibel both 8siptural and scientiflo. After you CbaVedone your best thinking out a difficuit problem, IM On the forcs which are invisible, and Iisten for' iii. v\"of \u003c d. Dr. Minet J. Savage once aaid:- \"I baè a fieid, Mrs. Maary A. Livermore, famous fm er erdevoted services durmgte a, n oeo tii. tratest woman speakers that the world has ever hoà.Shtold meliowhler life-was saved during beï trAvels mn the West on -a certain occasion by hier hagMmd. instantlyoehg a voice. She did flot -know whee itcame fombut she leaped, as the voice ordeedheto from one- aide of a car to th ther, à\" d istantly l~e aide where she had been si;tt4g wus oeuidki an md utterly demolished.\" - \u003c1EURMu ERm The moral character of a community depends on the. vitahity of, iti 'churcliçs. Every normal« citizen ahould ho idefitified With a churcli. If lie cannot, wth apr'm conscience, ji a church, hie eau nt hs rent a pew\"' or a pare of one. But *voy broed midd mmd sirmn m- mWinl aeek te Mek.dooIn ie beut ieiiewhich are on- tbtsmd IntlichurdL And lie wiil aise do weil to become a mmbeo fte church if his life is ail that It Ouýhto be.,'By*the way, tlat is abig if.\" An Enghali divine says:- \"I recail a etory heard ro- UtYof meeéoüveted bythegFaeeof God aiter a wil life. Ther urged hlm to loin the churcli and tek. tth. Loda Supper. 'No, neyer,' hoe said; 'at aIuM Y . Y He left bis home, and souglit througli the. u1uà Of three great cities for the girl once pure AW, swiet, and undeffled, upon whomi lie had laid_ 9 etinigtGuth,ý and wlio lad drifted to the furthest hugts-Re found lier in a top attic, burning with a oonmptvelever, on a straw pallet, witli no one but tiw O fa ~ the bouse to iook in on lier now Sud agait and moisten lier lips. He hastened away édprbotè. Wlit was necessary for lier wants. Thon, as a pure brother to, a pure ister, lie nursed lier for \u003e~ tbree weeloe until alie died. But in that tinie lie liad .on-liet back to Christ,, and she blessed and forgave hira wjtj ler dig breatli. Then lie called and took gImod'sgipý.j n DE TY' AJMLI In(delity, byyhicli we mean tlie apirit whicli on- throne athelismi, the lieart of aan-infidelity lia failed. Failed to provide a master motive for the seul. Failed to satiafy the aspirations of ,the heart. Failed to create an atmospliere of hope. A great American preaclier says:- \"«After Trom Paine's 'Age of Reason' was publislied and widely read, there was a marked inclvease of soif-slaugliter. A man. i London heard Mr. Owen deliver bis infidel lecture on socialismn, and went liome, sat down and wrote these words: 'Jesus Christ la one of the weakest char- actera iný history, and the Bible la the groatest possible déeption,' and then shot hiniseif. David Hume wrote tlieae words: 'It would ho no crime for me to divert tlie Nile or' the Danube froan its natural bed. Wliere, then, can ho the crime i my diverting a few drops cf blood froni thoir ordinarycliannol?' And, having written the essay lie loanodit to a friend; the friend read it, wrote a letter of thanks and admira- tion, and aliot huiseif.\" IlD TOUR PARTNER Find your partner. You cannot achieve the great- est auccesa alone. Evory man in the world needs a supplement and a cempanion. Androw Carnegie created and was assisted by thirty splendid partners. Fraternity organization, co-operation-tliese are the worda cf tle hour. Find your man, youir companion, your partner. \"Two by two\" is the Divine plIan. In June 1870, an international convention of thie Young Mensa Christian Association âssembled at Indian- apolis, Indiana, Dwiglit L. Moody of Chicago, and Ira D. Sankey cf Newcastle, Pennsylvania, were members 'of tlbe convention. The twe men were strangers to oaci other. At one of the mornin services the singing lacked the spirit cf true-hieare praise, and some one acquaited witli Mr. Sankoy inv te hi te take charge cf the music. Hie went forward, andamong the hymna lie gave out was Tliore is a Fountain Filled witli Blood. Tlie seul- feeling witli which lie sang tliat particular hyran made a wonderful imiresion upon the audience, and especiaily upon Mr. Y.od He liad discovered bis man. The evangelist and the singer wero introduced, tliey formed an alliance- and only four yoars after- wardB, tlie nighty revival spirit that swept ever Great Britain, wlien millions cf hearte and tongues were moved as they liad net been moved for many years, was the work cf the gospel message proclaimed in sermon and song by Moody and Sankey. CHEIK HM tPI Is there anybody in your neigliborhood wlio is trying te do anythixtg for God or man--cheor li up! Yo need not approve of çvFery method, or accept, every notion, or bind yourgelf te follew eveýy sugges-. tien, but keep yourself in'a mood cf encouragement., Spoak a word cf cheer. Don't knock. Don't deal eut cheap criticism. Don't prophesy final failure. Don't hispe1'\"rank!\"ý-\"fanatic !\"-' entliusiast!\" lu anew boolc 'we find this patlietic sentence, written by FultÔn at the close of his life: \"1hn ail my long struggle te work eut the principles of the steam engine I received innumerable jeers, opposing arguments, prophecies cf failure.. but nover once an encouraging word.\" BARS, BARS, BARS This is a vocal wrorld we are living in. Tliere are voices everywhere, and for every voice there ia an eiar. Wals liave cars! There are ears ýehind every door, acreen, curtain, mirror, picture, and sliadow. You cati ho 'heard when you whisper heard when you sele, heard when you look, amd heard when you think. Ears, cars, cars everywhere. Some in- visible reporter is making record of ail yeu think, say and do. Bishop Latimer, whend examined before Bottier, at first answered without mucli thouglit, but,1 hearing the noise cf a pen behind the curtain, lie concluded that bis words were being taken down, and became more cautieus. The recording angel takes down net our words only, but aIse our deeds and our thouglits. 1 t Workwe QUdoncpTYssINsaWcranrpoutv Work we.iladoe pasesses a cerstansreproduct of quistr itacodvertiers sel.Itand as a s or c itoreecord. athingteaasa beatf ul momctr. It becsomes hitcfo h in h evbriccfeotechactier. Itf, oething or whkici o ovte rhaeute aphopze pi ofverlvour Aorkhea ooterestdlamthop bpie cef il£hi At te mtepetedsumomend bad piecentcf wo lanpt ntentcornesehe urfacemd marn prisentsur o es mmd Intenions. ikye aad peyi la ure, te r %*up. Igtoh f a wbearys- ýrairabidge uownder ih weili f a heyps- sngaje tah etwasmhndmmbuiies ereo et magrotenewsmebWlienh b .aiding cnracte e coiveedhe nesfeimeberighl osieadnged tre, eey a df evovermteali strctiangte brt ige, li lcda eovrtebshadadb eut bis brais. \"U1T SIIOULD BE UN YOURHUANDS RUGUIT NOW\" WINGOLD'I IPIIO à 8U3fl(EEATALOG ham just bemu. malled and Ir your 04W liés not reachod you-taUunu, and wo'U monçi you anothor by roturn masil. \"MU-avip O MghGra e M rcha disl O I nov cataloff vél ou th. LOWEST WHOLSAaLz TO CONSUMER PEICES on KES ABUESE HARDWAREIn R, SEWING MAOC\u003cES and PECING. Don't buy any ttes i losuna Foe 7u got your WINGOL» CATALOG. Il laros aul risk out of buying sud a6.olutlY guaratoos satisact~aion or rofund of purchaso money and treight charges. Good Harnoss Choap 'Saskala$ 9 THE MAJESTIC i. qualfty la the very eta95ny ihm grdworksmanship and materWaluaed in theWngl heassurance tliat it will give satisfac- teoryevce in every way; and if flot found satis- r a £actery, it wiJl bc your privilege to ship it baec\u003e té us wbeÈ we will refund the full purchase e a io pres ad aIl freight paid. Particularly WeilS pa at r \u0026pà ogeneral farni work. Mail your orde- kdOe4i. box loop, square blinds, round, wlnker-biaces, fancy fronts, short flat cheeks. Lins-l'La. X 20 ft. buckles, billets and snaps. Pade-2y3 in. double and stitclîed, swell feU lined, IY3 i. billets, folded bellybands. Hfamee-apanned steel belt. Trc ply double stitclicd, with 5-link liecd cha na. Breait Straps-1 'A in. witlî snap and slides. Martingales-îy, in. $9 Price, without colinrs ............. $99 Ngo. 3401-Iakalta Te Mam Hel g oi with collra ............. $34(.75 Th.IghBlandlix E n gin es heaI It mnakea ne diflerence, cheap A ~ pries or se called high qual- 1.4 50 ity. There i3 noengine which Ni cmii stand up againat the 5~ Blaindix for atrength, dur-. Tihe owiiers of Blandlix* En- gines know No Trouble! Their only carist to keep flie* Blandix rngine Supplieil with oil andigs~îe This big 21/4 Ii.p Cflnine pIIlls a blî- '..er load ilani \u003e4 enZife lQMiias 2Ik 1.1). It 1 bpiît fori'vduiring Ccoflomiual service. (idr fiim tlîis adl. or send for, fil par-ticulars. THE WINGOLD CO. Ltde, Market St. E. Winnipeg 1 'v - CGuaranteed ta outlast-te out-sii, id be made of better material and easier ta turn and easier to wash than any separator made. Add to tlitis ny, other conditions you can tllinl, of, tlivn cider a Majestic Winigold Cream Se1,ala totittîijke the TEST IN' VOUR OWN HMEI FO\u003eR 60 D.YS and if you are flot collvtttteiI t!s all and more thian s c aim re- t tint it ;ind lý, ick otir imoncy, togethier w îth fritnît ciages yu paid. Our Spring Ca;! t yoii ail about it, it's superior to l tiiur Look at these prices for a RFA 1 111\u003c H OUALITY CREAM SEPAR- ATO' i t k for catalog. 50 0........................$3975 6;0 î~ ,~. ...... 45.00 ....................................................................... 47.50 t -- Y' K îý- ý 1 I\u0026Argjre",
         "Ref Unconventionai Burgiar (Continued from page 31) -hood who la cheer him Up! od, or accept evef y sugges- icouragement., Don't deal final failure. atliusiast!\", la ;ence, writtea 1 ail My long t steam engine g arguments, i encouraging i. There are tere la an ýehlnd every and shadow. heard whea heard wlien -e. Some in- ou thik, say nined before ici thouglit, ie curtain, lie m down, and angel takes .eeds aad our reproductive as a sort of ful memory. tir character. te apologize. ilt la the op- id moment a surface and Like a bad es were bast Datractor me- ad neglected tructing the Ad and blcw AId itor te be D turn made. u can Cream OWN e flot lm re- getl er Spring perior for a ýPAR- $39.75 45.00 47.50 The. invitation - r~ ,rn Mrs. Lambert and her three youngest D.y Uha daughters sat over a late breakfast agi4in. E H LB0HM aoigt ir [t was a perfect June rnorning, with fe slwithee s OOHM,can toir dew sparkling\u0026 on the roses and the E emfwstf he Star,\". tesed al~ bimxrming-birds darting inanad ou.t amng endency to be more than just cheeful. the-moriuig-glories by-the sideidPOrcli. To say that she was on the verge of \"Here's Postie,\"l observed 'Felicia, emotional riot would have shown a wiser eatcbing sight of the dispenser of His delineation of lier feelings. She had just Majesty's mail, coming around the read that invitations were out for a corner. They were breakfasting on the great Patriotic dance to be held the side veranda. Postie waved a letter following Thursday night-and she had at the littie group. flot received one. \"lThis thie one you've been looking for?\"' Nothing, perhaps, te get wildly excited lie inquired srnilingly. about, but be it said in palliation of the Justicia pQuflCed on the missive. youthful desites of Ethel that she was 'i should say so,\" she cried. \"About just learning to dance and, posaessed al time, too.\" the rapture of a devoted pupil. \"Fromi Allie?\" demanded lier sisters But she was flot socially prominent together. in Pearville, having gained a reputation \"From the wanderer at last. It'. for aloofness while in higli school, which addressed to mother. Here, mumisY, formed a highly-tempered shield to bar rustie your specks.\"1 lier entry. into the various- social sets, Mrs. Lambert was prodi o*usly slow one of which at least had the biggest list in adjustng lier glasses ad nopemng of \"those present\"' at thWo conmpicuous the envelope. dances. The committee of that set \"Juat fancy-three whole weeks and were the chosen ones to organize the flot a lime out of lier. She miglit have big Patriotie dance. dropped us a card at least.\"1 At one of their ordinary fetes she !Welf, listen, children,\". and- Mrs. certainly would not lie asiked, but a Lambert read aloud a six-page account patriotie affair (and shie with a brother of the good times Alicia hiad been having. fighting with the Canadians) surely would The Grayaoas had insisted upon lier atifie the very thouglit of exolusiveness staying over after the other guests liad and extend the welcomming spirit broadily. gone and there had been drives and picnics Tom Raymer .would b e there than and excursions and bouse dances and ail whonfno dancer ia the hall would carry sorts of larks-and the end was flot yet. hirnself with more coasummnate grace \"She doesn't say anything about a and elegance. Tom was the beau ideal man-the man 1 mean,\" was Pat's of social Peaiville. Tom, who waa comment. 1 \"Wait, dear, there la a potscript lcribbled in lead pendi.\" \"Wel-let's have it, quickly, mother. 4 Mrs. Lambert cleared lier throat and resumed- \"Elaine wants you girls 'to corne up smre time soon and get acquainted. $eeing she ia to be your sister-ia-law-- \"What!\" cried the three girls lnaa breath. \"Sh-girls! Don't interrupt.\"1 \"Go on, mother.\" \"Seeing she la to be your sister-in-law jou wiil be interested in lier, I arn sure. amrn egaged to lier only brother, Tom. He ia the saine age as myseif. Tliey are ail going to motor down to sec you nex-t week and bring the girls back here for a visit. Tell Justy l'in very sorry for lier sake that Tom îsn't wea1thy, but lie is everything else that is fine and desirable, and he is neither- blond ner brunette- just halfway betweea. Tell Pat it's up to hier, now in off the books.' \"Up to me, eh?\" sniff cd Patricia, International Falls and Power Constra pleased nevertheless at lier sister's news. \"Wel-I guess it is, too.\"alhinaheisfoavtono rmg .\"I -suppose she just met him la the aphaaartetsion fom avatin tepruning ordinary way, \" remarked Felicia, after parstnree scinerof hubndrne whos a long silence, during which ail four cfuacr ericeasfgeneion bygeeaton them had been digesting tliis intelligence. buntilftheics ogf tem heo \"lna adrawing-room,\" said Justicia, burea of b i yog leRye n lier lip curling slightly. \"Isn't it a good tecy were niglbsthe Ramer mseand wo ise on anlieunusualme Pat. \"She nearly a mile from the humble but pretty taleo stdon-anhesa meeting and Bookham cottage by the lake. Ethel, taled f sul-lases ndlimes converging lier schooldays over, had taken to steno- and uncenventional situations, and al yt epke u h arln thatlimeof tuif Roance Po appearance of the littie place. It was It is just as I tol e-hwold have a low,, grey, coblile-stone bungalow, manner hanIsoaw ft mit snd hate.\" urrounded on tliree ides by gardea rn.aner eave sa fitto snd hm.\" and the lake in front, now lookipg sombre And the others nodded their heads with the eye of impending winter gloating sagely, entirely agreemng. over. 1 ~A good macadam road man past the The \u003c'Peerlesa\" fence, is one of the best cottage on the north, down past the ffnvetments the poultry raiser canuinake. Raymer's and into the country. The lt turns even amaill chiieks. They can- Bookliam cottage was a hundred yards9 net roam or- get crop bound, lost, or beyond the car-lime and quite suburba.l1 feE.d on destructive vegetation. Tom liad given Ethel an ýoccasional This ivire is mnade fromn open bearth lift in bis motor. They liad become very steel, is securely loeked4ogether at each friendly until the last time, when she intersection. of the wires. By this liad laughed at bis serions declaration method of. fence construction, lesa than of affection, which, to lier girlishlind, half the posts are required, compared appeared more humorous than sensible. with the number required. where or- Tom was lionestly resentful and charged dlinary pouiltry netting is used. No rua- lier with a frivolity which made ber ning- boards for top or bettem are re- incapable cf underistanding him. qn'red. \"Oh, but Tom,\" she had answered, Tt will stand any kind of weatler, ilI love dancing, with you-yeu are sucli eannnt rust or sag. Will outat poil]- a grand dancer!\" try netting several times over. MITl Then the cord snapped. Estrangement turn large animais as well as smail became more natural than friendliness, elbiels, and it alwavs looks substantial, each dying te make it up while fabricating tirn and neat, A« faitliful guardian of ~eir elaborate wall of fancied hate. Your higliest prized poultrv. ýYes, Tom was sure to lie at the dancea Better write to-dav for the flearest and she would bury her pettiness ands klealer and illustrated catalogue of \"Peer- go up te hlm prouly and declare the less\" fencing, gates, etc. barriers down.. Or wpuld she wait and Write te the nearest office- Banwell- -see if Tom would be the first to âdvance? t Hoxie 'ýVire Fence Company, Winnipeg, It was the man's place, reaily. But ahe M'ýanitoba--Harnilton, On t. mayn't b e asked.b ar1es Dorian Shestoppedcaroln o ponder tha contin ency. he ldes'o hecm xaittee were weil kaownato lier, but Êhe Illived in* the'coutry1\"'ad theyniglit easiy o\u003e et ler. She could mn ~e ita poit uéeone of them and brlag up the subjeet casuaily, but that was tee mucli like intrigue. No, she would take lier chance. But what would she wear? TI$it astounding question lias startled womaankind since leaves were a la mode and the woods full of them. Ethel must have new adormients, especially- la view of lier resolve te lie nice te, Tom. Being isolated from town had nurtured the habit 'of dealing with mail order lieuses in the city, and te one of these Ethel sent lier order, including a pattera from which she would make lier own \"dress. Witli tense expectancy she waited tlie arriv'al of the dfresa goods, and the in- vitation. On Momday the goods came. She opened the parcel feverishly and tlien threw it dowa la disappointment. One part of the order 'was perfect but the reeda satin de chene she Qai ordered was the moat Hibernian of Paddy greena. She snapped back the tears which peeped lato lier brown eyes and stoca]ly sent the order back. Wedneaday passed and ne invitation. On Thursday the goode arrived--hI time as ordered, exernplifying again thb anomaly of mail order deals. Lction (Fort Francîs, Ont.), C.N. Ry. \u003eFaith had kept lier seul aliglit. Nimble ifiagers plied scissore and basting needle and the hum of tiesewing machine viej with lier cheery singing ail day Tliursday. Mrs. Bookhani Assisted. at the. fittlag- on. The gown waa, a great success. Tears of lionest pride came te the e y e of Ethel's mother. What genius that could tuck and gather and fold the gar- ment that made of oneself a queea! \"But what's the use of the fussing, niy dear? You cannot go uninvited.\"1 déI can hope te the very lust minute, can't I, mother?\"1 déI don't want te dampea your feelings but 1 hardly think it likely that they Mil send it by messeager and it was net in the box at the post office when Hector eailed. \" But there was 'no invitation by eight e'clock. Ethel, bedecked lanlier reseda creation like a wood nympli ascending into the ethereal blue, began te look sadly resigned. Hector, like all younger brother\u0026 xnocked as lie adxnired. If ah. wanted te go te the dance se badly, why didn't she go? Fat chance that they would know at the, door whetber ahe was in- vited or not. He c6oMd take ber and pluink down bis donation te the cause of pa~oism and they'd be none the wiser- maybej er. Coerne on, Ethel, yeur brother wnt sec you stallid. \"i éOh, Hec., don't make me appear any slier than I arn. Put on your pumps and-we'll have a two-step te the gramo- phone.\" She placed the record on the dise and sent it reeling te the catchiest two- step in vogue. Then the doorbeil rang. Hector answered it while Ethel atopped the music. Tom Raymer asked for Ethel. Hector bowed hlm lato the mooni and then beat it a e e The wonderfut Brook# RuPttur Appliance lu made at Marshall, Mich., ..ansd will b. Sent on Trial to any rupture sufferer snywhere ln the 4dm to prove its meniti, ei a Retainer and Cure for Rupture. The soft automatilc cushion la the s4cret of this scientific invention. No harnesiy' no springa no liard padi, no \"medicine,'\" no misIkading promises. It i\u0026 to lié hopo that readers oft tub paper will take advantage of this opportunity to cure -themsolves of Q4~ moît painful and dis- tr'essing affliction.. jtit fil-ast anid mail the coupon. Fwu E IFORMATION COUIPON C. E2. BROOKI, 11 State Utrert, Marshall, Midi. PleaFe send me by mail in plin ra'je your illustrat!d' book and fullinfôrmation about your Appliance for the cure of rup. ture. Naine ................................. Address............... ............... [City ...........Province 1 JUROIS 1 28 When WrltIng advertlsers please mention The Western ilorne Nontblv. '. '\u003c t. A gain We Say' Tiirow,,Awa Your TM$\" Rupture Oomplotely ,Ôurd- Sound end WoII From the trenhýs of-Europe cornes a lettei written by PrivaeJhn Cart% wbgse hom* address is No. hwVe,~itp çln of his complet. c2ure o,.f Yrupture rmw.r, the Brooks Appliance. Apri l th, 1915. Ç. E. Brooks. Dear Sir I recelve4 your lot. ter by fir lput this thank yas for your, App lance ~' Whic rw as ln- Struihenta. kf tbe way t -Cue me of my t,rP i leeKtchn. * oiths, \u0026nd.1 'gnythlng 'a à a ot had tIi.é Ilghtest t r ôoUn. bIc. Iremmabot when i1 -nasufl the doctor Et, rq. marked !\"Thpe lp n *0t h.in a wrong with y9%, YOuDZ1man, you are in the iUt condition CId e sounded me \u0026Il over gudI sag thank you for the iame; and giem qn sent to use mny letter as a tesjImonIal8% aW one, as I have been cured. 1opfnft y« msd your firm nnich success. Yours truly, And ùnder almoit the 2 9Aame *dte, the mother of a soîdier write: '2, Orcirard IÉoad,I ichmond, Surrey. Arîl lltbt, 1915. Mr. C. E. Brooks. Dear Sir:- A 11n e ta tl-.ank 70U for wL.at Your Ap. r ince bas done omy son. Af- ter wehring 'it f r o m December to the following September I eau gay heo'As iute c u rediland sl nov serving hie leotuastr y ln France at bia own trade, a- shoeing asm 1 t h. You can make what uise you like of these, my thanks. I amn, youru,",
         ",mon thly 8UITS MFIEE Itminarble Cloth that wen't Wear Out! Now regders, wouid you like # suit or piré of pants absoluteiy free! A mouatounding offer ia being mnade by ~a wefl-nown English firi They have diseovered -£aremarkable Hoieproof Clôth.' You can't tear iti Yet it looks 'jlzsfrýth ',. oaîie as $20 suitings. You eawu'4 wnr.itiout no matter how hard ýyoU'ear It, for if during six monthm' of soid -Lard grinding work every day of the week (flot just Sundays), you N-«r, the -amailest hole, aniother gar. litent will be given free I The firm wil muid-a. wrl9ten guarantee i very par- oel. Think readers, just $6.50 for a MW\u0026n' suit,' and only $2.25 fora\u0026 pair of gàPm ent to you ail charges and post- neq., piWd,, and guaranteed for six liontha', solld grinding wear. Now don't iink becauseyo are, miles away you dannot test these remarkable cloths, for r s imily end a.2 cent'postal card to Ti.e Réeproof ClothingCý o., 56 Theo- 6lud4. Road, London, W.C.,, Eng., for larg., range of: patterns, easy selfincas- lire ..chart and. fashions. These are ab- aoutely free and postage paid. Send 2 cent postal card at once I Mention The, Western Home Monthly. a retreat to the dining-room, where h. Lad a thriller to read. 1 Admiration was staraped in -capital letters on the visage of Tom who had corne to repent. Ethel quivered giddily, forgetting her resolve. He had- co to take ber to the dancea. He.w nfo drescd' for it. \"I sec y ou arc going out,\" Le began. \"Yes, Hector ie taking me to the dance,\" she fibbed. He sxiled. She thought there was more sadness than cynicism in the amle as he handed ber an envelope with her naine upon it. She reddened as ie accepteit. \"iIow?\" she stammered. It was the style of envelope that invitations corne \"Put ini my post-office box in mistake. They are changing the nuxnbcrs, on the boxées and adding new ones and I cxçect mnany blunders are being made. I've \u003cbeen under the weâther for a few day and did not bother going for my mail. When I got it this evemng.this envelope was there.\" \"I'm awfully glad-oorry you were not well. Are you going to the dance tonight? Why, you're, yu're lame! What Las happened, Tom?\"0 \"hthe fortunes of air scouting- a elumsy voiplane and about sixty bones1 shattered and, strange to saynothing serious. Thought you migit have h=ard about it.\"1 \"Not a word. Oh, Tom, l'm sorry.j Don't go now. Rest awhile.\"f Kaministiquia, Power RANKIN $\\ HEAD OINTMEN OI4LY OF TM£ oU, o o.-do.. pt ..y ph Weg pd t - -o , - d.., o nR . wohawrid pract ... 1oder, tih EMERSON RFCORDS. 20,, EACH 1. LOT. 0 t.. - VSCR WESTEN PIZONCrAPH COMPANY hs.,..r ort iCT8 1APHUlu - OO.0 * Ion \"I'm keeping you froin the dance.\" \"I'an not going to the dance, Tom. I wanted to go, tlinkig ou'd be there. Iwanted to tel you ço I'vc missed you.\"p Bis blue eyes scintiilated as t1hey bad donc 4bat last day in tbe motor. \"I '\u003epder if you'd laugh now?\" bie asked ,dobtfully. \"Neyer again, Tom.\" \"Well, corne tben, put on the banjo- tanjo two-stcp and we'll havea short turn ber.\"e \"But, Tom, you're burt!\" \"I'm not feeling burt, you little mignon- ette. I'm above the clouds and it isn't lard to dance.\" Wben she was swaying in bis arme to the ragtime rhytbm, she confesscd timidiy that this was wbat sbc badj longed for since shc rcad thc announce- ment that invitations werc out. \"Because I do love dancing witb you, Tom.\" A physician tells in the Newark Star a story of a philantilropie doctor in a. Pennsylvania nhiningr town wlio gave a new tiîcrmonmeter tô eachi family, with urgent advie to keep their houses at a proper teniperature Mlien lie vas making bis rounds one day, lic saw bis thermometer hangrin- in thc rooin. He aslked tic wornan of the bouse if she reinembcred hiis in- structions. \"Indeed, sir, I do,\" wvas flit' responise. \"I bang thc thing riglit, up there, anti 1 watchi it carefuiiy to sec it docesnet gYet too liigb.\" 'ýGood \" exQia imed the dolior. \"And m-bat, do yotu do, wlen t]he temperature riscs abov:e seventyder~ \"Wq- ir,\" .answiercdti la -wornan, %vith the' air of' one'faithfuIlt o a trus.t, *Nivhien it gets too bigh I take, it doaii and put it outside until it couls off.\" The Inajeae's W By M. Bruce, Brecch WAY up mi the very heart of the, \"She ie the most heartlesp coquette in A northern woods there nestîe a the wordi\"he cried, cienching bis fiande. prtylake srnong the mountains. \"And you-arc you in this, conspira . c ~it à -reaehedafter a journey of many too?\" Le,,dcmanded mn truc \"Et tu-Bgte' hours froin the place where,, according style. to the vernacular, of the country, you' \"She is ail that,\"I calmly replied the \"'go in.\" And when you have once young girl on the dock, ignoring the \"gone fiW\" you know why it le not usual latter part of bis speech,'\"and more, too. to say you have gone through the woode And yet,\" teasingly, '«I suppose you stili or simply to your destination. You find want bier.\" that, you have plunged into a new world \"I'm afraid I do,\" said the young man, -aworld that Las apparently nothing i mieerably. common with the world you live in; a The girl regarded bis downcast face world of wild, solemn, desolate grandeur, for. a moment, then, \"Wefl,\" she said, a world of space a.nd silence, a world that putting on bier shoe again and begnmto wLxilepp ressamg your soul, charms you tic 14 up, \"Ilil tell you whût, Mr Ase*n dé sstby. And after you have once you've been hanging aroundMire for \"corne out\" of that world, there will be more than a y car now, and as you are the tines, as Iong as existence lasts, wben only one of her 'hangers-on' Who hasn't y ou will be homesick for it, and will onubÀW me, I amn going to give you a long with an unutterable childlike longing lit\"Aa ht\" to returit. A-awt? Up in this wild région there bas lately \"«A lift; you.'re wasting precious been buiît what le fast becoming a fasix- time. Mildred Las no use for dévotion. iouable tourist hotel, with its accompany- çh is aitdwt t.I' rgo ing electric belis, many course dinners and the market for hier. There's only on~e \"iguests I\" who dress tbree times a day. wyto accomplish your end. Two fellows It le peD edoSattefat point, barred tried it, but tlxey weren't game enougb to froue remdefthkai n, by a stick to it te the bitter end. Maybe you hue ocy cliff. A seeming impertifience, migbt bc. You've got to make ber this erection, fin that majestic ilderness' jealous\", the Red-man would doubtless have haâ \"Jealous, of me?\" an irresistible impulse to level by fire \"Oh! but you men are clever,\" said sucix an affront to Nature. But it is a she witb infinite scorn in bier voice. \"0f course net of you-of thxe other girl,\" The yung man pondered. déWeil, Hildes-a,\" be finally began, and then hie became aware that the young lady was reZarding him with a look calculated to chill bis very soul. \"Well, Miss Hildessa -Miss Von Daum,\" lie hastily amended, and noted gladîly that winter ebanged te summer i hz5 on Daum's expressive face, \"y Our seheme is no doubt a good one, ojy it involves another girl.\" ,\"Certamny,\" cbeerfully asscnted Miss Hildesasa. \"Well,\" said the young man, \"doesn't it strike you that were I suddenly to develop an admiration for any of the other young ladies of wbose charme I bave been hitherto oblivious, it would appear odd-lack artistic versimilitude, so to spealz?\" \"Rahe,,\"was ber prompt and frankr reply, dées;pecially as none of them are fit te flirt weitb.\" 'Well, tben, wbere, pray, amn I to Hanse, Kakabeka flnd tbe fair maid?\"I Miss Hildesea tied and retied bier shoe. Then, calmly, \"HowQY-vhat's the good hotel and tourists flock there from Eratter wit\"--a scarcely perceptible ail parts of the country attracted by the pause-\"'me?\" dual pleasures of \"going in\" and breatb- ,you?\", Mr. Asselin was plainly ing the generous, bzilmy frazrancc of thc startled out of bis manners. great pine woo0s. \"e. One summcr morning, on the beach i.Mr. Asselin simply stared. near this botel, whcre thec-cnoe wcre \"Perbape,\" aggrievedly1 \"I arn not drawn up in line, stood a fine looking siifficiently good looking?'/ young man, wbose cheeks beld a tinge \"'You certainly are good-looling of red somewbat deeper than tbat given eog, ele r seirevrn by exposure to the sun god, as bie gazed himsclf, \"f r . Asing eln Le rwa frst at bis own canoe, bigb and dry, =,onvincinmpxaisinto thd le athrwrd loaded witb luncheon ba.dret, rode, nets as be took wbat as i b bie ls firet and ail tbe ui3ual paraphernalia of an asleto wa a eraps i e s intiipatd da ofpleaure n th wa er, calinspection of Lis adored one's junior anticip-\"but-areoyou surereyou are not trile and then at another canoe, fast disap- !r e ueyuaenttil pearrng down the lake, seated wberein young?\" aý vere a young man and a young woman. \"Hlow old do you suppose I arn?\" \"Oanned again, Mr. Asselin?\" inquired dSé en yu itr odm. isaucy voice near by. \"Sixteen!\" eried Hildessa in infinité The oun ma lolzedup ntothescorn. \"Yes, tbe kind of sixteen that Tihe pioun mcanokd lup into hestays sixteen ttill your cîder sister le mar- trihtpiqantfac an lagbig ye ricd. déWby, I was eigbteen on the )f a young girl seated on the end of the second Of last January-unlese thé be- lock. It was the face of a -girl between atemk whos fiureganto akeme ouner beforer can bildhood and womanbood, wremembegu.e meoub us ( sse roclaimed lber tbe Woffan, but by tbeee îmr tU(e xs e ucbwysh e con- xess you would have adjudged hier a girl. tinedelameciv oely. ayI hecnr And you wouid bave been confirmed un tne elciey lie latter opinion by the fact that the \"Eigbtecn years! The deuce!\" criedi the rong person was doing something un- young man in astoflisment. Re did not )aidnabe fr a oun lay, bt qitemean to be ill-bred, but bis surprise over- ardoable for a yo-ug lady t uie came bim for the moment. However, Lad taken off bier canvas sboe; a hr was a greater surprise in store for haking some small stones out of i t. A Wl, esiatrmsn oet iny bole in the toe of lber black Stockingi aiafe msngamoet iad viibl a limscof pink toc- 'bt sYôur Plan of campaign? I arn ýrettily pink in comparison witbh er sun- to-to dcvelop a sudden admiration for ýurned face. you?\", \"C'ertainly, and flirt witb me like fun.\"o \"Your sister,\" replied the young man '(And yol?\" itb dignitv, \"wvas to have gone flshing \"Oh1 1 arn going to dangleye\" itb me, but at the lasI xnionient she re- repiied ihe imiperturbable Hlildessa. YI. iembercd slie had a prier engagement 'To -to dangle me?\" itb Mr. Meking.\"\"s oqus,(lnt uho9 e \"She badn't in the least,\" gaid the girl. dé ý ounsd n agyt vou o.\"Le I beard theni concoet the seheme last o, runled\"dluiat ,o. enig alerYol ~vnt ip'air.\"\"Tbere, now, don't let a littie tbing The young man dlean, forgot himself, like that x,, ûund your masculine pride. I tI eD k ti v si ti in wi #q eV 'r l . - , - - -J",
         "on Home You may as weil face the music. You know Mildred la net ini lÔve with you, don't you?\" -\"Yes,\" he groaxied, despairingly. di t's money she's after. You have lots, I kxiew, ut Mr. Meking lias more. You are eaer, but Mr. lM/ekig is coy. That's the rao he is now iS-the b64a while you are left moping on the cold, colci shore, anid no cloubt that to ease your mmnd you 'wôuld that your tongue could utteplhe thoughts that arise i thee.\"' $Jàe, laughed gaily, then con- tinueci: \"It's ail in the family. Iàttle sister lipjýly taking big sister's leavings so Mildred can devote herseif entirely to Mr. Meking. Please don't look an, limp. Brace up. After you've asked me to marry yen-\") \"Oh, I arn to do that, arn I?\" \"Certainly. Now don't get goose ficali -I won't accept you. It's just part of the game. Then, when I refuse you you are to go around like a wet cat ana1 mope and nibon and still hang on. Then big sister wil find she can't afford to take that from littie sister, and presto!- there's your chance.\" \"Oh, there's my chance is it?\" said the young man, bitterly. \"Yes,' with decision, \"that's your only chance.\" Mr. Asselin meditatcd. He lookcd down the lake. There was no longer any sign or sound of the canoe. He looked at Miss Hildessa Sitting so cahmly and con- fidently on the dock. \"I don't know just how feasible-\" he began, but sh interruptcd hlm de- cidedly. ç \"«Oh, it's feasible ail riglit. 0f course Mifl-red wiil write maanma, and mamma will write and scold me, but she lias to stay away and nurse papa, and the Misses Gambol are ail the chaperons we have,, and they don't amount to shueka --e.o don't care.\" \"But why,\" demanded the young man, and ie tone indicated a complete fj surrender tolier plan, \"why shoulci you trouble about mer' \"It's not altogether for you, you know. in Putting in a bit for myseif. I'm now two yearà behlnd the tixnetable, and I've got to make a strike for liberty or die,\"\u003e and, resolutely, \"I'mgoing te. Besides\" she continued, \"it needn't be such an awful trouble if you wiil be nice,\" smiling up archly into lis face. \"Ail riglit,\" lie laughed \"Ilil try te bore you as little as possible.\" He exteni-. cd his hand in token of compact, but she did flot accept it. \" Now don't make axiy mistake \" she cautioned, looking hlm squarely in the eyes, \"this isn't to be any little girl affair. There's to be no0 elegant supercilious con- descension to littie sister froni big slster's young muan. It's to be a real flirtation --devotion galore, and you have got te keep your enýd 'way 'way up.\" luette li la liaxids. mnspiraey Alied the ring the Lore, too. you stili mg mani, ýast face ihe saici, inndig te Assein; [dred for i are the o liasn't e you a eveotion. drug on xily on~e o feilows îough te ,ybe you ike lier r,\"' said 'e. \"0f girl,\" \"WeUl, then lie idy was lated to Elildessa mended, mnged te premsve a good 4d miss 'doesn't enly to of the iarms 1 Swould -ilitude, ci fraik, cem are mu 1 te ed lier tt's the -eptible pkinly n not looking oVerrng 4hrew a t word is first i unior infinite a that s mar- n the eybe- I can sister Le con- Here's Values Uni pproaohable., WrrHOLIT CAS , TBRs. A mE 011 il - Bridtms 84 box BiLoepi, Cup elB;lInd;Ues Pad, eLned Drôp'look ani Tret;BlI n, FoddRigT ace, jr y;ee Sirdld(hecks Short Straw Ieather Collaro. Pri c omplete wthCollars .......... ThM s ur Lader. Extraleav Ring TraCE,, generalPuose Marnes. inade throughout extra strong and heavy; a Harnesa thatawil please the moatexctng.1 ROYAL DOMESTIO BLUE STEEL RANGE GET VOUR NEI Ile sxiled. \"l'Il keep--my enid up ail self, much to his own surprise, giving thA right,\" lie declared, \"but 'are you sure,\" most lifelike imitation o f an infatuated dubious1y you cankeep Yours?\" lover that ever delighted the old gosp \"Sure Y~ can,\" she responded with con- of a summer resort. s8 viction., \"No doubt Mildred wiil raise 0f course Miss Von Daum,\u003c,the eider, an awful row, but if she says much, l'Il' raged i the privacy of their apartments, tell my age, andi her's tho.\". - A~~ut xi that sanie privacy ehe ',« ooly Once more the young maxi extexideâ his Informeci that 'If she, Hides, found lianci. This tiine a small, soft one met Mr. Assdlixi's attenti agreeable, it his with à firm, friendly pressure. was nobody's concern but lier own. And \"Have no qualma,\" she assured hlm, Itoo mucl i nterference would oniy cause \"l'Il refuse you.\" interesting disclosures te, the \"oid gossiBaY Thus it happened ere maxiy days had concerning additions to the censuc statis flown, Mr. Asseliui fouxid hixnself entaxigIed tics, which her sister might net care to ini a flirtation which he had never dreamed have made public. possible. Miss Hildessa's seheme suc- It was about this time aise that- Mise ceedeci only too weil. The whoie hotel Hildessa deigxied to give Mr. Amelinbis was agog at the outrageous behavior Of first lesson. It was an eye-opener to hlm. \"that littie Von Daum -girl\" anid Mr. D yo knw she sweetly-, said toi Asseliu% wlo \"sureIy as old e xuhto *D oe y, twudbcavuae know better.\" Mr. Asel, cr idea ut fhrmonedy,told bp te a er ni hisinsrucion leter focity adZvesme me csndy sent and humbly presexited for my acceptance. ,I might graciously accept if the bonbonniee were pretty enough.\" 0Of course h.o om- plied. .' lI the course of a few 'day. certafa miracles of sweets li a marvel of a box afrived. The next day he found h.r on the verandah surrouxided by A motely group of chilaren scraxnb%,gfcr ldie candy e flung them. 'Sniceofyou to send m~e t'ah. uuId sweetly and'languidly, .but loua enongh for the mexon gg near to hear, \"but I neyer eat candy. ere,you le mite\" li the blue saah, don't you wint thlçmrty box to keep your doil'asc1pthe nrAnld the petiest of bon bon boxei wexit tW . 0elo- a.e brat of thtee. Thas..wad pries Se made hlm have sent in't ý swftet of motor boats, and A luttle ~* of a pony carl, wherewith te dgive hýr tzj axiddowxi the tliy stretcli a4ê' ore the hotel. 4n she hW \"Denkey,\" a nickname pÈuINl Parliament Buildings, Toronto, wih te ptit n gested by Asselixi and\"calle The Commnitte. arrivod in a bllnding iaowst\u003c\u003em toci the hearing' of \u0026à té bote? Elsowhcre o der 30M R ero' the0 Hamnw eau.mgade upRemembryn r Mbiiljoan e.Q pole StraP; i Hamma, oR compIete with Collai.............................. ýW BUGGY EARLY omgwut ZVEET BUGGY WUL~ ADGU*A.REM FOR LJ TWO 1mâ 1 Here's the very best in an Auto Seat Buggy. We have put ever imprveet possible into this Buggy, malzinz It eq-ual to any $100.00 vehicle offrd e he. The wheels are scrcWedL and bole bctween each spoke; the gear .a our me.rd double reach full ironed; the piano body is large and roomy, sec=rlybaodand bsptnt leather dash. The seat je upholstered with g e 1\",Ia~hr eta riven every detail the ininutest attention. Painting le tho aiee\u003cof perfecio and all charges if flot satisfactory. Pucee t Wlnnipeg ........8 .0 I Tho- FARMERS' SUPPLY GO., LTD. Do49 ant -W. .M twoull seicra r n-omdawio eoIab dot directionýsbytur 1 t9 fy he n a~.Tomto thus am Fordl iia asqtt h ubn m in ohethesw argu- d rabltly ndero nu~ 80a Da riLPt .10 lap M.aWIM RIhPaS r q 4., 4 4 r j-, 44 444~ v4 's'- thly 'rhe C-ëýmtee of One Hundred'on the stopsof-the i for prg1lIbition, which contained 825,000 signatures. ied the Uic not ovr wever, ire for )ment, I arn o)n for fun.\" thing pride. m 1 -1- -L m a",
         "O' f course such conduct did not pana \"\u003cTbat's the first time\" hie explainéd, 19 ab itobaW oma unchailenged. .. Mildred scolded, raged with'the feeling that lhiadn' the ghost and raved. SBhe wrote to mamina. of a breath left in bis bungo, \"that 1 ever S'e dsM e sag Mnia wrote reprovngHidessa, but proposed. cud not leave papa. The.Misses Gambol, 'l should think Bo from the cbarming -h chaperons- muet set. They re- way you did it,\" she retorted sarcastically, \u003c ;nhnstrated and w;ept ail to ]Q0 purp.e \"and yog werebýeautifullY rejected, keren't ftRLLS SUF1E2MN WOMEX TG USE the flirtation wnt on, and the people-you? Now look at Mrs.ýMewer,'11i you. DODD'S KINEY PILLSenjoyed it immensely. Off she scutties to spread tenv'. Four weeks fled by. Mr. Asselin waa And sure enough, before Mr. Asselin scaroely on speaking termeis with the retired, hie was made aware that everY lira.1.P. Gantas, Who Suffered With eider Miss Von Daum, but with the man and every woman i the hotel knew - Backadie,, \u0026ya That the Remua sSe younger Miss Von Daumi he waa on termes that hie had proose to ildessa Von Go1 rmDUa JI î characterized by the hotel gossips as Daum, and been ' beautifully rejected.\" Wondrn y a er aml cadlu. eking gae at. Next morning was radiantly f air tnd en the=y met. He was wthavmggtw s SteartValey Sak.,Apil th ate rng in e1h .a xeautiful, but notwihtnigtosly ý\u0026teartValeySas., pri 5t rahertryng imethoe dys.The men, one sulky womau, and one girl (peial)-Mrs. F. J. Garlis, wife of an eider Miss Von Daumn was nôt yery radiantiy happy set out in two canoca 'etti3Dable résident of this place, is 'en- pleasant of temper Just uow. to certain fishing fields, snd began castinig busastie ,'lu ber praises of Dodd's t'And now, Mr..Assel,\"said Miss for trout. Indifferent success mIrked ]Eiduey PIN4 ildessa one eveing, \"it's; tiine you their, efforts, and the day finally wore to a \"Ddds K.dnyPille bave helped me propoeed to me.\" close.' Mises Hildessa made the lust cast Wî6nerfIýy.ý1 rs. arls sas I an There were sittiug oni the hotel ver- of the day, just as her escort had taken 14ténverful, \"AMrs. arl I s says lu anda n h vening darkuess. No one the paddle to return. A big trout rose-' ith-my baek 1 could hardly moe was near except an old layi a camp Just touched the fiy, and disappared. SIchair. \"It's this wretched rodg!' cried l- ;took foui' boxes of Dodd's Kidney Pills Tees Ms ee.Sespe essdserp tegnneo an yo epu emr ha a el r' r. dM bw u'B. es e- escandoe r edbt he gubeutfu and.1 thyble emr hnIeut tendig to be asi pbt 't. Sh'sust the e e osmartly thtth euil watchig us. I4ow you walk me up and bamboo, broke sharp off i the middle of Mrs. Garl is nxow able tè attend to down, sud ask me to marry you loud. the seond joit. Then she threw it over- ber houaehold duties as well as nurse ber flue big luby boy and she feels that ah. eannot recoipmend Dodd'a Kidney PIl too, bighly. B4ckache la the bane of wthe average wornau' life. It la accompanied by a weakness and lassitude that makes life 6 burden. But thousands of wonien al over Canada are telling their sufféringr sistera that relief and cure ia to be foun'd Iu D)Od's Kidney Pilla. They cure the 1 kidneys, and nine-tenths of womeu's ilus : corne from diseaaed or disordered ' kidneys. THE lest, Is Noie To.Sool-! scrious scalp \u003cisordrs Our b..* godeaie guaran- teed tobLcomposed exclu- sivoiy of boit quel% bohir and accordingly wed the largest business in hair S\"cl in Western Canada. Switcbes. amy Ien\u0026th or color, froeux . ..$1.50 Comhina made -up.$I.OO W. carry a coslpIete lime of ai hair goods and would like to tenid you à copy of Our catalogue. Sea mana Petersen New York Hoir Store Kenilngton Block Winnipeg Saon Cmoplote asoflmmofa ail t\" Fi- ignable Haïr Acoeuoduesof t h ehichest .ac ingi -q3enci us your coinbings -we cau mie oer urtty sices Cornets TrarÀor- moderato cost. %t us to-day for paticulars. We can save you money. M. IHmiI's Mardrsssing SParors g Arcade, Paris Building Cor. Portage and Garry, Winnipog This niountain, which was formerly Mount Geikie,i s 11,020 feet lifgh, bas two fine glaciers. A trait lias been cuit through to the main glacier from the Canadian Northiern line, but the peak is visible for twelve miles fromn the observation cars on the line. Tie new name of the 7 untain is \"Mount Caveil\" It is s0 called in lionor of tlie late martyred Englisli nurse, Eth Caell, and the decsion was nmade by the Hon. Dr. Roche, Minister of the Interior enough for ber to hem it. It will be al over the hotel inside half an hour. Mildred will just rage.\" Tlus adjured, Mr. Asselin marched ler up and down the long verandah. They had passed, Mrs. Mewer three tirnes before lie was able to articulate i a Cliokced, uncertain voice, \"luIl. I-I-I love you!\" A silvery peal of laugliter greeted h in. déWhy of course you do, Donkey. Tliat's wliat makes you o, stupid half the time.\" \"But,\" said Mr. Asselin, vagucly, \"but 1-', ' But.you'e a sily boy,\" returned she; then,in a swift aside, \"You havcn't asked mne to inarr v voui.'' (4W-w-wyiIl you be rny wife?\" starn.. mered lie. 'No!\" empillittt icallyN. ''I will not; you tirc too utterly riclictulous. The idea of it.! No, Doiikey, vou are charming in vour present aî'ty but not to be con- si Iered seriously.\" .'fhey strolled oni into the glooin at the end of the great x eranidali. board, reel and ail. \"Now row me borne, l'mn tirîèd of fishing,\" she cornmandcd. This exhibition of tyranny was seen and heard from the othcr canoe, and tended flot ,tWmake-the elder sister more amiable. She starnped lier foot, endan- gering the bottom of the canoc, and re- solved that mamma rnust corne at once, no matter liow ili papa was. Mr. As.ýelin, wcaring a grave expression, was paddling liomewards. He had madle no remark whatever, and it was a notice- able silence Hildessa finally broke. \"You've donc pretty mucl everything I've wanfed you te \u003c10, Dorujce,'' sl said, \"but save my life. 'NoW 1 M going to give youi a chance.\" And before he could divine bier purpose, with one twist. of bier supple body, she had accornplished that. not difficult fhing to do-overt urn a etanoe. .Mrnost before he knew what hanpened 1'Nfr. Asselin fond bI imiseif swirrnmrng To- ward shore, hliijnc liide,9a Voii Daii with one arrua, while figltinle for life iii the icy water of :i northern lalJIe. llecîîîl(. came runninig clown, bearing blankets and Accurately ]BY NORMAN H. NEILL Optometrist Paris BIdg. Portage Ave. brandy as lie toucbed bottom ni his at desperate struggle to keep the two of tliem above water. A few feet furtlier he felt lie eould neyer havie gone, sud tbey would both have perished. le struf[led up on shore' sud when he could get breath, burst out: \" Vihy did you do it? It was cruel, wickced?\" iiThere, that wiil do, Donkey. I ,don't want to be scolded\" she said, as she sLivered and sbook i is arms. And »Us' thcrn the delegation with blanl ets and brandy arrived and took lier from him Towards noon of tlie next day Mr. Assein presented himself at the door of the parlor attached to fhecFuite of the Von Daumn sisters. Mis Von Daum, senior, was jurt coming eut of the rcom. She rcceived bis enqiiry for bcer tister witli cold and haughty mei. \"I sliould thik, Mr. Asselin,\" she began, \"that you had gone far enougli in playing with the feelings of a mere child, and that-clih, I have no words to express my contempt for you!\" And in a rnost unladylike rage Misa Von Daum'swept down the liotel corridor. The door was left open behind ber. Mr. Asseia heard a voice, weak, but checry, addressing him. \"You've got lier,\" it said. \"Sbe's crazy rnad, and will make Up with__xou te-niglt-see if she doesn't.\" Mr. Asselin looked up and down tbe long hall. It was empty. He entered the roorn'and saw Hildessa lying on a sofa, pale, but briglit-eyed. \"You can get liér now,\" she wbispered, as lie knelt beside lier. \"Hildessa, \" lie said, \" don't you know Idon't want bier. I love you, dear, and yen only. Ail that is ended. I bavcn't theuglit of anyone but you since-since --oh,' Hildessa, don't you-is it possible yen don't iînderstand?\" Miss Hildessa Von Daumn stretcbed iipward two weak arms and encircled hie nerk. \"WIxy did you tbinil- Ibad you in t raining ahl summer?' she said. \"Did youi tlink it was for Mildred?\" Tlie lest remedv ag-ainist ants is cày- cure ppp\u003c*.Sprvad it on the shelves of flie store closet uiifer tbe paper that Affd a littie turpi-'ntine to, the watcr w fi c'ihî the floor is scrubbed. it oil fa Le :wavyfliec elose smell and rnake theG011 oaideigitfu11y fresh, j - .44 -i '4 /",
         "The Western -Home Tifonthly Lcittie Tidai. About Easter Byý Max McD. WITH the coring of Eâer interesi is always aroused intJhe ancieni belièfs, ceremoniees--eusto-m1, anc observances.,b;ough4êogether in thecd bration of t1he-modqru4estjval. These in- -.ude sucli ..4ugs -à tËèe Eaatçr egg, th( bot cross b ~E ger floweri, the Easti hare, the.- cia candie, to say nâothajl of otherà Obsolete in our times. dividu . gs of one or another of tT cerm r observances have ther\u003c been ut 1i is ne eàsy matter to, lay one'm hand on an assembling of them. They represent very ancient customs of devotion or superstition, which, like the disaster QJ spilling sait or sitting thirteen at a table, are persisting reliecs of a tixne when the world was filled with signs and1 omens. And so I mean in this article to only give a few of 4he \"Little Things about Easter' that have corne to me in various ways in the co 1ý\"e of my reading. The Name Easter To a tudent of the world's history there is great interest and food for thought in the facts coneerning the origin of Easter. Étrange enough it may seem, this popular cburch festival dates back to a heathen custom. In Anglo-Saxon language, this feast was ternied \"Eastre,\" and was held at about the same time as the Christian festival. The goddess Ostara seema to have been regarded as the personification cf the bc- ginn ing of spring. The worship cf this goddeaa was brought te our ancest ors in Great Britain from Northern Germany in the earjy centuries. It is well known that the. Anglo-Saxon name of April is or was Estermonath, and in Gerrnany this month is still known as Ostermonath. Easter ia the -modern English equivalent for the Saxon.word \"oster\" or \"osten,\" meaning rising. The German word is \"ostern,\" the Hebrew form is \"pascha,\" the Frenchi \"paques,\" the Scotch \"pasch,\" the Dutch \"epaschen \" the Swdih \" paskz,\" and the Danish ipaaskze.\" Îfhe cominon word in the East was the \"paschal fcast,\" because kept. at the same time as the paschen, or Jewish Passover, and in somne measure succeeding it. In the sixth cf the Ancyran canons it iii called \"The Great Day.\" .The reader wiil perhaps be able te gather from thia some idea as to wby we cail this great religioua fcast Eastcr. The Modern Celebration The coronation cf Christendom is cx- pressed in the phrase, \"1 amn the Rcsur- rection and the Life.\" Triumph is the' keynote cf Eastertide. A few weeks ago, whole forests. showed their tracery o bough and twig without a single leaf. The felds were bidden under the sniow. There was an aspect cf austerity and silence in the familiar landscapc. As if Nature were waiting for something te bappen, she with- drew herscîf from sight, and dweit in mystery Eand reserve. But earth has felt au ellemenfal thril. Nature has heard the comnmand, \"Corne forth!\" and is obeying the promptings cf the resurrection pulse throbbing in ber veins. The vernal fields, the bursting buds, the day springing out of darkncss are ail reminding us of }1im that burst the tomb. Ea.ter is a day cf hoiy memories. The sun shines upon an open grave and into it, flooding out its darkncss. The Sun of a neiv ighteousness cornes with wings cf healing, and death loses its ating and its bitterness. The resurrection has its message for every age. In the midst cf doubt, and the helpiesa speculation of our own time, and the love of the temporal that seema4o crewd out spiritual realities and the scase of the life to corne, it is somcthing te know t hat the gospel cf Christ liftcd the vision higher; that H1e ennoblcd this world with t he glory cf the next; that He made turne eternai and gave the. duties and responsi- hilities cf turne the significance and doter- rnining valuie cf eternity, and this is the r-ssageocf Easter te us. Observance of Lent A Pagan Custom Athough Lent bias the elaimn of Christ- ian origine Lewis, who hLs delvod deoply into the history cf pagan customs, asserta that it is of very ancient enigin. It aroqe, -noarly as bas been determnined, in the f'tsting that was dustcmnary amnong the T\u003ch vlonians, whosc worship forrnid the f-' rting point cf Ea8ter. Tho fast ivaq 000 ~vmpqthv ith th(, goddess of repro- S*i en. çho rnourned hor es-ort. an~d fhe period was marked by fasting arýà an àab- stinencelromfnirth and social festivals. - Fasting has béen a widesprèad custonm. Humboit, the noted traveller, found the Mexicans observing fast days when he visited that country many years ago, Landseer mentions fasting anxong the K, EUyptians and it is still a customn arong the tribes in Kurdistan. In civilized countries theme is to-day in severai cf the churches a season cf com- parative abstinence, and its effects are feit in a commercial way by amusement en- terprises and confectionera. Few per- sons in these churches will marry in Lent, while leccasionally theme persista some custom that has placed restrictions on in- dividual action, as in Hungary, wbcrc it is forbidden te make love on Easter Eve. From Ash Wednesday te Good Friday, we may if we ill, o into etreat from the ol, shake oits duat, compromise with its care, and seek tbeblessedness cf Heaven.' Swiftly after the gleom cf Good Friday with its memeries. cf the Cross, follows Easter Day with its memories cf the Crowu. Easter Flowers Easter is the season for flowersalal ovex the world. Perhapa the eai reason is that this most joyous festival cf the Christian ycar happfly coincides with the returu cf apring and the fuiler pulse cf life when ail tbe werld is bursting forth into a glad éx- ultant rneod. It cornes just as the warmth approaching spting has.. caused te blcs- soin forth the first blooms since the win- ter's icy blast made bare the fields.--, Aftem the gloom cof a long winter, Easter flowers are especially entrancing. To the invalide s èaecally, they bring hope and cheer. To he youthful, they teil tales cf budding love and fragrant joy. Té the children, they are the harbingers cf sun- shine,. fragrant fields. and dewy meads. To the aged, they bring gloriona promise- cf rejuvenation and hope eut beyond tbe evening star. They bring the Eater mir- acle into ail our lives, and whisper,,\"we camne eut cf the blaekuesa cf the soi]; why may net your dark and black pat also produce flowery bleois which may bles net ouly youmseives but others as .wel.\" Hundreda cf thousanda cf dollars are spent each Easter for flowers forchurchep., Loversanad sweetbearts excbange flowers at Easter, and in rnany a littie cottage on back streets cf every town and city i the land,- house plants fil hornely living oomas with perfume and brigbtness. To go back to an ancient use cf flowers at Easter, Gurber tells us that altars known as Easter astones may stili be sen in Gem- many, and up te tbe middle cf tbe nine- teonth century, at least, they were crcwncd with flowers, and the young people, and net infrequently the old, danced about thcm. The Sacredness of Fire at £aster \"Easter fimes cbntinue even now in Northern Europe,\" wote Grimm a gener- ation ago. On tbe Weser, a tar barrel was ticd te a fir tree-and lighted in the evening. Around this men and maidens danced-. Theme was a fire on every bill-top. rro- cessiouns te these firca and hyrnn siîîginr and the bcaring cf wbite roda were fcatUre:t cf thl-is ceremony. The people like te carry the fime home with themn because it was sacred fire and embodicd the elements of the old fircý-worship. It was produccd by friction and te kindie it two boys wcmo, sclected wbo knew nothing about t he van- ity cf the world. The sacredness cf ire was an element in latter worsip in Scot land and Imland, but the fine must bave bnnn car'ipd home from the Easter ceremonies on the moors and huis. In those couintrics the cemernony had te do with fcrtility. Giant Sacrlficfal Candie Tbe beat hen bonfimes cf the Weser w( re perpetuated in the paschal tapers wiffi which the eburches were once lighted on Easter eve. The brilliant illuminations cf the eitics cf Russia and othen Etiroprn counîtnies at Eastcr are aise mreminders cf tho narly heathen festivals. A giant sacrificial candie, said to ho tliti largoat and nost hoatufiftil over madol, was hlessnd hy bis holinoss the Pope lit ELnstir inorning, hefore theit ar of St. Biagia, in St. Peter's af Roe. The great canitie weighed two hunridred and eighf. pot inds, stood doyev(n font high, and neail,%, broc foo(t :kt t ho(,:în.t iporinfr fo ono foo t i ho top. 'd cf ivax. this grot oIeislait iîixdo :liiil ATHLETIC UNIFORIS BASEBALL UNIFORES ever suit to measure and in Il difernt rae,, The materials are inai the ns popular colors and ranging in.price fïrm a good uniform frboys at $2. 10 per nuiti toa Mjor League Uniform at *17.0. Write for sample book of materials and our \"To Measure\" Order Blank. We eau also supply FOOTBALL AND\u0026lr LACROSSE UNIFORMS in a good range cf qualities and prices. and Summer Sporting Goods. ITHE HINGSTON SMITH ARMS CO., LIMITEI\u003e Dept@. W., Main St. (Opp. City Hall), Winnipeg. Establthd 187P emhÔ*;spod with solid geldIo l flic value of lÏýoiowing the hios'ing cf the candie it. was igbted, and the flame kindled wilI not rw dim for six ypars. Saint Biagian la fho patron saint cf ail who suifer frorxq iroat affection. The carsloe was a mari- ficial Easf or offering teof his saint by a FmoatIf :lian singer îvho had loat lus veire frein disease. Bot Cross Buns Hont orosi liOns, if is f1:,îmod, aire a ihîti esctidntof ithoecakes offoevl )bN f ho ,.Jewish wo\"roen to the Queen of Heaven, that 'so vexed Jeremiiah. Cakoes and libations have in al part s of the world and in ail tiges boon nonve,îifi1qt i ic niif Oi:oryuîtrings f o oti. Write for 1916 Catalogue of Spring The GAreok.s offened thein te Ast arte, and et hem (livin4t les. The pagan Saxonsaise tison cakes in henor cf tbcir goddc'se cf Light, Eastem. The Mçtxicaria and Per- tîvians are sbown te bave bad a simnilar e'arly nîjatons, and strange te say, for enc eamen or another, these cakes weme markcd withi a crOMS. To-day in'England h tckstera cf ail kinda offer bot cross btîîs fri-ou earîiest(laylight tînt il rwiih loses anol hen Cood Fiday. iny ojiaint rustfoiins tif tach to the cross buns. I n ote plane-( in i'ngland a sermon is îireachvedte icboys of a boys' school, -ifi nîwhinh \u003cquîtli\u003ctv yis t- enntd mwith a on'bmliii. 'Flii ;ivîord!ing te the pro- vion o f s i1 iwui bee nnstrictlv f\u003cu!cs id t', îîîv xîriTtis s ait!fhat 'j- 1~. bis last tweocf ther hie id tbey rug£led ild get 3cruel, key. I ;aid, as ;. And ian! -ets 'r from iy Mm. door cf of the Daum, r sister l, she ugh in e child, express a moat ýswept id hem. .k, but \" Sbe'a wn the entered g on a spemed, i know an, and haven't since cossible retcbed Iled hie you in \" Did is cày- ýIves cf r that water ýd. it 1 make AJUS«e OFF THE PRESS Thé Off iciai, Story of the Canadian, Expeditlonalry'Force CANADA- UN FLANDERS,_ By Sir Max Aitkea, M.P. with an introduction by 7, Rt. non. Sir Robert Borden, G.C.M.O., M.P., LL.D. Prime Xinister of Canada and a preface by Rt. non. A. Bonar Law, M.P., LL.D., Sec. of Stato for the Colonis. Read what thie critics have to say about it: \"ýThe book ahould be.i the hqnds of every reader In the Enmpire, for the inspiring -quality of it, fts nobility, its bravery.\"-Sir W. Robertson N icoli. phaEcn jIere done. .. ....With the aid of exèellent sketch Mali, ever phas canherebe followed of the fight in which the Canadiana, first alonc, \" then forensost amiong the reinforcements, improvised and maintained a, living barrier against tie flood of the Gerosan arrny which had'poured the great breUch on -the Br'itish flank; and thus averted, i Sir John French'\u0026 significant words ' a 'disaster which niight have been attended with the malt serious consequences. - Th~e Times, London, England. -\"The etc o f how the Canadians fought at Neuve Chapelle,, Ypres, -a Givenchy. at J'estubert, as he tells it here in as absorbinq as ever, and our pride in thse lavish bravery and sacrifice of the daughter nation in, if that were Possible, strengtliencd by reading these page......twil he one of the bicîk on the war which will live.\"-Daily Terah ondon England. \"One of the clearest expositions and mnict edective pieces cf writing w!e remember te have rcad. . . . Hies tories will thrill bis readers flot on In Canada . . . but wherever the English language is read.\"-Standard, LnoEnglapd. nls edrofYr.wl et \"Wht Aincurtis te the Egihrae fShakespeare,Ype ilbto ,nborn Canadians. . . . We can wish for ne better telling cf the heart grips in a great battle. \"-Observer, London, Engiand. \"kis a thrilling record of the manner in wiîich Canada bas played lier part it ~rat fight on the Western front, and hitherto unpublished atories of extraordinary feats of bravery and sacrifice for others are toid. As a record cf what the Canadians have accomplished for the Mothertand, it in one cf the best bocks the war has produced and it is written i stch. an interesting form that it can and should be réad by al cf the English-speaking race.\"ý-Star. This book should be read by ail. In it wili bc found mention cf innumer- able brave fellows who a short lime ago were mingling with us on the streets cf our cities, tcwns. and villages here i Canada. LET US 83911)TWB GLOE1OU8 ECORD TO TOU --MlU OP' 05*808. WC wiIl de this providing you send us your new or renewal subacription to ile Free Press Prairie Fariner. Bomembr: Tou get the 7lise Press Prairie Narner for one jour. 1 CANADA IN 7VAjDEs au for Scnd in your aubacription now and be sure of getting your copy of thia rpmarkable book. CANADA I N FL A ND ER S SPECI,%L C01UPON IFREE PRESS, WINNIPEG. I 1 enclose $1.00. Send mceftie Frce Press Prairie Fariner for one year ada copy cf Uthelbook \"Canada in Fiandlers,\" postage prepaid.f Xame .. .......... .. Addrcss ......................... Speci Nte-Tîi~noee isgond in-ilod nnly. - ~zo I",
         "88 THI SPINT or FRAIICB 1una rcent àddre.s to the men' ofthe P.ench pMe\u0026Whb-h..d won mentoin ludiÎ\u003eatchesfrom'the brout aid1 $4 received military dçeorations,\" Presi- Pýt oioare, of the. French Espubli., epoke of 1he lier1Uaustible çourage aM id vltly of the. French ru., wioh hadj 1.theFr. neh people te rise.as one pi4n aMi ýmeet the, foe 'with erene confidence and % suechabledet«rmination.» hee ee iko' va iiWo' omtbng, but the plain literai telth, as risltôry *Ill forever bear witness The moment Frànce waa In peFil of violation by the. hordes front «troa., the Rim,, every Frenehman, and every Frý#cbwoziiau ank every odier thought, than that of duty to France.- Quckly the a.'mies were xnebilized. .Âl trikeo» were dropped, and nothing of the sort b\"~ been beard ci. Te-day France stands more florious ln its hlgh spirt and, more united than ever before inIt11 long and eventful history, fighting beart and iseul for 1h. cause of freedom. à GREAT DAY IN ENGLAND'S CALENDAR Eseter Sunday this year falis on April 23, a great day lu the calendar not of Englishmen alie but of \u0026Ul vie speak the longue of -Shaktespeare, for April 23 là net only the. festival of England'e patron saint, St. George, but itla t he day of the death--end, as de believod, of 1h. birth ais-afl Shakespeare. Pr.- ýar\u0026tIxm -are béing made for a fitting celebration of the *three htindredth anniversary of th. death oft1h., Bard of Avon, though opinion le divided en 1he. ques- jion .whether, lu the midât of, ithe war, such a cele- bration should not b. poutponed. Not, indeed, that Shakespeare tam. le in~ any need of formai crte- xno.uies for lis perpetuation. With characteristie ar- rogance aud falsenesa, leàrned ýGermais have labored to eiake il appear thstt there was a Germanie strain in Shakespeare, and thmtt 'tqiere le identity between the Glermanie spirit aud th.eapirit of 'Shakespeare, as it in revqae11L Ju bs writings..Nohing could h. more erpt.uquely.ünatrue..Inu hua grest atruggle for f r..- Zom,.the mauy clàrlon passages in which Shake- spare Veicee the Britishspri*gve inspiration tb #11\"wfho speak.4e longue- that Shak espeare speke. -I'E ARTFÙL1\"UTTERAZICE EY THEE AISER neii London Tixn-s bas published the. fact that accopaningthe dfficiai dieth notices sent tb Ger- n fmlies tuer, are now spnt carde bearing thig message -i'una facaiiinile of the Emperor William's bandwriting: '9 did not, I swear, wish this war. I sitar, your eorrow.\" Al ite world knows weli that tbis ia not the sort of war 1h. Kaiser wished. Noth- ing could have -been turther from hie wish, or from bis absolutely confident expectation when lie gave orders for putting mbt ruthieus operation the long- P ianned plot against civilization devised to, make *the' 1ohenzoileru dynastylthe mSt powerful ln aIll hie- ,tory. Wfleu he sent his- legions hacking their way throuqh Innocent -Belgium, slaying, ravishinig and pillaging, he counted with complet. certainty upon making bie tritumphal entry into Paris and his coronation as Emperor of France, in fourteen days after the .re.sing ef theiel~giau border by the, Hua hordes. Later on would corne his triumphal cntry Jnto Lo'ndon, and hie coronation in Westminster Ab- bey,. Thre ii-no need in 1h. world for hlm te de- elare that b. did not wish this war. Rt1 was a very different war ho wiéhed. MALE BIRTES INi WARTIME The retlirne of the Registrar-General of Great Bn-. tain show that in thirty-six ofthtie elief cities and towns ef England aud Wales there las been ef late a eteady increase 'i' 1he maie birth rate, as com- .r red with the female. In the flrst three monthe cff t1 h. pýfflrtion waa 1,032 boys te 1,000 girls; in the. second titre. inontub, 1,043 boys te 1,000 girls; and in th, third quarter 1,055 boys bo 1,000 girls: The figures for lhe fourth three months are not at band, but the proportion of boys for the first nine znonths of last year je said tobc h.eh hinitest record- ed in, s'tventy, yeurs. Tihis statement lias been, wei- comed as serving te confirm a popular belief that nature doe something te inake good the lose of mwaIes in artime, a'belief Mnl'ichi bas seme scientiste of standing te back il. Thug Profesger Haliburton, tb. physiologist, le quoted as saying that \"Iwe must look on il as a wiese diepensation of Providence.\" Likewse, a biologit of good repute, Professer Arthuir Dendy, la queted as follows: \"One cannot put down to, mers ooincidence 1h. fact that maie births pre- ponderate during amd atter a war. Probably there in éome natural law, at present hidden frorn us, which in 1 reoponsible for this.\" But there are not a feiv scientiste, on- the other band, who texpress ab tonlshment at Professr Haiiburtou ami Professer ])eny for \"accepting se questionablo a thhory on eidence se lighit.\" They say that bhe tiieory in question le \"an anelent delusio, dsting frein long before there were any trustworthy vital stktistie7., Further, titey point eut that the inre lu n male births over feniale births le \"sliglit.\"1 But nuic it mot h. replied liat il. 'iglightness\" at lhe beg-in iug wiIl cease te o 4siighb, if lte rate of increast, coit- tinues progressive? It adl depends, on tint, ef course. For il was- established some yeare ago, froin (x- amination of the st\u0026tistiff8 of sorne 6,000,000 births, that thie no maLf*portion las abouit 106 'maies to 100 fema les. 1é ý 1 The Western. Home filonthly The PIuil.sphe Tr 1RW VODKÂLESS RUSSIA * TEE POWERS IN TEE WÂR Tihe'weilIknowu English, journaliet., '- amilton «The paet mont4,lias.-seen lthe etrance oe thte Fyfno-inns.ahsben~lsc4ân~heeffeéts of~ thirteenth pôweeltot the wary t4ioùgli te speali tihe elimiination of intexlcoating liquor tram Russian of Portugal as one of 1th, worid powere la 'te aply lif,. Ho ays Ibat the Ruesdan people are bette*off ratter tee large a desiguation toýthat nation, which now than tbey evel- were before, and liat lhe eav- once wae a world pewer, indeed,,but le et negligibie inge bank deposits have increased te unprecedente,. ,inight uow ou land sud ou ses. When we Bay volume, snd liat thougli 1h. peasanta are contribut- Vbqirteea are now engaged lunthe war, we eount our ing very generouely te the war funde, giving not only \u003eSmpire aseene power, ot course, lhough, etf coursep, money but furs and, other commodities.Inl oee il includes several nations. The powers e egaged are email tewu money grew se pientiful thaI the people te Britiisit Empire, France, Belgium, Russiai Serbia, clubbed together and bouglit a moving picture Sp- Italy, Japan, Montenegro, Portugal, San.- Marino paratus; sud, by citarging a emali admission fce, (which la only te h. termed a power by courtcsyl, tliey raised enough money bo buy a new fire engine. Germany, Austria-Hungary and Turkey. In addition, Happenings like these, writes Mr. Fyte, give a the. principa.liby et Luxemburg le eccupied by 1he strange air of buoyetncy, which contrastse trikingly Gerinans, snd Persia le aise in ne inconsiderable with theý grimneseft1h. war. Tihe Russiaus do not measure concerned du the couifliit, foreiga troops be- act as if they hadl surreudered penserai libertv; ing ln ber territory. they set as if they had found a new liberty. TiteyWOE IN OLTC are realizing more sud more, -wibh fevery day that OE INPLTC passes, wlist a bencftt it ie te them te h. wititout Out. of ail the journals prnued in 1he' English vodka. language lu Western Canada, only eue, se far as lhe THE GROTESQUE GERMAN MENTALITY Philosoplfar le aware, lias' declared its belief that It~l tn, c 1h Gemanpeope thatlhe ar at woman sirage wili have the effect of iowering lie' same ofth liebol rmaipely erious sudhorrihly women, or et briugiug about a lowering of lte caim the ametim boh trgicllyserous nd orrbly to respect which womanhood lias heretofore been held. comte. Tliey temeelves cannot see liait hris Ilkemnr there teebe idswihhv auybthiug comic in lte spectacle bhey present. It lu 11k. manuer sml r ae b eve exdenshionthav wouid be impossible te make 'hem uxderstand, for te rcacd with imatfoeboing o e aexesn o instance, why th. British soldiers u inte trendites lefrmiewthnlelmta fth miesx net ouiy laughed loudiy at tiie solema manner in Tier. are not neariy as mny womcn naturally wietih ie Hymu of4ilate was sung lu the Germai adapted for polities as there are -men, sud women trencbee% as if it werc a religious exercise, but toýdk will not rush into the cancer et being practical poli- Io singiug it -themeelves, as soon as 'they were able ticians juelt because wornan -suffrage lias become an to pick ib up. Ose oethlie meet vivid chapters lu established fact. It je iu the luterests of tie geseral Mr. Boyd Cabl.'s book, \"Bietween te Lises,\" des- weifare ltaIliter. Ëhould h. lite ju-t aud equai treat- cribes te huge diehigitt whlch te mes o etoueet, meut et womes citizens with mes citizens in -respect Enýlis reimets too indoig tis theserea ofthVie f ranchise. Tliat the wisdom et womau sut- Elsh egitmfotents took nof titi (ivere lit trage will vindicate ibsecf abundanbiy under the test sliou, lng et ber. bit e atin t ait vereane hw Df actuai eperatl n is an absoluteiy sate prediction It maddmel ed hGermans. In order te usderstaud t ae te tua witich the Englisit regiment was gettiug eut WANTED\" DIFFERENT TREATMENT et this performance, a Geninan hnbued 'witit Kultur In looking through some Unibcd States newepapcrs. vould have le h. bora over again. To him, Britieh ounbis table, the. Philosopher foufld himselt readiug laugfliter at hie solemn unyi ofe lite le incompre- about a youug womau la Cincinnati, wio deserled h.as1ble.- What lie could unjderstand thorougiy, her husbaud because (by ber owu account) lie was sud ia hie German way, respect, would be thé eBrit- tee kind te, her. \"I know leie l a model husband,\" lait Pst'iiment commissioning Rudyard Kipling bo she expiaiued ta bbc womas judge, Mies Edus Mc- write a Hyma etflHâte in r.ply le lite Gernian pro- .Christy, wto presides over te Iomestie Relations duction, sud having speciai music composcd for lb, Court is Cincinnati. \"'Me hae noe d habits, sud je sud the B'riish troopesud tih, Britisit people at always 'home at nighils. le treate me jue't beauti- home ordered to, siug it slemuly. 'The Germas dece fuliy, just emiles sud kissles me wben 1 say anybhlng eve-.rythiing by word et command,'includiug hie teel- iean. 1 cani/t stand it. If he wouid bully me, or ngsd hie thinking. Tint le whal makes hlm se abuse me, '1 would like him better.\" People doin't horribly comie. Human, beiugs wit etel sud tiink Bay mess tinge ta be smiled at for tem sud kissed, as titey are or4ered have abandoued tem intef'ity lb would appear. Aud undoubtediy wliat ltat young, as individual seuls, sud becomà mer. machines. wife meant by sa.vinir tha\u002b. if her hlQhand. wniîld HOW ABOUT A CODE 0F MORALS FOR ADULTS? This le an era et mnuch theorizing. Espccially lu lt.e counry te tue south,-or so it seema lebte Pilosophier, le tbeorizing carried le as extreme 'leugthin luth, framing et educational sud moral codes by weil-meaning pensona with moe zeal tas undereibaading sud kno*loedge, AItlite preseu-t lime titere la in progres a cô;Qqs t for lie besî Ciild's Code of Morale, whicli wili yield lie 'winera prize of $5,000. The sstonishiug thing about Ibis affair le ltat prominenit educators should be wiiliug le leud their names le se, futile a purpese. SÙirely auyone wbo kuowe anytbing at ail about cilidren, auyone vite bas any sympathetie understauding ot ciîildlîood, kunows bliat children, youug chiidres especially, re- flect te conducet ftieir associates, eft Ilose wbhose lives anc lu contact witih heir ommwnsd most cf ail, ot course, oet bieir parentesud btce ther eider per- sous to wiom bicy uaburally look up. No ntere code, bewever flue seundiug, wili make a cbild frau, generous, reasouable aud courteous, unlcss lie je et imffated le acquine t heso virtues fthreuigh pî'act ice cf liera is bis daiiy relationshipe. No code will, or cas, îîake s listliis, lazy and. uninteî'esteii clild, in- dustnious, unless Nvork le made intercstiug sud signi- ficaut to bira. Se we cas go on tiirouiitI ail the qualities wiicli bie contestants for titis $.-,O00 prixe for tliibstCiid's Code et Morale 'viii uudloibtediv \u003cesre te Itave iîtstiled into ehildt'en. But, as lb seems toe cPilosophter, lb vould be tarn nore tise- fui, more te bhe point, te foriuulatc a code for par- ente, teaciteresud ail who have anything te do with1 te traininîg et chilîren-auj, wivais ci inelabîr more inmpor'tanceof te foirnulating eof aur code, b get lb acted on.. Xndi l ' dile be Pilosophîetr las noi desire toencuter into 'tue contest fori' ie $5,000, lie ventures le seuggest a Code for Adults, \\V-ithl a View le 1he Best I\u003eossibIe Resits intoft fi u în i vL 3ýiuudsud Cliaracters cf Uhidreji. lhî' to lit s'încei'c (net iterel v -\"te tll tti bruti,\" lit te lue iou('st with. oncsclf---qione tee eas ' a job) for t1e lest cf us) . Seconid, le be epeu-îtiiîdcd( (te sec and judge the ciilds actesud condîtet, not fient arbiti'art- point et view, but lu relation iith lauts anîd chi:- cîinustaiccs). Third, toLe -,,s-nipatli(-ti'(- bopnt one- .ýi if ltitechiid's place). Fourth, te lie îiî' leia ýt is, te be direvt iandtlbrief it cxpressioni). if C u Weeo observe tijis code inthtii r ''îti ati cli ldreit, it wNouliciibefit the chihdrcn iîî'e ihlait autv passible Code cf ?-Morais for Cltildnî'nit uoffld l;be (icvised, cxcilif ticet'eward for deviýsing t cw $3,O0 îsea f oiily $5,000.0 c only buliy bier or abuse bier site would like hlm bet- ter, wae biat if h. bullied or 'abused lier, site could teel sure for once that hie was interested more in ber thas lunhimself. A question witich eccurrcd b t. h Philosopher was Ibis: Would tlia,t young wonian have made a dlean breast of ber troubles in taI way if the. judge had net becs a womas. However that inay be, lt is in seme messure satistactery te, note that Judge McChristy wa.s successful in persuading tlite couple te make up teir differences sud try .agaiin to live togettet'. WHAT IS THE KAISER MAKING \"RIS PEOPLE\" FIGHT FOR? Tie Emperor et Germany could end lie war iu a day by a renunciation oethte insane ambition wvhich made hlm begin it. Iustead, *he iag prolonged tihe hideous carnage, draining thie lite blood ofthbie Ger- mn. people aud brigiug te s'iadow et famine over 'luis people,\" and repeatbg ahil he lime hie bise- phiemous assertions that Cod le witit hlm sudthem in filhting forý-wliat? Tîte Kaiser dare net bell \"hi\u0026 people\" Vite purposes cff tit war jute wicit tey pliuged at bis commandl. He canuot speak te trutit about lb, for caudid confeslsion would end the war and end hlm. Wlten il bte Germas people awake te lhe truti? Wlhen wiiil they sec that the war w'as bog-un net in ite cause-et Gernmany, but for te fuititeranice cf Hlohenztllern ambition, not for te defen\u003e'e of lite Fatltcrlandf, for lte Fatiierland w~as ia neo danger cf attaek, iot for tt'eedem and justice, iviten it 'vas in deudal et treedom and justice that le Enîperor's Covernunent decreed war sud with- stood ail appeais for peace? Kultur, a word becoeene more odiouis thon 1ally otJter ln auy of the languagyes SPOkeit On cai-ti, 11lîlcas, as is now mnifest, net or- gaîtizcd national efficicncY lu good works, but isavage coîtqllcst, subjugation, tIi,-extiniction et ibertv sud bite dom1ination cf lrussiannîilitarism. It je five huîi1di'cd Yers since tlie firet Hllezolleru eeut liiiîoiîgst the savage-s cf IPrussia aud made . tlîemn G(,IIîliian l ir ad~ie\"as 'lreitschkc pute it. Prulssiali as advalnced, and German unity lias been brouglît about, but its , ivitle rot lisbn ,centred lîpoît i fit le aim. and pltrpose of brute ftjl;e ile o liiilo a Stîtte arîtîed, aîighty, irresis- tiM f i 1 Il'st, stI/izue aund c'x paii.ou over ail l1Mat oi 1,11e - li.The Ilclitefzoliern auto- steitIle w1IYi:iilltý,tille Cel-irîm for titis, sud wlie th -0'd f ooinind -asgiven thev rusited into uar, to e l ien ~ l estîuet ion. Tîte w-ar was leirin v i lle sole iil)ose of nia k ing the lloieu. *' t'",
         "at a stalli-in Chelsea, George IIt once ýstoïped te, partake of these delicacies, and since then the buns at the sale table are called \"royal\" het cross buns i Te SaflorWh#o Neyer Returned \u003e Of \"the o s3peaiz LO appily ri, which. tegligible Wýe say aunt Our Sccureç, Lged are Serbia, Marino ourtesy }, Ldditicn, by the ;iderable :Ops be- 'Englisit r as the ef that eowering le dlaim 'en held. ch have niin of dle sex. aturally women ,al poli- ýore an general LI treat- respect ian suf- the test ediction. read-ing leserted he was isband,\" na Mc- elations and is beauti- nything me, or e dc'n't. kissed, young, would li bet- e eould in lier te thse woqman at way er that te note tuading nd try OPLE\"I ar in a Lwhich re\u0026 the le Ger- ne over s blas- d them ell \"his. hl they e truth he war awake Ur was bor the ,or the w~as in justice, ,e that .with- beconme g\"uagtes net or- savage Ly and is five elent them uts it. s been been brute ýrresis- er al .auto- i, and ruslied r was boleul- The Weagtep'r.Home Mont hi \u003e, OLASSIFIED PAGE FOR THE PEOPLE'S. WANTS if you want to \"Y or eli anything in the. line of Poultry, Farm Property, Farm Mahnry,'Ir if you wat HeIp or Empipqyment, remi.ember tha6 the Cassifiedý- adÏertisem.eXclumnm of The Western Home Monthly are a.iways ready to help you accomplish your object. Cost 3c. word, minimum SOcS Cash with order. POULTRY AND EGGS FOR SALE BABY CHICES AND HATCHINO eggs; strawberries 100, 70 cents; currants,.10 cents; ROSE \u0026 SINGLE COMB RHODE gooseoerrîes, 15 cents.P Carniage paid. Cata- ISLND RED. gue free. Charles Provan, Langley Fort, ISLNDRoe CombB.C. 7-16 mres hae n hesSICILIAN BUTTERCUPS, prize-winning past seasn\"than strain. Beautiful birds; grand layers. Eggs any other Re $2.25 per 15 postpaid. gim. Hogdgson, Box Breeders in the 601, Yrkton, Sask. 7-16 West. fly their «DLA*\"W IERCS-Eg winniiigs the r \"UMG\"WIERCS-Eg have proven toy f om ur heavy laying utility strains $3 per be the hest at 15. McConnell \u0026 Fergusson, P.O. Box 505, aIl the big shows, London, Ont. 4-16 i B .C. Provin- ci:~ Show Alberta SINGLE COMB WHITE LEGHORNS and Provincial Show, But! -Orpingtcns. Fifteen eggs $1.50; flfty, etc. and winning $.00; hunldred, $7.00. E. *. Anderson, 3rd Cockere I at F1leming, Sask. 5-16 World's Fair, San Francisco. My BRED TO LAY-Barred Rocks, baby R.C. Réd pen at chicks 25c. èach. Eggs $1.50 per 15. Circular the Internationa,,f. ree. A. M. Tamblyn, Corretta Dell Fanm, e.g99 y 1 cotW\u003e-Delisle, Sask. 6-16 tgs lT ictoia, 191 Y\u0026 won 4th FOR SALE-Pure-bred White Holland place with average cf 192 eggs.- V few good Gobblers, $6.00 f.o.h., $5.00 at the rancih. Mrs. pullets and cockerels at $5 each.- Write for Arthur E. Ccx, Pincher Cretk, Alta. 4-16 ~N.Clarke, Box 2661, Vernon, B.C. 5-16 FOR, SALE-A numnber of S. C. W. Leoe- À E6d story asseciated with cross bus bas grown inte 'An east. London legend. I. the densely Populated district there lived a widow anadlber saior son. The lad, cn leaying home te join bis ship, promisedâ hie mother that he wbuld return and receive her blessing on the following Good Friday. The poor woman, relying implicitIy upon bier son's promise, bung a hot cross bun in the front room of the little cottage for him te partake cf when, as she antici- pated, be would rush with jeyous excite- ment into'the bouse. But the boy did nol corne; neither did any news cf him reach the sorrowing widow. Her faith in his promise, however, did net diminisb, and every Good Friday a bun wassbung in the room te gladden the eyes cf the wanderer if bie returned. The widow died witbout ever hearing a Sword cf lber son's whereabouts or fate, That was more than seventy years ago. The bouse bas passed into éther bands but the custom cf adding another bun te the mouldy cnes that bang ini a groupirom the ceiling cf tbe room, is stili preserved, and a to-day will see anumber cf curious eus- tomers gazing; wistfully at the tangible re- minder cf a far-away romance. The.Easter Egg Thse Easter egg is the acceptance by, a modern festival cf an emblemthat is oldèr than any buman record. In the early systems cf Pbilosephy, the egg was already well established as .thse symbol cf life. When spring ret urned after the winter's deatb-preessely tbe import cf the Ishtar festival-the eldest ýf the nations used the egg te typify the nevý ife, just as the new- est nations do witbout knowing why. Easter eggs were colored ýo show the Joy cf the people at the reawakening cf the eartb, and were used in connection witb tbe spring Astarte festival clebrat ion. In ancient, as in modern times, tbe eggs bave varied from the simple uni-colored cnes te * creations in gold leaf and gorgeous tints. Everywbere, in ail ages, there bas been a spring festival and it bas been oelebrated witb eggB. Several superstitions have grcwn Up sround the Easter egg. One is tînt empty egg sheila are witches' gcbéto, and may be used te the harm cf him who ate the egg. Irish and Englisb cbildren are taught fo put the spoon througli the egg shell. Leaping Hare EmblemnaticetfEaster The Easter hare cornes te us from tbe Germans, the home cf Kris Kringle who was gifted witb anonymous fairy gifts. In many parts cf Germany tbe customn pre- vails cf hiding eggs in tbe garden at Enster time. The children who find them are told that tbey are laid by the hare. In other parts cf the samne country and at other times than Easter, bread is hidden in the same fashion, te whicb the naine bare bread is given. Easter and the hare have a number cf strings te conneet them. Ostara iked the haro because cf its fecundity and it became emblernatie cf lher. It would naturally tIen be conaected witb Easter. Then again the leaping haro is the emblem cof spring- time in the lore cf many nations, and this is renson enough for its presence in this festival cf spring. 'Jack\u003c'and Ji\" Have £aster Connec- tien When \"Jack and Jiil\" went up the hill together for water they may have been p ursuing a devotional act connected with Eater. Their jcurney far antedates the name Easter, cf course, yet it may have had its origin in a practice that Easter 4 cerem onies bave perpetuated. It.vas the custom on the Continent for the youths and maidens on Easter mcmn- ing te go together up into the mountains te the hcly springs for water, whicb they hrought home with them. Suc1 a custem is undoubtedly the survival cf an eider Pagan one, and it relieves Jack cf somne criticisrn fer going up the bill for the watem. If it was a water-worship observance, Jack was riglit. In this Easter mcmning water seeking, thore is a, reieocf water w6rship,' for springs, being direct gifts cf the gods te inon, miraCulcus gifts, were more sarred than brooks or wells. There are other 4e1tstomq that have obtaiîned at Eastcr Ilhat p)oint te water worbp. PAKENHAM'S SILVER CAMPINES AND RED SUSSEX w6n at Canada's largest shows, including Guelph, Hamilton, Ottawa, Peter-' boro, Belleville. Eggs al,ý reduced, prices. Write for circular. W. E. Pakenham, Drawer A, Norwood, Ont. 5-16 S. C. BUFF ORPINGTON EGGS ýFOR H-ATCI!ING from extra heavy winter layera and bred to lay strain $2.00 per 15. Satisfac- tion guaranteed and corresvpndents invited. David Russell, Two Creeks, an. 4-16 EGGS-For hatcliing high-class strain. Ail the standard brccds of Clickens, Ducks, Geese and Turkeys. My eggs bave won a reputation for reliability. Write to-day for free catalogue about breeds and poultry supplies. J. H. Ruthierford, Albion, Ontario. 5-16 P VRE-BRED WHITE WYANDOTTE EGGS from carefully selected, heavy laieing strain, 85 per cent guaranteed fertile, $1.50 e r 15, 600 per 100; Cockerçls, $2 00 - White Podian Vunnr Egvs, $1.50 Per î6; brakes, $2.00, $1.50.Mis uth Lloyd, Morden, Man. 4-16 \"THEY LAY BECAUSE THEY ARE BRED THAT WAY\"-Ottr Brred Plymouth Rocks are bred from America's 'ladin strains. Eggs $20O0 for 15. Arthur Ray, Creelman Sask. 61 S. C. WHITE LEGHORNS cfMe heavy winter layers, eggs for hatching. OM)lr quân- tity. AIl unfertile eggs replaced. Write for prCes, stating quantity. Albert Middleton, Keystown, Sask. 7-16 Time of Bauter The proper time for the celebration of Easter was the source cf great discord 4îamong the early Christians. There bas neyer been any differenoe cf opinion as te why Easter is kept but there bas heen a good (bal cf disgagre*lment as te when it ougbt to ho kept. The great mass cf thée Eastern Churcbes in Asia Minor kept Easter on fthe l4th Nisan, thc Jevish month corresponding fto our March or April, considering it f0 he equivalvnt to flic Jewi-h Pwssoer., But flhe M'e-t4rn C'htirchesýkoPtt the feasqt on fthe Sîînday followijig f ho 14th dav, romember- ing that Christ's resiirrection teck place on the Sundav, and ai.so wishing to mark moe clearly their disconnection with the Jews. bori Cockerels, $1'to '$ ýeac- prize winners. L. H. Gardiner, Broomhill, Lvn. 4-16 HIGH CLASS ROSE COME RHODE ISLAND REDS. Egg from beauties, $2.00 per 15. John Dut!, MekViwin, Man. 6-16 BUSINESS CHANCES FRIER FOR Sik )ÉONTHS-My Special Offer to Introduce *dy magazine \"Investing for Profit.\" It i. wortlh $10 a copy to anyone who ha. been getting poorer while the rich, richer.' It demonstrates the real ealning power of money, and shows how anyone, no niatter how poor, can acquire riches. \"«Invest- ing for Profit\" is the only progressive financial journal published. It shows how $100 grows to $2,200. Write now and lVII send it six mcj*the free. H. . Barber, 550-20 Jackson Blvd., Çhicago. 1 12-1-17 850-$150 MONTH PAID MEN AND WO- MEN. 25 Can. Government jobs. Common education. Spring examinations throughout Canada. Saniple questions free. Write im- medîately. Franklin Institute, Dept. J 177, Rochester, N.Y. 4-16 024 weekly earnsd at home by industrious workers in aIl districts. making lighting a.ec- islty. . No- selling. Whole or.spare îe rite Y. -Dept., Sayres Co., Toledo, Ohio. 4-16 FOR SALE GET YOUR NEW SUIT from Catesbys London, England,. for haîf what you pay local tailor.- Best materials, style, fit gunranteed or money bac.k. Write for free catalogue self measurement form and patterns. Aâdress Catesbys Lirnited, Canadisa_ Office, 119 Wel- lington- §t., West, Toronfo. Mention The Western Home Monthly. 5-16 \"HEAVEN AND HELL,\" Swedenbo -'s great work on the life after death and a teal world beyond. 400 pages, onl y 25 cents post- raid. W. W. Law, 486-C Euclid Ave., To'onto, Ont. 5-16 BILLIARD TABLES - For farm homes, Portable and stationary. Tlie game o! kingg. $50.00 up, easy terms. J. IP. Clark Billiard Co., Winnipeg. T.F. HARNESS-The \"Square Deal\"~ Brand. Sold direct te usera. No agents. Send for my CataIogue B, showing 80 styles. Tîtos. MeRniglît, Winnipeg, Canada. T.F. RELIABLE INCUBATORS AT *9.co RACH. Write at once. The Raymond Mfg. Co., Ltd., -Winnipeg. Agents wanted. 6-16 FRUIT AND FARM tLANDOS FARMS WANTED. We have direct buyers. Dont pay commissions. Write descriling property, inaming lowest price. We help buyers locate desirable property Free. American In- vestment Assoçiation, 26 Pallace Bldg., Min- neapolis, Minn. 6-16 IMPROVED QUARTER SECTION, haîf mile front town cf Raymore, Saskatchewan. Clay loani, well'located, $22 per acre, part cash, balance hall crop payment$ or $20 al ca'h. J. R. Booth, Heyden, Sautlt Ste. Marie Ont. 4-19 CALIFORNIA LITTLE SUBURBAN FARMS near Los Angelesi for sale. Easy Tayments. Write E. R. W'aite, Shawnee, Oklahoma. 4-16 IMPROVED FARMS FOR SALE TO SUIT ALL -NEEDS in one of the hest wheat- growing districts in Saskat(ciwan. Enqîtire IL J. Reid, Petrdue-, S 11-5 WANTED TO HEAR FROM OWNER of gond farn fcr sale. Set,ul \u003cecriptiogn and cash price. R. G. List, Minneapolis, Minn. 6-16 IF YOU WANT TO SELL or e-«-hangc ; pnertv Write uis. Black's Business Agcnrv, es. k , Chippewa Falls, Wiî;. 1 4-16 MEDICAL RHEUMATISM NERVOUSNESS CON-ý STIPATION, wéakness of every i1, stom- ach troubles, skin diseases, are curable at the National Institute, 'Carlton,, Blit., Winnipeg. Write for large illustrated'bdok sent'free. T he National Instittte is the largest and most scieritifically cquipped institution in Canada. STAMIPS FOR SALE' STAMPS-Package free to collectars for 2 cents postage; also offer hundrcd differeut foreign stamps, catalogue, h.ingeg-, five *cents.ý We buy stamps. Marks Stamp Co., Toronto. T. P. STAMPS BOUOHT, Sold and -Exchiasigd. Correspondence solicited. O.K. .Pressj PrntV ers, 339 Main St., Winnipeg. SEEDS FOR SALE O.A.C. No. 72 OATS -Bi.ht, absolutely pure; no noxious'weeds; officiaii gehiination test, 95 per cent to 98 p~ et v \"..Ee.Ined and sacked. In lots of 10 bus., r Woicre Or- per bus. f.o.b. J ennler, Alberta. Ëor sié b\u003e the grower, R. O. Klinck, Redcliff,, Alta. 4-16 ALFALFA SEED-BALTIC and GRIMM -the hardicast strains. Forpriçeaec. ap to Canadian Weat Lands, Ltd.', Sf jukAtai ySEtD0eREY FOR SALI 3Ige .arie ty beautful sampen shtlyce. ApplyPotOfc Box 2055, .Winnipeg. 41 PATENTS AND. LEGAL' FETHERBTONHAUGH \u0026 CO..' PA1en Solicitors. The old established' ii. ,enl, Office Royal Bank Buildini, Tolýito'ô r'5 Elgin St,, Ottawa, and other 'pti4~a e*., PRINTING 160 COP#80L BOND EVLcS u 100 Nothieads. printed to yôur' order.,jeO postpaid. Randailûg PriiiterY, '; MACH INEftV. gasolille ensgme cylinders rgbordltd new pliktous and rings cr il eh N gearàs-çast 0 busbvc. . âenetMIxe ors, or boiler». V A. outidry Co.,Priic AJM Sask. 9 FARMERB-My. automatie .raèk lftr r moves heaviest racle in twenty s*coils. Bulld: ht yourself. Costs very littIe, wrk perf.otlrvu -:10 lifting. Write for informatIoù. Dorenîce, Alta. 44A. M ISCELLANEOUS FOR $2.95 YOU.CAN BUILD tslpplebt%- fireproof, ratproof, windproof'H.gtsd\u003elgiroéde RunaPr deys wîtliout attèntion. Boy cain. build one in an- hour. Saw and hardmer \u0026Il' toola needed; easy directions. 23q. pst uil rnoney rcefunded if net satisf e. 9Rdioil o Box 1794, D. Winnipeg. 4 STUDENTS AND CLUbWO1\u003cR-Attoit. ion 1 Experienced teacher and author %2 l l you! with your papiers, essaya, crationj,boolc. reviews and short atonies. Manuserîpts cor- rected and typed. A'ddresp Ona BradleyLacy Ruthilda, Sask. VALLEY RIVER NURSEET offert r4y without protection, Raspberries, Miller nl. j Sîinbeam, $3.00 per'l00; Dakota Straw' ieris, 8.o per 100; Willow Cuttings, $3.50 per, 1b.00. ulI line nursery catalog. 'W. J., iiouglien, Valley River, Dauphin, Mati. 4-16. OAT SPROUTER 81.95, doubles -nui yIeld, cuts feed bilini half. Boy can malçe onc. ln an evening. Saw and hamnier, ali to le. nceded; easy directions. 25c. pont paid. Rgd,7fo Co., Box 1704, D. Winnipeg. .:0 BARGAINS 0UARANITe~ 3I1IN INO STOCKS, l5j35c. lcl ilsXUt Dakota and rich San juan County, Cd!oraio.- N. M. Lewis, Silver Lake, Oregon. -416 RAZOR BLADES UHARPENE]b by ex- perts.* Gillette, 35c, dozen; Ever- Ready, 25c. dozen. Mail to Albert Kcen Edge Co., 130 Biathurst St., Toronto, Ont. 446 TOUR FUTURE. Send queistions' hirth- date, 25c. Dreamns interpretcd loc.. Mediwiins developed. Nellie Lewis, Sflver Lake, ,(\u003eregbn1. 4-16 PERCHERON STALLIONS-Thre an d four years old; weighing a ton. F-W pale. at dealers' prices. T. S. Holmes, ýFairchild, Nvisconsin. 61 MAGIC TRICKS, JOKES, ETC. Cata-' logiies andf saniples, 13uL. Stone, Box,474., Fré-dricton, NXli. 6-W6 LONELY LADY WISHES TO MARRY. Address 1. Isherwood, Isherwood P. 0., Ont. 4-16 j. D. A. EVANS,.,,reiclier of English rom- I.- BARRED ROCKS AND RHIODE ISL ND 'REDS (rose comb) Cockerels for l. $2.50, $4.00 and $5.00 each. If you wat'egodbid a areasonabe rice try without any special care or attention, average over '1.0 eggs each annually. William LaChapelle, McTagati Sask. 4-16 EGOS FOR HATCHING. Prom Silver Cup Winners Rose and Single Comb Black Minorcas Single Comb White Leghorns and B3arred Pýlymouth Rocks. $3 setting-2 for $5. Cckerel. for sale. Try some and be onncd the bes.t are cheapest. Lusk FouI- tryYars, emprance St., Saskatoon. 4-16 WILKIN'S WHITE WYANDOTTES are the last word in w inter egg production-wes- tern bred for western -climate-settings t2.50 fromn magnificent pens, large, vigorous, blocky birds with stamp of quality which by ?rears of breeding have proven to be most prolific lay- ers of the day. Gordon A. Wilkins, 112à Fifth St., Edmonton, Alberta. 5-16 McARTHUR'S BUFF ORPINGTONS - Champions of Manitoba, Saskatchiewan, Alber- ta and Minnesota whenever shown since nine- teen eleven. Write for Prize and Stud Lirt. Eggs five dollars for fifteen. F. . S. Mc- Arthur, Wolseley Ave, Winnipeg. 5-16",
         "wesern Tifont hiy 1.-/Bjy Hugh S. Eayrs. Il~D othitf to do Vrth de- 'Ueroicsz ci. zêing wari1 1bqdy who - ---wo er4 uitting, a bulmoh of u\u0026a- of~ heroics l 1is ité \u0026e ot0ibig over the day's It was ti uva ftrola ]EWope..Battes had -been des- rhapsodised uat amre, length about the. apthy nover. Hisç 1\"ér lçae up aginst, thimarple in- pergment.1 dLf.ç~gup.4.wuthe province on anty sort-i th ýetof tho ar. Batten was a make-up. 1rav~~, 'o day. ase ho came home '4Heroies aiid Iod. us h ld enlisted with the tel o 1t thlr4 -coitiitg%ént. -: -ail there in \"Mit!. ,wviAfaver..yoa-chapa think \u0026bout given ape it,\" ý»id ho, \"I want to toit you that iqeèer have1 1 d14 o boea*s fet it my duty. The o far as it ohIV\u003eethbIng that troubles Ime la- that I cerned. Bul .itOJ~ doue so before.\" somethlngV 'ý'U les,\" mutteret! Ted, intohi reosbil Iip,ý but net no -iow that JSatten had. loua than t eèt opiigit the whbspr. don in the 1 asked hl newsgpaper a There it iE Death-loi (tén u\"M\u0026 am.m. LIdou ni'M*m\"te everywhere sell Save- Tho-HNoe withOCONTIAOT or we uend by Pared Post. £811 OIL SAPPEI UNESI FOR TI u4flnmove theand bave no biemishes. Reducga am puii or .weling Does sot bliàt. or removo the hat and horse can b. *orked. $2 aboule deiivcr d. Book 6 Kfkm FYo.P.l.. 1 38l fi lldia MIe. an\u003eI1d Abserbine Jr. ai mdeuCaaa . em \u003cemoet he WozId BaSé,]ush.. wthroseson them in 8 uushs front the time the soed wma * btuti. It mr nnt sm pessible but * UNM48tB t to b.co. Tber-willi Wlntoor eBinons«o, and wben 8 7B?5 ol eIWIUba Sý-o hundred rom.son euh bush, WI grow in the. hona» memlI m In tIi. ground ln umm.r. zam , éUw Awouui. tk of se.d ount uarnt zaije ei, A.T.E.- Co, Dept. 5, 41 Park Row, New York City BOOK ON ê Dog Diseasés IMaiIed Fe to How t. Food j I ay adrea y H. Clay Glover, V.S. thomutor Ils8Wet 31t St.. N.Y. s.fer 1 0 ar ut mnd GEO. G te or 00 . pontICi ,nothing,» ho aaid, \"Every- -knows ide would accuse me. last of ail.\" rue. Batten was a man Who 1over nothixlg; 'en9lused was the coldand even tom- Stolid, and solid, heroica--of -ad no reprosentation ini his nothing,\" lie sald again, \"I Lhiùk 1 ougkr\"to go. That'a a to it. So far I haven't nny piece. This war might been raging eighieen monthsa its effect upon me was con- ut two or throe daya ago 1woke me up to, a sense of by. It was nothingmore or lho siglit of a stenographer hé ofce crying her eyes out. er why. She picked Up a and pited to a casuaity list. is, 'SDeventeonth Battalion. oson, Private, Hiarry B., at \"I had nothing to dg eéwere ail more oi table, and we took wha out of this sophistry of we did not have ,anyt] deelaring WaZ! P'o;siblv Jlatten broke in agai: \"I arn no recruiting sg your attitude, particuli ho lobleed at him, \"«is - wrong, tili a slip of1 knowing it made me s\u003c have turned myseif ,i scored myseif, and fina do something by waye eighteen montha' indffer of ail people ought nat over titis business. Y( ho a goldier ?\" Ted kickod the coals did not answer. \"You have sat aroun and told this very buii inciuded-of your Dad's berg. You have shown your Dad earned. You1 of it. You were nover APu\". la the sua Written for The Western Home Montbly by Lyd.ia M. Dunhaii \"A .place in the sun!\" the Vulture screamed. 'i ~ hI ave walted long for The Day!\" 50 lhe marsbaleci bis men, wftb- saber and gun, 1, And bidng tbem clirnb to a place ln the $un, Hie ordered tbem forth to Slay. *'\"A place In the sun!\" bis word forsworn, N Belgium was strIcken down., i lier flelcis were trampled, ber towns were burned, lier sons were slain andi ber daugliters Spurned, f N For tbe Vulturo's greater renown. 41A place In tbe. sun!\" andi the fieldis or France Wore wet witb a.crlmson dew. AS tbe test and bravest of ailtbe land For beaftb and home made tbeir valiant stand, Whero the Vulture's minions slew. \"«A place In the suin!\" tbe Vulture screamed, And hlielaugbs ln bis belligh gleé S As the gbosts of the murdered babes arise Wltb their murdereci mothers,-beforo bis eyes, In Scarborougb, by tbe sea. N Il\" place In the sun!\" Let those Who sailed g ~O tInn ta lthneir ocean grave, With neyer a band tecdfot to save 'When tbe Vulture's dread blow fe11. *A place ln the sun!\" Andi the wbole world stands - - Aghast at the horrible crime Or deadiy bomba andi of submaj'Ines, By whlihthe murderous Vuture'nihans To iepacelntbgrsun to climb. \"IA place In tbe sun!\" ànd tbe Vulture prates Or Goci andi bis \"lHoly War!\"I God's chosen people, bis chosen Day- Thon marches forth, God's chidren to s]ay, N Andi to drench God's earth ln gore. I I\"A place ln the sun!\" We chant no hate Of the German bate and greed; I But graven deep on the Innocent sou], I Like flery letters upon a scroll, Lies every dastard deed. \"IA place ln the sun\" Ay, a black blot, Where martyrs' llfe-hlood bas run- A deep, dark, shamneful crimson stain- The staîn or tbe blooci of aur heroos slain- - That Is thy *pot ln the sun! Shorneliffe Hospital. Next-af-kin, Ellen Morson, 75 Wheeler avenue.\" That stenographer whio as crving was Flon Morson. The one wbo lad died was ber brother.\" Batten paused. \"Did yau .wipe the maident's tears away?\" asked Ted, witht\u0026 asneor. \"And it came borne to me right there,\" went on rBatten, ignaring the onerlation, \"Thatthat chap Morson had een kilred, as tons of tbousan'ds more wil bo kilied, ta save a country and a people to whicli I berong. And whie felows like Morson wore getting shot up becauso they were defending me, I was rnaking good nioney and spending it at the hockey matches and the theatres, and beinoaning the war only becauso it -%as responsible for a ton per cent cut in my saiary. But l'in through! From how on, I'ffi going ta do my part. Notiîing of horoics in that I tliink?\" and lie looked at Ted. Ted stirred a trille îîneasilý. Appar- ently hoe folt the aeccusation titat had not been put in woriis. Thon it uvas lie said the sentence that opens this story. of it. WelI, your dad is supposing lie were aiive? lie woîîid b(- sitting I)v a wpre giving tlheir life il think ho wvouid be talki seornfully about 'wipino toi rs awi yVIlDo vou ? Do o with declaring Dr lass uncomfor- at bglm we could , Ted's. 0f cour\"e bhing to do with y-if we had- Jn. sergeant, boys, but lariy Ted's, \" and wrong. Mine was a girl without oashamed that I He went upstairs to hi\u0026 room and iocked the Aoor. Hoe got a book and tried. to read. But ho couldn't read and ho threw the book on the floor. Ife itrode to the window and looked out on the street. There were soidiers marching down the roa\u0026, and lie turned away im- patient,- ullen, angry. Batten waiaa meddler. What right had ho to inter- fere? -Batten wasn't his keeper. Some mon couldn't keop their fingors out of othor peoplo's pies. Let Batten iookaf- ter his own business and loaàve him to iiook afteibis. aIly made myseif Ted waiked Up and down tâe room. of reparation for Me was an intensely,,,ervous man and »ronce. You, TedIý lis irritability show9d itself in queor )t to be so blase ways. Ho went to his dressing tabJe and aur Dad-wasn't straightened that up, putting this in its place, a2nd that in its place. Ho walk- into a blaze and ed over to the book-case and tidied that up.-And ail the time ho was puiiing id tis very fire thii book out and biowing the dust off mch of boys-me that book and leveliing the unevon swork at Paarde- sheivos ho was, snuttering to himseif, ,n us the medals \"Interfering Meddier,\" \"busybody,\" and have been proud so on. rtired of taiking Thon ho wen tot bis trunk and un- ..... locked that, still bent, thouglih uncon- sciously, on finding some action on whieh to work out his irritation and spleen. Hol unlocked bis trunk and took out tbe things theroin and laid them on thc floor. And ail the time his mind was n O'Neilbusy-busy at the job of casuistry, at the task of stifling the voice of con- science. For ho knew in bis heart of hearts, -bhat the reai ego in him ac- --cepted Batten's impeachment. Ho went on lifting the things out of the trunk. lecame at iast to a long garment folded neatiy, lying right at the bottd'm of the trunk. 'He iooked at it, thez iifted it out. It was bis father's miii- tary cloak! Ted knelt there, the cloak in his hands, thinking. That cioak bad been --around the shoulders of the flrst mian in ail the wor]d -to him. Ho bad worn it in India. Ho had worn it in Africa. ý9Ted- fingered it reverentiy, unfoiding it and foiding it again. And ail the tinie the stili smail voice within. him was. taiking. \"Your dad neyer counted the --cost. Your dad nover hesitated. To your dad the bonor of bis cauntry was dearer far than wife and children and borne, thougli these things made the worid a biessed place to him. Your dad neyer said, I had nothing to do witli declaring war!\" It was enougli for biim that bis Kin- and Country needed him. Your dad neyer counted the cost. Ho gave ail. He gave his life.\" Ted buried bis face in the folds of the eloak*' The thing became to the boy the habitation of the spirit of his father. Like Caesar's mantie it became a siuent counsel, pieading a cause. Ted turned it about, sobhing a wbiie. A line of Kipiing's rang througb bis brain and - wouid not ho stili-\"Who lives if Eng- land die? Who dies if England live?\" A long time Ifd remained there, bis head buried in the foids, of the cioak whicb had re-incarnated, re-vitalized the dead dad who was, gone. It was not for nothing that Ted was on bis, knees. - Thon lie rose and striding to the mir- ror, -put the cioak -over bis shoulders. sdead now. But And said to bis reflection in the mirror. ? Do vou thînk, \"You have been a cad. But, please God, a fire wvi]elo c thore is time yet, time tae vear tbis blood? Do 3'oi1 cloak and not disgrace it. Time ta prove ing airiiv and yourse.1f, in very truth, the son of your ]g a inaiden's' fathe r!\" 0o ?\"IV And lie buttoned the cloak about him. Ted flusiied aiglrils-. 'Why bring mny Pater juta this? I said I lad inoth- ing to do with deciaring war. I havon't. It's not my war! Why should J flingr up a good job and.a good tine, and don khaki and go and gtt shot up? I lad nothing to do -ith dociaring war. It isn't imy %var,\" Ih(-*ropeated. doggo-dlv. Then, \"IJf you -want ta go ta -%var, go! No one's stopping you. But (lof't ini- terfore with 1ýther 1pooplo,\" and Ted kicked over t1ie chair and stumibied out of the room, white faced and angry be- cause soutleotua 'litd spoketi the truth ta hini. That wvas it. I lvý%as aîîgr.v heituze he know B1at tu liad spok'enth te triffi,. The old Frenul, divtiiii, \"Le vrai seuil est amiale(.' isiCt universallv frite. Tlie trutti, ta Tud, wias aiythilig but agrce- able.f ,The Christian a Blessing Traveilers in South America tell us of a specios of palm, called tho Tami Capsi, wliich lias the power in a. remarkabie Aegree of. attracting the atmospheric moisture, whviceh it condenses and drops upon tite eartlî in a refreshing dew. In the inidst of an arid desert it rises, and around it a luxuriant vegetationi sooti qprings forth. The flood gates of beaven inay refuse ta open, the flow of the fouintaiuis inav coase, the rivers may slirix-el lita rivuiots, but the life-giviug raii troc is o y the more active in win- inZ t nloistli-e froux the reiuetant air, ai ce'atiing an oasis whore the travel- ler's wear -iv ove shall find delighlt and bis huate tu rw- a cooling shadie. What 9, 1' po uf the truc Chiistian this!",
         "The -Pfrat -Oimp.. et a Cetat . - 3 y Owen Ilall )om and and tried 1 and h. le strode t on the msrching tway i»- a was a ta inter- r. Some s ont of look, af- \u003ehim. to Ïeraom. man sud ni queer ;abje snd this in le walk- lied that pulling dust off uneven himseif, ly,\" and and un- uncon- in which 1spleen. ont the on the ind was Istry, at of con- oart of hlm. sc- e out of garment bottdM if, thez r's mili- ln bis sd been s3t uman id woru Af rica.. lding it lic time im was ted the ced. Ta try was ren and de the aur dad la with for Min ed Min. st. H1e man-of-war.' Heotvoýil4, have been onl a very little mistakèi,, sft4r àa, for it was a time gnd placce in whichi the line between peaceful frado and a flght far life was easily and quickly, lassed. So far as flic Dutch sdventurcrs vIa had their headquarfcrs in fthe East ait Ba- tavia knew, evcry island, in tbose East- cru seas had va]luab!e articles ta ex- change for the manufactures of Europe, a) d ail that was needled uvas ta find the islandsansd get into communication with thbe inhabitanlts. Bothi uniertak- ings were likel yta befuIl of danger, aud more. dangý rous still wvould bea ~meeting, with a ship of Portugal ai Spain, wlhose eumity «1\" Id be certain, 'while fluat of the natx'es wss oul3 likely. Thc Duvffhen ssilod round the west- eru end of, Java and coasted aloug its southern shore, till at last tbe higli conical top of its eastemnmoýt volcana, witli its slender column of bine smoke, grcw fain.t and misty on thme horizon, and tihe Captain felt that he was in unkuown waters. It wes anxious work foreven sa aid and experieuced a sca- man as Master Hans Steffan, aud in spite of hi\u0026 stolid look of composune. as lie paecd the lofty poop-deck or stood y-T,-Was early. in the yeai 1605. Europe Iwas but juîý awâkening te the great E.d1an \u0026,! intro'duced by the. destruc- tion of t.eSpaniê tAriadU; Englarpd vas but just trnsferred from the Iast of the bouse ol Tudor ta the first of the house of Stuart; Shakespeare vas etill acting bis own plays at the Globe Theatre; Bacon vas meditating his philosophy; and Sir Walter Ptaleigh vwas stili dreanifing of new discoverles and,ýsettlements in America. In the far East the star of Portugal vas already setting, and that of 'Hofland vas rising to its short-lived brilliancy; and only five years had passed -since Queen Eliza- beth had signed thé charter of the Merchant Adventnrers, trading te the lequntries of the Indies, whieh laid the. foundation-stoiie of the empire of Brit- ish India..,- The Duteli adventurers in the East were, like their Engliali r$vals, nmer- chants first of al. It was with no Idea of found.ing empires like those of the Spaniards in Mexico and Peru that the thrifty burghers of Antwerp and Iýotterdam sent thoir vessels to the .siatic Archipelago and took possession of Java. To exchange the goods of Europe -for the spiees and gold, the pearîs and preciaus stones of the East vas the objeet with whicb they set ont, and the purpose from whieh they allowed nothing else seriously to divert their attention. It was to this that, folland owed the honor of having been- iLe flrst to discover the last« of the continents, and perhaps it may have been ta this alsa, that she owed it that allie discovered it for others and not for herself. The good ship fluyffhen (or Dove) sailed from Batavia, early in the year 160.5, on a tradiing voyage among the southern isiands of what is naw known as the Malay or 'Asiatie Archipelago. She certainly would not have been called a ship xowadays, and even then she vas perbaps not istrictly entitled ta the titie. She vas a cnrious-looking vessel witfh two masts, witli a low deck and bulwarks for about halfflier length in the middle, and a high poop and fýorecastie at the sterm and bow. It was long before the age of clipper ships, and the Duyffhen had no pretensians ta be considered a quick sailer, but \u0026lhe was looked upon aa a suitabie vessel for an adventurous voyage juta un- known seas, and as onc that could be used alike for trading and defending ' herseif. ~Batavia, from whlch she salied, vas a new port, but it hall been selected, as t'lic capital of the Dutch possessions in the East, and even then had become the centre of the trade in spices, which was Vlhen, and indecd haa ever since been, the ehief tradt of Holland in that part of the world. Trading for spices sounds nowadays a very peaccable and coin-6 inonplace kind of thing, but it vas a8 r very \u003cifferent business wbien the crewvst of the ships of the Dutch advcnturersV took their lives in their bauds ta carryd it on. In 1605 vory littie indleed was known of the Maiay Archipolago. The best charts in existone-and we may be sure the Oaptain of the Duyffhen was suppliid with anc of theso--showedL onlv the south'èrn end of thec Malav i Peninsula, part of thc coast of Sumatra,e and one or two outiying points of Ce!e- l hes, besides an impcrfec't outinfe of Java i itself and a few srnailer islands. Whatd isiands or continents there mi7ht be bevond nobody icnew, but it was notc bard ilta imagine from what bcd heeng discovered that whatevor miglit lie hâl-1 dcli away ini that unknown occan, its woilci contain no people very friendlyp te tlie new-comcrs. I Tt was a real adVentureoan which thea littic Dunyffhon sailed, lher deeks armiedl îvitlm cannon, 'ler hold stowed with al -rts of înercbcandiso, sucli as had been I fiidqltempting te the savage trihes ofV I lic islands the Dittcli aiventurers l! niet with. The crow was a large onie, mind more than half of it consisted of fighiting-nien rather than sailors. Ifa i N-bodv accustomod to modsem vesselst liai found himself on tlie derk, he wouldM certainlv bave suppore'i. when hie gotn over his wondler nt the \u002bn.elkn fflarp iand(jtiF qulaintiv dressed puc'plcf, thiat hoc was on board isome kind of t It W ,t r i was the most deliberate. Master Hans Steffan had corne out on a trading 4d- venture, and ho saw no «pe4iI reason 1for haste. weeks paased Into montils, e and 8ti11 the Duyffhen went deliberately Labout lier. task, and sf111 tthe sto k of nutnlcgs, claves,, ginger root, cinnamon bark, pearls, and -birds of' marvollaus plumage inereased linlier hold. Clinging -to.th ,e soutlwm, ushores of Vhe long thalu 'of lalandas,the Captain hatd at laslt, withnut knowing -it,' pas sed through the aIrait of Timor, and en- tered on what lis knowi to-day as the Flanis Seg, to the northward of Timor ilself. The voyage had b\u003een a pros- perous one, and'Captain ami crew ia1ikç were in good spirits, as tbey ttood eait- ypard, atill Iooking for more islands'as rich as those thoy bcd passed. The islanda were not so frequent now, and tiiose Vhey met with wcre amail, aud not so good for tr'ade, and so they pushed onwiýrd, and the bluff roundcd bowe of flic good ahip, Duyffhien burst their way noisily farther simd farther info that unknown aud esuent ses. At iast.there came a change. It wss the time of the elhange of flhe monsoon,,and -Master Steffan looked 'anxiously at the driving masses of threatening cloud that came ruehing up front the uorthweatern horizon. The etarin came on et leit, wifb al the violence which dhanacterizes that par't of the ocesu, and in a few hours with hl\u0026 bauds thmust inta thelicekets tIhe DuyfiUlicn -was mrun.ning hci-plessly of bis widespnead breeches, lic had but before the gale, atrippcd almost to her littie rcst by day or uig.ht. IEach niglif bare pales, and wallowing l\u0026 the trougli indced, Que took in ail sal, cxcept 'whlat of thc seas. was ueeded ta give the vessel stecrage- Ii s an auxiaus time. Master Stef- way, but lu those unknown seas wlio fan neyer left tIce\u003cleck, and tfli sailors could say wliere a rock mnight show its clung helplessly ta flic bulwarks or hoad cliove, wster? All went wcll, rigging, as thc waves wsmicd heavily -hwevcr. Qlow sud then, if la truc, a ac'rosa Uic low main-dock or broke with scaman wouid repart liaving sigbted jarriug blaws against the taîllpoap. isme strange flali or serpent, aud flic For flirce daysfthe storm ooufinued, sangs of mermaids ont of flue dcpths of with usrdly a sigu of abstement, and thc dark ocean wcre common thinga not for a quartèr of an hour at a time w'hidli nobady on board ever tîmouglit of did the Oaptain venture ta leave the doubtiug, but flic weaflier wss fine and dock, snd neyer fortei singie moment flue sea clear of rocks, snd flic Duyffîen was flic lookout wifhdrawn frai» fIé wenf steadily an ber sdventurous course forefop, wliere lic wstohcd witih strain- wifliout a unisliap. ing cyes forth flicfrat aigu of lsnd ris- As fan as possible flic master had ing ont of the dim world. of thse leaving kept withiu siglît of land. It was by %vater. It was nearly sundown an flue ,no î means difficuif fa do that, as ho rau third day of flic gale wlhcn a change eastward aiong flic southeru Bide of the came, almost as muddenly as flic gale long succession of isands tbant stretcbed hldcammenced. Firat there was a luii nearly duo easf from flic end of Java, lunflic wind; thon Master Steffau's divided from anc another b 'v narrow quick cyc caugilit the first aigu of a straifs fliat make flic long island pro- break iunflic clotîds dowp near flic east- cessio*\u0026zIook like flue joints of anme cru horizon; and i tlenxtie wind died giant 'tail. Prom fime ta 'time flic away, leaving flic Duyffhen rolling Duyffbeu feit lier way catifiouisiy into lieavily between diie sous. In a littlc somo harbor, or casf ancbor undor uîomc whille a breeze sprang up from fle profecting eadland, wbclire smwarms of norfîcast; sails uvore iinfurled once eano-a- 01r0aftracfed by the appear- more, snd beforo ,niglitfall flic vessel amuce of the curions sea-monster-liardiy uvas bea4ling for flhe soiitheasf, wllile less afrangce in aur eyes fa-day flian inlînur bh limr flic amîry Fseswemit dowm, tîmeirs, throe hundred years ago-whiieImmiafld )mthe lcnrau i rril--Y once marc. liad found its *av ta flîir eoast. Ti:îlc juotahli e mlsof fie iindiscoveil.4 -%vent on nierriiv \u003c*iiuiili, for the 'islan,iîisîîial.. Mwvie rieh iin mmarlv aIl] tliiis of Mwlii Thfli soumd tîmat awoke Mastcr S;tef- Cheo Duteli adventfurers wtere ini suarclî, fan franu lus wl-andsleep) was flic and ,te beads and ciaflîs, the uveapons startling cry of \"Land!\" Sf111 haîf and \u0026ornaments, wîich flic Captain of asleep, lic hurried ou dock. The uew tIc % -~ffhen had fo give in excliange\u003eday uvas just breaking in the east, and were th ings of priceless value ta the the sky was aiready flushed witli fli native rhiefs of the iiands. Vovacres f'rst pink of thce\u003ciawn. R1e lookcd n toedava were mut tire hmîrrie l iamtil * yaraimnl. Tese a ami tlinçg5ta uwliicVeh ve iî ePumtomed. anîioon'\u003ctii, imidtflic Diî%Mfl-tci Mas pliunging of ail l-iyagers peiaups the l)tit-Ilumiin nuiîily tflroughi thu glaissy saiell, wîit a.full topokali breeze thar6=Mde 'b., i..! over. fo leeard. .And therç befoir. li% lsy fheel'and-\u0026 high wooded-plt bscked alnpoet at rlght angles byh 1gMer and \u0026tili higber ranges of *Wboded latlg bc4hind whi.ch there waa the reddoùthg ok, fr igteoutline -of the; mcdn- tain-peaka. To ýnorth sund south, aà t# as the eye could reacoh, thé »ew, latid extended, barring the eastorn ,court., sud it wae ueccîsary to change IL.'The wind declded fthc question of tire divie- fian, sand ftheDuyffheu ian down b coast aimant befare the breeze. )(a#oqr Steffan stand gazing at the. heMldlo4 hoe passed thiepmint, not tbroe mn frai» shore. Ie _bad siotd -7 islands ou bis voyage sie ho Ieft h. favis, and had narned them' ail, but naw, as lie watohed the long regehës' of the shore, clathed Irmm b4ch to' bIl. top iu green of a 'âtrange bi'eui. tWi f lat was new and trange tÎO ià *y., it seemed ta hlm as if tit was msorne. thing lifferent. If nmlght l: an.ialand, in\u003cleed, liko the ethers h ha bd oe, but lic would sec. Andsû it\"was that , as ho notcd the outline of*the now -land on his, chart, ho na med the woodrd cap@e v-Oiûre flrst hoe had sêe«n tihe ihore jafter luis Slip, \"«ape Duyffhen,» but' gave no 141nm e fa 4land ho dl qcnvered. Far fhree \u003claya ficthe iyfrlen waled motutliv.'aril down the coaf tintô the great (u1f of Carpentaria. More than once sîme was braiîglît up Into the wind, and a lîoat'm crew Nvent. a.qliioro, but always %vitIm the sanie restilt -theî sailors had fou:nd streams of wsfer, and flowerî, anil palm-tirocs; they had beard the harsli acreams of great white. golden- Cre.Sfed birds; some of theni had soeo strange ieaping forma of animais thu.t disappesred among flie trocs; but ne villnge had licou seen, andl no a4gn of a li-rmnn inliait,,nt liad lipen found. %u ilie Llîli-td aftcru oo thuy alpproftohpil A 21 Mak*ng friendu with the oiu 5 of flic lie boy of bis became c. Ted A line alu sud if Eng- [ivc?\" ere, luis c cloak ,if alized vias not kuces. lic mir- oulders. mirror. se God, ar this a prove of your t hum. Il us of i Capsi, arkable îspheric L draps mw In es, sand nt saoon heaven of tire s May -givinig in wvin- ut air, travel- ,d bis rhat a",
         "49 woe cape, lo= rtbt any tbey haa yet seni ih be the southern limit Of 0t8. s tringe lonely land. At *la.t thé. Du1f3'hen . drew a.brea*t of the pot-;t\u003cand there, far te- ueSout'h as far m-the eye could' ne, tilli treà onvardi 44Îp yodd'shore, and tho high- ranes '0\u003c lthe foree.covered ulountains, lb*!'iuglthe ýlight Qf the sinking-sun. tIý. ' ith'a reluetarut sigh that Mas- ter tfa gave the. ord'er to put the .itp abogt\u003eýand ail away te the north- wýtonemre,, Whilè - he marked upon ïàd cio t ù .m', 'Cape. E:eer-Wee?,\" Amo,1ý\u003eO'ý'.a'ppmeud tlat Rang Stef- fan ~,~td'aand aailed away, ligi.iý' 'tPif 'the, *ew, land lhe had A %lm s~ h ailora',ready to ýtell et -70o the gréat island they Aéfid ', where-tbère were beautiful biidîbtatAJIuKog bgh :fiowers g .e\"l~seut, 'and' curions beans thàt,\u0026àW-~~.büt neyer walkëd, but with né' ~sa~êr~mgn o manponits shores. ~utte.th.maaoe !. 1~Duyffhen, as Iie,~t~b.ut~h truding,,the memory 'of t'hat étrange country came back 'adyet again, and, he wondered 6Wx au lie- smoked his. pipe and pan- d4~wh.ther, after ail, it mlght not Mieal1n to him to, be the first ,te éd~~r.-tbe grogt southern land which ti fremiie, of by navrigators èer .. ound by' Coumabus more than a liuhredyearu befbre. 2thû, foufid byjam acpiden.t, and un- reý\u0026bIed,when it.was found, the man- tai' of tii.'ittie fluvfihen was the lirst 10- \u003climvertua he Ére.uof the great Sonther» Iand ..which wa ýcalI Austra!ja. t 2119nflikey thàt hoelever knew wh-t jhe, had fqun4-; it la certain that he ýme#er dreamed of its value; but still on tii. mape of the lat of the eontinents thiere romain tô'-day the xiames of caprs Du.Yffben and Turn-again, in memory of thé 'happy ch'a4ce by whidh, three hun- dilrd years ago, the good ship Duyffben État ilg'hted the shores of Australia. An offIcer from Japan visiting this country; whila Iooking about a big city, s9w a man stop a milk cart. \"Inlie gotng ta arrest the manT\" ha asked. \"o\"was the anhlwer; \"ha must Se that the milk sold by this man is pure wlith 4o water or chalk xixed in with \"Would chalk or water poison tlue milkl\" \"No, but people want pure milk fthey-pay for it.\"1 .Penssng a hotel, a main staggerad out, struck his head against a lamp-post, anid fell to the pavement: \"'What is the niatter with that manT\"P \"Ha in full of bad whisky.\" st \"la it poisoni ?\"la \"Yes; a deadly poison,\" was the repIy. ý\"Dé you wateli the sclling of -%isky ot aýs yeu do the xik \" asked the Jap. of M i the market they found a mani look- Ing at the'meat tao see if it was Jealtl. mi j\"T oant undierstana vnIîr rounrv.PiC' The Western Home Mè nthly Amn 01\u003cMmes Remt By Kate Seaton. \"lShe is!\" he exclaimed eagerly. then turined away with a littie îîoan, of. desp, ai\"BtI ahave deivJJ e h eh TTE was a quaint little figure, slight speec-\"'perhaps you lave / worriee lier, and wlien she 'fluds out dle truttli IAand frail, with thin white hair, business worries--that barasa yau T\" site will dèàpise me!\" -H afid f ace deep1A* furrowed fiii \"Oh, no,'!lîhx s aid quickly. \"M b - He' broke dawn utterly gn sobbed by the band of tima and much sorrow. ness is fairly goad, thank 3-ou, madain.\" like 'a child. Yet lie carried hýself ereet, in seaming Ille passed bis hand Wèarily ol!er the D3y degrfees 1 got from him the whola deflance of the(e ense of old-age whiclî fiîin wîîilê locks, anie continued jerkily: stary. was 50 surely creepneg upon him. RTe \"I thirik the heat-yes, it must be the Foeuver twenty years he had been that always wore a tail silk bat, carefully lieat whiich is,'-he paused, anai bis eyes respéèta1bly 'vague \"samething li the brué1ed afid polisTied; a rather shàbby met ffixie defiantly, tTuex\"' dropped- ety\"and had lived,'if nat in flffluencc,, f roak-coat, aiea speckless, ana shôwing \"which ie troubling me.\". at least li madest comfart, in a qui. t signe of the -are bestowed upon it; I felt sure lie wvas deceiving me, for he suburb, with bis wie and only childâ. while a broad black bow, tied ln the old refused to meet my glânce, apd began The first break came into their hitherto stl, bad egunte ilok osrtuethe fmbling nervously wiflh the catch of qùiet and unc'ventful lives with the b a eu olokfradt h is ba-g. iîaiifiage of theji daughiter, -%vho im- daiy assngofthequintol fgurc, Su(deýnly be looked up, gnd met n'y mediately afteiwards emigrated along for, punctually an the stroke of tén searcîiing, sympathetie gaze. %vith lier hisbàiid to Ari¶erica. each morni'ng, lie would céufie, trotting ,You-you are very kind to int reeýt, Soon alter their departure the firmn brisly ondte onecarinc yourself in my welfare,\" hie faltered . wlîieh ha hâd served for so many years sna 'klal bag, alert and businesslike. I laid n'y hand impulsively upon ' bad turned hima off to make way for a But the last few moxths I had noticed arm.von-er man. a ~ ~ ~ ~ \" chageinth èlitryfiur. isr you sîîouýld be in any His salary had neyer been lar\"e,, and walk was less briskc, and lie édrried hb i isty hatyuwol ofifi enw e ey itesaeh-efl bag with more effort, while his head adficumte, thatyouwouI coid ene, it ey itl acd e . drooped sadiy, as if weighed down b n-e m epyu, adeansl.hmmself cast adrift, to be,4in lifa afresh, anxious care. Fer a moment lie seemned ta strugglc at the aga of f6r-ty-eight. Then began I had oftexi wondered who ha was, against bis weakness; thel, slawly un- a long, pitiful search after the employ. and what hae carricd in tîîat mysterious- 'bu ttoning bis shabby frock-coat, hae took ment for hc iwscniee o looking bag. Quite by accident the an envllope from an inner pocket and aid. mystery 'was solved for me. I wasasilently banded it to me. At last, in despair, he taok up the pointing hirn out oe day to a friend,. \"Do you wish me to read it T\" I asked, tea - a'7ency, and, with the help of aid when she exclaimed, O'Oh, that is n'y Burprised. friends, managed to get together a littie tea-man!\" Thien seeing n'y \"If 1 arn not'taking up too much of reguilar cannection. Ris wife, who bad neyer been strong, now be.7an ta fail rapidly. The strrin and anxiety had been tornuch for ber, and soaxi ýhe weary nian was left to plod alang the path of life li solitary Ioneliness. At reg-ular inteuvals ha heard fromn bis dauc'hter acrasa the sons, but tliera also was anxiety'and care, for their en- doavors in a now land hiadlm\"\u0026l failed. It was just que long striuggre for themn, and between the flres of\"her *- prit(cd letters li'r faPivr coti!d r-,a'I £ia distress and disaproitn\u002bmTcnt li h\"r hoart. Ha bravelye resore d, th\",refore, tT'at no burdexi froa flT on-l- shauld rest upan ana already so bowed dawn with care. lI Vagua terme ha spake of bis pros- pcrtyli his new 'busincss, a\"d nde aocn'f1ona1 allus,'9n5 ta bis hoii'e ar'd gardons, oq rcferred casually jto bis liauselzeeper and servants. 'HIe aven Ttiraged ta send moneyatntra, ta!:\"ýn frai hMs awnrnd1dicVg savîn7s. The years râý' cd slom'ly by, with no lig1teniiug of the burdens. Thi A goupof ladton Ma. WC.TU. adis i a ramticPatiote prfomane. fcnei his dauglitcr's last letter, tell'ng A goupof ladton , an.W.CT.U Laiesin Drmatc PtriticperOrmnce 1m of her -hushaànd's deatlî and af the enraachingr disease whr-,h prcsagc'd her îuzzled expression, she added, \"Ha bas yvaîr time, madam,\" ha said,, with a ai, mwith the pravor fiat when shbe was eupied aur farnily with tea for the bow. - 1 .. -gone lhe wolildtie care of h\"r ana ehild ast twenty years.\" I drew out what proved to ba a latter -lier lîife Parbie, and airow 'her to Tion and tiîcre I resalvad tlîat an- in thea unmistakable handwriting of a Nb're fliat brautifuil Engli h, ho,.e )tlhr naine should be added ta his list sciîoal-girl.. W'hiclh se lier.4(e1f oid now neyVer s(ec. )f lust'iersta a und skdme. *en \"Dear Gran,\" it began, \"how lovc'ly Pefare tlie letter reachied bis bands the I fund]îin uic aîd aureau . it ls ta think tlîat this is rta'îy n'y tired lnotlîcr hàd passeci aw, v and I fo nd iii q u ck a d c urt ous in ast ter n! I aîn counting up thie days arren - rc ifs w cv re a rcarly afl cat fo 'anne, u\u003cjeseved a a egre; 1an %vowta yôur couiing. Woi't y ru h si'iiî over the arplian child. ce en lie luad been calling upox nae *l , , sad b -.ent andv for over three montlîs, I w-as fne-na-rer sathe Jap. \"'fou watch theat îanngayîannrdaothi hx temilk 'and ]et maxi sali whisky as erigayhn moebuti hn ranch as they phease.\" befare, though 1 feit sure sanie deep __________________ rng-edy lay concealed bcenentli the caliiî exterior of t1iait apparently uneventful After alno, tetn years' experience i life. AU iny efforts to penetrate below the handiling of grain on commission, ' ls reserve lad been met by polita but The Crain Crowera' Grain co. ltd., af lesalute discouragrenxt. 'Winnipeg, lias opened an office in the At4.at I wvas grawing desperate, for I Union Stock VarulsI, ini that cit:r, for flic saw mare cloarly tfian ever thînt lie was bandling of live stoek. Tivre are con- in saine diffltèlty or trauble. His sflghlt Iparatively few (14) do ot knaw wbat figure was becoming mare and inore tIhis cornpany lias donie ta briiiu abaut ix»provement li -the conditionis under attentuaied, and lis tliin wlite iaids véhiJeh grain is niarketed' in Wrlestt cm trenibhed as they disposed of the sinal Çlanda.Thq -i no oub bu tl packâges of téa, n'hule the fine betwvecn tlîey will do much also ta inîiprove con n hesddopigo h ditions for those Wlho sell eattlh, sîîeen hi wlivite lîead, lind becaune habitua]. or boea \"I fear you ara not strang,\" I said The Grain CGrowcýrs' Giaii Co li (.s- oneCday. ning anotiier attempt ta eitred an experieîiced aiid capabile tiîe- pic'rca beiow ]is reserv'e. ilitendent iin Allan-t Ilîî.aîî iMr. I)îîîîvaiî \"I tlîank you, nadani,\" lie answvered, bas been !ii close totîch i %Itli i%1kv stnî-k withi a couirtlv aid luow~; \"but, thougfli I and markets for about 25 yeais, an([ k have nover bcîvory robtist, I assure a coînpeterîrt jud'go of'stock. Re lias an yoiî I aîîî strouiger flian nîiy appearamice efficient istaff and a well equippcd office. %%mnit! sugcs t f Farmers, drovers; or associations ]'ult tliis finie I w'as resohved uot ta throughout Western Canada meed have be so ea-sily put off. no hesitation in using tiha Grain Cro,- \"I anu glad af tlînt,\" I said; \"but ers' Grain Co. Ltd., i the marketing of lnteiy I ]lava thauglut yau have not been their stock. MWrite çthemn for information looking ýo brikht and-fit. M~s the or ask themb to aend thair week\u003chy mar. w'arin %veather tried you T Or perhiaps\" g keti- etter. -as ha did not attemnpt to cheekn'y \u0026I ga o have a unustre-ss in youî' bvnuti- fui aid hiome once a'gain,' and siîan't I inake a di.-niti cd, proud yaung mis- tress? I mean ta put n'y hair up right away, or else the servants -will Z be tiîinking that I arn anly a sclîoolgirl, anîd -sill îot show me proper respect. Only ten lmore days, andti thn-good1- bu-e ta uuîvdear aid -seiiool,aii-- huirrah foriny îne%%, life witi i m char aid Grandad. 1 incan ta take grvat cara of yoîî now, 3au aid dear. You tac, au are ail I have, anti I miefff toiake you veîy happy. I do not tink .)on have iooked quite 50 vcll iatehy. iNIadh'îioisefle tliaughît youl haal.ed very tired -frl a'ttfinIe Cyau wcre liere, btit-wait unfil you have me ta fako careof oyu! (Jooc-bye, dear Cxraîîdaid-for ton more days! 'Tour aw'n loving littie \"Barbie.\" Then carme a line of girlishi crosses. I reati the hcttc*r tiiiowîh \\ry slow]~, for 1 saw fliat bc uas d(lt\u003cŽilag'itateti, a id. alhoulihi-e Wtic'soiue thin,-s l thle lette- îvie lu îcti surprised nie, I mîade 1no rerîuark upoîî thcmi, anlv saving, as I Lrded it baek ta hiiîî: \"I n'as rot inrire thiat ,'ou liad a. rnd-daughicr luit I arn very glad, for \u0026lie smaa a eu affectionate girl.\" As hae praceeded IYith the star,'. the aid mnî's vaice hàd gr-owil steachier, but now it broke a1rali as lie faitercd: \"Ah! If I hiaul ou1Yi,'itd courage ta lindeceive niv-little l' -îrlie at flic firqt! Puit I hall irot. WiîePn I met lier at Liverpool I found tlîat ,IVy TtterIs had dobnc flîcir w'or-koui,' too ' ehi. Tha littie Dmaid lookedod niber aid granid- fatlier as a wcltocgentlenian .and picilired Ili,,; hanse as a hicaufifîil rosi- deuce. I Ilad flot tue iîeart ta undeceive lier. To gain tina until niy plains couhd ho inaturedI took lier ta West part, wliere w-e spent fhîre weeks togoetlir. Wliî'never I fliauglit oî fitw' 'it -100111-y moins at imv g(Iings, in 'the duiTI. gi-ci' street uviere 1 fiâd ibeci, so' lo -,J iraik afresli fromn the thiaugit o0 tle disappointmnît àwaiting lier. S!!e n'as tiftccîî 'vas tail for lier age, aiil, tlioîî'l (i l îrbfly al f)rlui 1 y'au-s.I found ta t hier udîicati i ai becu rathier irreli rions a nd ims ui~-atkIîci \u003cn.. J1ma (! iîiîiris c.w\u003c iigternis at a good b)011ii uii - ý(11l , naiW~ rrck-oued 111) mî ~ ' r rtiea uîd fillai l*-va rranged ta i-v 1jur tirere. To Jlt-r gi-c di-ýajI- porirte 1rît I so anriurgenî for ber ta 4 \u003cri 1 maatiauis at t1ire scinool, and as t u i 't f iry'e otic-r pupils, w'hosa ltiris v\"eal-roc d, ira dii thesane, it wa'c*i rr altogother lonely for ker, and * .t - I ~' t-- v - 1",
         "njy. then uîîoan, of ber,\" le deceived Xie trufli sobbed lie whole been that lui the affluencce, a qui't ly chilà. hitherto vitli the wbo irn- ~d along the firm îy yoars ty for a r'-(o, and e f9dnnd Safresb, n begant ernploy. ?red too up the of old 4tber a strong, 3 stririn 'ch for vas loft solifarv- d frorn .t tlicre ioir en- itriigg'e of her Md r-ai in li'r \",refore, bowed I feit glad that I bad turnèd 'back, foi mny specirnen glasses and, after a little debate with myseif, bad gddËd to my collection a dainty afternoon tea-clofli. \"I hope you don't mined,\" I said apM~o- getically. --h-lave brouglit a feîv fowers and-'tne or two littie things for tea. I thonghit I wouid like to bave a briglht table to welcarne aur young jfriend!1\" ýo adow tyu \"Oh, no, Umm,;yUeu owa a like,\" she answered; \"but I\"ý-with a slighfly aggrieved air-hlave no'tirne to waste on those fal-lals amd tbingsP\" I smiled, and *itbout further delay began the pleasant task of transforrning thîe dingy roorn. When I had linislied, 1 looked round w ith a sigli of satisfaction. Tiiere was certainly an improvçrnebt. The table looked swvcct and ternpting, in spite of the oid chipped china; the sceut of the roses lîad overcomne the unwhole- some fustiness whieh bad grceted my entrance. I threw open the window, and then, after a final survey of my handi- work, was about to slip quictly off -home again, thinking it best tlîat my friend (as I had corne to cali hlm in nîy own mind) sliould introduce bis little xnaid to ber new borne alone.ý But my plan was frustrated, for even as I paused for the last glance round I* heard a four- wvheeler drive up to the gate, and in- mediately the front door was flung open as a voies cried ont qnickly: 1 fiýrt#r consoled bler by spendi qtIrele weeks of the summrer vacation withbher in Wçstport.\" Hia voice grew drearnily rerniniscent. \"'Three whole happy weeks away by the sea-alone with My littie l3arbie.\" Hie sigied wistfully.- \"Madanj, you can- not ecnneive wbat those weeks of bright-ý jiess meant te me-stolen, as it were, frorn a whole ypar of duli, lonely ones- for a solitary old man to hear the glad tones of welcorne in a young voice; to have a wealth of ]ovin- affection warrn- ing the coldnessa of Lis lipart! Ah! xnadarn, ao you wonder that, for the tiine, 1 forgot the duil, grey life behind, and basked inu the brightness and joy of the present? Tlis summer our holi- day was not quite se bappy-so bright.\" ile paused, and 'his voice grew sad. '«I eould net liake off the thought of thec change wliieh was now coming so near. 'You have read ber letter. Tell me, wlien she learns the truth, will that warm, impulsive love grow cold and conternptipbus \" lie loorced at me piteously. \"I do not think se,\" 1 said bopefully, \"thouigh I fear s will be terribly dis- appointed. But when she learns of al the sacrifices you have made for her these pat three years, P feel sure lier yoiing heart will respond to your love!\" Ie ghook bis bead despondently. \"You have not seen xny littie maid,\" lie said earnestlv. \"Sue bas grown into sucb a tali, proud, beautiful girl, abe will be asbamed of bier poor old grandad\"- bis voice broke again-\"-fand-sbe will bave cause to be!\" Hie turned and strode towards the window, where lie stood awhile figting with bis emotion, and when lie turned to me again lie bad recovered bis old stately manner. \"'Forgive me, madam,\" lie said depre- catingly, \"for troubling you with ail my private affairs.\" lie bad become once again the stiff, unapproachable gentle- man 1 bad bitherto known. 'q must really apologise for troubling you, but -you were go very kind and-syrn. pathetie. I thank you for your syrnpathy,. but now 1 must not take up any more of your time.\" And with a quiet bow 'lie took up the oid black bag and left the rooni. As I watcbed the slight figure move stiffly dowu the garden patb, I realized afreq'h the bitterness of his life-sorrow, and I asked myseif bow it would al end. Must bis brave spirit be defeated at iast, tbe cbapter of love bèelosed before bie had «fully experienced its sweetness ? With a sigh 1 turned away to take up again the everyday duties of my own more prosaic life. But tbough I fouéId many things te occupy my time and attention during thé next few days, the littie old man, 'with lis pitiful story which prornised so sad an ending, was often in my mind. To-morrow bis granddaugbter would leave hier ligbt-bearted, girlish school- days bebind, and would take up a worn- an's heritage of disappointment and sorrow. The loyal. wbole-bearted trust of a young heart in the one being she loved best would be rudely shaken, ber youing eyes opened te the faitb-sliatter- ing possibilities of duplicity, even though the motive bad been kind. I rernembered bis description of the smnall, dreary rooms in tbe ebeap littie lodging to whicb lie would bave ta bring tlie girl, and I resolved that at least they sliould boive a little welcoming 'briglîtness ta meet ber disillusioned eyes. Early in the afternoon, therefore,1 1 set off, arrned with a basket of sweet- srnelling roses, and another of tempting dainti4s for the tired travellers. The door was opened ta my knock by a frowsy, iired-looking woman, wbo, in answer to my request te bc allowed to enter Mr. Austin's roam, gave a listless assent, and, throwing open a door at the side of the narrow passage, usbered nrie into a duli, cheerless little room. \"Yes,\" abe said in answer to my in- quiry, \"I expect 'ern home in time for their tea.\"1 I glanced towards the littie round table, whieh showed signs of preparation for tea in the shape of a soiied table- cloth, a glass sugar-baqin. and two cups, c.racked and chipped atthe brirns. G.- F, Stephetis 8aC o, Limited 1 lrookcd atli in amazement. WaË flue the saine worn, broken-dawn ohâ man 'wbo had sobbed' ro,'h is pitiful story ta me.* only a few days ago?1 Hie heail was bsld proudiy erect, bis mnanner.briek and. aient, *hile bis eyes se9uied-ta spankie with giadneas. Bêfore I could enter a furfher profeot the door was fiung quickly open; and a talM, hligbt, beaufiful girl came im- pefuously into the room, and then paused aliglitly as slle canght sigit, of mue. .A proud light elione in thec ol man's eyce as lie took ber band and led bier towande me, eaying: \"This le my littîs Barbue, and thi\"ý-- with a aliglit movement ia my direction' -\"ethe lady wbo was so kind as te* listen ta. the ùnburdening of ân old m\"n'a beart 1\" The girl put up ber sweet-_ face Im- pulsivsly and kissed me, ,saying brighfly: \"Tbank you a thousand times for your kindness ta my dear, unself[Ilh grandadi\" She looked ait hirn with sliining eyee, thien tturned ta me and said soffly. \"Hes lias told me-everytliing!\" \"Nof quite everything, Barbie, dear,\" lie Ibroke in quickly. \"Thiere ie ans thing I 'have not yet told eitber of you.\" \"lls!\" interrupted the girl inipetu- ously. \"I wilI not hiear any further confession!\" She laid ber ernaîll and gcnfly upon bis anm. Then turning ta, mne, she said earnestly: \"focs flot the fact that lie bassacrificed( even the last of luis eavings for mue atone far-evcry- thiing 7\" Hie looked at me and. smiied, \"4You sc, yau were riglit, affer al- my fears -were groundleas; elie still loves me-in apite of everything.\" \"I aliotld think so, inl!eed!'. cnied the girl quickly. She linked bier arin in bis again, and glauced towands nie -luif dleflantly. \"And I arn proiid of him, tool Would yau not beý if anyone lîad macrificed as muell for you T\" \"I arn sure 1 shtould],\" I said beartily. .He sliook lus hiead doubtfully. \"I fear you are bath too generous in your judgment of me. But, Barbie, 1 have no funther confession ta make-I thiink you bath know the worêt'of me now. But I have some good news I ]lave 'not told either of you yet.\" lHe ttîrned ta me apologetically. \"I did îîot knowif myself until this nîorning, w1klen I got a lawyer's letter telling me that 1 was no longer a poor man. Tt seeis tîjat an aid friend, ta whorn I bad once been able ta do a good tiam, and wborn 1 had losit siglit of for yeane, bas rscentiy died and lias left me a conaidenable fortune.\" 1 lbeld ou n my aud. \"I arnsodeligltedl My hertiest cou- gratulatione!\" I cried. \"«Tbank yon.\" Re amied, thon ti*ned ta the stanfled girl.' \"Bar'bie,\" lie began; but ah. .pt*g euddenly forward and, seizlng hlm bythie ehoulder, shook him pray-fuilfy. . \"Yeu dear aid fraud i -ohé -4etd. \"lLeading me ta believe that you; wüê a porman!\" - She turned to é mé lu màt despain. \"And bers are'ail the wandiift plans I ba\u003cl fanmed for belping my'dir- limig Cran cnuglhed at oe blo*, and l'am ta becoune a useless member of *ooetyI after \u0026Il.\" He piaced his anm lovingly sboutthlie girl and said pnondlys \"My lit fie Barbie's love bas atood %ho test well, and I amn glad that'she ha., proved if wben aseoniy knew the waret.u# She tried ta laugh, but bier uweet lips quivered aensitively, and lher oye. wýere 'wet as ah( tunnied ber bead away, saylng ligbtly: \"I belleve the tea la waIting, and-I bad almoat forgotten lîow hungry I *an. Please take your seate.\"1 She waved us towande the little table, and taklng lier own place behind the.oid black teapot, s presiled over us with, a sweet, shyr gracioneness very pretty te ses. Mben sbortiy aftenwards, Ileft thiem alone with tbeir liappineas, there w\u0026s a miat before my cye and a warm glow in my beart that the story whlch bad pnamised se aad and tragie en endiug slîouid bave been tnmned teoans af Joy, and that the brave aId lisant was at rest at laet-rejoicinig in love. As ans passes middle lfe tbe fires burn more elowly, the appetite in les- se-med, fthe digestive powers iowered, an(l the aupply of batlh fuel and nitre- genous foodesf s lie in nerordanêt-,witj the constitution, net enaughta ehoico thiese slaw.burning fires. The eapacity for action, of course, in diminislied, so that the demand' for nepair material in cornespondingly diminished. Stimulatink fooda, sncb as meats, muet lbe taken in very amaîl quantifies, or the aged will suifer. While the enduring quaiity of' thec body depende upon the adJustment of ifs severai parts, it now requires greater attention te produee a lieaithy 01(1 age. Thompson tells us thaf lie finds those persons who go back to aimôst the food of young chiidhood have a more conifortable 'epding than thos who stirnulate the nervous eystem wlth nitrogenous fods. In the economy of Nature, death rornes early ta thome whe .di8obey ber laws. '1 \"Mns. Janes . Mns.Jones! 'Wbere are yau?\" I acarcely recognized the voies. There was an imperions ring iu It quite new ta me. Even the listless landlady seemed ta become sudonly consclous of the ciange, and nonscd borself acconding- uy. \"I arn bers, air,\" se aid respect fully, as she burricd forward ta ineet tiîcr. \"Please show Miss Barbie up ta lier noorn, and then-let us bave tea as soon as possible!\" Tlien followed a slight swish of skirfs, and a bright young voice said, langhu- ingly: \"Yes, 1 arn desperately bnngry. I shail inof lbe two minutes faking off my bat and thinas.\"' I stilli hoped thiat I miglit make my exit unpeen, but flic aid man caine straiglu tlinto flic room, rubhing his bauds gleefnily, and ut tering a pleased littie cliuckle as hie entened. Hie glanced at tlue table, and gave a cry of surprise and pleaure. Tii n lie cauglit sight of me' as I stood un- decided, enmarassed. \"Why,\" lie exclaimed, \"your kind baud muet be flic wand that bas transformed my duli littie room!\" \"I hope you will forgive my intrusion,\" 1 faltered. \"I xmwant te bave left before you carne.\" Hie laughed joyously. \"Intrusion, indeed!\" lHe beld ouf bis baud. \"If was like your kind lîcart, flear lady. T arn so .-li] you arv lbore. Going ta slip off before we came, in- deed!\" Ile led mne courteonsly towards a chair. 'Tou wil etay and have t4ea ,with us, and-meet rny little maid. You muet,\" lie enntinued imperatively, as I uttered a feeble protest. s pros- n\"-nde e ard fo bis even ;erva1.q, ']y by, Thon tell'ng of the cd her he wvas e child her tA r se. AIs the 7and tt for y. the r, but ge t fi rst ler at s ad Thue graîd- and resi- ccc ive could t part, ether. ,littîs 'l the aulglit Ils. I ather ifla\u003ce good :Oned Pd tou s~al- or tA id as close are, and",
         "a, By.S. Dike Hooper., IBumpe, rancher, stage owner, and 'preminent ciien of Wild Rivet,, wubusily' engaged-in bis ,morning d4ty of. making out-way for ~ie.\"den\" tNrg when h. be- ul4y. aware 'of an Impending tplIn Tat le, the presence of efir msi-ent intruder in the tiùiy, k.;' 0noffce foreéd itself upon awîiUhg ,oniousnems. ý4 .w is it, Bub,\" h. asked oluà* t.,ttP, eorreetiy divining the ~-~p~ximate age of the, palier ut. nhas giancing up from \" atot appiy for the. job of sta \u003c4'ei betweren here and the SprinI T4:. Bumpa 'threw down his mu( \"ed p$Ùdl' and wheeled abouti âsýÔnlshmèpt. *'fliere, facing hum, \u0026toc ;ad of, pefhu.pe ixteen yoars. uIiÎem, rêslute- face looked out froi lbeeutMi .the bbrIm of a very mue bit.tew.d fèt hat. The applicant wei 0W~ familier Oregon weodman'e ehir with .shoiýt talle hinging, outeide, and ý,4qi~ r. 0of -blue: denim everallaetc 4il:t below the tops of bis hig à~.' boots, completed bis attire, a * whch vwas decidedly the worue f\u003c b erof the stage lin. broký4nt e-, ud. though not unkind laugh. *hWhy, Howard,\" said lie, rocognizir tiâý lad, 'q couldn't give you that job. \"$y net?1\" nei troubiod blue eye lô hgsa4ugrtly into bis own demande \"'Beëauue yeu're eniy a kid. Il'y.ga te . hae omeone wbe can drive. tha- tiam nte thte Springs after'liark, and ge- lem there on time; and ligit eut o *hère befe)re daylight, and pull lin berg oi itùùfe. *'Yr.see r i-m able, te Uncig @Wmfor afine ifthie mail i. late, an 1' c*n't afford to, put ne 'excess baggage Wt h. driver'u \u0026sat.\" .\"I el an hindi. a teani, and 1 know th( tqaidrigit ggod,\" said the boy, a nt «fýdiappointment cr eping into b' voice ý'T droviafroight ocn for Mel Haggetl !Lil .l]st summer.1 \"Thiat's ail rigbt, son, replied1Mr. DBulups, in, a kindiier ton., \"but a stage * it a freigbter. You stick te freiglhteri 4ra few.vears longer, and thon maybe well se. And with an air of finality the. magnat. turnhèd te bis booksu. As A. lo wrd, left -the barn bis face wore a . iroMbied *frown. The world looked petty cold and cbeerless te hlm. There wga, ne freigbting te be done, and Eli 4iimpsnmutlave known that. Since hie fatber's 'd4aih,, ln the fail, lho had managed te talc.. carte of bis mnothmr's sud bis own simple wants, by trapping. AIl thiough, tbe .cold raina aud snows ho h'ed .peraistently fouglit bis way far up t4èe. mountain s ides te* make the rounds otfÉils trapu,,but'the season had come to a close, and hoe must flnd work. Thus.'it *as that wben the down stage pulled eut, haif an heur later Howard mnight have. been seen occupying a smnl port ion of the rear seat. There mugt be..pienty of work iu the city, sixty miles down the valioy. A great many peop)le lived there, and, they musC ail have me means ef making a living. Re was strong and wiiiing, and could noe doubt oasiiy*find work. And se the lad reasoned te bimself during.the long day. Aud xnany were the regretful looks ho cnet bebiud at bis beioved montains ,as ,tii. vaiiey -broadeued, aud tbche bus tapon çither band diminished in size finlly te b. swaliowed in the great, rolfing wheat fields. But work h.e must, aud there was ne work te bo bad in thie anountains. As the inst familiar peak fsdod ite the sof t purple haze cf the failing niglit hoe sigliid, and sqmared about, manfuly, drawing bis rougit shirt closer against the unfainiliar ,dnînpness. It must have been about a week later, on. a blustoring. rniny morning. iiat theo driver cf the ùp stage oertook Hloward Bhortly after dayiiglmt somo ten miles fromn the city. JHe was liiedd for tlie inountains oit foot. and as tiiere woro ne passengers lhe gladiv nvailed bimsoif ûfofb tedriver's invitation te 11mb iUp and rest bis boots.\"' It would have seemed good to b. perched up beside the stage driver at any. time, and ai Howard was both huigry and foot-sore h. feuýnd it doublyvagreedW~e. He nade\u0026'non-comnittal replies te the drivtmr's inquiries about bis doiîîgs in town, and feeing serry for the lbÔy the driver did not press'hlm *With, quèstions. 111e .search for wo'rk bad e~n fruitioss. Positions were scarce at best, and if the truth were known, bis clotimes cdmbined with bis total ignorance of the ways and~ work of a city had counted heavily againet hlm. .\"Btter crawl into my extra oiieker, Howard. It'asesttling in for a right bad spel of weather. Wbat I don't like lu this wind. Driving through timber in the wind i8 bâd business.\" The words had scarcely left bis lips wben Howard shouted a warning. A flying 11mb was sweeping through the air directly towards the borses. The driver set tbe brake and brougbt bis horses to a standstill just as the great branch struck, butt foremost, directly behind the leaders. Terrifled, the leaders commonced te buck and kick frantically, throwing tbomselves into a frightful tangie. At every move the .pricking of the rough i r needies .increased their un- governable panie, which hmd communi- cated iteelf to the wbeelhorses. Turu abouti 1 \"Take the linos,\" shoutod tho driver. \"I mnust get that 11mb eut of tier. before those leaders break the wheel herses' legs.\" Howard grasped the linos with a tbrill of pleasure, anid siippiîig his foot on te tIhe brake began te speak te tiie herses in flrm, reassuring tones. Fert-anateli the loadors had swuug apart, aud were Lickig eut lu the ch,,ar, yet te got iu beliind them, and lu front of tiie wvhelers was te expose one's soif te imminent danger. Running 'forward, the driver wntciied bis chance, anîd siipped lu safely. Grasping the limb hoe was lu the net ef backiîmg eut whou the noar leader swung lu ever se siigiitly. and felinge tie imb behiud hlm strnick out with terrifie force. Witiî a iow cry of liror, Howard involutariily tiiroev ls arîn across bis eves. 1Wiien lie lookod down the driver lay huddled in a heap at the 81(10 of thi entia. For jmst an instanit a soisation of dothly fanueiss swept t er Howar'd, and hoe reeied iii the seat. Tt wns but niomentary. Pram-iuîg iiinsm'lf tegetiier lie ienît down. The poor driver lay as lie hnd fallen, and llomvard fliriiv ai gCelith' roiled h iii on b is baek. Io~-ýeî iîîg hiiq suirt at the neck. ut id kiliowliuî tlio min te hoat dom-nu upon is ls utii-ruie\u003cl face. H-e revivàd aliiuotiiindlt , but at the first attempt te iove lielny back with a gren of ageony. His righit le- ivas biroIkoi above the knee. c'ouse. Howard. You ieam o ie bore 4imd sond time people from the first lbouse you pass back after me.\"- Thiougli reiutant te abandon theo driver in bis plight, Howàrd 'quickly \"Hlold- on, kid., You'll have tP work realized that the older man's. judgment hlmi to-day. The regtîlsr is lame.\", wae best. It was clearly the only thing \"Iitn t okhim\"'Y pie to' do, and every moment's delay pro- Howard, coolly, \"but I want hlm on the elongèd the.poor man's suffeîlng. Running~ wheel. 1 got Unele Sam's mail on th* \u0026back to the stage lie has;tily'drtèw forth stage, and no time tg fool with buX ~ e two heavy vaierproo,.f làp-robes, andgishoesntelad' mnade: #b\u0026'dîver as comfortable as pos-- '\u0026411 riglit, 'Uncle S'am,\" responded the e sible. A'fe'.v moments' woi-k on the de- speaker, 'good h'tmoredly, going to bis r' rangcd harness, and hie swung into the assistance. The change mnade, the youth- edrivâi's high seat, picked u? 'the linos ful driver pullod a. stouît rope from the *anid kicked. the brake free.' In' a boot of the stage, and knotting it *twinkling the nervous horses were off firmly, about the balky horse's girth, at a gnllop. Chance had given hlm the carried the end forward and made it fast longed for opportunity to drive stage, to the end of the pole. 1if only for a single day, but this was Again hie picked up the reins and Ffarthest from bis mind. Ris chief con- spoke. A quick response, a sharp cern was for the.wounded driveor, and struggle, and out of the barn they fiew, lihe let the borses have thoir hcads until the balky horse jragging on ail fours'. 'li recalled the firat ranch bouse. The Once outaide the barn bià stubborn mood 5ranchmen only waited to ]earn of the left him, and hie threw himself forward i wbereabouts oi;---i-Îjured driver before into the collar, nono the worse for bis starting for the barn on the run. There shaking up. swas nio further need for baste, and 'H:ooray thero, Uncle Sam, you're al L Howard pulled bis teamt down to a jog right,\" shouted one of 'the men after 3trot which they could keep up for mile hlm.'. 1e slipped down, removed the rope, 3after mile, and devoted himself to the and waving them a choeery farowell, ework of slinging off mail sacks as he turnod the leaders' beads into the storm. bpassed the crude mail boxes of settiors Long before Howard roachied bis ralong the road. Fortunately, lie bad destination hie feit sore inovery bone and e made the trip so many times in a freight muiscle of bis body. His arms fairly ,wagon that heknew the names of every ached fromn the constant strain of bandi- 1single scatterod rancher, and wbotber hie gth evhos nteruhmu- h o bsmail at a hollow cdaran col nghebayorsonteoglmu- goilto a poear, smpanh tain road. Nevertheless hie grew even a gailed t oto ipl o h little bit elated as the aftornoon wore Heroud.\" t h on tprgto one. He was where hoe had longed to be, Ho plledint tbenoo sto riht Olcd better stuli bie was in bis own moun- t:ins again. A suddon thought fiaslied .cross bis mmid that mnade his beart fairly leapl with joy. Perhaps if ho got in on time, and bis horses were in gond shape Mr. Bumps would give hlm a trial on tbe stage to the Springs. At exactly four-twentv- p.m. a very wet, and if one xigbt judge from out- ward appearances, a very much sbrunken driver pullod ln bis steaming borses, set bis brakos, and brougbt hbis stage to a stop in front of the Wild River Post Office. \"Suffering sailors,\" gasped lil Bumps, as lie gazed up at the sorene, diminutive fio.ure perched on the drivor's seat, on- velined in a groat slicker. \"Won't bhave any fine to pay Unce Fqm to-night, Mr. Butnps,\" said Howard, c\u0026-cerily, the while tug-,çing at a buckzskin thong, and finaliy proudly drawing froni the neck of bis shirt a very large watch, the bands of wbich dosignated tbe bour at which the stage was due. He thon b'-iefly acquaintcd the stage ownor with the particulars of the regiilar driver's iwshar. W\" H0 boiewas liqtening MVr. Bumps' practised oye raii quickly ýover the borses, and came to rest on the off is fairplay wbeelor. \"Sn\"said lie, soiemnIv, \"Ilow'd voit time, and drove proudiy througb the big get that 'bunch grasser' out of the bnrn.\" bar-n, swung his horses iu a snail circle, \"Hitched a line to him and bauiod him. and drove back agnin, just as hie had out,\" replied Howard, calmlv. \"Weli, so often seen the regular drivors do it. ber. comes the mail, 1 must ho' a going.\" The stable mon wholjstood in readineErs \"Goin? -where ?\" to unhitch the tired hbrses and substitute \"Springs,\" was the brief rejoinder. four fresh ones grinnod up at him as thougb it was a joke to see hlm in the \"Look ber., Howard, that's a bard n. driver's seat. Don't you want me to go along with \"Hello, kid; where's the stage driver?1\" yo~?\" asked one. \"Nope,b replied Howard, stowincr the '\"I arn the stage driver,\" replicd How- mail sacks with Èis foot. III got to mnake ard quetl, felig hmsef crowredtime, and 1 don't want to be botberod ard, ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ t quelfeigwtsî rwmd~ ith no 'excess baggage' intue drivor's about the cars. sa. \"Well then, vhere's your son that M1 sont.\"l Bms ondhmsl usually drives ?\" porsisted the joker. At faetuaewt h otatr h thi saiy he on rok ino aroa ofstage baving drawn out frorn between aughter in whieli Howard good naturedly tM. joined, and as thoy proceeded togethor to t\"Uoneirv.\" Mr. Bumps spoko slowly, thie Haif Vay Ranch bouse te dinner lhe briefiv relatod the events of the morning mliszng i oe it i ug fc iîe. 'leumiv. go0 back into that Lo ymptheielisenes.store and lav out à flist class outfit for M-lion lho returnod to the barni fresh t bat boy. fr'om undorclothes to slickers, horses were already harnessed fo t1ie and sot it down ou the books agyaiist tage. Ho -%vaiked once around the rig, ny namo.\" I i rapJiuay gwancig vethe whVIVoIC oUuit, and mmoumted te the seat. \"Ail rig-lît,\" lie cailed, taking iu the linos until lie eouid fvel every Iorse, on the bit. Tlue bovs stood hack fronmt the liorses' leads. Howa id spoke sliatrid. andt thre. of the iorses responded to- gethior. but the off leader oniv 1damted lis feet firil tog-ether on the romgh baril floor. and settled back, in thme barpeý. la ring bis cars fiat angainst bmss bond. .'[ho( inmi comnminced to grin. How-ard set tie brake, ieapt down. and comîuenced te unharness the balky animal. In preparing a sanop for rice do not ilnike thie vervY cominloin mistiko of mak- illgi it too elal)orate-so plaborate that it billes tuie flavor of tho vrice. JEiel creain. wt itli te addlition of sugar. or soine kind of fruit. lio is more qatisfactorv on ilii. l~ u n.than a. Sauce. 'Use PURITY FLOUR More Bread and Better Bread. (See Back Cover)",
         "F:\"eJ T'he.atmAm\" am afpe By Miss Margaret Bemister ta work replied n on the on Mh Sbuflth- ndled the 5, to bis, e youth- 'rom the tting it s girth, e it fast ins and Lsharp ey flew, I fours. rn înood forward for bis u're al n after lie rope, areweii, 9 storm. Ad his one and fairly F handi- i moun- even a n wore d to be, i moun- fiaslîed heart lie got in gond a trial HE lounging figure aleep on the bencb outside the Western Hotel A'door did not stir as the rays of'tbe sun grew botter ani more direct near noon. Neither did the shunting of the long traiin disturb him as it sullenly Ouffed its way backwards after standing in front of the low station for an hour. Now, as a heavy hand was thumped down on bis shoulder and a hearty voire shouted in his, car, \"Hi! there! wake up! Don't you know there's a circus corne to towm!\" ýhe only muttered sometbmng and settied down more comfortably in bis set. ButSamn Wilkins was not to bre put off soeaesily. Takiiig boid of Larry's shoulder, he pulled him unresistimgly to bis feet and turned \u003ehim towards the steps. Larry sbuffied down them mechanically after bis companion and joined the group making, its way to the rear of the long train now on the siding. \"Where're wc going?\" he questoned Svaguely at last. \"What're ye ail talking about?\" \"About the circus, of course,\" rejoined eome one near him, \"can't you see the cars?\" Looking in the direction ifidicated'by the latter's finger he became aware of several gaiiy painteci cars, from wbicb, down slanting gang planks, the circus was being rapidly unloaded. A buge tentbad aiready been erected near the track and to it, in a steady propession, the heavily-laden cii-eus hands were makimg their way. \"Tbey're gettin' ready for the parade,\" said Sam, \"it's goin' to be at twelve 'clock sharp.\" \"It's-it's a real circus, ain't it?\" mur- mured Larry in dazed taiies. \"I ain't seen one snce-since years ag.\" \"'I guess you ain't the only person that hasn't seen one since be came West,\" put in Sam. \"They don't grow wild o'n thc prairie, circuses don't. Lucky tbing ns tbere's that wasbout ahead se they can't go on. They're goingto give us a parade now and a show tonight and I guess WC won't turn eut to a man, eh?\" 'Larry did not answer him; in fart, he Lad not evcn heard for be had pushed into the group surrounding the end car fromî which severai impatient elephant truniks were restiessly waving to and fro. Eacb joyous shout from the small boys crowded1 close to the car made bis bieared eyes giowi and bis mouth tremble witb excitement and ho pushed and elbowed with the rest to obtain a btter view of the animais. Suddenly evcry' one's attention was diverted b y the sound of voices. Near themn stood the Manager and an angry- faced man in bot dispute. Encirdling them curiousiy, the crowd was just in time to hear the finish: \"You do as 1 tel you or quit,\" said the Manager in firm tones. \"Then 1 q uit,\" retorted the other, flinging down bis cap and coat and turning defiantiy away. \"It's the man wbo piays the steam calliope,\" wbispered Sam to Larry. \"I wonder what the fight's about?\" \"Keep quiet,\" eominanded Larry. \"He's sayin' sornething.\" It was the Manager Who was speaking.i \"ICan any one bore play a steam calliope?\" hoe asked. \"I1f se, will ho pioase corne forward. 1nm anxious to start the parade on time and a voluntoor will be iiberally paid.\" There was utter silence in the crowd as they iooked from one to another expert- antly, but no one moved te accept the invitation. \"Is there any one bore wbo is accus- tomed to an organ?\" urg d the Manager. \"'If so, just kindly stop forward and I think you wil1 find you can manage the Calliope airiglt.\" Again there was silence, eacb eagerly scanning the faces of those around him. Then there was a slight stir and a man hegan to pusb slowiy to the front. They lu ack quickly to make way for bim and 1 urned witb ill-concealecl grins wben they ~'Who it was. But Larry Moore,-his Id cap in bis hand and a strange, eager lokon his face, neyer not iced t hemn. He \u003cdged his way througb until ho stood in frornt of the 'Manager. \"Cnyoeiplay an organ\" the latter\" ;[skcd, bis keen .eves seernirng to pefletrat(' Larry so deeply that he trembled. \"Yes,' sir,\" bo stammrered awkwardly. \"f I 1usedj to play the organ lots w',hcn-- bon - hefore I1ce lehere,\", Mason \u0026. Ris-ch --ll.xited' Factory Branch:- 302 Portage Avenue, Winnipe-g, Màn. uPnj \"Then corne and try the calliope, \" ie- plied the Manager, turning wjth a quick decisive movement and walking toward.s thé tent. ' ari-y followed him, stiil un- mindfui of the jokes and iaukhter of the crowd behind him. Near the' tent, the parade was beginning to foi-tn. Some distance down the Uine stood the buge sbining instrument, ready witb steam up, needing only some one te draw forth its music. e\"It always makes me want to laugb and cry and boller at one tinie te bear one of them playin',\" said Larry boarsely, \"and 1 neyer tbought 1I'd try ýo play on one myseif.\" S\"Oh, you'il manage alrigt\" returned the' Manager encouragiigly. 1'Now, bere j IN syorseat and ail you have.to do is te play onr the keys, the sarne as on-an organ. Wpe.'ll atend to the rest for you.\" Larry seated hi:niself fcarfully and gazed for a moment at thle key-board before hlm. Then balf-timidiy he stretehq(d forth bis fopdj\u003chnd laid them, on the Q y, rgn Ôo h a Whistiing drscord. \"Go on, try,\" urgcd thQ Ma nager, tanding beside hirn, andi Larry slowly bc- g an. some rnciody bh hd iearn\"ýd long years before. Faintand tremuIous, but true, the brass pipe avout the sound, and wbcn Larry her t sudden change came ovor lhim. Hisdopng shoulders straightened with a jerk, and into his eycs there leaped a ligbt that had mot shone there for years. Rapidly and surely his fingers pressed the keys and the great responsive instrument sent forth a stirring msrcb that made every onedrop into stop inétinctiv9fy. \"God! declared the Manager, c apping Larzy-on the ahoulâr. \"Yoi'11 do alright. Now, we'll 'get everything in Unie and make a st.art. Right on turne, tool\" For the next fifteen minutes ail w4s a systematie confusion of gaily derckid horses and riders, ponies harnèssed by twoe and fours wild animais n cages,2 elepýhaiïa - and camMs on foot,Grecian ébarxn dIMeO',' negro minstreis and clowxes. Graduafll3 they resolved themnseP.res into aio ordcriy Uine and stoddready for theaoigWà. When it was given, tfie-pu.ade- started, crosing. the track.and turing.up the.main strt of the littie town. From his lac.e Larryhadia oodview .1 the sidewaI scrowded\"with ègrfcs Many of them smiled ata, etirw~ encouragement or dér«sionbut thf - proval and theirecorn wr ie'nedL He was hearing only h'racai'Jo~ bed around bim-h-e *a, 9 goth scen~e of long ago as tiey toqebefoie hi ........ ....... l ...... .. ... .. ( 'f DoYou. Want to Buy a Slightly Used P layer-PFiano If op, your opportumity has corne. w\", ave for sale, at ùtnsblngly low prices, 'a number of. dependable, glightly-used i» tnuments. For sound and unavoida3ble reasons, some of these instruments ha'd to\u0026bere-called' by us, and in other and more numerous instances exchanges were made for other, instr* '- ments. The consequenice is we have a- number on hand, to ail intent and -purposes 'as gooçd as when they came from the factory, but they have 'been away 'from our .store Iluit~ long enough for US- to consider them' \"IJSED\"ý-YOU would cail them NEW. They are splendid in struments that have undergon e correçtion, whçnever there. was. the sljghýçst- necessity for such, and thus .,they are i prfect- conditio'n. tune and pitch. Wé have lowered prices, We have' made termis easy for you, and are ready todeliver the instrument you choose.' Your old Piano or Organ willbe acceptedat a liberal valu- ation as' a first payment. We are sure you will bp',âlighted with the choice, thç' money vou wili save and the convenience of our payment system. A suitable bench and twelveY\" mnusic rols FREE with each player piano. !I!ýiiýji.$ 1 Mi .............. Il 'j .1 One Mason \u0026 Risch l ,ayet Piano, -88-note, beautiful mahogany case, practically new.' Regular price,9OO. SÉale price ....................... .................$60 One Mason.\u0026 Risehi Player Piano, 88-note, walnut case;, interior in perfect condition ;qase, shows siight' usage. Regular price $1,000. Sale price ....................$5 . One Henry HTerb)çrt Player Piano,, 88 note, mahogany_ case; used for demonstrýting pur- poses only. Regilar price $650. Sale price............................... $525\u003e One New Ydrk W\\éber Pianola Piano, 88-note, rich miahogany case and in spleipdid con- dition. R egu7lar price $1,350. Sale price. .. ......................... $750 Opie Stuyvesant Piatiola Piano, mahoganyý case; looks like' new and has a beautiful torie. Regular price $850. Sale price............... 1........ .................. $500 One Mason \u0026 Risch Player Piano, 88-note1 weathered oak case. Ilas neyer heen used except for 'dernonstrating and cannot be di-Itinguishcd frorn ine'w. Regulýar'price$,OO, Sale price ................................. ............ 1.............. $725 We have others\u003cý Corne, and see thern, or write immediatciv for complete list of used Pianos and Player Pianos, and ACHIEVE THE MOST FOR THE LEAST -MONEY. a very m eut- irunken ses, set e to a 1Post Bunips, inutive at, en- Unce loward, ickskin g from watcb, e lîoui- e then r with frive''s he off 'd i-ou b rn.\" d hin \"Weli, 5oiig.\" Ici-. d in. with 'the iake lpred river's imself r, the tweefl lowy, pudy that it for kers, aist A 'PEWl SAMPLE8 0F PTEBARGAINS wu 0711 nero mal- at it reain, kin\u003c' y or j' Covcr) Aiso Branches at Regina, Moose Jaw, Saskatoon, Calgary, E9dmonton and Lethbridge",
         "The Western Home Mon thljr m -fun, ci triT\"la 'oe' me tJla4qg1-' y ewith'adeep joy ~çt 1~trespnsiility. He coulci see am otta oe the waitiig fiqire *~U1\u003cIO~§WêLRof the super table. tlche h*voice sing- jndi dbalidswhile he accompaied Jieo he fttie organ andi the soft twllight dqpudarund them bofli and shut in w.Unonà,cioudyiùs. ongers Boy Scoutis wrentle *ydinto fihe olW firxqe fune8 and hle w *away1 from, th.P cmrcus parade, livl memorpliose fMir ia y s, when suciden musié traied off wif h a hissing ýwhi senand stopped. The parade w auing te Rtcory corner wIiere a frci * big lungon li ne. Near fliclt tke a tire woman stoaci with a stranl wildered lookc on lier face. It was sl ~hom Latry saw andi yet flot she, forj îhât breathlees moment, lie saw as in o*i-theý,ftuh. -This was Chariott $hh round-sliauidered, faded wash-w6rne thjwas thelic tl-wifo of- his coftàge lia -hIwas, the gonfla sveethcart cf Ion midàome corne he icmatferbe-:c?' àvW1sme the'. Üànager, ridhg up quilki3 wWhat's wrong, sfeam run ouf?\" '-No, air,\" proffered flic boy af fie fuc box. 1W\"Tetem'O alriglifr-I gucs tl uyhas got tired of lis job, thaf's all.\"' 'le Mnae-lookeci sharply af ar è'Look hEee ,\"Eh saici, taking lim firmly h, the Zhoulde. \"You'll have fa brace u-' Goe alead and play those tunes again- they're fine, corne on now, ïou were doinl âp1endid1y; tart up again.' ,But Larry only shook bis liead and ftri- ta get to, bis feef, muttering, \"If's no use- t'm no good now-no ýood f or anytlhin-' \"Yee, yotn are, you ro a.iriglif, and 0wý iieed you-. The steam calliope needs yct adly., Hurry andiet art now, evcry on( \u002611oin,\"inaisted flic Managrbul n'oénheadddoti*a àjnZýýeno mavement toward tie e. he somefhing made hi look a- gain at the woman un flic ard. *She liad corne close fa fhe fcnce andwas gazin- nt hirn witli expectancy and doubt and fèar rbleftded on hcr nervous, eager face. aone second, their eye met, then into 9eracame a glow of fititih wvli -:u s an- twrid bya suciden flash of defermination In hie. La.shead. liftced and his fingers t'eaehec farthfle keys and gripped thiî *lth a new-od foudli fIat made ftli woman's facIlfusi .warmly. \"Thaf's rigif---now you've got flic idea. That tune is gtoat,\" applauded flic Man- ager and flic slow-moving proces4ion quirkenod ifs stops to thlic callenging, Iringing notes of t he imusic. U aonc, st rcct and down anotih(ýr'tley paIssed until af Iongth fhe parade crosscd thelitrack agaiîî Wnd stoppoci at ifs starting-point, wlicre et once flic long lino dissolved as if by knagic. As Larry seppcd stiffly down from bie Oeaf, flic Manager liandcd huîn an en- Jvelape saying c-ordi-dl11y, \"Thank ybu agan or your splendidassistance. You -il fic Our roînuneration in tis. I laope it wiil be quite satisfactory.\" Safisfactory! Larry. could scarcely bc- Iieve his senses. Xitlin lay a crisp), five- ( dollar billl Five clollanus for an hour's work. 140 flot work but happliniess! Uce looked up teefing sure there nînst be a inistake but .the Manager liad disappeared. St upidly, ho turne( and 1egafl to walk awav. ýFeveral spoke to Iini but lie did not he:u' liem. Uce lad only otue idea-Jie niîusl. go homo-ho muet talk ta Charlotte. licacli- ing flic Rectory, lie cntered the back gate. Charlotte lad scen him eoining and met liii with a lialf-shy pride that made lier resemble fthc lappy girl of long :tgo. \"I want you to came home nioN,\" Laru-y explained, somewhat brusqiiely lht i th la 'touch of hie former inasterfulncss, Sic t-' -t loQked stbrfled and disfmayed arid atempt- eto speak but Lariy mterrupted hier. \"Chaxlotte, woxnan, I'm gomng ta mako fresh start'today. . I want you ta coïne home and stay and l'Il ftat earn the living for us bath insteAci0f ou dong* it. 1 hope yg'It forgive.me.\" His*voice waa vcry hwsky as lie fiufishcd, but every word reached lier eare li\u003ce a tx\u0026'mpef blast., With a srnothcred cry, shé buricd «her face« in her apron and her eo with tetut in a H.gh wind was thin bodly shook with. sobs. Larry stoad. ving for a moment, thon- awkrwardly uly alipped bis arm around lier quivering istle sliudoers and waifed. Charlotte Mooro w às8 %y.tsflot given fa self-induIý-cnce so in a c.vh few moments sic smiled into lis relieved 'ucs face and thon turned f owards flic lousie, r, sying, \"'Til be ready in a fcw moments, lue Larry-to Fo homo with you.\" .-inLate fliat night she sfood af flic door aa wafciing fhli Iihfa of flic long train glide tt flic c os t épraiie ca nd bogintegrow MeO ed apron'fowards if in flic darkness and )ng. murmured sometiàng in a low voice. Itt \"Wht'sthat you wcre sayin.-?\" asked Jy. arryas lie ca: -c tp dDaobc'XEd l Lr in GlaGiW. ae ~ett uniong the going concerns\"l of fhe 0 fawu af Gladstane, not the.least interest- ing 'is the 3oy' Scout Traop fthc holders oLflie MaIenz ftedfor l4orthwesferr 1,Manitaba, and' the pioneer troop of the Yorkzton brandi of the C.P.R. - The aecompanying snap-ehof s give r n idea of some of tlic linos of scout worh flicy underiake. Last fail they under- took a travelling camp, which gave tliem ii [ood deàI of fý:m, and some \"roughing it, \" which they endured with a smie :nd a wkistle, as je flic manner of flie food scout. One evenmng f ey pitched t licir camp iî1 flic cosy sliclter of a popiar b!uff, but woke -ncxt morning in the r-idisf of a- dnving ukowstorm, which rfter leaving an incli of \"flic beautiful'1 cn flic round, turned to a bitter drizzling rain. lhe boys wcrc unprepared fer such a turn of flic wcatlier, but tlicy Fcrambled around and made thcîr brea-k- fast cliecrfully in flic cold, and tricd fo persuade ecd other that the experi- ence was \"thçi bcst fun ever.\"1 One of the snaps ;hows tlic scouts wrostling witli thc tent in a higl i vind, ,whicli gave thcm a livcly tussle before theygot if E curelyst. V other viewseshows a paf roi P uiting tfheittrckz-cart flirougli flicWhit e Md River at )rden by moilas of à rope f ied to thec cart-tonguc. The boys do flot look as if thcy lad spent two niglits and days in flie cold and wet, and wcre marching on in a coki Oct ober morning with wct feet and clammy garments. Take a good look at flic brand of amio3 fliey wear. It's flic kind that won't corne off. Tluere'is no end to flic liroism and varied daring of Our subnuarines. Tlîîy roscue mnen from euuiken sf;sfey ro- hie bayonet, and a bomb, and awarn with' these to land, having arranged that ho sliould whietle, on hie returu, ta surnmon efrionds fa hie assistance. On attornpt- ,- ing ta land, lie fond huiseif beset by s ,teep cliffs, and had ta pueli off,. again i; nd swim ta a point from wkere, after a. eloùfg walk, lie reached tlie railway. Far aw vy stood an important vigduet, and 9iwaS at that ho moant toa iri. Creeping slowly along with hie hèavy bomib, lie wvas disappointed ta find tliree Turkish soldiors on guard, right across hie line of advance. Re 'therefore crept away, and reached the viaduct by a cir- cuitous route. On the way lie fell into a farmyard and aroused the poultry, but' luckily lie escaped detection and cameý to within 300 y ards of the bridge. There was a watcli-fire bugiing near the enîd, an engine puffing just beyond, and many rien wert- noving. The lieutenant decided that it was im- possible to carry the heavy bomb to the bridge, so lie returned and found aÉother point of attack, a low brickwork support of thlilne, buit over a smal liallow, flore lie placed his bomb, and set the time-fuse, but in doing so ho was heard by the tliree soldiers lie had seen. They -%ere only 150 yards away, and ihey gave chase. But hie bomb -%as planted, and lie could afford to run now. Ho fired his revolver ta check the prsuit, but failed to bit flhe encnuy; so aJXay lie raced. He could not go by flue m-ay lie ]îad conie, but made a dlash for the sea-at the neiir- est point, and aftcr a inad race lie suc- ceeded in reaching flhe water. As hoe plunged in lie licard tlhc roar of the bomb, wluic1h lurled pieces into the water 1Five luundred yards ta sea )îoe swam, fluen lie blew a long blast on flue wlistlc fo eall friends to bis aid. But fliey wero in a inuali bay aiid did uîof hear. Day Nvas breaking rapidly, se lie swam back fo land, rested a wluile, fluen set out ta sw-im to flue bay. It was a long, long pull, but at last ho rounded flic point of flic bay. Ho whimfled again. This finie shouts came froîn flic cliffs, anîd efflnîy rký\"e-slîots rang ouf, directcd at tlu*sub- marine f lure. When excifement and 1101)0 îere at tlueir heiglît, liesaw wlîat appeared fo be tlîree armed rowing boats advancing. Once more lic swarn back to the slio 0 and hid and wafclied. And wliat do youi think, the three boats- were? The tluree were one, flic faifluful lifflo sulimarine, backzing stern first ouf of fle icut y be. Hlb realized bis mistake, whistled afresi, and pliunged in. Tlîe boat came up jusf In ti ie fo save him, for his tremendous exertions liad cxli'usted him. Scouts crossiîig the river witlî treiz cart i flie narrow doorway. Sliý, tu-ned I)h 1m i wili an unstend,.y. ittie lauir \"I w-a1 Ijust hidding goodby to a iuiî1uonry,\" shc anàweî-cd, ,\"the steam callioipe, LarUry, your hcl:)er-and mine.\" HIe elasped lier bande figlifly in rp\" and :as lhy stood and watchcd, flic train rotunde(dl lIc \u003curve with a qhrill w'histle and disap-peared. A collier camec fo nie, says Drc. Cainp. bi-lIiMor ac a.,!e (lose oif oîîe of uîuy scrviv-\u003cs, ami saiýi .! 'I oul. give an *v- tîiîug fo bclieve tliat (God i-ould for.-'îo my sitis, but I cauinot lxclieve that lie will f:irAevc flmmif 1 jusf furui fo bhm, If is fnîî clieip?' I looked at li:iu, anid salîl, \"MYdei friend, ]lave you beeuî workimug lii(111 \"Ves, I w as downinI itllc ]lit lis lî.!' \"110N% did you gît onut ofif lie îl \"Thje -iv I ustiallv do. 1 got liii.0o fie iva ux auud Wispilled ta flic foi.\"11-ow initiirl d(1\u003c yoi uili- fo eoiuii out of flue 1it fîîPa \" O?Of orse 1didn't \u003eliV 11 tiiiiIý.\" on n t; fl-id i ti i -st ~'uîs-fin i t a 'le~'! \\Vas i .t tii -iol \" ~ 1. mi,no,' Ili, 510(1. 'it %%:i-4 cleeaj fori- ne, but if, cost fliec eiiaîliiy a lot of molle *v to siiik lunt sliaff.\" \\Vit li)lt nnotlîeu-word flic fiutlîof f1t 11111 a iqsdoîuliroke 11o)0 lu ini, andi-li0 saih if Ilic -iiillivc silvl)4a1uîifholit uuoîîev îîiand Nuit iolit 1i-h-e, ifIlîad cost tlie niîtlte Cod a grict j î'to Si.iuk fliat sliaft and îdscue luit lmien. (1 -in dr o wvIli 1il- aviafors froin flic aîuid fopedo battlesilips, flicy figflit c-isers and ds~c-r iii flic ecilv's s-a, flîey sink tranîsports anîd sIiell rail- .-vaiid tbcnl-tlîî-v let kt man loose t iigc-illidilagaîmut flic Turks. ''lie adlieritiu-e of Lieutcenant D'Oilev. Ilmî,Iiglîce rcIî 1likc atlbook. 'l'lic silIhIlial-- ic fo wlujcli le bt-Iugs w-ns alrevady tlirougli flicDairdaneclles, in tfle Tiuîkislî Sea of Mlîruioi-l, w-len if occîuu-îed ta hhl ta fake a tr-ioui land andl lblhe..alook et flue eiieîuîy's kouî id rlîj!ua ,v lino. At dead of uighîlic dropjîcd oITflich Pubinuaii uiclii !hîg icfi ile lii iii a ra ft, on. iv , ic-1 lueeairiîd bis elotlîes, ]lis revolver,1 An Appropriafe Dream A ji\u003cori- workiîigîuail told liiti vife, oit aw-akeuuiuug mile îo-iiig, a curious dreain wluiclîholiehad during fthe niglîf. 11e rvaiued tîtat lic saw cornl towards liii four rats. Tlue flrsf one was very1 fat, aund -%as followed by two' Jean rats, flic Iasf rat beiuug blind. The dreamner Nvns greatlv% perplexed as fa wliat evii migflit folloqw, as lie lad iuîdersfeýod that to drcaiu of rats deîioted calainitv. He nîîpealcd foelis wife coîicerning flàa, but slie couldl îot 11011) Min. I-is son,,whli lîeard lis fafluer tellich story, volun- teered fo beoftle interpreter.., \"The f:-t rat,\" lio saiti, \"is the uman wlio keeps tLe publieliouîse vont go fo so offexu, the fiwo ]icn rats areuny unothcr and ne, aîd flue î'îîrat. fattîer, is your self.\" Farm Lands fer SaIe-Easy Terms Biicin n .:1 -9-- 2.1 0.. . .. . .. . .. . . $lp800OO 1:1claliil S V. 2-1ý-6- 2, IG Ac s .. ... .. .. ... .. . 1,60000 .. . . . .. . . . 180000 17-) ure . ... .. ... .. ... .. .. 2600.00 s ,A ,ve ... 160000 1,400.00 1,600.00 1,800.OQ 1,200.00 2,500.00 Ltchewan j' -i Ilt... .ll - -('(..† †.† † ..† ..† † ..† †.. † †.. † VoJl iS l . :36(-2-8 -W2. iG(O À -rus Rb,îhjiN. I.1 4-127-29-Wl I - oAur-i Bamîi-SAV. 22-27-1 9-W2, 160l*. .... For turther pârtilare write B-x .40, Yrn-kton, gsmlr,",
         "swarn with' ed that ho to summon a atternpt- f beset by 1off,. again ere, after a I'way. Far Rduct, and his hèavy find three ght across ,fore crept ;by a cir- e fell into \u003eultry, but Ad cameý to ,e. There r the end, and many t was im- mb to the Ad aother *k support Il hollow, 1 set the «8a heard en. They they gave nted, and Sfired his )ut failed aced. Ho îad cornle, the near- e lie site. 1As hoe r of the ,ho water 4) t i -c' 4 r f I U-RTIRING ?ROM RETAIL DOHýERTYS \"LSNGSAE A Message to Our -Countryý Friends-ý Inorder to concentrate our capital a.nd energies on the manufacturing end of the. business, wor retiring from the. rotail trade. That's the whole story-only to add that as the lease on our present showroomns expires on April 3th, the disposition of our- -extensive'high-grade stock rmust be made in -extra quick fashi on. Doherty Pianos are too'well-known the country over to, require n elaboration a this time. Udr ejaycniosthy have sold readilyat thçir standard prices. But w.ae ' facing extrgordinary condiions--and w e mect'them with pheniomýenal prices. We have sized up the situation, -and in re-marking our entire We will stili maintain àn ofc and staff to 'look after those«'ý\"\" stock, have made reductions with, a.sweepingand reckless hand. with payrnents to make from the sales'of the 'ast few- yrearsw ý Values have been cut almost in haîf. Neyer, -have siîih high- We miake this îifiation to assure our patrons, past andý.pos.. grade pianos been offered at such low -prices in Western Canada. Peo e-htteca eyo scos teto o.h ir rqunea : If you buy at these sale figures it will be a matter of pleasur- (etsasIfr soroswr ieoe suul'Oy% waittil th fial iffere 't p evious sales in WiVinipeg have âlways meèaift much able reflection for years to come---Lbut don't wi*tl hefnl.in a .value-getting way for our customers--but this, the\" last, days oftrhe sale; corne while tixe choice is at its best. will be the best. Note the Prices- on these J:ran New.Pianos orfor. . .. .. .. .. .. F'ill in the Coupon. Below Grap tisopportunity now. If you evei- hope ta possess a really high-grade piano, let your immediate DONFitlyaction at this time save you possibly haif the price, you would have ta pay later on. Delay may mean disap- pointment in your not being able to secure thé particular instrument you desire. PRE-A Beautiful ]Bench with music,~ Regular $750 $ 9 receptacle with euh instrument. Every new Now ........ $ 9 Piano Fully Guara'iteedfor Ton Years. Nov............7I 1 Unprecedent\u0026I Pricès on SligIitly.Used Pian.os and Players ORIGINALLY WORTH FROM $400 TO $500. NOW $f25 TO $195 DOMINION-Upright Piano, small size, DOHERTY-Colonial design, miahogany DOHERTY -88- note Player' Piano.,: at bargain..........$2 case. Original price $400, nOW. $175 Price......................$8 WILLIAMS Piano; upright, colonial, CLINTON-Style 10, nahiogany case. tl.Asa.........9 PIANISTA -88 - note Player Piano. Original price $400, now........ $187 HEINTZMAN-Upright, rosewood case. Price........................ $480 priýce.......................$1.65 GERHARD HEINTZMAN-Jnl perfect DOHERTY-Colonial style; mahogany ANGELUS -88-note Player ReguLarý.. condition. Regular $500, now... $365 case. Price .................. $174 $900, now..................$5 One-Tenth Cash IIBalance ini One. I tkv Queryor W ItWith 10% Discount fol, m Two or Threelqualoai E1af-Yeary payments y .~ ~ Tern s I ~DOHERTY PIANO CO., LIMITED,_h R L L f. I.u4nA324 Donald Street, Winnipeg uo'ierty Piano Co i te Please mail me full particulars of instruments, near price indicated helow. Pianos about ................. The Old Reliable Piano H-ouse-Established 1875, 7 1(J-111 in style anîd price) 1. .......................................................... or I laver I iaîî s ;al)i it........................ 324 Donald Street Winnipeg Nanme .............. ....... 1a..... pr.... ) bey weî*o ar. Day arn back t out tA Sng, long point of bhis tUnie wvere at rd to be vancing. rie shore ;do yoti he three )imarine, sty bay,. 1afresh, up just nendous vife, on drean Lt. l ,oWards is very mf rat;, reamnier at evil )(1 that ,Y. Hol ils, but n\" -hO vohîin- he fi4:t q)us tho lie twvo .îd the , ý or,,, rÀý",
         "DmImy UmbhM~y Av tA.1** He,us*.1I Sixte We have much pleamu in publiubing below a number of einbroidery articles which we belive,willl be popular with our readers on aocount of their iitility and'héat;. We ame lu a posit ion to fil ail orders promptly. O8-Cetrbleee--A verj\"-neat cen- terpece' l conventional leaf desgn. This dZ e suitabie for outline embroidery stýtc andisalo very effective eeiTied colors on Aberdeen crash,, 20 x 20 ince, 30c. Colored embroidery cotton te work, 20c. Lace for edge, 30c. Perforated pat- tern, including hllI necessary staxnping materials, 15c. 084-Pillow Top-Here la a pillow that will please the fancyr of ail art lovers: a \"H1ome Sweet Home' design, It eau be carrli ont vcry effcctivcly in simple outlile etiteli, as the design is tinted in colore, or the Black eycd Susies would ho very effective inx solid lembroidery. Stamp-. ed and tinted in colore on Aberdeen crash, M0.\u003e Art cloth back, 15c. Colored em- broidery cotton f0ontline, 20c. l'illow eidie, 35c. No PGto±ated pattern sup- plied. 1 176-A Dainty Corset Cover-An exquisitely pretty and attractive one-piece Corset cover is here shovvn t o hc exeeuted in sqlid or eyelet embroidery. Stainped on nainsook, 65e. Saîe on lawil, 50C. Perforated P4ttcrn, 25c. 0189-Baby Outfit'-This ncw Bah y t)utfit consiste of 5 sheçts of patterns, each size 22 x 28 iuches,,\u0026U..perforated on good quality bond paper enabling the patteru to be used over and over again. The following le a partial list of the designs coutained in this outfit: 1 bahy cap design for outline, solid and butto4hole embro'dery; i 1pair bootees, butterfiy 4esign, fr' ufIrne, eyblet and buttonhole errbrcidery; , email auchor, 1 large auçhor; 1 star, suit- able for sailor suit; 1 baby cal) for Renais- sance ernbroidery; 1 con pîcte set of initials, Y2 inch higli; 1 complete set of initiais, 1Y2 inchi high; 1 baby pillow for eyclet, buttonhole, ontline and solid em- broidery; 1 colkir and euf set for button-. bobe, outlinc and solid embroidery; 1 baby kimono for outîxue, buttonhole and cyclet embroidery; 1 erown' 1 h\"t in two pieces for outline, eyelet ami but tonhole embrol- dery; various sprays and flowcrs; 1 one- ciecc hat for outlne, eolid or cyclet cm- býoidery, also buttonhole for cdge; 1 bib for so]id ouf une and buttonhole cmbroi- dcry; 1 ib design for eyclct andi button- hole embroidery, and othere too numerous to mention. 6We also include with t bis out- fit stamping preparation, poneette and fufi directions for stamping. Price, 55c. We also include a lO-page book wvherein is iilustratcd and describcd 48 of flic most popular stitches uscd in cmbroidcry. ['ice 'guxue'l i a 'llial\u003ele fi) the l iei Or 1111iletw Mo is obliged to vary fi' îh't o f a pu fi cnt . A )l\u003c'a i ng rnecgrl i n ay be maîxde as follows: Grotîid lice, tW1b ouilies js 'îli rd iii na unon, onc - fourt h ounee; foui' Iints of w'ater. \"' Vegetarianism is Coming into FaYor. Veal andi pork are the most indigest- ible of the meats, requiring five honrs for perfect digestion., It i§,, always a . uestion whetlier or not mani, elther lii idileness or occupation, can afford to tax his digestive organe for five bours, to digestý that fromn which lie receives at the end very littie incarne. For thjs reason beef and mutton have grown te' bethe xnost popular meats; the after- taste of the digestive organe is by them satisfied more quiekly. After half a Pound of rump steak the mari feels-in fact, lie \"knows that lie lias dîned;\" and it le thie tîxat causes the craze in, favor of fleeli eating. The thiniking mnan, ]xow- ever,. knows that a bowl of porridge, w itii half a pint of xilk, fits Min. better for lus mornling('sq work than white bread and beef. Vegetarianism lse oming into favor-not as a matter of religlous belief, for for economy'e sake, but from convictions of an entirely ifrn character.y diern The Iaboring classes can, without in\"- convenience, eat a mucli larger quantity of meat than the affluent andi lcss busily occupied. In constant labor tlie former consume more of the ir-n work in daily wear and tear than the man in idlinese, but if one. watclies carefully lie finde that tlue wealthy nman will take meat three trnes a day, whule the poor man le satis. fied with a suice for dinner. ï Fisli may take the place of umeat, al- though red fish is more difficuit of digestion. Salmon approaclîe meat more nearly than any other fieli. Many1 of the white fish, iu a mixed diet, occupy I important places. The fibre being moret dense than that of meat requires moref thorough mastication. Fish le indigest- ible wlie(n Iifl(er(lone or frivid, anid is qiiite dangei,\"(rotis if not absolutcly and altogether freeli. Cooking Cheaper Cuts of Beef Maxmy a savory dishli ay be preparedj \"cookincap cuts if they are carefully co-dand seasoned. 1lank of beef la deened undesirable by many, but it is very good prepaî'cd in the followin mlaliner: Take a flank piece weighing tla:e or four pouncis, ivash edeanl, roll it 11P firmly and wrap sccurely with cord to keep roll ini shape; then phrcc in a kettle witlî water to cover, add sait ta scason not too salty, bring to a hoil, reinove scum and boil gently untîl very tender, remove to a llattei'; put some butter or fat from the eooking of'tlic meat lu a skillet, lay the nicat in it and lrowvn on top of stove or roast in oven till brown ont rl sides, then takc it out, add the broth fromn the kettie and thicken wvith flour as usual. Or the rol xnay be set av to cool for licing, cold and the broth u.î,vd for inaking soup\"%%ithi the addition of îuoodles or riec and pota- toes. If served eolid (o not remove the cOrd until 11xîa;t ii col\u003c1, tiien slUce thin muud serve mw ti mustardi or catsup. Flatik xrl'o :nikts goodi pressed nîeat if b)oiled ver ' tender; pick it ixîto bits, Seasan ivitix ait, Ipepper and alIspice, put loto a dish . tid put on a heavy wveighit. Tixis niakes nwice sandwiches or ïis nie Servedi Nvith iiieipotatoos. Any of the cheap cute may be utilized ln* tht. wav. the mneat from the necc le more nutri- tMous tha-n that from niy portion of the carmas; it ie rather todgh and for-this reason is used 'Simply as mince méat by miny. Hlowever, 5t is excellent eating when properly eooked as stew beef, soup meat or pot, roast; it requires long cooking over a moderate heoat. If a pot roast le desired remove broth. froin kettie when meoet le tender and add but- ter to meat and allow meat to brown nicely on ail sides, turning it often until done; then remove to a warm platter, add the broth te the fryings in the kettie and make a nýce gravy by thickening it with a littie foeur mixed sinooth. witlî water. The neck cuts may be madeý te serve for two dishee by cutting off the thick portions of mewt, grinding ln the incat cutter and forming into balle for frying and etewing the bony pieces for soup etock. Tongue maay be etewed very tender, sliced warm and eerved with its own gravy or sliced cold and the broth ueed for making soup; it le also nice pottod by being qtewed until very tender, niinced fine, àidding four ounces butter to each pound of tongue and seaeoning with sait, pepper, a littie cloves aind i- epice, then pressing it firmly la a jar or dish and pouring a littie melted butter over. Thîis le nice sliced eold for luneh. Roast beef heart le a fiee change. Cut the heart in two, wash, take out the strings, rub with sufficient sait and pep- per to season, fill with stuffing of bread and a bit of onion orsge, put the heart together se it will .hodtufganti flrmly with cord, place in roaeting pan with. hot watcr to baste and roast* one and Ed half houre; when done make a rîlce gravy with liquor ln pan. If any is Ieft chop fine, stew, make gravy and pour over buttered slices of toast. Beef liver le good fried or baked. Do not slice for roaeting; leave in a large piece, season, Iay a few slices pork or. bacon lu to miwke it ricli, add a feNy slices of onion if liked, add hot water and roaet tili tender. Meat etew rnay be made from odd bits of beef or from any of the cheap cuts, ribs, etc.; stew until tender, then add raw potatoes, eut la emall pieces, onions if liked, or other výegetables, or instead ofa vegetieble stcw a good pot pie may be made. Left over pieces of cold beef makeg an Lppetizing meat pie; chop, line a dish with biscuit dough, add meat and cold potato, chopped if liked, add gravy or inilk, season, cover with biscuit dough. and bake until nicely donc and brown.- Mrs. Cora Belle Wifiiams, Ohio. Thorougli Cookingm of Meat le Essential. Overdoîxe meats are robbefl of their nourishment and case of digestion; underdone or raw meats are dangerous. The germa of disease usnally found ln nieats are not easily killed below a temperature of 212 deg. Falir-eliit-f ho hoiiing point of wvater. Porkla stuie source of tric]iixa, for tixis reason it 5110111(1 be cooked thoroughIly. ]Raw bain is ]fost dangerous, thougli, perhaps, not s0 indigestible as wlien it is cooked flhoroughly, but we hiad better spend more tirne lu digesting it tlîan to run the risk of a deadly poison. Hogs are alinost alm-avs fattened so as to be aetuia]ly diseased before killiuîg, and we fln(l ]ueca1s9 a comimon source of tubes'. iculosis; it isaaso gcnerally believed itt pork cating is a conminou source of scî'offla. Persons who indulge freely in pork bave very unhealthy, rough aiid easily-irritated skias. Veal (equally iuîdigestible with pork) may not contain lie dangerous germa of the maiture ox; flc ibre, liowcver, i\u0026 dense andi difficult of digestion. Unless it be thorouglîly boiled and chiopped rather fine it had hetter' fot be caten at al. It .should never, mnder aîuy circumnstances, be givexi to dibrn 11\u003eu1 *v llied oiitilil IX11.v b li iiiij iY cooukini, f he oitfîneal -'vtÈ an addi- tiow cu i dp or cup and a haîfof water, ;1- wI wiu done tur-ning into cups ta lniolil, Serve with hot creain. il'",
         "The Western Home Tifonthly. H. 1,E. Xaloux DUFMIG the\\ gy and festive son Of tihe bon,-,pel in Wi --Pj two -splendid exhibit were held-'the big affluai poultrya at the Industrial Bureau and the que -Show, ,Pf a magùificent herd ostriches at -Eatonle, that hadc from the Panama- Exposition. Dit the same convention week, a \"pou congress\" was lield for 3 days at Manitoba. Agricultural Celloege, ii poultry experts from both east West, lecturod On timelY poultry te to a groat many interested farn and poultry raisers. d ln* thi. Dre nutri- on of the 1 for-this r méat by At eating oeef, soup ýres long If a pot thi frouîî add but- ;o brown ten until platter, he kettie cen ing it )thî witlà madeý te \u003er off tihe g in the balla for ieces for tender, its own 3th. used e potted tender, s butter casoning Und il a jar or 1 butter r lunch. ge. Cuit out the Lfld pep- )f breadl rie heart and tic ing pan *ast. one make a If any tvy and L. ed. Do a large ýork or, a feNv water dd bits p cuta, en add on ions instead ,ie may LkeS an a dish id cold avy or dough o'vn.- Prof. Faker, of Saskatoon, gave ii opening address, on è'Some Poultr. Problems,\" the keeping of profitabi( utllity birds of a. good bred-to-laj '\u0026train was urged rather than invcstin, ln show birds of fine type and feather but uncertain egg production. J. E Burgey, -of the M. A. C. followed witll an excellent talk upon \"Poultry Farms, their succoss and failure. He considor. ed good management the keynote ol succoss in chicken farming; choosinge poor locality and lack of a good ex. perience in poultry raising, weo er mon causes of failure. The speaker con- sidered Manitoba offered many facili- ties for success in poultry. A good market could be socur6d for broilers, roasters and fresh eggs. In an interest- ring way,, John Guest, manager of the T. Baton Co.%s meat department, Win- nipeg, traced the growth of the indus- try of buying mnarket poultry for the ý4last fine years f rom farmers in the country. Many changes had come about and great improemont in dressed birds was noticed, especially sinco fthc city liad altcrod the bylaw, which liad de- manded only drawn birds were te bo exposod for sale. The day of dark colorod, scalded poultry was past, and farmors were fattening and finishin\u0026 their stock btter, thanks to Professor Jierner and lis department. Thore is need, however, of muoh missionary 'work yet among theo growers, too xnany poorly fieshed birds flood theo mnarkot in early winter. The egg marketing problem n'as the subjeet diiscoursed upon by Messrs. Haro and Allen, Dominion Poultry De- partmont, Ottawa. It is interesting-to hlear thait Canada wiich was importing eggs in 1913, now lias enougli eggs for home consuxnption and exported several million dozen in 1915. This present time, when Great Britain lias man' sources of lier supply eut off, wi prove a. golden opportunity for Canada in advancing lier egg trade, providing a gilt-odge article is exported te Eng-' land and inferior eggs kept at home. KCanadian eggs now stand fourth on the list in theo Engliih market, Danish flrst, t.hen flutch and I'rish, then Cana- dian. The anadian eggs scl for 4 cents per dozen more than the Ameni- (dfl egg at prosent. Mr. Allen is in this Pro-vince organizing co-operativo poul- Iry an d egg associations. Egg circles 'i!b omdin several centres and be(tter prices will ho roalizod by the rroducer, of a strictIv first class ar- tIie. \"fireat success h*ad attonded the to-operativo fattening of poultry at the college li.tvinter,\" isaid Pro fesser a-Herner, who 'told of the workizi of the J-schemne, SbÉeen- hundred birds of the sheavier breeda liad 'been aent in by w farmors to be fattened for 3 weeks ai; i- the college. These eold fromn 16 cents )f te, 25 centspdTf'1b. wheu dressed. The le profeseor aleo stated later on egg cir- « cles and co-operative fattening stations 'y could lbe 1inKed up and the stations iewhieh séould handie 3,000 birds could 'esecure feed grains direct from the far- 1 mier. The eos't of handling birds runs !s te 12 and 15 cents eaci, feed esting 's 7 to 10 centa per head. This is ail good news to both the producer and consumer and surely lie time is eom.ing for syetematie liandling of botri drealsed poultry and eggs. The statisties of Canadian eggs, the kind used for home consumptiion, is not pleas- ant re-ading, 33 per cent -are fresh, 40 per cent slightly stale, 17 per cent very stalo, 5 per cent broken and 5. per cent bad. The-se figures were givbn by Messrs. Tiare and Allen at the congres. The annual poultry show took place from Feli. 15th to, î9th In the Central Farmers' Market. Over 1,000 birde of most aristocratie conneetion and pure 1!neage were exliibited and how proud and grandi they looked in eU their fine feathers. The show we asplendiâ suçees. from every point of view witih an attendance very gratifying to the hard.working of-* ficers of the association. tSuch magnifi-, cent birds, someo f the f inest ever ahown. in Wiqnnipeg, were well worth a visit to the show. One pleasing feature te west-- cmn people was that the greater number of the prize winners wore reared in this country, showing that our rigorous climate is no hindrance to the growth of fine stock. The 1argýst exhibit was in tée 9Buff Orpington cias, 130 birds, chiefly shown by Winnipeg fanciers and such beauties tliey were. P. J. G. MeÂrthur won any number of prizes and lionors with hi\u0026s splendid Buffs, headed; by h-is ,champion cock whose photo .19 f\u0026ere pic. turec\u0026 Mrs. Cooper, of Treesbank,' was on biand with a grand string of Barred Rocks, and aise won many prizee. This lady, whose fame as a breedor of bigh class \"Bred-to-lay Barred Rocks,\" lia ex-. tended, far and wide throughout, the west- ern provinces lias beon breeding up \"The Bugy Bec\" strain lof Rocks for 15 ycars and has reason te lbe justly proud of her - success. Mrs. Cooper follows nature very closely in breed-ing and clings te 'the use of the old lien for liatclhing when possible and lias at the four shows at; which ahe lias exhibited this past wintor won about 35 prizes. Geo. Wood, of Ilolland, aise A valuable Orpington tlhat bas won nany first prizes during tie îpast year. Property of ExController McArthur of Winnipeg sliowed some grand bird. l in \"ciass, wiwning a nunnber of prize. TIno dainty little white Leguhorn was avery large exhibit and gecmeê-a primei favorite. The snowy white Wyandottes pade a pretty picture. I nover saw suci fine- ones before, extra largo for that breed, oneelien weighed ne losps than 15 Ilis. in the exhibit shown. Ail the other breods wero woll represented, including water- fowi, dear little Bantams and pigeons by theo doien. Theo dressed fowl were a fine oxhibit, sh Wing that a wider knowledTe 6f kili- il~ and dressing chickens correctIy ia APUIL 2Dth TO JUNE 29th, 1121 l.-Food@ and Cooking Household Manage- 3.-Rioture, D\u0026,îryingor Poultqy. m e n t , H o u \u0026e bonveniences, Il om e Nusig.A thoroughly PrmalCoin.. for womoe frein 2.-Mllinery, Plain Sewlng, Dtemmnalng. town or country. lee-Maàitoba Residenta 8ý0.OO; Non-Reaid,,nta 820.00. For funl prtieujars apply to, President J. B. REYNOLDS, Manitoba Agricultural Celqe, WImnip. If It'a mode of UOOK en POULTRY RU B BE R mMAmamfou. 1916 han 2w0pestwth Have ILt rii tdhe.ir r ir ou% 41- Write us and nmren »*mdrd1m...our want. C=\u0026\" tmd Ibir og:Z.rm* AU. 1Mout poulul baMod how 10 o t b. ' 5Ift *o.- Ca u«SuppIu Co. ciýhem. rýTonas à my ~ nr ,. enom 8j «\".5 - - iu e ogui -_____ s A lot prize barrecl cockerel nt the Winnipeg Poultry Siow, Feb., 1916 iential. .their astion; gerous. ind in low a t-the is the son ut v harn )s, not ýooked specnd ;o run )IS are to ho nid we tuber- 1 tI)dt ce of clv ini i aud luallv )ntain e ox; ificuit ughlly ; Iad hiould giv cm 1111do addi- 7ater, )s t boa-' Wite ft Owvthe Film- at the Time Make every written record more authenti 1 , accurate, by truth tflng photographe. Then, in turn, make the photographe more valuable ,by writing the date and titie on the'film atWhe time of expoeure. Buckr a record bEZ\u0026n\u003cýda permanent part of the' negative, at no extra oot for Mim and the making of it i. only a matter of a few Sohewlth au Autographie Kodalk A8k uour dealer Io show you, or write us for a fre. asde1ogu CANADIAN KODAK CO,, Limited 610 King St. W. Toeoto IMAITOB AUARICULTaU RAb OOLLEOm 'I- Sho rt Course in Home Ecomomios I",
         "t'he Westei-n «-ome -Mont hly *Peerless Poultry Fence Sclosely woven. Ites a relprotection to flot onl]y large fowls, but chicks as weII. They can't get through. Neither cma harin get through te the\"n For Poultry Fencig lu not mere poultry netting - it's real fencing. Every intersection of wires la securely Jocked together. Tbey Can't slip or get loose. It is made of Open Hearth steel wire wkth ail im- 4urities burned out and ail the strength left in. WeUl galvaxuzed. Top and bottorn wires are extra heavy. No top or bottom boards nceded. Requires les poste dian ordinary pouitry fencing. Our cntalog Rives fuil description of the above as well as our com. Pete une of farm fencmn zfh mi Sates and Ornameutal fence. Write for Et foday. le la aune fiuee on queat. Fonce Co., Ltd. FAT iO anger- JSHGWING WDNDERFUL REDUCTION and IM1PROVEMT by the home Sulf -treatment method that 1 prescriboe bMowas 2 8amn 0 w t,'ducetl Io h160is. lboeotiir tetmntais, nmen anîd %%omen, wili be giveny ou; Iinvestigate for yourseif. Let nie eend 3- --Ify PROOf TREATMCNT if youwlult toreducegBtolpound.e wekl rnroeielh andi ad E yearg f Ute. 1 wli aI'o serti tfree I]BOOK of VALABVAD VI CE -Conts absoutely nothtng: ýWrite to-day. 1I mil senti ail FREIt. \"aed.xostpiid. Addres9: DR. F.T..BRO UCH 617 Irough Oldg., East 22nd St., NEW YÔRiC. . Y. ýLiceiiscd phyaicîir by the etate cfiN. Y.) Get a Farm of Your Own, Take 20 Years to Pay. ýf yoii %% i4. 'l'lejie land ilsupport yoi\u003c n \u003cd .ty for itsëlf. Auit nîîîicieî aicza offlhic îîî' fertile lanîd ini N%ï'stcîn ixiiaila for sale ri Iuw pri Ces and uasy ternis, i angiijg froîn $11 t $30 for farniî lanîd s w'i t tri îple rai nfai- iri igated lanids fi oin $, 5. Tenst\u003e- tm ttetli doci îîbla lnce wi t fi iitwetty ycai i In iririgationistrtiicts, bau fmr fatIi i liligs'' etc.; Oh1)t $2',000, also iei':ivablc' ini1 ycar'-iiite výt''f idi 6 pr tir('t. lcxe N,, ciII ý,t i il fV ii 113 .'iii' o r f;îîiii liîllitig bl ruti iiiîig 'litng l.iîl cir eiî'y'îr fiiid c lîciFoi . lcî iieît \"\" aid jir tic 1! 0 o rat]ielan iar AI..AN CMIOCeiier:il Siîpt,.of Liis OecIc 16, Dept. of 'Natîîr:îl lBcources, C.P.1t., Calgîii ý, AIlerta. at homne among $120.O SUREchurch people. ____________________Man orwomnan. AP- t Ure rnay be used. , No experience rcquired. INTERNATIONAL BIBLE PRESS. Suait n\u0026 Av. Toronto being taught. Tempting plates of new- laid eggs were displayed in competition. It is curious to note the different shades in alor in eggs, froni white to deep brown, prizes w'ere given for best weigh, 1radsiape. Ail the eggs laitd.uring show wveek wem-sent to thie Soldiers' Conv-alMosèent Home, a daintv breakfast for returncd soidier boys. in big auction sale of pure bred birds at the close of Flic show was an intlese.ting feature. Facli exhibitor donated one or maore birtis to be thus sold for the Re- turned Soldiers' Association. Premier Norrig opcnied the sale, buying a line Orpington at et fancy figure. Rumior bath it, lie named him \"Êobins'on\" because lie crew so.\" Prices ran from $5 to $30 and the Returned Soldiors' Association benefittil to the extent of a cheque for $250 afttr the sale. 'Twas a splendid. idea. The T. Eaton Co. donated 2 ostricli eggs, laid during the ostrich show. Tiiose were knockhed. dotvn to Mayor Wauîgh, w~ho had the names of tlie donors of aîietion44 Ifowlinscrîhîqîl upon the nanin- moth eggs which lhe gave to tlie Rot urn- cd SoILdiers' Association as a souvenir to be piaced in the club rooms. Thei otîber big show e~ Eaton's, thoe wngnificent bord of 28 ostriches drev- sucit crowds daily, mon and woîndn anti kidtlies by tbe thousandes came to gatze at these strangeýcroatures, whose owner Iîad brougit thom from tbe Panama Ex- position. Some of te monster birds stood 8 te 10 feet Iigli. Eggs were on view and an incubator filied -set for hateliung, as well as cbickens of various ages. Tlie estricl iis plucked the first time at 6 mon tls of ag(e ani aftorwaruls sliould be plucked cvory 8 montiîs. These birds on exhibition were vaiuod at $40,000. My space 115 noariŽ' illied, but 1 nmus't keop to îny proiîise in regard te the rearinc of elîicks te get back te domos- tic fow'l. After thie ohicks are nest ripçnod4, tîtat is kept in the nest 24 l'Ours, l'love tlîom te a cloar, rooiny;coop 'witiiout any floor placeti on the grein swardi, o nl early spring, put the coop0 over fine litter iin wlich the chicks willC deLliglit to scratcli and deIve for thoirle fî, fcourse, the liard boilî'\u003cl eggs and b!ta'î'îinîbs niakes a fine fe- I tor the ]itile chiei\u003cs, but, 1 fil c oocxl ick food con hi' -iven frîi nthe fii'ct (du -c, offect- ilig(~, \u003cpulte sai Ittîki I lie inotiior hen aside,, xtliîîi nov'iig te tlîe cool), and A I st îcî uc harred lien at thic W'iiiiitiîcg 1cQtî1ry Show, !916 gt'lier aIl site xviii cot of iieat and a dr1iltk. l'lite pîlor thlig us alw'ays lînîrv, ni tenons, in tact. 'Ilin xvlitiisa .' le '1îexiit'î.Ill ,7 )tOid lier faîîtiy. ''îy. need littie food the fit-st day 1:1 the coop, afterwards fivo sînaîl feed-s ik amIIý niL.iorýîekd xittor û\u003c'011 i s -roi fi or a. few la.ys, olmo rolt'd cal io''1 a ttiogt ii.Nex'or feiiv ntllil ,da liii 01, slîiîpv or ctir. eurds nmalle iti tii iii il k aret'butter thtîni any niittt for (.'liî'kis. \\\\ti'uî th iîc tuu'claps litte a. r'iit oi tho i-ag'i's. xhîî'eiie'y silapit I î-''t.tte ,v î'oxvlii'e t'îî'i îîilki'tp %%eii. I'f i tcflivi-grt't'i i'tî ii ae î'i.î'iril' clicik.s aie Ielt ott hiîe iiset It md4ý1, l w îtîe a w oel'. W\\\u003cîltw e w eeIýstlt. 1îîi't'er tlo t tllie goci (1daine go in andîi ouit at will-, tosteiiîug b ler ia the cool) a t ii'lilîc''1ver, \u003ea le frein rits 1 or otîti,' 11tl«lt , lt t.k îNext nfl)1 i t1 N litteludi' theŽ rear- ingo c hiClsc. kow i Care for [0y Turkeys S By M.%rs. IL E. Jackson. I have been rgising turkeys for 15 years'and have li'd wbiat I t-aIl goed, lnel,ý',erNv ycar., -'T arni îew going te give yeu îîiy plan for raisiîîg turkeys. Onie iltîportant oh- jeot is te always get the eggs whule fre'sl. 1 bave gene as ntany as tbree times a day te get the eggs before tbey have cliilled. Always keep the eggs lnaa warnî place and tiirn tlim every evening. wlion tlie littor is laid and the bias get broody and want to, set I thon fix themn a nest near the- bouse, genorally a barrol turned down on the side witli xire across the top to liold. it steady, and thon 1I make a large nest of straw inside. I sav largye because I raise large turkeys, the Mammotlt Bronze. 1 thon go to the old îiest and get the turkey and place her in tbe barrel on tlîroe or four ben eggs for thte nighit, se slîo will shape the nî'st. TMien next Inorning I remove the hen eggs anti place 18 tui-key eggs iiior lier. Thon I put the enîd gato of lins. band's cotton frame at the end of the barrel se nothing eau disturb lier. I keep bier thus for about two days and tlien lot bier ont athlir will. Tiîoy xill iîardiy ever go back te titeir old iie'.t more tJ!an onco, sometimes net, at ail. I d nothor any furtîter than to water andý fee Ph-old lhen, whon sli cemes off, until about tlie 27th or 28t1î day I look to esc wlat is tîtere. During the day 1I lakg etlîom a pen of the et ton franies la a nice grassy place, hein- sure tîtat, ne place is ieft largo enouigh for a little turkey to get eut. Fixing, a shelter for tlîem at one endî îiow 1 tako tlîom off and put them la tite pen, wlicl I have prepared, and feed and water thîtm. The first food 1 give tlit is corn bread daîîîpened a littie and some black popper spriîîkled ever it. From that day on 1 feed thom. as iuchi as tliey can get, four times a day, of corn broad. and tender enion blados. chopped fine. 1 ilever give a tuirko(y roc' deugli. I oftoîî ]et thieni eat from my hand, as thîov like it better. Tlîey are unliki' clîickeîîs-tlîey alvays want clean food and wator. About tlîe lOth day, if weathor 15 goed, T turn tleiem ut'lor \\ie first timo. Th'le old turkey will not go far the flrst tlay, but xvaîder about foi a -wlîtle and thon corne back te lier pen. The next morîîing xm\"hinthe dcxv lias dried away I turn lior ent.9 For a fem, aiglîts T aiways see ttaat sîte is at honme. Now I consider mx' ti-'îuiîlo is ox'or, for the old blinxxill do the rest. 1 put tlîimini thepotr yard evory niglit. After tlîî' \"show tlie ted\" I gix'e tlàêern coin or chops. 1 break up ail the piiices of crockery for them, letting tbemn piý* thit up at will. I raise a fair peu' cint of wvhat I lîatclî. Tbey genorallv ]îateli about the first of Jutie. Eaî'Iv i;i the foîl I bogin te fced thlem sues cern, tuilk. veuot tbles and otiier fattining As sooîu as thtey be.-in te cliînb iupoi tîseir pen to roostI 1kîiow they woîît 1t go hiilier, se I fix illilnta w'xîl'1i1) to ftEe î'oost. MV w'o'k is nov fit islîed util tixue te cateit tuerntfori- aari.t. I nover stl mv tîîrkevs locallv. 1 eitlior get a frienit in a citv te scil tiiotî for ine or slîip te a reliablo comiion merchiant. T got the top of the nitorkî'î pricos for thein. T miak~ two shipients, Tlianksgiving oand Aristmols. The tliveks 1 roctivo ini retutîtmako i'w 'l tlit'î'o xas a ('lirî'.tias orTiiî'gv n ex'er iiiiîitiaîîdtuî'key-iaisî ig iwa- soit lastti al lit i'i' loveitv 1--'t i xi' lic ni Ti' T niav uno îî\\iltt1gc)u':îi1-dî bt i i w ( Ici' '15. -ýiv oi O1ld Ctî'tn h'ýlt. ito tule wtii. ine: T ca o ''i Nottl cli. ileggar: \". r o 11ht ;tîtit vr1, mwb' l Ill a ii t haV:. t ntfer a we. Boston Trot '.ý,- t. THE lEST LINIMENT Oilm laiNKLLFOR lTUE MUMAN mi Gombault's Oaustic -68188M IT, HAS. NO EQUAL horAndfor Od en touad, = RllbRm EorcCancer, Boelleo OASIo BALSAM bas Bore Throat b dy a Liimet, Chest CoId *aokaoho W, gnoul Say te aIl Neuraigia, oftoisonous substance Strains end thertfore ne ha s cou rescit trou tis os- Lumbago tersai use. Persistent. ubrmmoa use will cure Diphtherla man naid or chronic oe ug alimue.t n ta le e SrL si e.ausayc= t'. Rheumatiom neqIres au uwr perfect saut. ail Stiff Joint* EMOVEI 11EUREIUURNBIE MUSCLES 'Wlotl, Tex.-\"One botle Couastie U.lmmm dtd :7 rhetumaliom mort gSdot4 ha S120.00 pald la dotbiih.\" OTTO A. EEYaE. Prices*1.80 par botèle. Sou dbnorgglot,'r'18*au bn. express prepald. Write for Sokiet a. Tlm LAWEENCE-WILUIAMU COMPANI. Terante.be.. Impressive Stationery We would like to quote U prices on Stationery whîclj is at once both irnprcssive n dainty. WVe rake a specialtv of Wedding invitations and-~ Society Stationery,, and our Plant enjoys every facility for turning out work of un- excclled quality. Stovel Company, Ltd. Printers and Lithographers Winnipeg Man. IS HE CRAZY? The owner of a large p)lantation in Missi- ssippi, wbore thli fine figs grow-, is giving away a few five-acre fruit tracts. The only condition is that flgs be planted. The owner wants enough figs raised to supply a co-operative canning factory. You can socuro five acres and an interest in the canning factory by writing the Eubank Farms Cornpany, 1134 Keystone, Pluts- burg, Pa., I .S4.A. They will plant and care for your trees for $6 pcr rmonili. Your p)rofit sliould bc $1000 per year. Soîne think this man is crazy for giving away suceli valuable land, but thbtre may be metbiod in bis madness. ItJDU AGENTS WANTED impvlet.vtu ridie and oohibit a 1910ô HySlop Bioyoe wlb hauiop~o.ns.a. 0 AYS FREL FTRIAL Do HOT BUY Bcee u n drieil, Tirc8-or Sportinq Goods un- WOCENTS geLd uo a fit. va.111 ilnaFree , pstpst abm domeArt Fo d r .l u.g ConIpte.0 .1tireo!Iit.g la 1~.» al. \"tuai coor 180 Ca otalogue ,f BOt. 1,!.., TI,e.4 . . ,tlug i1ç é od. D flot wait. Write to-day,. iIySL.P BI\"T1HERS, Llmited Depet 25 Tronte, Oalo r H RoEs BRingFMAeL; 1h-3 \u003ccco.Se,*, c.tfo R?,es11u\u0026 To ,~ rt., o u Io erot,.w, i e nd rhlà ~\u003e '* \u003e F' f'Y i~,,pa dv-tai.",
         "The Western Home Mont hly Mis Face Wi: Oovorod TheHo, * » or dy at Id] 6005000 \"Seedlings âaM euttiflfr Sale this spring, and in order to encourage appie grow- irîg I %vili give awav free tîis spring 1,000) Hibecrnal A p pie and 1,000 Transcendent Cralb Graft. I 1we are grafts and should grow two feet thisi w . ilnl alog away free 500 Iris, one ,f i i iot imautiful and ihardy pcrennialq. M 1iric e for WilUox cuttings is 8459 per 1,000; ýiSMOUfor 10,000, express prepaid on ail orders of ý310o and over. I have a fie stock of trees, shrubs and fruits. ½vything that j, flot satisfacton- min' ho returned at once and I dIll refund the money. Miy prices are .15% legs thnn agents' prices. Send mep your adclrr's and I will send s-ou rny prce list mith ful rinted instructions, John Caldwell Est. 24 Yeýar2 Virden, Man. antecd lu\u0026. T. !nd tb là rti«Iiii. . Miah. Wilh PimPloS. Pimples are not a serious trouble, but they are very unsightly.1 Pimples are caused wholly by bad blood, and to get rid of themn it is neces- sary to, purify the blood of ail its in- purities.1 Burdock Blood Bitters has made inany remarkable cures; thc pimples have ail disappeared, and a bright, clean, com- plexion left behind. Mr. Lennox D. Cooke, Indian Path, N.S., writes: \"I arn wiiting you a few lines to tell you what Burdock Blood Bitters bas done for me. Last wintcr my face was covered with pimples. 1 tried different kinds of medicine, and al seemed to fail. I was one day to a friend's bouse, and there they advised me to use B.B.B., so I purchased two botties, and before I had themn taken I found I was getting better. I got two more, and when they were finisbed I was completely cured. 1 find it is a great blood purifier, and 1 recommend it to ail.\" Burdock Blood Bitters~ has been on the market for the past forty years, and is manufactured only by The T. Milburn Co., Limited, Toronto, Ont. For Swollen Veins Eis E That Absorbine, jr., would relieve Varicose Veins was discovered by an old gentleman who had suffered with swollen veins for nearly flfty years. He -had made many uinsuccessful efforts ta 1get relieif and finally tried Absorbine, Jr.î knowing its value in reducing swellrngs, aches, pains and soreness. Absorbine, jr, relieved lm, and after hie had applied it regularly for a few weel s he told us that his legs were as smooth Sas when he avas a boy and ail the pain and soreness had ceased. Thousands have singýe used this anti- iseptic liniment for this purpose with re- imarkably good results. Absorbine, Jr.. is 'inade of oils and extracts from pure herbs andÈ wben rubbed upon the skinis,î quickly taken up by the pores; the blood circulation in surrounding parts is thereby stimulated and healing helped. $1.00 a Bottie at Druggists or APostpaid. ALIBERAL TRIAL BOTTLE oi-will he mailed ta your address for 10c. in stamps. Booklet free. W. :p. YOUNG, P. D. P. 509 Lymans Bldg., Montreal, Can. By Dr. Leonard Keene Hirshberg, A.B., M.A., M.D. (Johns Hopkins University) Sleep, the uncomfortable bird that broods over ýthe troubled sea ýof infants, whose mothers dnd fathers refuse to learn or te do what is best fqr them, la the most conciliatory of ail the mnucli courted physi- cal debutantes. This strange state of being, senseless to feel and with sealed eyes to see, hovers like angels around a baby's bead, yet faulty food, irregular feeding, home remedies, soothing syrups, rocking, bouncing, walk- ing the floor, and showing a child off to relatives and visitors, ah màke for such a disturbance of nature's own rhythm, that the gentie thing disappears and the mon- ster, sleeplessness, takes its place. Infants should always sleep alone, and in a crib. Not only does this calm. their daylight spirit and ruffled nature, but it obviates the chance of bad habits, such as rocking, contact with others, contagious diseases and similar things. Systematic regularity of the cbild's bed-tixne; feeding at the precise turn of the clock's hands; absolute quiet between turnes, and exact moments for the youngster's toilet. If the baby la very young, it should be Urepaxed for a f ull nigbt's sleep at 5 30 efore every feedîng. If it bas9 had a fi morning bath, a thorough sponge and wash may be given it and ahi its linens changed. Then it la fed or nursed and put to bed. At ten o'clock at night, or, according to the age of the infant, it should be agamn fed after wbich tbe child should sleep until six or seven a.m. Most infants, unless their p ower of sleeping bas beent-interfered with by pr- ents, relatives, or faulty foods, wih .sleeèp all night. Contrary.to most notions about babies, darkness and uriet at night are conducive to sleep. î the waiting and crying of a well child is flot catered to if the heaithy infant la not taken up to Ïeel the warm fiesh of the niother or nurse, it soon acquires the ability to make the best of its uncomfortable situation and faUls soundly asleep. It is no uncommon experience te find babies of ten and eleven months in well- trained homes, so thoroughly established in its nocturnal habits that it sleeps from earlyevening until six or seven in the morn-, ing. Indeed it la a refiection upon the knowhedge, the wiil and the eneryoth mother and guardianà. o h It la considered best to have infait sleep after the mornine bath and the ten a.m. feeding. This tine shouhd be set aside for sleeping. The crib should b. fresh and clean,the roem, previously well aired, now dark and as quiet as night. Begun'at birth and steadily continuad, it will be found that the ittle banibino, if correctly fed,, wl1 sleep tbree hours. -There is no more certain antidote to ir- nitability, muscular restlessness, twitch- ings, crossness anid other so-called ner- vousness in cbildren, tban regular hours of sieep. To b lame a child of such tem7. perament upon \"inheritance\" or similar hazy causes, whcn the origin lies as close at hand as hack of food or lack of sheep, la to loac the bcst means to cure. Insomnia in a baby is a vicieus cirche. Not only (mes iii health sometimes produce it, but once present it is responsible for many physical and mental ailments. Given a mother, w-ho watchcs over bier infant's every mnove;,who seeks the newest knowledge; who providcs the proper food, a cornfortable bcd apd a room that is dark and qiiict, tcnOthcre wihl be bâbies that sleop as ithey should. Next to noise, a liglit in a room is one of the worst eniemics to the god Morpheus. Thie ciosed cyclids do not sufficiently pro- fect the eyes fromn lighit. If one is left btirning in thle oo, it will cither kccp the lit tie one dreainy, rcstless an'l a bed-tosser or the x-oungster xviii unconsciousiy \u003cîeperid uipon it, and awakcn when the liglit is dim and low or out. J3urthlermrnnrQthis-very- lact k -manif est. ini a \u003cisaerceable way in the wee small liotirs in t lic summe-. The dawn bréaks fJie(n as earlv as four o'cbock. Unless t he curtairîs arcel wthe blinds down, -tid( i lie rouin darkerncd, cil ber the morti- ing lighittatxkes ilhc littice onc, or it ai art s- sofle J)('stif\u003c-rotis, lonesome fly to bujzzing and thus startles the chihd from its rnuch- needed sk'ep.'C In homes, where-paterfamilias or mothera must arise early, even in the winter, to fc make a fire Qr cook breakfast, enrh îinv a, [izht or crcaky floor is exaggersted almnst \" into volcanic eruptions. The- mucli- f .amented 'mv baby wakes up every Don't Whip Chlldron Or Scold oIder Persons a ho wet the hed or are un. able to contrai their water during the nightorday, fo tis not a habit but a Disease. If you have ny JCidneý', Bladder or Urinar.v Weakness, write -da for a ]Pree Package of our Harrnleas Lemedy - When prmsnently rellevAd tellI your riend, about t. î5èlnd no mnoney. Address: ZEMETO d0., Dept. 40, Milwaukee, Win. MARE TOUR DK A MOTRCYCLE rDeDt 1SGAEdBBi. L42NS-.. U.\u0026h Mogul 8-16--An Everyday Tracte,- Last season eighteen Mogul 8-16 kerosene tractors went into onc neighborhood. Sometime later we made a thorough canvass of the owners to find out what kinds of work they were using their tractors for, and to get figures on the comparative cost of kerosene and horses aa farm power producers. You wil be interested in the report of that canvass. Tho.e eighteen farmers, among them, hiad used the M9ogul 8-1l' for elvery klnd 0f farm work they had ever used horses for, except cultivating a growing crop. That proves the everyday usefulness of the Mogul 8-16. The report on comparative costs showed the net profits of *very fa increased by the use of Mogul 8-16. The littie kerosene tractor did its work cheaper than the best records of gasoline tractors, and at much les cost than horses. The big advantage of Mogul 8-16 is that it uses iow grade, low priced, kerosene, benzine, napbt ha, or miotor spirits for fuel. The farmer who owns a Mogul 8-16 ia always sure of a plentiful supply of low priced fuel. Because of this feature, and because of its general usefuiness on smail andlrefms Mogul 8-16 ia selling fast in Canada. gefrs A line to the nearest braneh house wilI bring you full i nforrmation. Write for it now and bave your tractor for the uprlng work. 0~~t - eiond %Tare\" te . .,nOf caïi\u0026àW BRANI BOUSES and satisactionWwhile occupying the. premises, but whcn offéred for us!., t Ig a bettor price. It'e an ixwctmcn-uot an expem.. la mala et stramg. stAffgalvansd wlre that wIllDot a.Jdlc tgami, every .rud la is tn o em vlnt.thuefarmi»ngU betvouubleinsurace aganst rmat. Pee rne mmental Pence tg d nacn everal styles. Itle easy to erect 9\" boldo t. shape for yearu Âroeta adrome«d t ther wiwlbrlngý SENT ON TRIAL ~±1~k~1CREAM SEPARATOR Thousasandalu s act~îionjs tifies your investigating our wonderful of- fer to furnish a brand new, w.U mde, easy running, easily cleaned, perfect skimming separator for onlir $13.95. Skirns on. quart cf milk a minute, warmf or cold. Maes thick or thin crcam. Different From this picture. which llustrates our low priced large capacity mn.ahine. The bowl is a sanitary marvel and embodies ail our latest improvements. Our Twenty-Year Guarantee Protects Yoa u wnmfiyIwpi. a irouM termoftriai wii aitonisti vo, i. hether your dari Ilar e or smaI4\u0026do fot e-reat offs h reyy ;i(rti rtl, etfre hrgdtn request. le the afl C P*e eiaborate and expensive book on Creain Seîîaratoka istued by îny concern la the worid. Shipments made promptly frein Winnipeg, Man., St. John. N. B., and Tormite. ont. Write to-day for our eatalog and ec ni lt a Lig îiioii y .aving propositions w. wilii nke lm . dru: AMERICAN SFPARATOR CO., Box 1196, Balnbrldge, New York --c,",
         "T;pe Weate1ýq Home Monthly Except I the boftle- Ni' ,You a~otget real Bovril exýept in tli\u0026J3ovril N ôF ô b ottiBvrl' 8 tog thàt it cannot possibly be manufactured in cheap cubes. It takes the beef of a whole bullock to make a dozen botties ýof Bovril. Add ]àovril to make your cookery more nourishing and, to save - butchers' bills. B3ut it must be Bovril. ICLARK'S PORK \u0026 BEANS I ingredients, The value of BEANS 'as- a strength producing food needs no demonstration. Their preparation in appetizing formn is, however, a matter entailing considerable labour in the ordinary kitchen. CLARK'S PORK \u0026 BEANS save you the time and the trouble. They are pre- parcd only from the finest' beans combined with delicate sauces, made from the purcst in a factory cquipped with the most modern THEY ARE COOKED PEADY-S\u0026IPLY WARM UP THE CAN BEFORE OPENING W.Clarlk ' the quality. cannot tel Montreal The Firm Behind - seeds you buy la your nly guide t. Whether the seeds are good or bad yoDU tili you have planted them-you must buy proves beyond a doubt that EWING'S Reliable Seeds are trust-wortiy. They are clean, vigorous, selected seeds, true to type, sure to grow. What's the use of taking chances, when by simply insisting on Ewing's you cau get seeds.that are sure t» kt~tu-ýrnout satisfactory ? Vour dealer shouid have ]Ewing's, Seeds. If lie ctalogue and order 9 li hasn't, write for our illustrated from us direct. flJI THfE WILLIAM EWING C., LIMITER Seed Mrdhats McIII STREET, NONTREAL \\VlcIî~ ItlïgaLvertisers please mention The Wci\u003e1vii ilumîe )unthly. Mornig at six o'clock, and will not go to Usually, there ane other symbols and Bleep amai,\" is thus unhappily explaincd. cross-road marks that show the child d1e- Once sucli an iniquitous tbit is initiate.d, serves admission into the star-chainber of $t will be the devil to check. aduit punishmenits, rather than of infantile \"Putting\" a baby to sleep la an abomina- ones. Babies of two and three occasionally tion. There la no sqch thinitas \"ptt' ~\" indicate that they ah~ be made to obey as a baby to, sleep in~ welliýlreuted fainilieA, well,-if n\u0026t more so, by rewards and evi- where mothes read study and Iearn, and deces of approval by non-phýysical insuits, refusé to be cajoled Ly grannies, aunts and instead of te rod and w ip, as puniali- neighbors who \"know more than ail the ments. books and doctors\" about babies. One littie boy of two, years exhibits hla Correctly reared, a child will fail asleep, capacity to be a social mason in this if left alone in its crib, in a dark room, fashiçrn. When Be begins to cry for or to where ail the air a solemu stiliness holds. have bis way about something, he is told: Bouncing, rocking, Iuilabying, lighting \"Stop your, crying; it wiil get you nothing \" and waflg a babe la 'putting' it to, sieep. or \"You may cry ail you want. It will 'do In other words, it la the foundation of a uyou no good.\" He now understands this, need for a'-particular set of tissues to be '¶tnd cesses to cry. His tears failed to bring moved Mefre the sandinan a swilling to the resuits expected., weigh down' with bis weighty bags, the Whèn Bh spilis buttons or candics or eyelids that must steal together upon the other smailobecta over the floor, Be la eyèbails told to pick them. up. At first, Be spon- taneously developed a obstreperous \"I la Te ClldA MmberW Scley p won't.\" When deprived, however, of some 18 Te CildA Mmberox ocity? pleasure or given a cookie, Be acquired the The ignorance, stupidity, and hysterical knack of pcking things up. Now without temperament of the father and mother de- rewards lil offers to pick up anything scend with compound interest upon the dropped by anyone. Such achildma-,-.be child. Smail minded slave-men, who are said to, be more than a society prospect. through their own mediocre lives, deprived ln other words when aà- child lias an of ail authority, command and power in understanding anà appreciation of a'deal the world outside their own front doors an exchange, a bargain, and cçivenant ol rail, rant, browbeat, buildose, threaten an agreement, it may be saîd to be Psycholog- thra8h the children of their own household, icaly a constituent of a circle wider than often merely because they have the paren- the hzearth. {éen tal right to do so. Ail of which gie' rs Contrary to the belief of ma5y 'author- to, the query: \"When is-a child not a Mchid?\" ities\" on child study, ehildren jýat are From the Himalayas to Cape Comerin, messages of loyalty and proffers of assistance have been pouring in on the Viceroy of 'India.T hese letters and messages came from princes representing millions of Indian natives. Millions of dollars were sent by these princes to hel p swell the British exchequer. Great Britain accepted the Indian offer because it could not be refused. To have declined it would have been in the circumstances an error of sentiment and statesniansliip that would have chilled and humiliated every Inidian under British rule. On the lef t is the Rajah of Pudukota, who offered al bis possessions to King George for the war, and returned to India to raise a regiment of bis subjects. On the rigbt is His Highness the Agha Khan, whose great loyalty to the King is well known. He offered his services in the wa r ini any capacity. Tihe influence of IBis Highiness extends, it is said, over 50,O00,00 people \"When does it have ri,,hts beyond its blind duty to a useful opinionated parent?\" \"W-hen is it a full fledged member of Society?\" The solution of these questions depends upon several things. There are so many fathers and mothers incapable of inspiring love, respect and reason in their own child- ren, that the latter at times neyer became physicaily, morally and intellectually a part of the social fabric. \"I have my own opinion about rearing a family said a father reccntly, who was rebukcedý by me for his illogical, ahnost crininal habit of horse-whîppmng two fourteen and fifteen year'old daughters- obedient, docile, lovely girls. The answer to such imbecile remarks la the definition which fits most opinions: \"An opinion is a theory held by fools, Nvho wilfu]lly ignore the fac.ts of nature and the ligit of rason.\" standing at ans- age that it exhibits thei power to appreciate the wiser,' for the1 worse wtIv. When a child realizes that it1 accid6nt.ill v knows a truththat itsparents do not knowv, :m can liglit hcairtcdINvwitb-. out any sense of stiperioritv, S.1% so in a home, whert, lise parents arc bi.g e(oIghf to learn froint the cIil( lot ot a seonse if sacrifice offls pride, authority ai dig- nity, the childisi a qtualified mlemiber of society, an(i1tise parents social'v ahove, sucb parents as feur to learn from or ho coriected bý a ý-hild. natutal imitators and foilowers of adulte are the exceptions and not the rule. ln- fants of one and two weeks of age learn by sensations of comfort and dicomfort, just as olcler ones and even aduits, learn by pleasure and pain, success and failure. The baby that cries and is picked up, thereafter cries to bc picked up, because she lias been thus tauglit that a pleasant warmth follows ber wailing. The cbild that kicks and stamps and thus effects its purpose, because the Brya \"n-like errors of its parents demands \"peace at any price,\" uflconsciously appreciates the lesson and-. f henceforth beiligerently gets what it wants by warring on peace. Plainly, from all this, some children are bora \"in society,\" others thrust themselves 'into it, others again have society thrust upon them, and no man can say when a cisild is flot the equal of its parents. Thus -nature,- exerting- -tn- unwearied- power,- forms, opens and gives scent to every, fiower; sprcads the fresh verdure of ýthe field ansI leads the dancing-Naiads through tihe Jewy flnads. It is Wise to Prevent Disorder.-Many tati\u003ecs lc;:l tii diorduis if the stomach and f ,v huu-i froîn îliem. At the first iiii hii itlîat the st)iînacl and liver'are iv tlieir filtileir , a course of ivh \\i-table lilh s ýi'uld be tricd, i I t fîiunîi li.it tie digestive organs v j i reine heaithy action. Laxa. -i-, ives are oi blerided in ti-ese liii il E , i otiser preparation couid be so (.ml c-,ýý- -, !ýiy. i v app",
         "The Western Home Wntl Cow Gives Nine Quarts DaIIy Fifteen years ago an assistant in the dairy department of the University of Missouri began ýto keep tecord of the nilk and butter productiir of a small Jersey cow. This 'assistant lias gone and ôthers biave came and gone, but the Jersey cow is still on the job. In 1 '5 years she has produced 108,068 pounds of milk and 5,000 pounds of, but- ter fat, or 5,833 pounds of butter. Her best year's record was 13,322 pounds of milk and 730 pounds of butter. During the 15 years this cow, Grace :riggs, lias given birth ta 12 calves. lBer iast caif- sold for $300, and the av-: erage for the 12 is about $200. About $2,400 was obtained from the sale ai ail the calves. Figuring the entire xilk production for 15 years at eight cents a quart, the total would be $4,- 358.72. The approximate cost ai keep. ing lier wvas $50 a year, or a total of $750. The average daily production oi niilk for the 15 years was a little more than nine quarts. During her best year she produced a little more than 18 quarts a day. If the butter was sali instead af the milk, at the price of 35 cents a pound, the total for the butter production from Grace Briggs would bie $2,041.55. A Patriot Private Henry Drysdale, a successfuI farmer of Pine View. Man., and police magistrate in tliat district for several years is now to be lotînd in the ranks of the 144th.« Mn. Drysdale is not uniknlown tQ many of the readers of this magazine, for lie bas been one of our very progressive agents. He is a Scot, mith ail the fighting instinct of his race, and lias two sons now on active service. James J. in the trenches in France with the 43rd and Henry W. %vith the lOth. M-. Drysdae's fart.. at Pine View is a model stock one, and for eight years lie has done well with it an the EngIlsh systeni ai iarming. Advantages of a Clean Stable One can not* produce dlean milk in a poorly ligliteci,. pooly ventilated, fi)tliy stable whlere the milk is cx- posed tealal sorts ai noxiaus odars. Funthermare, one can not lawfully seli aniik produced under unsanitany'- con- ditions or manufacture it into butter and sell it-as an article ai food. But Cren from the standpoinit ai ecodomy in managring a dairy berd it pays to baethe - stabl e --and wil~oe. Thie follawing points should be con- sidered la building a new barn or in re- Illing an oId one, acconding to the W isconsin State Dainv and Food Com- iiiisioner: L. Keep the barn cdean, m-4-11ventilat- r I well ligh-lted, andifree froin dust. 2. XViteNvasli the barn at least Conce .ear*. t will add ta its appeanance, riiease its value, lighten the dark cor- i îrs, and niake it more sanitarvN. 3. It is desirable ta have dairv cnt- tleinl a barn by thereselves. The odor Iarn hanse etaÎls, filtliv ealf wns, or ibols and child dle- ainber of ' infantile ,asionally o obey as and cvi- ù insults, 3punish- bibits his in this for or to e is taid: iothing [t wil do nds this, 1 to bring LndiEs or or, 'he is he spon- erous \"I ý, of s.ome uiired the ,without anything snect. ýf a deal enant aJ y cholog- er than \"'author- ýýat are Ralse Thlngs If we agree that blood.us the basis of ail profitable animai husbandry then the logical thing ta do la ta use that blood for the purpose oi producing aur stock. There are several ways ai doing this, but the cheapest and the easiest way is to buy and use pure-bred sires ai the sainie breed generatian aiter generation. This is not an expensive pracess of im- 'piovement. A pure-bred sire boughit -when yaung wil aiten seli for enough at maturity ta return bis purchiase price. I lie daes not his progenyhave retndi ogbfr i sflei th erd or fiock ceases. If anyone tdonib\u0026,this let hlm try ta buy, for the feed-ot, ir the dairy or for market, stock which shows breeding and stock which fails to show it. Now and then somebady bobs up and tells us how much money lie has miade handling \"common\" stock. Note that lie \"handles\" it, does not raise it. And lie makes moncy an it because hie dan buv it cheap. The man who raises it loses rnoney on it because lie mnust sell it cbeap. Let us maise the kind tlat ex- cites competitian among buvers, for whc bev are able and willing ta pay a decent prTehe other kind nsay prft ?mbd, but not the man mhoi raises them. Oats as a Green Food Sprout 1ed aats are'considered l'y a]- Most kil poultrymen ta be the best green\u003e food tiîat eanabe praduced dur- ingm the iinter season. It us a niost excellent egg producer and the fowis are yen- fond aif îï. The cost issmali for a bushel ai onts when sprouted will ---make about -four, thus- making the eost- at abouit ten cents per bushel aifi eed. t is not necessary ta bave an oats sprouter ae they cana be sprouteul aii. place wherec4here is enough warmth. A cellar will is,,Nwer the purpose veryv well althougli they should have a lit- tie ligfht or sunshine as this causes tlîern to bc greenh' In preparing thrni take a quant ity andi soaK for twelve liiourr-i w'ater tliat N slightly warm. Thtn, pour off the water and place in tra * N or boxes which haveholes in thebo mttom of them so as ta ]et thec water drain off. Then w ater the oztt: \"1'a -rnkl 1 3O.-àguembtor and Brdr e$1 3«90 If ordered togethiIt we uend bath machines for anly $13M9 and we gRktIO64 eay ail freight aa4dty çhargea ta any R. R. station in Canada. AND 11171 ehave branch~ e .houses fnWlnnipeg, Man. and Toronto.Ont PAIR Orders shipped from nearest warehouse ta your R. R. station liog pens is objectionabie, because it wiIl taint the mnilk when it is drawn. 4-.WWhen constructing a new barn, or if the old ane is remodeied, cee that tIhe wals are smàôbth aed hat' the êeiling is tiglit. The floor and the base af the walls shauld be econstructed of cernent in arder tliat the liqfid manure niay be saved and removed. 5-UGve the caw a chance ta keep clean. She can nqt'do it if the stali is too long or too short or neot high enougli. Oow stalîs ehould bc e couce- structed that the cows wili lie with their heads in the 'manger, otherwise they wiil be campelled te step back- ward before lying down, in which case they bave no chance ta keep clean. A large gutter and adjustable stalîs that line ail the cows up ta tbe gutter are important factors in keeping the cows and floor dlean. 6. An abundance of bedding in the cow stalls makes for dlean niilk, clean, contented caws, dlean floors, and flie saving of the liquid manure. If bcd- ding or other absorbents are placed in the empty gutter, the liquid manure will be absorbed and held at the bot- tomn. To some extent that practice prevents the cows from esoiling them- selves. 7. The manure should be. removed daily and the manger kelit c1ea-n. Cob- webs should be swept dd'wn and be- spattert\u0026 wal]s washed. 8. Manure should not be placed against the barn or where\u003e~le caws il be campeiled ta wade thr6iÏgh it ini go. ing ta and from the barn. 9. Even when the cows live out af doors in summer and are in the barn only at miilking time, failure ta dlean the floor and gutter regularly will re- suit Wn foui odors. 10. During the summer months caws should not be kept in the barnyard over niglit. They shouid have a dlean place ta lie. T Il It Il ]IL jne sei ha Th me n0 no tro loyq If\u003ey can ThE bui' doz .Ace upos Cai his Book Helped Me nprove My Farm is the most valuable book own and it cost me nothing. has saved me time, 1abâr and oney and V've got better look- 9, more durable -and more rvieable buildings tha n I ever .d before.' e fi rat coat of concrete farm impr «e nts is also the lat coat. Thees after expense for paint or repaire- danger from fire, rot or rust-no uble of any kind. Besides concrete vers the insurance rate. ou havern't a copy of \"What the Farmer do with Concrete\" send for one to-day. ere 's more than 190 pages of valuable lding information, 52 practical plans, strated by diagrams and photographs, and ens of other interesting farm facts. opy wiII b. sent to, you froc of ar go, itnediately àreccipt of coupon below. ,nada Cernent Company Limited HeraId Building, MONTREAL. FCUT OUT' AND MAIL -IIIIIIIý C41ÀA-nD UEtômOpmANTmLINITD rsJd D. ol OTEAL 772 entlmen:Ple s nd me a f ree copry of 10 M 77 What the Panner can do with Concrete\". Street and No .I...... ...................-.......»...... C ity ... ... ...... Prov.. ........ MME. FORMAN--Corsetiere Pars4cd winn9e. Gossard and Mme.Irena Coets M!edil fitting ga specialty . Phoenix Hose Pictorial Rev'icw Patterns. \"Ifailordcrs solicite-d 1RELx lm- DIAmOND RmNfEE ,r 10 -.. . (oh.1p psy adv. Mrf. todai. ci Jewclay Ca. PuNM 000, 686 .C@\u0026Nu A 1I About the. Fanam jJ I I istance from these offer tances every tii bis of bis King )f I-fis adults e. ln- arn by .'t, j ust lmn by lure. cd up, ýecause [casant Schild ýCtS its rors of a)rice,\" 'n and- lat it en are iselves tliust 'lien a Thus Gwer,_ every, )f the rough -Many h and C first er'are rse of tried, i)rgainî Laxa- tl-ese be so",
         "Thé Westen oe ilotl mea n*at ana mornlng but stIr thun *1UL a stick or bond 1»fore wattrlng. As uconý as, they begin tb apruut thoy *olb. qSprd out la boxes tb a etoauso about au inch. Thon cou- \u003eO nu. t.water the mcme as before but do,-not, tir qfterm.tbç.y-begin, to aprout. ?ILey abould b. up Ivo or thrée Inchea We oi eng fed whlie requirea about tou daye , or,,two weekî according 10 the. waraMt of the place viiere they were kept. A block about threp or four fuches square will answer very weli for laenof ten fowle. Thi can alsobe t K ng cieks but should b. fed avt theZC i in h cats ane jut be- glniir« -oW Prout, .or .lhey siiould b. eut tés, Liber a fow daya ule on. àkoffl b abl to teUwhen to etart a now aâmomt àn as bbaft mre for ea\" day's f«\u0026 .MA. FeSling for E90s SqilIy Substitut* for IFod#Avaftbbh \"Mei whol. puosophy of sucoeus. fui feeding for ega, Say\u0026 William . LLppimot4, profesur of poultry hue- bandîy la the. Kanma State Agrriculural Ooleg., \"oomults i the. uWiitution cf sornthing which wiii take the. place cf lMei.bùgiansd 'worms cf the apring and sumroer and cf the green food which le available thon. Either commercial butf srap or skim milk may b. mub- étituted f or the bugs and worms. \"Commercial beef arap le, prod t eooked from the trimminge fthe pack. 1-w houaq,\" eontinued r fessor Lip. plùmtt.\"IIt eau b. purohased at f nom *5t*o0a ton. XilkShouid Be.Sour «81Idm milk ehould always b. fed sour as the milk sugar contained i sweet milk cannot b. d1geted by chic- kens. Af ter thia sugar haebeen changed to iactlo acid, iowever-which je the came'when milk sour\"t la thon avail- able for foo\u0026 Bouides furnishing protein for thie birds, sour mnilk acte as a. cor- rective and helps to keep the digestive tract ini good tone. \"'Nothhdng seemu fuliy' to 'take the place cf' - actual green feeci for the. mernanor oa\u0026bbpoahoûkbe f.ddur- donc, amonalg the best subtitutes are aila:e, leavea 'f alfilfa hay cured green, or terne et alfalfa. Once a day the biffds ahould be.ýgven aU the green feed that they wiiI dleau up ln a hall hour,\"# Kash for Laylng Soni Mr. Lippincott'recomurnenda for iaying bons a mash tobe kept lu hoppers placed ithe heu houa., the hoppere being oponed at noon no th\"k the hone wiii have. acces e, tohem during the. afteïnoon. The mash consiste of 60 pounds cf corn mneal, 60 pounde of whoat middings or shorts, 50 pounds of meat scraps, 30 pounds cf wheat bran, 10 pounds cf linseed cil mneal, 10 pounds a .iled, alfalfa, aud 1 pound of sait. Thi us naile 10 be b.d la oomection wlth a scratchiug feod couisting cf 2 parts of wheat, 2 parts cf corn, and 1 p art of cate, ail by weight. A amal handful of thia feed .hould b. acattered lu the. litter i the. mng for six birds iu the pou. About 4: 30 o'clock in the. afteruoon the dry maah hoppers should be closed and twice as much grain ehould bo scattered in the litter as i the. uorning», Grit, oyster sho, suad cliarcal mIioud b. kept before the e bos et ail times. The. grit le necessa.ry to the grinding of the food iu the giziàrd, the charcoal keeps tho system in good condition, and the cyster sboli supplies the necessary lime for mnaking the egg ebeli In cold weatber iuko-warm water should be given te thie chickene in preferenco to cold water.. .If thxe birdsa are kept busy scratch- iug ail the tirne and care je taken that they are-u\u003ct being overfedý you will bc sure te got egge during the winter months. Wateh the fowle closely. If thoy do not run to meet you when you orne to, foed then i es aure sigo that they are beinq overbed. Cut down oni the feed immediatoiy aud avait re- aulte. Erseruni% Turkish EtronZhold, Falls to Czar's Forces Erzernrn, the chief city of Turkish Armenia, has fallen before the assault of the Russians, and is now occupied by the victors. Grand Duke Nicholas, in chief command of the Rus. sian forces, in the Caucasus. bas telegraphed the Czar of the victory. The capture of Tur- key's northcrn stronghold is considered of great strategic importance. Fromn the city, roads radiate in all directions, and it is thought that with Erzerurn as a base of supplies the Rus- sians will b. able to corne to the relief of the besieged British in Kut-el-Amara. The, city is reported in Riames lime to Buy :When hogs are higb there la a big demand for pure.bred stock. Breedera get more money thon beoausr-the pork value cf their hogp rakes them inde- pendent of the cheap buîyer and ho- cause the demand je sufficient' te take aIl tlheir stock at good figures. WheiL hiogs are lowr the demand for pure-bred. stock fals off, and breeders are com- pelled to seli it for les\u0026 than when market hoge are commanding grood prices. So when *he pork rnarket is low, when the demand is least for breeding stock, je the best time to in- vest i pure.bred hoge. Juet now hogs are ebeap and breeders have a surplus for sale et reasonable prices. And now je the time to \"go to it\" and stock up with pure-bred hoge. lDon't wait till everybody wants them. Get them now and be ready with a. surplus of your cwn for the time when everybody wante them. That time will corne as surely as night follows day. The Poultry-House Floop iProvided the floor is kept coveredl with litter, as it should be, it really does not make a great deal of differ- ence what, kind of floor je in use. A floor cf dirt will give as good results as any, if the dirt inside the bouse is raised at least six inches above the sol outside the building. Many dlaim that a. dirt floor will be unhiealthful unless tîwc or three inches cf the top soul ie removed frequently and replaced with fresh dirt. If the floor ie kept welI littered and the litter renewed as often as lb, becomes reduced to short lengths, very' little cf the droppings vil become mixed with the earth. The lit- ter wiii absorb the greater part of the. liquid portions cf the droppings. Wr1here earth floors are used, it ie ad. visable te hbave the bouse rest on a con- crete or stone vail that extends twelvo or fifteen inches under the ground. The purpose cf such a wali is to keep rate out. Concrete floors are extensive and un- less rightly buiit viii iikely be damp. Concrete for poultry-house floors should Your cropsb-ý,re* * .: i n, dariger! ./. C ;a... ....... Iflulii..",
         "be laid on a good foundation of, coal cind-' ers. The cjuders absorb and hold the moisý ture that works up through the ground. Concrete je hard and cold on the fowls' feet .and should- always be covered with several inches of sand of fine garden loam. .When hiens are confine4, they should be giyen.a place-in which to dilet them- s elv es. Wallowing in dust ie the hen's Ë*atural method of ridding herself of vermin. If the poultry-house floor is of eârth, the best method is to set aside a sunny corner as a dusting place for the hensé. This corner should be boxed off f rom the rest, of the floor with ten or twelve'inch boards to prevent the lhens ecratching it ýull of litter. Road dust, dry garden loam or sift- ed coal-ashes rmake good dusting ma- teniaIs. The dust, as a killing agent, is greatly improved if a pound or two of tobacco dust, sulýhur or Persian in- sect powder is occasionally mixed with it. T. Z. R. Soils Lose Food The farmers are fast recognizing the fact that each crop which is harvested removes from the soil certain plant- food elements wvhich must be replaced if crop yields are to be maintained. If cave is not taken to Keep the soul fer- tile by putting back these forms of plant food that have been removed, it has been f ound that smaller and srnaller crops will be obtained. The four elements removed by grow- irig crops wiiich oftentimes exist in such limited quantities that they must be replaced, if the crops are to con- tinue to do their best, are nitrogen phosphorus, potassium, and calcium, or lime. The nitrogen is found in the humus, or decaying vegetable matter of the soul, while the other elements are found principally in minerai comn- bination. The following figures show the amount of plant-food which is re- 'noved from the soul by the different crops, the value of this plant-food be- ing measured in termis of what it woultl cost if purchased as a comm~er- cial fertilizer. An Appeal from the Honorgble the Minister of Agriculture of Manitoba Winnipeg, Marchi 8th, 1916. Editor, 'Westegn iomne Monthly,. Winnipeg'. Dear Sir, - At the present moment one of the most acute, problems 'before the farmers of Manitoba is the securing of a suffiient supplyiof farm laborers to meet the demands of the seasoii just opening. ]3elieving that thie niost p;omising, and alrnost the onlv, outside source of supply at present is in the United States, the Maniitoba Department of Agricul- ture and Immigration is seeking, tlirough its St. Paul agency, and through an active advertising cam- paign in varjous parts of the ' United States, to stimulate a northward movement of just as many farmers' sons and experi- eneed farm laborers as possible. In this connection I wish to ap- peal to ail thoseitizens of Mani- toba who, having corne from the United States or otherwise, having formed an acquaintance south of the international boundary line. can hielp us to get into touch withi experienced farm lielpers there who mighit be induced to corne 4o Mani- toba this season. I have no doubt that many of our people could sup- ply the names of such persons; and in ail cases where this is done, miy Departnient will see that an appeal is mnade to them, and if possible they will be ihduced to corne to this province. I would ask ail sucli correspondents to kindly address their letters to the Immigration Branch, Departrnent of Agriculturc and Immigration, Winnipeg.- Sincerely yours, V. WINKLER, Minister of Agriculture and Immigration. Twenty bushels of Wheat will re- move fromn the soil 25 pounds of ni- trogen, 12.5 pounde of phosphorue and 7 pounds of potash, with a fertil- -izer value of $4.91. The straw ire- moves 10 pounds of nitrogen, 7.5 J3ounds of phosplhorus, ant4 28 pounds of' potash, with a fertilizer value of $3.33. The entire wheat crop, unless the fertility r moved ie replaced. takes fertility out of the soil valued at $8.24, nearly one-haîf of it being removed by the straw. In a similar way, a fifty-bushel oat crop will remove fertility worth $11.06, sixty-five bushels of corn con- tain plant-food worth $7.96 in thïe grain and worth $7.94 in the staîks, or nearly twice the total amount re- moved by the wbeat crop. Two tons of cloyen hay will remove plant food worth $4.56. This is the commercial value of the potassium and phosphor- us. removed, for the dloyen plants, throughi the medium of tiny bacteria living in nodules on the rootiets, leave the soul richer in nitrogen. It is anerror, however, to believe that cloyen is the remedy for an exhausted soul if more than nitrogen is needed, for it cannot turn back the pliospiior. us and potassium which lias been re- mioved, by preceding crops. A \"crop of -).0 bushes of- potatoes will remove plant-fo)od- worth $11.05. The* aver- age yield of fiax, which Le supposed to he harder on the soil than other crope, removes plant-food worth $10.80. Certai n general figures can be drawn4 f rom the above- estimates. Theý cropj whjch removes the least plant-food- according to its commercial value-isi the two-ton clover 'crop, which removes1 potassium and phosphorus $4.56. Thei 65-bus *hél corn crop and the stover re-1 move -from the soul plant-food worth1 $15.90,ý the largest amount taken out1 hy any of the crope nentioned. Wtall proves how 'necessa ry It is for the( farmer to carefully conserve every bit1 of fertility on bis farm, if he is toi keep hie soil productive.1 A systeim of grain fanining, whenc not much live-stock is kept, depletes1 THIS is a strong but a truie statement. \"Eastlake\"l Gal.. vanized Shingles on the roof, \"Emipire\" Corrugated Iron Or \"Metallic\" Siding on walls, and the building will last for generations. And it wilI do more thau just t.\"last-t will be always fireproof, storinproof, liglitning- Sproof, neat in appearance and dr inside. Thirty years Sof successful use ail over èanada prove tiiese statements. =xensv. ae a beautiful, sanitar, easly leaed fieprofcoveri , ýtt l'eadi\"Y 'nâiZecon over any surface. Splendid foreSunday schools, halls, etc.- US SCOUPON TODAY Put a cras, opposite the \"*Metamc\" lune Yeu are fatermed in, clip thi. out and mail ta u wlhi i, yopnm nd addres. and w.'Iltend lau paphlet.. uesand fufl particulal!. .4 is a big Breeders r-the pork hem inde- and be- to take ,s. When pure-bred are com- an when ing good narket is [east for me to in- now hogs a surplus And now stock up wait tilI Ihem now your own y wanta as surely por Scovered it really of differ- ri use. A d results house is )ove the ,ny dlaim ihialthful, the top replaced ie kept aewed as to short \u003eings will The lit- rt of the e. it is ad. \u003en a con- 1s twelve and. The ýeep rats and un- )e damp. 'S should the supply of fertility in the soul. It bas been proved that Juch a 'system of fàirming cannot . h\u003c continued, be- cause the yields will eventually fail to pay expenses and the interest on the .investmnent. When a* crops are fed on the farmn and Ibnly milk and live-stock is sold, there will be only a emaîl lose in fertility each year if ail the manure je returned carefully to the fields. A smali amount of. milI- feed purchased and fed-' to swine, or dairy cows, will usually eupply the fertility lost by selling the milk and live-stock. The farmer must learn to conéerve the fertility of the',soil if permanfent success je to be obtained. It is as necessary for him to do this, as it ia for the -mianufactur?.r to keep the ma- chinery and system of organîzation in. his factory at its highest point of efficiency. If hie does not do this, ho cannot hope 1,to succeed perxnanently. sity. -.Raph Hoagland, Minnesota Univer- sity. Start with Good Onos The poultry business la not difficult to acquire if one pays attention to the work. Many editors and witers. on poultry saubjects, have .digcouraged many Who wÔuld' have eûtered tbis business by warning them of* the dit. ficultieeýof the undertaking.' Like any other business there are certain. rules that mnust b. obeyed and certain prià. ci pIes that govern the successfut, man- agement of the enterprise.\u003e ness are based upoh t e care, the knowledge and the inteltrgence of the, operator, not upon the fowls per capi- ta. Without the application of an in- telligent systom of breeding, housing, feeding and caro the fowls could not be kept with profit to their keeper. bue- ces depends upon the display of business acumen.' Altlbough the fowl. may lay well and the broilers grow ,well, the roastera fatten well, profit or succesa ila not assuredlunlesa ugh products are sold well. - - s 91*'*1. Y' 'il I 1, 1 1",
         "The'' wetern noÊmronrtiy ICLL.EM£-QUICIC--Th. TIie-T..t.d OoPIr Pots At One TMme Don't \"hms around\" ail spring and summer to1 rid of gophers.Cicar them out once for ail. j gave Mr. Gopher somediing ho' likes and sSc h gogeau» el.H docsnt liko pa=î poisoned w auryhîn,, hard to get him to u touh 1 *ë b a pun ho.likou a poison that atratby is pungm odor PoWn o. sw.ot no gopher viii spit it out, a poison sodeadly gaghen dt duotheiim partie .kils insowty. 0\u003c Kîilm-Quick Gopher Pio M\u0026 t o kfLatoki eh.gopher Itlamd. Isodoaturaces. Chap.st l!jv. cotsmore than 1 cent acerkiliUte gophorLBecz ci ts m rsuk-ifitcost threti m muhw o t ;uld @lb.che\"peut. Z o znpll.aatfeatures la ndirmI respecmt tih. poultry bueinees il fno cçption; but I believe, for a man amail means with a liking ln that rection, that i -\u003e greater opp turnties than aUÛidat any other liue ok.It pays to be a littie eut] siaatio over what one b doiug. AUiL great succosses and ail thse really gri tihings that have evèr been acco piished have been made, possi. Ct through enthus-iasm ln the work bei ust done. The man who cannot get up iim lttie enthusiasm over hi\u0026 birds ff boter mot attempt breeding poult S Amy one who intends raising a f fowls had best begVn riglit by buy! 'B firat-class stock. Not Madison SquE tg Garden winners but healthy, e1 tured, pure-bred stock. My advice the beginner la to istart with one, bre and, stick te it. IAsten tô what y lhear and; \u003cobserve whetlier it tai] with your experlences and obser'% tioine. In making a start it is ve seldom that one can procure the s( of flock he neede, but -he can soonp dt by breedflng riglit and feediug rig] Cet the shape by right breeding, th an kep up the vigor and health by, ria ngu C. E. Morris\" ex- iof ;hu- flie -eat ibif -ig had ry. fe'w Ing are na., ta eed you ies va- ery cort eet \u003eht. idn rht on. Oea .0 tUM Guarante.d $lMjy a r om -fd It lh guamat.d in wsftlg on\"ma, dmk o\u0026dié waer anemd twi kilt al the \"lienrawhere __ * l orcdaccordlng to u1 Idirecc Malbepurchaso Primo The Safoet Gopher Poison oe, no damVoi la mbdng or handling. Suf4 ebcune It ab»ooluty pro. tu y= cropu Mmd profite from popher diasag. Ne, fumer ca alford te. b Got GeÉuine KllEmi-Quick let' h. berne,1fcst, raout peoomic\u0026L 'ZIore la ono thoro*Ugby proveszne you eu be so mureot Don't ýeta.. miio.\u0026 ,Akiroiieatlonsfyouwanttogetrldof;ohr. \\8-,\u003c 3 dwàjý 10e,73c, $1.331 nough for 40, $0,0160ars WOl Gt it frdaiysz rggaF If hocan'tsupplyyouwc sLp dirct~o nult-p- o.Scad for FR£- GopherBook KILL-EM-QUICKW ~ WO. Ltd. SnOld PZ\u0026hg CANAD lam OIdNan iIAWIC BICYCLE e Sttdw eR ,Grad £VPwDartureor Hrue Coasr Brke ad Hubi D eta- ckabAr71es hlghgrade equlp- jmet 1cuâingMud. of pagea o 8i~dsundnes atmMir BI Ma4-sLYoucau T. W. oD48~ ON. I LiQoR AmbDrooAcco HABiT Dr. MeTaggart's Megee Reniedies for tese habits are sae nexpensîve homne treatments. No hypodermic injections, no Ioss of time froni business and positive cures. Reeommrended hy physicians and clergy. Eiuiries treated confideniti-illy. Litera tutte and miedicine sent iii plain sealed packages.1 WArtc fiî r 1*T fl,'ool\u003cl' D.R. McTAGGART'S REMEDIES, 1*8 Bay St., Toronto, Cari. Establislied -'0 Vears. Sreen as a ollng \"H'm! 1 paid a quarter apiece for the eggs. Tliey made fuII.grown geese by Tliankoglving, but they didn't lay the neit spring, nor the next, nor tli\u0026Ïnext, und if I don't have a big flock another year, I chop their heads off.\" The irato ýwoman gazed balefully. amont her beautiful Black Africans tak-. ing a bath In lier wash-water, then sent a barrel stave at the nearest *wan-like It was exasperating to pay a dollar; for four goose eggs, and waste the vaca- tion of lier biggest White Wyaudotte to sit on them four weeks, then wait four seaisons for the 'second generation of gosliugs. The trouble was, she hadn't acquaiutedl herseif with goose habits, oi\u003c she would have known 'that mature geese aemcimore profitable than young ones, and that their produetivity increas.eti with aâge. That trio of geese and tlxelr gauder wouid by another vear yield : \u003er, an income to exceed that of' lier:scruab cow, for each goose, in. o~beiug af.t\u003ewed. to sit, could be foiWed to lay a second aud third clutch. of egg for liens 'to incubate, and once goslings are out of the sheil they cal for littie care and after the third weck littie short of crushing can kili one. The gosiings, as she said, would brýng fuil-goose prices by the holidays, and ln most places they couid be.,marketed un- plucked, for tirrget practice. It is wise for the impatient to pur- chase geese rather than eggs, and to select a laying strain, like the Toulouse, although the African type, crossed with full-blooded Embden, grows to monster size and gives a f'air number of eggs, the cross resulting in an individual un- surpassed for grace outside the swan pa-rks. Preferably, stock up iu the faîl, that the home-loving mother.goose may becorne accustomed to her new quarters, a straw-lined box or barrel, no matter 'what or* where-aud deposit her eggs there. Geese wll wiuter on next ta nothing, even in aur frozen nerthern climes. A bunch of hay, thrown down fresh everv inealtirne, or fed from racks, that they iay not run over and foui it; a root or two, a hondfiul of grain to prevent their losing fiesh, is ail that is necessary. They will pull througii on hay alone, cutting it off short, a spear at a time, Sut so lean a diet is not profitable. But ear in mind that geese fatten the easiest of anyfowl, mnd corn stiTfs are -heating -and -fntten ing -for 'àiny ile-li. -So feed iany grain-oats for chioice-as tlie- reproduction sea son a pproaebes i Nlarch, or they -wiI1qiei beiî'toi fat ta iay. The goose wviil huum bli'ergg, ini the feathcr-lined straw of ber i' ne-t, so w-heu feathers botraY lier., finitl u.eggm and save iù-lifufil t hve 'are foi' or fi veo ta hatch înideî' i lien. 1)îîek-, dmp tlîh' eggs anywliee. Mot so t lie gtse. Sbnît lier otit of lier nest when sul snw, tendency to 1veinaiii in l it, a 'l~e l vill \"break up\" ýîî a wcck or '0 1,(l hegîî iayinxgagauir. S inay Inithis IV ~1,,ý m Indueod to, lay twlce or thrloe. - For the. la firet three weekis keep the goilinga and r- their mother-hen in a yard, or they mal \u003eEý get stepped on or drowned in pails or 1- asks into whlch they clamber and re- r- imain undiscoverod until 'uxliauste\u003cý or \u003ef chilled; or tiiey.xnay get upset in a cow- Ltrack and, unable to right themselves, iecorne to grief by larger creaturea ' Feed Imixed meal with water and furniali pans L- for driuking and bathing. .Af ter that, ýthey may wander at will and turn up in 9the old quarters at night. The goose 's a the only farm stock that can take caf of and feed itseif at that age. Three r four weeks before siaughtering, feed with more meal which is the quickest fat- 9tener.' 6 It le curious that goose farma ou a large scale are not more frequent. Once *fiocks of geese are matured, the profits are large and sure, the stocks take no Ltrouble, and oliglit teeding cost. They 8do demand grazing pastures, preferabiy xnarshy places unfit for other uses, and ample chance for batning. They need to tbe fenced away from gardens; and they twill pick on ether poultry if housed with them iunfRocks. But they do not cail for warm. quarters,'only reasonable shelter, with a chance for daily winter outings and drinking and bathing, water unfrozen. Invest in a peaceabie breed, like the above mentioned, and the gan- ders wilI not be cross. Thoroughbreds eof auy breed are more even--tempered ythan mongrels. To be sure of fertility, eprovide a gauder for every three geese, ;.at the most.--4J. I. Trott Clearing the sea of one of its deadliest secret dangers. A rnn-weer's flotilla, with its \"dia\"leading HOW to Prevent Destruction by Cut Worms The advertisement of Mr. Ir. A. Gib- son on page 15 of ithis issue shows a handy little coutrivance for preveuting - the, ravages of the eut worm. Not only does the paper cylinder protect the plant completely from the worms, but in the earl 'ier étages of its growth it is a protection from frost. Indeed, in ex- tremne weatlîer, the top of the cylinder cari be pinned togetiher, thus making a compiete hood for a tender plant. It wvill permit of garden plants being put ln mucli earlier than hitherto. Iu fact, it is a real good thin.g which lias been brought into being by the necessity of fighting cut worms on the gardens aud farms this year. Miss (Gibson, who has an interest in thie instrument, recently gave a demon- stration of bits use at Eaton's, W'Inui, pe\u003cg, where it was uiost favorabiy comn- xnentect on and 'where îtit la ow on sale. Join (Crier llibben, Presideut of Ptitiîîcton University, said at the ILake 'Nlflimek afrbitrationn ofFrtnce-:-- he day is not yet corne when violence and oppression mwill met away before rigbt like the 1)liiber's 'bill. Like, I repeat, Ilie phuîuîher's bill. For a plumber, you- kiîow, one presented. toa.a millionaire a Ilil l nioC f for inending a pipe. But iliu iiiilliîaîre i-ban(led the plumuber a 111riiie ai sailiseîe: 'Receipt 1iat I)I of ni Oi's in ji. Ls %,- -' ifiige tlhere is nlothing so potent M I i. ives' \\Venn Fxterminator, and i cal!( £Zivun in tl'e ost delicate child -1r iîjury to thse constitution. -si 2\u003c' b",
         "9e weurV' O.eIE Fauliea. ami Patterit When ordering patterns be sure to etate size. When no size is specified we rmerve the right to send medium as, owing to the emali amount involved, it is flot pmsible for us to write and ask remitter for further information. Address al order to Pattern Department, ,The Western Home Muonthly, Wnipe YTTHLE tere re mny ovei details, imar an attactve features amog te nw ey lsit appears thatSprng nd Sxnxer ashons are fol- lowing clgaely ini the footsteps of the Winter modes. We stili have the short wide skirt and the fitted.bodice. Capes and capo collais are more in evidence, and thee is ý.uch ribbon trimming. Striped taffeta, handsome brocade silks, aie among the lovely fabrics woven by American oms for American women. In woolen materials, checks seem to be popular, and even the sheer sumrner fabries show designs on the cross bar and check order. Some lovely simple gowns are made up in striped silk, and are real emat ini spite of their simplicity. With summer dresses this cape will. look piquant and be useful for furbishing up or trimming a bodice otherwise plain and un- attractive. _es In taffeta, hs capes are usually black and fopped by a choker collar, or a high collai turned back. At first glance there seems littie differ- ence between the styles for youxig folks and their eiders. The lovélest pastel Shades, daintiest lacesand tulles, so truc to youth, are found in every depaitment where women's clothes ar'e shown. They are Em.e for afternoon and evening frocks for misses as weil as women. While some seasons past, silk was not permissitle for young girls wear, one finds now, gowns for misses in taffeta, Nu.w Remem ber! When I aok for cocoa I want the, bout an d _cveryone knowa that the best às It iu a well.known fact that'in e-very home where quai. ity is appreciated, this delicious cocos mnay bc found. It is pure and wholesomce and manufactured f rom the best eocoa beatis procurable. Sec that the boy brings k. A brown anid tan stripe, for instance, in satin and taffeta has a vest of tan, and trimming in folds on the skirt to match. Wide regular stripes aie shown i almost ail materials ini bright colors with white. Linens, lawns, voiles, chiffons, radiums, mohairs ail show stripes. One can make an inexpensive dress of striped voile or lawn with a simple trimming of frills or ruffles. Among the pretty colors for Spring, are greens, porcelain blues and lovely grays. In taffeta, a soft gray could be combined with white organdy of cream batiste or chiffon. BGlole\u0026effeets -are- stylisli, fnot -anly cen Puits but also on drçzseK- Horsehair lace is being used to distend and hold out the skirt fulness at the waist- band and over the 'hips. A narrow strip of horsehair may be sewed into the founda- Co'n of the skirt to have it 'stand out in sinart, ¶hough perhaps unbecoming, style. Single capes, double capes, short and I \u003e,ng ,capes, some with anid some without -'i1ars are shown, and while they do not ,ý i t ail figures,they are at least picturesque. T4huv may-be made up inl cloth and worn a thin frock, or of silk,'laee,etnbroidery -; :Ittate or as ipart of zi drer. radium silk, crepe de chine and sev\u003céral ribbed weaves. In môme instances, Georgette crepe and silk, or broadcloth or serge are combined. For party wear, it is quite correct for a young girl of sixteen ta wear a lingerie froc k of embroidered linen, dotted net, tulle or mousseline de soie. With a sash of color and a touch of em- broidery this is chariing. Junior frocks are shown in shepherd checks and in plain colons of serge, alo plaids ini wool and silk. There are Norfolk ideas in suite, and Russian blouses, double breasted reefers, andhalf-fitted coats with peplums. -Coynbination. dresse, showing a whett' blouse of lawn or linen, and a skirt of serge, cambrie and gingham aie nice for growing girls. One piece pique dresses retain their popularity. Sometimes these are erm- broidcred in color, but white alone is pre- ferred. 1644-Child's Rompera, with Sleeve ini Either ýof Two Lengtho-Percale, galatea, gingham, drill, linen, flannelette and crepe are best for this style. The leeve mav he finished at wrist length with a band cuif, or in elbow length with a turu- bLwlý ctff. The iierknaàv bave the rnp:Lt. WVhpn vuriltlurg- IvrtIqprq nh-a:, entocitoni Tho Western IHomne montly. 'I --,'w\\ ~i-' 4 For thé lizigk and they mal palle or and re- .ustedý or ln a cow- emeelves, 'e5.. a\u0026Feed nish pians Iter that, urn up in goosej 'ake c1af4D Three ý r feed with cest fat- me on a 2t. Once ke profits take no They referably mses, and r need to and they !housed r do not uasonable y wiflter ig, water le breed, the gan- tighbreds bempered fertility, Be gees% ,st secret with its nby A. C41b- ;hows a wenting rot only ct the ,but in lt is a in ex-, cylinder aking a tnt. It ing put In fact, as been ;aity of mns and ýrest in demon- Winnie-- [y com- E)f sale. Bat of ýe Lake -flne - ice and e rigoht repeat, er, you naire a ý. But aber a Receipt )potent ,or, and te child ioIL HORJWCK.SES1 FL A1NNE LET T-ES (Made by the Mmnufactur ot aitii culbeatod LONGCLOTHS, TrWILLS \u0026 MEEHTINGS), are made from carefully selected COTTON The nap is short awd close. No lnjurmous chemicals are used. Quality, designs and colouriigt are unequalled. If purcbasersof thisusful ma\"eiu for Underwear \u0026à the yer'touWd would buy THE BEST ENGLISH MAKE, obtainable from the Ieoiding stores, they would appreciate t6e cooefort and durability wbich finfeîor quaitie of- Flanneletue do flot possea. seetie-u \u003c!-ORROCICS981 4 ANMUAL-SMAEawaa on the selvedge every two yard.. T E N M ILLION yarVd..' Awarded the Certificate of the Incorpora*ed InoUtute of Hygem. For information as ta the nearest Store where procurable apply to Agent. John 8. Ritchie. 417 Khîg'a HaU Chambers, St. Catherine Street West, Moutreai",
         ", Ive Western Home Neonthly For Ail Wooc1raÀId Ail Finisbes,ç Use 0-CEDAR POLISH on ail furniture, on floors, on ait painted, varnished, stained or enameliod woodwork of ail kinds. AIways use it ase directed on the bottle-with water-half and half--and you wil be delighted. \u003clade la 0a»ad) we more than a polish. It does flot cover up the dirt or grease. It cleane as it polishes and brings out the original beauty of the wood. A high, hard, dry, Iasting lustre is obtained-the 0-Cedar resuit. *Tale a bottiehome to-day on trial. It te guaranteed. Satisfaction or mnonoy refunded. Fa'om your Dealer 25r- to $3.00 CHANNELL CHEMICAL CO.', LIMITED 869 ESORAUREN AVENUE, TORONTO (l.Ko'ep Your Skin Clean YouyII 1.1ke t BLACKWOODS TEA Choicest of choice brands to be obtained of your grocer Ton Irmportersaund Ptolkers WINNIPEGC couur or be eut i cooci IY low outline as illus- 24, 26,28, 30 and 32 inches waist measure. trated. The pattern is in à sizeà' 1, 2, 3, It requirca 7Y, yards cf 44-inch material 4 and 5 years. It requirea 3 yards cf 27-. for the entire gown for a 36-inch aize Thbis inch material fQr a 4-year aize. A pattern 'illustration caffs for two'separate patterns, of this illustration xnailed to sny addres which w'11 b3 maied to anky address on re- ..-on receipt of Ilqýpents m s ilyer or staffips. ceipt of ten cents (or each pattern ia silveir 1632-; dfes' Aprobti-Onîe of,\u0026the or stams. - Most practical features of an apron i fne .Wâ 1637-Sklrt 1657-Composed Protection it affords. Thle design here of L\u0026a~' Shirt Walzt Pattern, 1637, shown lias this goodpoint and some ethers. an~d Ladies' Skiît, 1657-As here illus- It has deep arm oeinsanisctit trated, butchera' linen was usedfor the sufficient fuineas. It is held to positioni at waist andchke sutn fo e the baêk with a boit. Gingham, percale, akirt. The waist is made with a pointed drill, lawn or linene are good inaterials fo yoke, which extends over the front. The thia style. The pattern la cut ini 3 sises' akirt lias plaited side sections and jauaty Small, Modiixm and Large. It requirea.5 pockots., Serge, taffeta, linon, gingharn, yards of 36-incli rnierial for a medium nuns a eiling anýd crepo are-nico for bath sizo. A pattern Vf this illustration mailed skirt and waisit, if one desires a dress of to any addresa on receipt of 10 cents in one material. Crepe batiste, lawn aad sivror stampa.Hoa madras are good for a separate waist. The 1638-Ladies' os Dress, wlth waist pattern is cut ini 6 sizes: 34, 36, 38, leeve lIn ither of Two Iengtis- 40 42 and 44 inches bust measure. It re. White linon, embroidered in blue, would quires 2!/2 yards of 44-inch material for a mnako this a amart xnorning drosa. Checked 36-inch size The skirt is eut in 6 sizes; gingham, atriped seoraucker, figured lawa, 22, 24, 26, 28, 30 and 32 inches waist drill, 'Ôton repp or polin îs also mie The measuire. an(l requires 4 yards of 44-iachi stylo' is simple and p'eaing. The right material for a 24-ic sz.1 h kr waiat front is crossod.over the left A meaBurea about 3V3 yards at tho lcwer shaped collar facing g\u003eutlines the neck. edgg, with piaits drawn out. This ih:s- The Bleove amy bo finished in wriat or tration calls for two separate patterns, short length. The skirt la eut on new linos, which will bo maiied te any address oa re- with panels titched in tuek effect. This ceipt of 10 cents for each pattern, in dosirale modol la cut in 7 aises: 32, 34, silver or atamps.Hoa Drs, it 36, 38, 40, 42 and 44 inches bust measure. 1642-Ladies' os rswt It roquires 7V4 yards of 36-inch miaterial Siseve in Elther of Two Lengths-As for a36ich size. A pattern cf tliis ilus here sbown, blue and white checed ging- tration mailed te any address on receipt cf bain was used, with white linene for trim- 10 cenlts in silver or stamps. ng.In gray striped seersueker, figured 1652Gfrls DraswithSisee ~ lawn or plain linn, flua style would be Elther of T Dengts, and Cflar inequally effective. The band.trimming could Either of Two Ountns- and her ion be omitted. The pattern la alsé nice for BirenfandwhiOte inhai wAs ed, with serge wash silk, taffota, gabardine or voile, bron ad witeginhar wa usd, ithin wËieh materials it will surely make a trixnning cf white linen. The riglit front serviceable business or afterneon dress. of the dres qerlaps the left at the The pattera is cut in 6 sizes: 34, 36, 38, elosing. The sleeve rnay be in wrist length, 40, 42 and 44 inches bust mensure. It flnished with a band cuff or with the tiýrn requires 7y yards cf 36-inch , xnýterial back ouff in short lengtË. Thoe kirt is a for a 36-inch sizo. The akirt measures throe-gore model. The pattera is eut, bu 3 arsa'h ot.Apteac 4 szes 4,6 an 10yeas.It requires this illustration mailod te, any address on 24 yards ot 44-ineh matorial for a 6-yearcrceipt cf 10 cents in silver or stamps. aise. A pattern cf this illustration ma î6-Jo res lt rvihu to any address on receipt cf 10 cents i '-Jn Boo wlh Sse n itheor o tho ailver or staxnps. Blr;wt leeI ihro 1636-Ladies' Dress-Gray broadcioth Styles, and with Round or Square with piping in a darkor shade cf satin, an Neck. Edge-Dimniity *i a pretf y floral de-. fane uttons complote thia ca isgn is here combinod with white batiste. effeet. Tergitfot ch ast g The boléro may be omitted. The style is shaped at the closing in unique outline. good also for challie, for lawn, nun's voilig, The neek may be\"nished i high collar ailk, gingham, erepe, silk chiffon and erepe style, with smart pcinted tabs, or in îow doechine. The aleove in wrist length lias Outlino, by rolling collar and fronts as beeoming fuiness at the outer seam and is ahown in the small view. The skirt ia a finished at the lower edge with smart three-pioce model, with lap tuck at the points. In short length a neat cuif formsaa centre front, whore the closing fr offected. pretty trimming. Thia till would be nice Satin, nun a veiling, gabardine, voile in tulle over china slk or chiffon, for a cashmnere and serge, gingham, linon and1 dancing frock or graduation dress. The drill are also good for this model.\u003e The neek edge may be finished round or square. pattern is eut in 6 sizes: 34, 36, 38, 40, 42 The pattern la eut in 3 sizes: 12, 14 and 16 and 44 inchea buat measure. It requires years. It requires 5 yards cf 4i-incb 6 Yards cf 44-incli material for a 36-incli materiai for a 16-year size; without the size. The skirt measures about 34 yards bolero it wiil require %' yard leas. A pat- at tlie foot, A pattern'of this illustration tern of this illustration mailed to anyr mailed te aay address on reeeipt cf 10) addrcss on receept cf 10 cents in silver or cents' in silver or stampa. stamps. 1650-Gfrl's Dresi with or without 1629-A Popular \"Twenty Minute\" Over Blouse, and with Two Styles cf Apron-Juat the tliing te make \"in a Sleeve-This weu]d make a very attract- hurry\" and te find cenvenient and comn- ive dress for party,,or bèst wear for gradua- fortable ever after. This stylo is nice for tien or for dancingNchOOl. Sifl and crepe gingliarn, seersurker aipaca sateen, lawa, or crepe de chine could be effectively coin- linen, drill and percale. Thé body portiôn bined in this medel, aise chiffon and net or lias ample fulnesa, and the strap exten- tulle. The dress inay be finished witheut siens sectire the baek over the fronts. In the overbieuse. The sleeve in wrist length warm weatlier, this style wiil be much ap- lias a new cuff. In short Iength the aleeve preciated, for it dees away with any super- is in puif stylo with gathered ruffle. The fluity cf material, and at the saine tirne pattera is eut in 4 aises: 8, 10, 12 and 14 secures ample protection for thé dress yoars. It requirea 3V8 yards cf 44-incli beneath, and la comfortable. The pattern material for a 10-year aize for the dresa, is eut 'n 3 aises: Small, Medium and with 1Y yard for the overbîcuse. A pat- ]Large. It roquires 5y2 yards cf 27-inch, torn cf thia îUlustration mailed te any inaterial for a Medium aise. A pattern cf addresa on reeeipt cf 10 cents in silver or this illustration mailed to any address on stamSks. reeeipt of 10 cents in silver or atamps. Waist 6Sit 1659-Composed 1633-Ladies' Kimnono Sack (In EIth- of Ladies' Waist pattern, 1658, and, er cf Three StYles)-This pract ical model Ladies' Sklrt Pattern, 1659-As bore may be made with the fronts in pointcd illustrated, white linen embroidered in outlinc, or tied in fichu style, or as is aIse self celer was used. The waîst is smart and iliustra.týed, in surPlice effeet. The uifode up-to-date, with the surplice vest. pŽortions. la- nice far aik,- erepeý-- I.tllie,- rashmero,- Theskit-raybe iuishe witl or without dimity, kw-a or batiste, fiannel and flannel- the drapory. Serge, jersey cloth, taffeta, ette. 'Thei pattern is eut in 3 sizes: Small voile, batiste, crepe, gingham, tub silk: Mediumî and Large. It requires 214 yard, gabardine and nun's veiling arc Ail ice for cf 44-inch rnateriaîl for a Medium size. A flua style. The waist patteun is eut in 6 pattern cf this illustration mailed te aay aises: 34, 36, 38, 40, 42 and 44 inches bust address on receipt cf 10 cents in silver or measure. 'fli skirt is cut in 6 sizes: 22, tamps. R osr1EA\"is good ---,',, by the use cf a good reliable cream and this you will find in my \"Ide0al\" Velvet Cream which la neithor sticky, greasy nor irritating. It wIll not grow hair on the face, prevents blackheads, and chapping, rendering the skin clear, white and smooth. I, make it myself and positively gusanteo that nothing but pure cils and--Vaxes aie used in its composition. Try it and you will use ne other. Price SOc per jar. Send for booklet \"Healf h and Beauty\" for further particulars. MRS. E. COATES COLEMAN \"ONE M. 996 224 SMITH ST., WINNIPEG",
         "1653-Girl'a Dr..., with or without pockets, and with giseve in ither of TWO Lêfgth.--Striped seersucker and white pique are here combined. Gingham, percale, galatea, repp, poplin, linen or Jnene are also nice for this model. The dress is iclosedaboveA'he 1glt, but -ýe closing. may be flnished to the, hem. Ie sleevé in wrist length has a neat band cuf. The short sleeve has a smart turnback cuf. The pattern la cut in 4 sizes: 2, 4 6 and 8 years. It requfres 24 yards'oi 44-inch material for a 4-year size. A pattern of this illustration mailed to any address on re- oeipt of 10 cents in silver or stamps. 1639-A Danty Dres for Party or Bot 'Wear-Blue batiste embroidered with white dots is he5e illustrated. The inodel is exceedingly becoming and effect- ive. The waist portions are in Empire style, with the skirt portions gathered or plaited. The bolero is shaped in attractive outline. The aleeve may be in wrist abst measure. rich material 1h size T[his ate pattern', làre. on re- tern in silver -Oomposed ;tern, 1637, B here illus- Lgeci for the g for the h a pointed front. The and jaunty î, gmnghamn, ice for bath a dress of lawn and waist. The 34, 36, 38, ture. Lt rt'- iterial for a Sin 6 sizcs- iches waist of 44-inch The skirt the lower This 4lu:s- e patterns, cress on re- pattern, in 081, with ngths-As ecked ging- ie for trim- ter, figured Swould be zpiiag could sO nice for ne or voile, ly mnake a .oon dress. 34, 36, 38, ,asure. It à maeterial measures pattern of address on anips. r withot )r of Two r Square ýr floral de-. te batiste. he style is n's veilirg, and crepe1 Iegth has mam and is 'ith smart iff fornis a ild be nice Ton, for a ress. The or square. 14 and 16 )f 4a.-incb ithout the s. A pat- d to any a silver or Minute\"i tke \"in a and comn- is aice for ýeen, lawn, liy port itin ap exten- roats. In mucli ap- any super- lame tiue thé dress lie pattern lium and f 27-inch pattern Of ddress on amps. (In Elth- ical model n pointed as is also [lic mrode cashmere, id flannel- es: Small 214 yard, n size. A Ed to any , silver or Jack was to go on, always coniquering, in the great batties of life. Dazed, John Brooks turned away, anid entered his libr ary. He cloBed auti locked' the door. \"He, can't die\"' lie said, doggeffiy. ',I can't let hlm de!\" Hee had a cuÊioùs feeling tliat thiere 'wag something lie could do about it,-if he could only colleet himself and think clearir-. lie, too, wa4 accustomed to conquer 'whatever opposed himi. \"Al tlat medical skill can do lias been done,\" lie said to himself. \"Is there anything else T\" 0f course there wfts!FNadi he not known-ail lus life that there isa C (od in Israel? A (God to Whom nothing is impossible? What could be more nat- ural or riglit than that ho ahould ask (God to save his boy, whms life 'the world must surely need? Hie would pray as the saints of old pra)-ed, iitît invinoible deternnination; witii a 'per4 633 4UW*I631 Sistence Plat COUld' not ho denied, and God, would grant his, prayer. He fell upon his kneea. But before lie could frame the wordse, le seemed tu hear a Voice speaking. Hie litened. 'Tour prayer is granted. Your son 's life will be spared. But I had a dif- ferent future for hlm. There la work elsewhere that 'lie ea do. There are dangers t'hreatening here that he cat never avoid. There are heiglits else- 'wqere that lie wouud have reached. 1 lad my plan.. You inay now have yours. John Brooks rose treniblng from lis knees. \"Not mv will,\" (he sobbed, \"dear Cfod, noV mine! \" Ot iiithe-la! h physician came from the sick-room to ineet litai. \"Its'ail rigit,\" the doctor whispered, as he grTasped the father's land. \"It's always ail rightl\" eaid John Brooks f rom his heart. It Is not generally known that a layer of sliced onions placed on the top of a roast of beef and aliowed to cook there will give a delicious flavor to the meat, while their distinctive flavor will not be iioticeable. 'Quaker Oats P1eim We reoferngmany prmust uaker .Qats users, in Silver Plate, eer n Aluminuni Coofing Utensils.* A circular in eachi package illustrates theni. iis takea the place'of largo advertising, and gives ail the ~, saving to y04, Each 19c package contains one coupon Each 25c round package contains tw coupons. Each coupon lias a merchandise value of 2c to apply on any gremlium. We niake very attractive, very ba offers. Note theni in the package. Cerea Spaan-Dominian Pattern Far 10 Quaker Oats Coupons To Make Folks \u003cLove SOâts F'~Better To Revel in This Virn-?ood This is to mothers who are anxio\u003cý' t(j(make\"a dainty of thisenergizing oat. The way is this: Get the large, white lUSCious flakes. Get themn unmixèd with msnaller flakes, (.or littie oats lack flavor, Serve none but Quaker Oats. On some oats Nature lavishes enjoyments. Soin. omi. In the saine field she neglects. We pick out those favored oas for Quaker, dloardln àai the rest.- Only ten pounds are obtained fromn a bushel. ý in'l worth the pains to get these,,ueen oats. Tt bzdng a 4ouble welcome io this -spirlt-giving dish. And_ you pay no extra prioe. Quaker% Qats Ail the Little Grains OmniIted Some thinga we know, and some wîe don't know, about oats. We know they ar-e rich in phos- phiorus and lecithin, t he brain and nerve constituentw. -We know they are 75 per cent energy food, and 15 per cent nitro- genous. And that two per cent is mineraI food wu mqed. But we don't know whY th\"yno (.xel in vim-producing power. In this respect for PZl th@. ag, oats have stood supreme, AM4 oats will always be the king food where vltality in prized, That'a why we urge dii. m.tod od niaking oati delight fui Excepi ln par Wd Peterborough, Cmt. Saskatoon, Sask. New Round 25c Package This esson n~e bring out a new large package of Quaker Qats. Il la a round package, inm.ect.pru\u003eof, A permanent top protects Il until the liret \"e. la used. This package contains twa pr.niium coupons with a merchandise value ci 4c. Ask for t-price 25c. W. till continue aur large 80c package with \"aiI. AIma aur !Oc. package. N length, finished wth a band cuf or in shaped kimono style at elbow lengtL. For low neck effect, the waist could lie eut out on a line with the-bolero. The pattern is euit ini 4 sizes: 4, 6, 8 and 10 years. Size 6 requires 3y yards of 44-inch material, wîth 1l/8 yard of 27-inch materlal for the bolero and collar. *A pattern of this illus- trat ion mailed to any addreps on receipt of 10 cents in silver oirstamps. @'De Profundis\" \"cTo speak frankly, the symptoms as the crieis approaches are not as fa- vorable as I had lioped for.\" W I wag iard--for John Brooks to -real- ize that the great specialist was speak- in-_ of Jack-Jack, his first-born, whoin hie Iiad watchedl through babyiîood and boYhood, and through love of whom lie lad been brought to a aew sease of God's goodaess; Jack, wlo had been his pride aIl tiiese tweaty years, and ini iehom were centered lus dearest kopes for the future.- Jack had beenksick before, but hie hat always thrown off ,F(ýesin the sème easvyfasterful t gelse that hie had had to face. To h- tiler, it lad seemed certain that (125M",
         "0.F HI.FRIEID M9 Chemplali St., Montreal. ..'I bave been restored ta health by tok1ng 'Fruit-a-tivea'. For two years, I waa'a miserable sufferer frm Rheu- ovatism ansd Somack Trouble. 1 becam e veçry :veak,. had 'frequent dizz spella and when I. took food, feit wretched ad s1o. * .-i suffered from Rheuzna- tiara drAÙfl1y, «dm Apains ins My bacÀ ansd ýbi ails and 'oWy ands stuollen. À frlend advlsed me ta try 'Fruit-a. tives' omd fromn the outset, they did me gôod.ý After I had started the second box, 1 feit I was gettîng well and I eerseverèd in the treatment. 1 eau truthfully say that 'Fruit-a-tives' is the oùly medicine that helped me. LOUIS LABRIE. '#7RUIT-A-TIVES\" la the faimous çnediine madefromnfruit juices. 50c. a box, 6,for $2.50, trial size, 25c. At ail dealers or sent on receipt of price by Frtuitra-;tires Limited, Ottawa. PRECKLIES Now la the Time to Get Rld of These Ugly 1 spots. There's no longer the slightest need of feeling ashamed of your freckles, as the pre- scription othine-double strength-is guaran- teed to reinove these homely spots. Simply get an ounce of othine-double strength-fromn your druggist, and apply a litile of it night and nsorning and you should sobn see that even the worst freckles have begun to disa pear, while the lighter ones have vanished entirely. It is seldom that Mtore than one ounce is needed to completely clear the skin and gain a beautiful clear com- plexion. Be sure to ask for the double strengthi othine, as* this is sold under guarantee of moncy back if it fails to rensove freckles. T '1LOISES 8URELY PREVENTED hi Cutter\u0026 'Ho'@ae filé'S Lo; .toc fnas relbZPie; reàrdby st J.ocmn. beause thejo L E G ê otot whore ethel' vacins fail. L Edo.Gke B klgP,1illa *5.iO00 Çu tr'a iaei.g nietor 95 Olaouste: 250 doe. 10: p. c. 00 doses, 20 p. et. Use onI nJeMfr, but Cuttr'. sipleat and strongesf. Eve~ a~kg.dafet.unusedpIlla exehanteable for r2asafr aeo pIka' DoesUtmu old vacins \u003cours or a u oisr A taforleu protection thon fresh. . .7t on utti'e If unobtainable, order direct. Bond check or M. 0.. w. PRY charlea and slp promptly: Vaccina and i1jectera pasduty fre A THE CUTT91NVLABOIIATQISY* Isrkali, QmjUorait. iWhat is your comniunity-doing to help, the Empire? At this period of national criais, The Western Home, Monthly de- sires te encourage the formation of local societies. whose Aim and 6bieets are ithe furtherance of ImperIal ideas and the help- ing of the boys in the trenches., Everyone cannot go on active ser-vice but we can al do our bit i other ways and thereby help win a war, which la Canada's, to the finish. The appended letter shows that some country points are already engaged i this praiseworthy wark, but every town and viae soud have a well-orgaiiized society cabl-of provîimg War 1 elef- Work for althe inhabitants of the place. The Western Home Monthly woukj like ta hear what la being done li this respect in other paes of the Prairie Provinces. Morden, R.R.1, Mani., February l2th, 191,6. Dear Sirs,-I have been a reader of your paper for many years and have always found somethingir n each pape r that was vey helpful and now I would very much le to have you tel us more ways to make maney for the Willing Worker or the Ried Cross Work. W. are the Dunston Willilng Workers with thirty members, and havinïg only or- ganized five- nontha ago, we, have don. very well, for out in the country, but if it is possible we would like toa have other number, *e tbought came \"«Ar I of use?\" and 1 decided to pén these lines and maybe they could be used, for Ilis rvc. Onxe Willing to Serve, Tbink of the Lonely Soldiers B' C, Feb. 1916. Dea'r Editor,-May I corne i for a chat? It seema a long tin'. aince I made my bow ta, the page, but reading the letters tempted me ta write. The Western Home Monthly la imp roving every month. I stili think it the best. I se. the bachelors are stili stoutly pro- ciaiming their independence and bewail- ijpg their loxielmess xi the sane breath,but there are others more lonely than they. A short turne ago I read an account tellixig how much the meni in the trexichea long for a letter from home. One soldier toid of sharixig his home letters with same of hie coinrades who had no0 one ta write to them, or whose people wcre careles li writing. 80oyo trs and boys who read this paper, ifya ave friends kx the trenchea, don't forg et ta write, and writé àften. I have no one there anid no one ta go, but if I had, I believe I would write ta them, every day. TÈhe least little bit of home news la weicome and it lasa littie Co, do for the dear brave chaps who are -dôing sa much forus. Now, I am goig ta hiiduige i a growl. Whcere are ail the correapandenta of mature '-t '.4. H England han added 1.000,000 tons to her navy since war began At the outbreak of the war the British naval tonnage was 2,714,106. To-day it is 3,714,100. This statement was made by Mr. A. J. Balfour, First Lord of the Admiralty, in the House of Comnions. The photo shows the British submarine No. 76 tearing tlirough thle seas while a British airslhip hovers oier it. while protecting the two tiiere soars an aerQplane hiigh above in tise air places tell us .what they have donc and where they got the best satisfaction send- ing their nioncy and sewing and knitting. We ail think it would be vcry helpful ta knaw what mare country places are doing, as wc can always find out what thcy are daing in the city. Yours faithfully, Ella Baulton. The Nlgher Ideais Sask., Feb. 1916. t ' Dear Editor,-We surely enjoy The Western Home Monthly, and it la read from caver ta caver, especially by the writer, who la somewhat of an invalid. I arn pleased ta sec same of the writers urging the readers ta a highcr hife and aim than just talking frivolous nathinga. Dear readers, life la ail tao short ta be spent in ý s having a \"cgood time\". Some day the eatth Angel wiil knock at the door and we wiiI have ta give an account of the deeds done in the body. Let us be up and doing whsle it is day, and may aur lives be pure and holy, and may aur aim be, not how many beaux we can have an the string, but how many we can win ta a higher and better life. Sa many say they sec no harin in smoking, and girls I tell you as long as wc say that, meni will smoke and usé tobacea. Some say there isn't anything in the Bible about tobacco. Well, there are -plenty-of- other .things that x-arenet mentianed that wc know. wrong. The Bible is a Book of Princip and God ex- peets us ta be hancst enough ta apply t hase principles.' Naw, dear readers, get your Biles and turn up these passages and seec what you think of them in regard ta ta-. bacco: Isaiah 55:2; Ezekiel 36: 25, 29; Zarhariah 9: 7; 1 Corinthians 6: 19; 1 Corinthians 3: 17; 2 Corinthians 7: 1; 1 Corinthians 10: 31. Naw, I suppose, sameone will say: \"'She la a religiaus, fanatie, iong-faced aid mýidIl but no, dear readers, 1 arn just a humble foilower of Jesuq, and as I rend the letter frçm \"One of Thein,\" li the Februarv age gone? Have they forgatten ta write, or have they fcit like me, that the youn~ falk have crowded us \"young aidsters out? I would like correspondents from Alberta and Manitoba and if they would like news of snow-bound British Columbia I will be pieascd ta give it if I can. I wifl answer ail letters. Wishing the Western Home Monthly evéry success. Yours very truly. Eileen Alannah, Talk About Red Cross Nova Scotia, Feb. 16. Dear Editor,-I have been an interested reader of The Western Home Monthiy for some time but this la my first attempt ta send a letter ta the Carrespondence Page. I do not sec many letters in the MontlIy from Nova Scotia, sa I have saine hope of seein ' L this epistle in print. This is a lonesome place at least for me. I live alrnost by myseif. M y sister left for Boston a short time ago and I had ta leave sehool and help my mother at home for the present. Several of the boys around here have en- listed and sorne are at the front, but neither of my two brothers have enlisted yet. I wouid like for correspondents ta talk about what the Red Cross, and other societies are doing ta heip our men l ei _war,_inste-ad of -such \"'piffle\" as-the \"ccity Girl\" calîs it. If any of the girls or boys will write ta me, I W'111 be vcry thankfi and promise ta answcr thcm ail. Wishing the Monthly cvery success. A Nova Scotian. Certain mnorlid conditions mnust exist in tlhe stornach aiinitestines to encourage %vermi, and they ilil exi,,t as long ae tilese irbidi conditions permit fhemn to. To bc rid of them ýand spai-e the child suifering. ue M~iller's Worm Powders. Thev NvilI 'correct the digestive i rregulari tics by destroying the worns, conditions favorable fo Nvorims will disrppear, arid the ohild wvil have no moare sufferinz froin that cause. S.fferod.Awfully' 1111013 EADACIES.. When the liver becomes sluggish and inactive the. bowels becomie constipated, the tangue becomes coated, the stamach foui axid bilious headaches are the upsiiot. Milburn's Laxa-Li-ver PilUs will stimu- late the sluggish liver, dlean the foui- coated tangue, do away with the stomach gases anid baxiish the. disagreeable bilious headaches. Mrs. J. C. Kidd, Sperling, ,ý.C., writes: \"I have used Milburn's Laxa- Iiver Pills far biliaus headaches. I suffered awfully until 1 started ta take them. They were the oniy thing that ever did me any good. I neyer have any biliaus headache any more.\" Milbujn' Laxa-Livd Pffls-are 25e per vial, 5 viais for $1.00, at all dealers, or mailed direct on receipt af price by The. Tr. Mi:sIurn Ca., Lirnited, Toronto, Ont. The Original and DEWARE ~ Of imitations sold on the MI NARD'S LINIMENT Successful Scientiflc Treatmnat FREE 0F CHARGE Do you suifer from loss of hair?-Does your hair get premnatlirely gray-Is your hair stripy, sticky or matted?-D)o you sufer frons dandruif, itching or eczema of the scalp?- Are you bald-headed or about fo become so? If you sufer frons any of the above-nien- tioned haîr troubles do not neglect if, but try to relieve the trouble at once. Delays are dangerous. Write at once for our illustrated booklet, \"The Triumph of Science Over Baldness.\" FREE TREATMENT We want* to prove to you~ our own risk fliat flie Calvacura HarT euet stops the falling of the hair; destroys dandruif and eczenma of flie scalp and promotes tlhe growth -of nucwlhyn- INe-will scnd you -a -$l:00 box-o1- Calvacira No., 1, together m-ith the above- mcnîiolîed hooklet, \"The. Triuimph of Science Over P,îldnes s\" if you send us your name and address, fogether wifh 10 cents in silver or postage stamps to help pay the distribution- exil lises. Cuit out tliis\"couipon below and send to-day f0 Union Laboratory, R. 31, 142 Mutual St., Toronto, Ont. I'ise- find enclo'.ed 10 cents to help psy te distriution expenses. Kindly send me at once yotir $1.00 Cîlvacuira No. 1 and yollr liuuklet, \"Tlie Triuimph of Science Over Bald- riesS.\" (Enclose this coupon in your1tter.) When çwrlting advertfser s please meion01 The NW-tom h lomie onthl.V. /' Cmesp.mdemc",
         "The Wate~-Home - ont hi y' f fuIIy 880ty GIlp inTrouble *gàta. DearSirThe Sa4., Feb. 1916. DmSit-he-atilb cftten by the peron signingherseif \"A.City Girl\"1 h a 1Itle too muçhfor me to gwallow aind keep quiet'. . . 1 ý' 'ý In regard to, readera being forced to read sucli pifle-I was. flt aware of 'the fact thtayne wa.s forsed to read the Cerres- podec or any other artiele* that doca' not suit themn-there is plenty -of g9od reading in The Western- Home Monthly, and different kinds of reading to suit differ- ent people. I wasa under the impression that the correspondence column was more for country people, as the city people have their. opera hoiuses, picture shows, dance halls, -Èkatiný rinlis, and many . other places for social gatherings, while some of us \"poor bachelors\" and country heople are depriveçl of these pleasures' and we have ail the long 'intcr months to put in with scarcely anything to do, except'read Luggish and ionstipated, lie stomach the upshot will stimu- i the foui- he stornacli able bilious ing, -. irn's Laxa- tdaches. I .ed to take thing that xr have any s-are 25e ail dealers, rice by The *onto, Ont. The Iriginal and OnIy ienuine and* write. Our work ia practically at a stand-still from the time the ground frietes until it thaws out again. There- fçoire, the correspondence column becomes, a kind of a \"get together.\" so0 to speak, or \"#ew way to get acqVainte.d, as \"Yankee\" cs it. We can spend many pleasant gusdrn the long winters correspond- 'k witll different people whom we have never', bad the pleasure of meeting and. possibly some of us \"bachelors\" miglit find a chance to niake a ch~ange and do something for our Country that would be just as bezieficial as talking about War Rlelief, Red Crose Work, etc. I have been baching for over eight y ears and :u, to the 'last year I have not benawgiy roïm the place for more than Oneuigbtâ~t a- time, as it is hard7to find a man that I',would trust with my stock-I have 4j acres of. land and consequently have soke ome stock. M . greatest pleasure,'fa in i èTàçrspondin9. Myléttersj may 'fot suit every . one, but I -hope that no one will be f orcedi to read'thers, aj- though'I would like to write a personal letter to \"A Çity Girl.\" l'Il bet two pins that she is a çhrçnic old maid. Chronic Kicker. Why Bilnt 8S2s., Feb. 1916. Dear Editor,-After being 'a sileit reader of your interest ing paper for. the, past 18 months, I feel it ryduty,pnt to remain silent any longer*. 'I can fIlly;ýsay I appreciate The Western Home Mon\u003etby especially the corresi.onde.oe eohmüin. i liv inthewel- seddisfftrict\";and god farming community of, d'eylon.-May Ilbe allowed tosay i flyappect tettr in the columnepcily\u003c'Vale3Yplower.'\u003e* I very often ladugh' over different -eozp- ments brought forth and think it- fine for the young ladies to Lave thei syas.weil as ehégrown up women., Co 8e6»91g * Nopes TbinouWil1imuprovo Palmer,' Saek.,i Jan. 1916. Dear Editor,-'As 1 have seen no letter from thià dW itI.wmUwTite afew lines. 1I have been a .sùbscriber to your valuable e4per for. five years. It i -a fine p4p\u003eer, Most excellent 'i' many. ivays*. Times are prtty dul around h4ere just now. The *eather is.rougli and the roads bad,so we do not go very far frçm home. Many of the boys are away to enlist, and more would like to if it was possible. Per- Iiaps afterseeding, there will be a chance for some to get away. \"Just a Boy\" has spoken the truth. There are rnany complaints of the wicked- ness of man, but it seems they like the fast traveller. I have known some niee girls to turn down the steady gbing fellow. and go with the sport. 0f course, I 'don't say al girls are alike. There is no doubt that many a young man would forsake sorne of his bad habits if his lady friend had the right influence over hirn. S. Now, ail bachelors are not dirty and many are excellent cooks, but I've* had almost enougli of it, baching over five cears now. If things don't soon improve, Iwill b.ajza. to try sornething else. Girls don't care to corne out on the farms these times, they seem.ýo have 'toogood, times in the city, and the farm ip duil f or theru. I would have lef t the farm myself, only I hate to leave mjv horses -and other ani- mals, they are old chums of mine. It je - like leavingý some old friendÉ. I love animals, they seemi to understand man pretty well, too. Anyone caring to write, I wii answer ail letters. My addresa is with the Editor. I amn, Starliglit. This Colun for Bacholor Maida and moen Sask., Feb. lSth, 1916 Dear Editor,-I notice ini the February issue an appeal for a more practical type of letters'for this column. Surely some space cari be spared for the nonsense of bachelor imaids and men. \"Valley Flower\" thinks a long terrn of baching will make a man cranky. I think she is miàstaken. If anyofie does know how to appreciate a good wife and home it is a man who has bached and homesteaded, as \"Single Handed\" points out. What does any oth- erman know about the triais of a house- keeper? Being a homesteadefand bach- elor, I can conflrm the statemnent of \"A Happy Rube,\" who says county boys like brainy and sympathetic girls. At least anbitious ones. I expect ini the future to be able to provide a home for some sucli girl. As for that type of girl which refuses to recognize a man in overails, my respect for them rapidly sinica, as I have discovered that they are the ones who generally make fools of themselves. They apparently think they are a gold mine and every one ia after them (delusion). Most of my ac- quaintances are different, I arn glad to say, and are ladies in the true sense of the word. However, I do kIaow a few higli- headed ones. As my homestead is about forty miles frorn town, I sometirnes get rather lonely. A few correspondents gained froin your pages would help sorne, so I w111 live in hopes and leave my address with the Editor. Rocky. Why Women Should Vote Manitoba, Feb. 2, 1916. Dear Editor,-There is one part of the letter from \"Prairie Nurse\" that I can't quite agree with and that hs where she says wornan shouldn't have the vote. There is one question I would like to a8k: \"What harmn is there in it?\" Why should awoman not have some thing to say about the laws that are to govern her children after they have grown up and gone out in- to the world ? Don't you think that a wornan knows more about what a man or womnan needs? Now some people say tat a woman wouldn't know what she was voting for. Now, that ia not quite true. At any rate she has more pride in lier than to 'seU her vote as sorne men do. 1 guesa I will close, hoping to see rny lettcorinaprint. I will be pleased to answer ahlctters. A Beulabite. A Powerful Medcine.-The healing ptaper- tie^ rn six essential oils are concentrated in -v bott1e of Dr. Thiomas' Eclectric 011. t'':i itg one of the most helieficial liniments c%, ffered ta tiie use of manl. Thausand,; testify as to its power in allaying pain. i' any tliausands more can certi ly that owe their health ta it. Its wonderful is flot expresscd by it5 cIieavrless. Il,. me\"a' Boc i 1.\" game Z \u003eO aé o nt m , il iiii k w, l o au tls a~ '1' Operation Ordered M'Sr Appelffilat-Uffe Dr. Ciases Kidney- Liver Pille and w as C Mrm. J. eL Baflan- tyne. Sturgeon Falls, Ont., writes: 'My hua- band was dreated for appendIcitis and the doctors ordered an o'peration. But ho would not consent 'to an operation and 4be- ga.n the use of Dr. Clia.e's Kldney - Liver Pilla. Since doing ao ho has lad nO need of an operation or even or a doctor, as the trouble hda completely left i. I cannot -find worda to apeak our gratitude for his cure. Dr. Chase's Medicines ýhave proven o!5 wonderful 'benefit ln our home, a» the Oint- ment cured zny littie girl of a severe bumn, when nothîng cime wo'uld 'brint relletl' D~r. vM ]E Beder vt.an foflSuu et MUIIb -i usnmderlng the tr.jtt cf a iy oolmet sdckemSt han; alwffl bea =yrnis to drt adthi e ulUTe M =mIn\u0026lthetii.oniy100=clwOay aw el. t. U ~ that If tbey bave h\"d am operatton for appemIItlthev esea foroyer Immune.ad nel have no trUr tm f. ang tMM lino, but I MW emphatieal\u0026. ma 1 hblnk y\"Vo,'w aras amr rght, tbat mter au attack of appondilgt1% divs tbouab 7011 have t\u003eee m aoemfufy ozuistel upo ab\u0026 Me apum removed. your troubles hav e ly JuMt baMm umu7« remove the. oaa.. *bîat va. the cane cfthe aspedicls7 «'The thougiitle viii çay lutes.tmatlou ta th*pend N, l nflammnation In the. a6*zendix la appendlulo6 but bA caused the. InflamnmatonT Constipation, vI a« Im. theý prime canse. If you wer. nover constlpate\u0026 you vwowlà forever be ate. Appenllitts la only eof ithe reaulti et the. r0t021t1021 et Lcal mktiela the. Cois.tur ta. ong=9 There in no -lon'ger any question . hat the redi cuse of appendicitis lu constipation. By keeping the bowela regular you not only prevent appendicitis, but \"ls a bout of other 013, somne of which are even mnore duixgerouuis han appendicitis. Dr. Chaue 's ]mdney-Liver Pille are reeoxnmended to you in this connection, not as a mere relief by effeting the. mpvemnt cf the bowels, but rather as a positive cure for constipation. Au is wpll known, the bile uecreted by the'healthful acton'of the. livef is Nature'. cathsrtie. So long aus the. 'bile flv frooly into the intestines there is no constipation of the bowels sud no clogging of the excretory organs. Hene. the windom of nsing Dr. Chaes' Kidney-Liver-Pila to euro regular working of the liver, -kidneys and bowels. You thereby lave youwef rnuch inconv ezience from the uinor ills of 1f., and enuur against such fatal disewsa appendicitis and peritonitks DEWARE Of \". mitations sold on the verlts Of 1 NARD'S INIMENI rHIfair il Lient ,air ?-Does s your hair suifer tram Le scalp?- became so? abave-men- it, but try Delays are illustrated -ncc Over r own riskc tstops the idruif and the growth 1:660 bax of the abave- of Science yaur name s in silver listribution end ta-day Shelp pay end me at and your «)ver Bald- ur 1 tter.) e menition",
         "Thbe We topa, Home Af onthly Why Py a Big Price For .ADiamond? Intedpik utone of the glorioffl da d SlNt . Gez8,astinsold 4kt gold, and get it on a ô D PFo Triaerito the bht the opera-on the street- to work-everywnere for 5 flli! ay\u0026-tnen aecide Wllether You1 Wilh to buy or xiot. If you are not fascinated by its radiance-if you ooWadeeila spiendor one trifle leu. than that of a. minedl diaxond-eend it bgokst our Bixpenne. You don't pay un a\u003cpnnY fo the trial.-; If you dedoto keep it, pay the rock bottoin-price -3O0 as muclias adiamond ooSt) an.ou can afford. Terme, au low as 34o a day (81.00 a month\u003e, , t Interust. No-red tape. Your credit ie good with the Gophur Dlamcmd Co. \u0026nd coupon for Sew jewelry book. Marvellous New Discovery À 'Pao\"i cdo the MM ham been solved. Mcence han at lent produced a gen of daahling brWianoe. They are called Gophir Gems, and resemblq imlned diamonde sno clooely that man~y people of wealth are preferring thern., Gophir Gerna stand Onr and aeîd testa and eut glass. Get one on tais! tài.dà;. Wear it before you decide to buy. Set . lnSolid 1kt Gld= g@/ýTHE GO] i a ete ma««pn c s cience V. e te rewmof centurles. They am nover M N ceitaaE : l4 .gl.Write for lbe nov esta- OF CANA 1 Cie d ss thieq~e nvstufor yeursll. / Dept. J. 4, 1 « For Nev .1ev. Street, Tor\u003ci Send the Coupon Bo.Ptyu rame asud' addrn ln the coupon or on a ltter or aý Geimen -tend me absc posoar 504 0 t aionc fr te bs nv ~k am Gentpaid. your new Jes aI aquile Ulr 0mw.Ren th faslnaing to7I an. fli articulari, of your ofho~lla~~ha oaqueod ntur an eay panaut plan. mtar ltee.D odoyanntn.Pu ADES........... .. o r anean dd~ush i.BCup o nov- /P greateroe Jutera 5UIte o nodtyrau ttaothe mont IbcYOUr UtlMate deatly? yM n =U Ste.N lrn b.Td 0y u vlsh t a apl Trados' (Model 22) Orcnw11ah st vospoudblftr our ownoelft.tla.oni Wtboutoperationqulckly, saely and pen whl\"àmob à oli l, wotir cur efforts, but you wiliila pleasant ansd dose flot intertere wlth0 0n ou -tly, If j ccu 100 1 t îs l ure lyour M .TRILETY, Face Speclalait wedl vtiponie ia.M=r inyouondmatly make 447Ackernaan Bidgý, Binghamtc Wheu the. pesky Yen cabs ure it in mot a Hairtaharn Shade Boller. Hartshorn Improved Boliers move quietlyand smothlyat a touez, and stayrlht where you beave the..Cea a .fev centamore, but obbowmuch- shade won't work FREEVaiuable book the Beat Service tram your Shade Boliers\". Send fer it taday and learn why it pays to look vhen buying shade roilers for \" ig- †Stewart- a* ...ss * . D........o,-.n The \"UN\" GRAVITY Waahes Cleeti -Try It at cour Expense A'his le the vauher with the perfectly ideal action- Jdoal, becauso it doss wash cdothes cdean, yei'doev ,,\" iear or vear thons. Up and down, and out and in that are afftotd--sol the cloths-they are held sta- tionary, so they cannot be io\u003eubed. Even film y lace, wil not toar-buttoqs won tome aff--edges . wontfray. It takea just sx minutes to vash tub fu o f very dirty clothes. Gravity plays a bt part le Ita action nsaklmg Itth sasiess opérated machine on the markt., e. Tou a a bismaebhwn-4twlllremove teoheav- - dq. « lestburdonthebibousework. Woknow wht.- z0*c Il man do- wewant FOtbo w to V. $çd4 1 want yu to trylIta Or «Ponsefor 30 . défibClore y ou dacide to bar IL. W. tt/ wli endlIt prePald. Do sa many \u003c' \\ waahin a yuIlàke with h, wlth- lu oth tit--m Ton hitrh at Our expeee. Couid aay Y q* ýý offe. be morefar4%t - tisai? Fllinthecluo bn/0q4 ~ . -o writé to-day for . bk that toila ai about the 0Gr1-0 ty\" Waaher. s 'I now, girls give us nme-good reading for the Drest of the winter months. There la one thing I am proud of and that la, that if the w6men can t have their say in the laws of the countryi they can say ail thçy w9nt through The Westerd Home Monthly. I aiû a bachelor of 20 years, and fully believe that Wpmen wi11 get the vote ere 1917 cornes along. I amn Engliali by birth, and am fully experienced i cooking, etc., and a first class housekoeer. Fully in- tend having the house sél'ubbed three times a week and every day brings its duties along just the saine to me as it would to wom]an. Weil, now, I can just sce some of these nice girls smiling and saying: \"He's a dandy.\" Believe me, lie is allright, one Of the.Wýest's best. Weil, now, dear friends, as this la my first letter I hope to sce itin printand shall be p1iease to write more If this one meets with succese. I wül sign myseif Poor Love Sick Boy. Th~e Oasi n the. Llterary World W ~Sask. -Fb.1916. W Dear Edior,-Mi du ect to your W desire to raise the's ndar of te letters i in the correspondence Column, I *beg - - - -~permission to say a few words about \"A Cit y Girl's\" letter. She shouid remember PHIR Ithat The Western Home, Monthly la flot a book composed o hard facts and figures, D CO. 1 but it is, as it were, an oasis in the desert ýADA of bard work and dry reading. 1 believe Jto fil this colurnn with facts about War M Yonge and the every day routine of life, would Onto. spoil it for many of its readers.' After olutely f reeI reading the war news and the agricultural welry Book papers and the editorials on politicai r re trial, corruption, I always relieve and quiet my rnind with a story fromn The Western Home jThis war is tee dreadful for us to sedal ........ our time thinking about it; we must have ..... some relief frora war and work. Country people as a mile, have but littie, and those - - ~of us who iive cnt irely alone, have none - except what we find in books and papers. LC]E This may be a hard fact for city pople t grasp, but, nevertheless, it's true. \"Mere Bachelor\" may have been rude, but 1 believe hie la truthfui. The Iast homesteads were taken 14p in this settie-v,_ ment about ten years ago; but there are stiii a few homesteaders left-myseif in- ciuded. If \"Aug7usta\" or anybf the fair sex feci sufflcient],y intereted in homesteaders to write, I will give themn as good a description of myseif and surroundinga as it is pos- siblei for a bashful bachelor of forty to do. A Cou ntry Boy. A New Correspondent Dear -Editor,-I have been reading your paper for the iast year and like thet reading very mucli, especiaily the corres- pondence page. I arn a young fellow living on a ranch eut West. As this is my first letter 1 The Western Home MYonthiy, I wil not make it, a long one. 1 wouid like to correspond with son:e of your readers. My, name is with t!ýe Editor. Sun-S t. \"Lone Star\" Sympathizer 1033 North Park St., Victoria, B.C. ,Jan. 11, 1916. Dear Editor,-This 'is my first ictier to your-fine paper and 1 arn quite nervous about starting, but I guess ll start an argument and get over that part of 1V-. What does everybody think about thec \"Ford Peace Expedition?\" I think it's the grcatest joke I've heard for a long time, especiaiiy srnce Ford bas retîîrned. I reaily pitied \"Lone Statr\" whcn I read bis letter. If there are no young ladies ,where he lives, life mnust indced be bard to bear without t'hem. I would like to shake hands with Kentish Hog. If she would write, or any oth rsthat, woulçfire- 4o1- Winl trv and alnswer ail letters. My address is -withi the Editor if :ïnybody wîil write. A Daughiter of flic Mapie Leaf. Han Good Opinion of Girls, Dear Editor-I bave been a rearie! of the Western leme Monthilv foirabut two years andi ehjoy il very 'imîîeh. I live in a very simal towN an' ll( it's very bard sonie-tinies t o fin, sorIel(- thîng to pass :wvthle tint e. put b winter I ain quit e a bit 11 ShxPools, work fromni niiin) Ih i, ,Ornijï liil at'nigbt. I ,elerkinfrei r Now I1 wisf.i 'vaýs proalvlisi witli *just, a fLuy.',Jt1UkL w jil u ..vi1 Was let Mmel of a Solever in Patent Medieimes ut Mllhun0 .afflrt éd N«»v PUll -Are Alil Rght.' Mrs. Wm. McEiwain, Temperance Yale, N.B., writes: \" I am n ot much of- a believer in medicines, but I muet say Milburn's Heart and Nerve Pulls are al right. Some years ago Iwas troubied with smothering speils. In the night I would waken up with my breath ail gone and think I neyer would get it back. 1 was telling a friend of my trouble, and lie advised me te try Milburn's Heart an4- Nervi Pis. He gave me a box, and I had only taken a few of themn when I could sleep alll night without any trouble. I did flot fiish the box until some years after wheéb I feit my trouble coming back, so I took the rest of them and they cured me.\" Milburn's Heart and Nerve Pis have been on the market for the past twenty -five years. The testimony of the ýusers shouid be enougli to con- vince you that what we dlaim for them is true. H. and N. Pis are Oc per box, 3 boxes fog 81.25; at al ffruggists or dealers, niailed direct on receipt of price by The T. Milburn Co., Iimited, ,Toron , ,Ont A atm ple, sa/e and effective treatneU, at'oiing driugs Vaporized Cresolene stops the paroxygnmq of Whooplng Ootgh and relleves the spasmodie Croup et once. It la a BOON te suff.rers froni asthme. VTe air carrylug the antlseptlt vej\"r, lnhaled wth overy breatit. inaepo breechlng easy, oothes thei sore throet end @tops the c îoutgh, assuring restful n1ghts. Cresoletie relleves the bronchial compvlications of Scarlet Forer and Measeuaendilae valueblo aid Iln thei treatmnent 01 Diplitheria. Czresolone's boat recommendation la Ils 80 years of succeszaul une. Bozid ua postal for Descriptive Bookiot. Tor Bale by ail Druggiots . VAPO-CRESOLENE CO. Leeming-Miles Building, Montreal, Canada R. D. Evans, discoverer of 1 he famous EZvans' Can- cer Cure, d\". s;res ail who sufer with Cancer to m-rite to hîmii. The t re at- ment cures extrnal or internai Cancer. R. D). EVANS PRIZEFv4fl,,J GAME PACKAG~E 10CV Y This BIG BUDCET o f FUN andGAMES .'Xi3a WONDERin the Amusement Field - wiii entertain tiha ,ývise lke Family. 300 Great Jokes and fliddles. How t tell Gypay for- tuntes,2 Model Love Lettere, 175 Ways te Flirt, 110w ta rua othera obey You, Elarriage Looking Glass Bus- band and Wife Commtandmnents. 3918 Popula ong5. 200 Fine ParlorGames Fox and Geese, ehu, Cheakers. Doninoes.: Men Morrisaeuthors, Chinese Puzzle Star 0uzl1-35 Ibis.17=1e. 13 k555, . Rman Cros, 7 Woodeys of h oi 16 CnàloôJads, 4ahMawn i rkkg-?Ojszza.4- grmnt.17 ram., Parler Magie. How teQ Throw Yo6r Vole.. I. o H es s.. nd 110.00 b tgsmney. Ail thia at coi- l2Ctiona yo600 other thinigstean ... f.r 10 cent-, po-tp5id. SeekwsillGamece.,Dl l.îa32o Madl»ant. eldcae MU SIC UGTFREE IYour home By the Oldeet and.Most Ro'iibIe School ofMuic in ,gAnerîca- EstablishedlS95, PnOraVidin, Mandolin, Guitar, Banio, Etc 1 'r t~ nedpLivers. \u003c)t e le-on wrep. fliy t 1\"aea mIici îmd. Vrit for Free z~iu~ Laktszcle Bldg., Cicago. flolch la to rmanenly today for orrect iii- ctory. it, ton. N. 'Y.",
         "The Weatep'n Home Tionthly noise for just that. I can saure hlm that I know a good tbing when I see it. 1 hop e he was not the young -sin that was ffV bebind by the girl\u003e who preferred a boy that could ake a glass of liquor. I think he must ho a \"tight-wad\" the way ho pùts down £ Spends al bis money on her. \"frýne Star\" has my sympathy, for I tbink that anvone who lives out on the ranch must find iV lonesome. I would noV mind corresponding with him if' ho wili only write first. \"One of the 68\", may hear from me before long, so as- to help him pass the wintêr everungs in the barracks. I wil let \"Western Sport\", know whaV we do Vo help our soldiers at the front. I bave learned how to knit and have helped mother making tbree pairs of sox. I have also mnade knap-sacks for the soldiers and have taken part i the concerts given here for the Red Cross Society. There is a \"«Five-hundred Card Party\" to be eiven to-morrow night for the Red Cross ~ocieVy, and wo furnish the lunch. Lonely Brown Eyes. P.S.-My address will be with the Editor and wil ho pleased to answer any letters. Skating Preferred Dear Editor,-I have been readig1 The Western Home Monthly for quite a while now and I like it very much. I think most of the stories in it are verY interesting.1 It is prett4y cold up bore in Aberta1 those days. \\Iýt keeps up between 30 and 40 bobow Ëero every day. I arn very fond of. sport. I like hockey abouV the1 best of ail. I go Voa dance now and again, but I like skating botter than dancing. I arn a quiet young man of seventeen and I would like Vo hear from some of the corresponden$à if they would take the trouble Vo write. I would liko Vo make the acquaintance of \" Shy Boots.\" I. wiil close, hoping to sce this btter i print. My name is with the Editor. A True Wosterner. No one need endure the agony.of corns with Holloway's Corn Cure at handto remove thetn. r i AgaInu quor a.nd Toboo Dear Editor snd Friends,-We have had The Western Home Monthbyi our home foi' a number of years and I must say we would not ho witbout iV f or any, Ving, and the correspondence ýouxnns are the first pages, I turn'to. $ Well,, I arn one of 'those boys -of »te middle'West who live away out on the broad open prairie of Sas- katchewan. Now lt me tel you, dear readers, those of you who are in Ontario and who have nover been in Saskatche- wan, if you could just corne out bore and live for a year or two, I don't believe you would want Vo go back Vo Ontario Vo live for anything. Well, I must noV dweil on tis great West of ours much longer, but I must say I think ail these Westernors are proud of these great plains. Well, friends, I am between 20 and 25i tail, and have light hair and blue eyes, 60 now I think you can guess that I arn noV bad lookig. I am yery proud to say I do noV use tobacco or liquor in any form, and you who indulge in these bad habits, just p ut ther n ider your fot. Now, Mr. Editor, I think you wil agree with me. And I say, girls, stay with the boys who can avoid these bad habits. I quite agree with what \"Just a Boy \" saysa in January issue on this subject. Isn't tis an awful war wich is raging now in Europe, and if it wasn't for my farm and mother I helieve, I would ho at the front right now. Well, I must close now, hoping Vo sec this in print, and would ho glad Vo hear from anyone who would care Vo write. Prairie Lad. An Outdoor Sport Doar Editor and Readers,-I have at last takon courage Vo write Vo your most interesting columns and hope Vo sec My lettor iprint. 1' We have taken The Western Home Monthly for a long time, but although I abways read the letters frat, I certainly enjoy ail the papor. 41 My,'searehavng uch a lot of anow this inteandmoreyet Vo corne I guesa. Christmas i3 past once more and I suppoe you allV received something. I got a lovely wrist watch for one thing and I liko iV beit cf iill. ýi I think the \"Countir Gil's\" letter, mn your Docomber numbor, cornes up to rny views exactly. I certainly amn not ashamed of my father in *bis overalis. 1 can imagine I see him out working around the stable in bis good clothes. Some of the people around towns dresa worse than the f armers. For myseif I like nothing better than a good long horsoback ride, on good roada, in overalls and legginp. I think when 1 get dressed imon -s clothes I amn just about \"it.\" I have been seen ly nearly all my friends and I don't,think they think any the less of me. I arn fond of ail outdoor sports and it is much handier to ride in overalis than with skirts flying, I think. But, of course, everyone has their own opinion. I cannot skate very good, neither can I-danoe, but intend to learn. It is very quiçt around here in wintor turne, as there are not many young people, but we try Vo put in the time some way. We have the telephone in aroundi\u003ehore and you can often have as much funi on it as if you were altogether. Woll, I gea I had btter close for this tirne. ilwill give a slight description of myseif. I arn tali nd'brown hair, hazel eyes, fair complexion and am con- sidered faily good lookiç, but wil beave that part for others Vo judge. Isn't this war terrible? I know several boys thaV have gone. Some were back hore for Chrismas and they seem to thik soldiering is allright. I f I was a boy I would certainly enlist. My, I houe it will soon ho iover. A Soldier's Admirer. .Although well known, it is worth re- mmnding lamp users that chimneys which bave heen boiled will not crack easily, that is, put on in some cold water and brought gradually Vo the boul. HON ESTLY 8BELI9VI MEWAS SOIN8.I11M EýONSUMPI OR, WOOD'S Norwey PIns Syu'uip« CURES HUMe. Mr. Irank E8. Anthony, 60 Xllen Street, Winnipeg, Man., writes: '*Haiing taken several botties of Dr. Weed'u Nor way Pins Syrup, durlng the past few weeks, to relieve a chronie cough and general throat trouble, allow me te ex- press my unbounded- satisfaction and, thanks as te its sterling qualities. A short tine ago I became suddenly subet Vo violent- coughlnt fits at nlght, Cnt dirsctly after rising in the mrornlng, \u003eer about an heur, and foumd 1 was grati losing weight. Ail m rkn nts c 3 informed me that I looked ast-- I wsre going ln consumption, andI honsstly' believed such ia the . cm. However, af er bavig takenuve!u botties of 'Dr. Woed's' 1 arn pleasedto c relate that the cough bas entlrey.dWs' appeared, àlong wlth -ail the 'iàty? symptoms, and I have minces regaineti Vhs lost welght. I have ne hesýtatlon là. recornrending Dr. Woodý' Nerway em*s Syrup as a mur cure fer .11 tho.s-troéiblea' in a like manner.\" When'you ask for \"Dr. Weood's\". oun that you get what you ask foir. -It leu put up in a ysflow wrapper; three pine trees the trade mark; he price, 25c snd 50C. Manufactureti only by The T. Milburu Co., Lirnited, Toronto, Ont. M I s Two years ago Nurse Dowdeswell, of 37, Alfred-street, Gloucester, England, wrote Vo say that Dr. Cassell's Tablets had cured her of acute kidney trouble, and saved her from operation. Seen recently by a special representative, she said :- \"I arn pleased Vo say that I have had the best of health since I told you of my cure by Dr. Cassell's Tablets some two years ago. People rernark on how well I look. When I think of what I sufered bef ore I knew of Dr. Cassell's Tablets,- I feel I can neyer'sufficiently praise your splendid medicine. Kidney trouble had reduced'me to such a state of helplessness that could noV walk alone. 1I had undergone two operations, and tgken endless medi- cine; but nothing helped me. Often I -%vas in frightful pain, pain that lasted for hours at a time. I ivas aiso a martyr to dyspepsia, and so .weak and spiritless that I used Vo wish I could die and ho done with suffering. Although, as I hitve said, I was Vwice operated on for kidney trouble, I got no relief at âll. I was urged Vo undergo a third operation for the removal of a atone on niy lf t kidney, but by that time I was taking Dr. Cassell's Tablets, and the benefit ivas s0 apparent that I 'refused Vhe operation and persevered with the Tabbets. After that I passed no fewer than tes stones at various imes. Tho n I niended rapidly. de ndr 1. fa .d wilh a «mgàs ~ _______ iqwd ne ~ 'b'~aybiaiIog~ No.. 2M0. LuIDFACISwwuà r.FclupC te InIIDOOL I had no more pain; the dyspepsia, Voo, was cured~, and I began Vo gain flesl In a rcrnarkahly short tinie I was thoroughly welb and strong. Now, if ever I feeb a little rus down-and my workas a intrse is sometimes very trying-I just take a dose or two of Dr. Cassell'a Tablets, asd they nover fail Vo set me up again. They are just splendid.\" flR.CASSEL-L'S Dr CÈSell's Tablets are Nutritive, Restorative, Alterativo and Anti-Spasmodir, and of Great Therapeutic value ln aIl derangemonts orth11e Nerve and Functional Systems ln aId or young. They are th1e rec1ognized modern home remody for: Nervous Breakdowfl St. Vitus' Dance Dyspepsie Waating Dlsuasée Nerve Paralysie Anasmia Stomach Catarrh Vital Exhaustion Spinal Paralysie Sleeplessnoss Drain Fig General Debllty Infantile Paralysie Kidney Disoase Headache Loas of Flash Rickets Dack Paine Palpitation Premature Decay Sperially valuiable fomr tslng Mnthers an(ld dring the crIrlla perlons or lire. Druggists and Dealers throughout Canadla s'l PDr. Cassels Tibiets. 1r not prortîrable ln yoir it' ly, $ed n\u003ct 0hie sole agents, Hiarold F. Iitrhie \u0026 Co., irdr-.. 10 NMcCauil St., Toronto, wbio iili see %-on art, sîpplied. One tube 50 rents, 6 tubes for the price or flvc. War tax 2 cents per tube. TABLETS- SEND FOR A FREE BOX' A free sample box wîillho 'sent you on reoeipt of à centq, for mnailing and parking, hy the soie agents for Canadat, Harold F. Rit chie \u0026Co., Ltd.. 10, McCauI St., Toronto, Ont. Dr. Cassell'ýqTablets are manufactured solely by Dr. Cassell's Co., L.td., Manchester, England. h C' 68 les eflperance rnuch of- a must say 'ilUs are al s troubled le night I 1h ail gone L back. 1 dle, and lie leart an4- oox, and I en I could rouble. I ime years ýe coming i and they rve Pis the past irnony of to con- for them per box, 3 ggists or 'eceipt of I,,imited, ied 1879 \"r Cough odl, Crop or. Throat: B ronch1.itsr rrh. rnq of Whooping mne. lalAd wlth eve17 tbruaLand stopo atlons nf Scarlet ho truatment of ,on la its 80 a postal for CO. al, Canadaé foc BUDCET dGAMES )ER in thei mit Field rtaan the Gls Bus- 12a ong5. a. heers. p zzle star ù,. grat col- ,-tpÉId. REE ,f music in Banjo, Etc IV. fli1nOr- ,ot 2e' per dav te for Freè -le= Ikhool MU RSE'S KIDýNEY DISSE Was in Frightful Pain and 2 \u0026perations Fa!Ied'--C9red by Dr. Casseli's Taboits A",
         "The Weatepn Home MontAIF, At E»teF I4differourt feeling in thieair, aighten- ing of the h.artj A w4rmer fervour ii.the amn, a ofter, -wandering breeze; Blue violet\u0026 on sloping bauka, a. ba.bbling etream fulil brim; A greeuing eover for the. earth, e buddlng of the, treee. A joyful tons to pealing belis, and glad birds jubilant WUtij ougs t\u0026at tell of al aweet thilge, and garden places gay WU b cme and goldi andi crimson blooms,, and planted rich with moi- M tbis ia bor a.new each year when oomss tie'Eater Day. w.lng of praise for mournful chant; suthem and jubilate Te ringý throughi lofty, sacred dmes, :9d for. our penitence iL pardon, and for douht and fear a hope that Ilghte the, way; 14r sombre rob\" atnd. draperi the *~bte of innocence. Punishin Chlldren \u003e !y Margaret Whitney. '%ane, lph, cerne back from thc street. Don't put tbat stick in your Mouth and lot that dog alon.\" 'This' wsl a soel of commande that were rpdyutteredi by a young wornima.* 8.Was aalng to ier lit'ble son, 10\u0026b th\"n t rs. years aid; and she cm- phs.lued her ait command with a ivfqorôùs' shaking *hieh Iifted the Ihld entrely off hie feet. Just aM that moment on. of ber neighbore Who lied iltaessed sirilar scenes mail Urnes hie- fors sand wiio along with otier neigibors bed been Indignant at the treatment this ebild received, took a hand in the af- fair. She was braver than ay of tbe others or tii. childi would not have Ibid the Chemplonahip tbsit thîs lenely wo. man, Who had ne home and Ily a few persona whom mîle Iold eallrelatives, now gave lm, for wh. plainly told the mother that eh.ehold explain things to tii.boy, Who really was a good littie fellow, but Who would neyer know what te do or mot te do because ihis mether uImply uttored a enies of commande and aever-talksd to him or tried te , eacli hlm WIhy he should do certain things and not do nmre othens. 'Everyone Who bas b.d any experi- selwth childrien knows tiaIt even wfth t4e oletS careful training tbey will omoazly do thinge tbey ought not and wbiioh they vcry well know are wrong, and for whieh sorne sert of pn.- muliment ebould hie iniflioted. But as sure »e theil are degrees of wrong doing se there dire degrelsa of punismhrent, and eue sh4uld ho careful net to puis in the sanie mauper for every misdemean- or whetber large or smali. There are in fact very few casserl a cIl d ould b. whippied tiioug ilt may sometimes be rieeaary. A ommon thing anmong cidren is 1 'ring. There are very few fam- i les boe theé boys and irls alyays goS along harmonleusiy and occasional- 1 y tiething beeornes nionotonous. Now i wilýý bc.very easy o stop -this kfy simply forbidding tiose wbe quarrel to play with the ethers. As soon as tiey are denied the privilege of playing te- gether hcy i ti-ink more than once ý hefore, beginning a quarrel and learn ti to get along more pleasantly together. w If a ,oild sIl, something that yoeuai have t4ught , him i's wrong make Mîin se o ay tbait'he lias doue rong. Do inet st ilk him isay leie j sorryif lie is iltpi and eo encourage lî!m to tell what is fi n'nt tirue but see that lie. acknowled1ges ;ýin that S ~e U dIl wrong, andlewT!ies I more fareful about doing the saneie liing g( the second time. If a boy getl into the habit, of saying thing8 h. ouglit not, nt Vfalh his niouth with aORp and let Ihlm i % * i know tihat if thcefliing is repeated lie \u0026il s wjll riil tie sanie treaitnient. é A1141te girl Who sometirnes as isy he sit thé table was very easily) conquere1 51. *hy bin.g turned away fromn -tho table. ve ;I After a few minutes of thlis sort of thiîg sic ivas giad to smile and ho grIel i froi they, allowed ber te turn back witlî lier wl f\u0026ce te the rest of thie familv. A lîNev e *who rau off wua cured bjy being takea sai homo andp ut to b.d for a. hef day evel Ure ~wen4 away wlthout ask- Ing. But do not get the miotaken notion that chldren are, eontinuhklly looking for an opportunity to doe oineth.ing they ought not, for with very'few ex- ceptions cbildren imeau te be good; and they only needi to be taught what is the right and the wrong in order that they may eéhoo\u0026e correetly. And in most ceues iv4here children fail te do wbait le right their parents are et fault rabher than the, children because they have failed to, teacli thelr sono and dauglitere what they shlould do, or baye flot had aufficient patience, te help them back to the rig'ht, after a feilure b.d been made. beautiful house. ontained a big, wide ohimuey that suggested an open lire one col\u0026~ dreary day in November. Wlhen the corner was turned and the chimney viewed from a dijfrent angle, the fact'waa revealed, that the, chim- ney wagb not_,for use at ali-just for outeide show; a vine that bad not yet succumbed te the froet had neyer begn wilted by heat. After hurrying home and putting the horse i'the barn, the very common heater that wotild hrypas8 muster for the dining- room another win'ter looked good. One cold January day, when pase- ing through a. mining diis'rict, the car window was on a level with the cabine of the miniera. A dreary outloek it was. TIle cabins contained one, or pos. aibly two, amaîl roooine, and the undur- tained windows etared drearily at one, Fern Gien. Kildonan Park, Winnipeg, Man. 1iidonan Park, Winnipeg, Man., is a miost natiiral attractive place of about 100 acres, over two-thurds of which carmes large treee-bush as it would be known back east. Sections of it are nmemd after speciai features to bc found thereat. Above picture gives a small corner of what is known as \"Fern Gicu,\" a section of mhore than an acre carrying t1ie finest of ferns in seagon, rnany of which stand nearly îLs high a\u0026 the individual when at their best Woman Croates the Home Man supplies the material, but te ioman wc are indebted for tic crea- ion of tie borne. The firstlhonmes were cheerless caves. Time passed, and womîîan preside in h a tent. -Sle searched for wood that, wais old and seasoîîed, and, thius* solvedthe fuel roblim. Te wouiîan wve are iiidebt(;d Fr \u002b,ise chiminey, the kitchexi, the din- ~grothe living-room and the e;piîî.grrroonîs, resul.ting,ntoly n aodx taste, but inorality A Iioîini8 jnet îuee4 aiilya boue, aithler is a leue1 /onie. NManiya vlmnai cpoor il..t.....' worl's égoods, te i li h shade of lier humble aboIe ewiug tiuiy garmciits, and siging te wr babies, as Iruly a home-niaker as lie iwio iay have every possible coii- e*fl lec. Doe we ever pause, I1itonder, and jiisiier thle great diffterenee ini. hoiîies, Ii lei viewei a s boises, look a Tost actlv alike? It la net alwvavs neces- ry to enter the bouses either. A revealing tihe wretclied, emfortless ini- terior. AIl the lieuses lîad been passed but one, whieh, altlîouglî a counterpart of the others se far as the outside wvas concerîied, gave one courage and Itappier tbougits, and aIl lecause the cdean win- dow Ivas îjiaded andl a geranium blooii- ed in the xwindow. Al l imier te tlîe ne- imian wlîo can andd %vill raise lier -work aiove thle sordid level of lier surrouind. ings. -- 3ore- nit more, -f-ariners -arc---sirpý plyiug fuieil.î fa îîlies wi th the hestt icl eau alTerd. Fspecially is Ulis truc to educat ion, and people who ho reteforev regarded ltise fariner mitlî good ni tureul toleraîucc, to-day tindem-tand that it re- quires ,îust as good a set, of Ibriaiis te be a sucs fi ainýer as it (Iote lic a nierciînat or a liesialmiiîî. Nt et Iiacv se miliuv Lfi i1 VI11 w , tc 1 sire te iiet e ýto tIie eitu- a- i etOM monly siimposel,and tuii envi iý get awav frein the four wuIo te ' pare notes, ile ,more lal :11-o r 'l get back %%here thlere Ù4 a vard ifer the \",idren, and elbow room for themselivea. On. loneaome dey or night of waiting in a depot of a. groat city sometimes pisys havoc with the city microbe. A hundoeed mien îmy make n encampment, but it takea a woman to make -a home. - The Measure of \"A Man\" An incident came te my knowledge lately which pleased me much. A young man, a mere lad when last i saw him wbho bas a great talent for eleetrical niatters, left hie southern home a few meonthe ago and -%ent to a distant city to perfect hie studies in that braneh of learning. His advancement bas been rapid, se mnuch ae, that already, by re- quest, ho bas given eeveral lectures te large audiences on wirelees telegiwaphy. After one of these lectures, the presi- dent of an electrical association gave bim a free ticket te a banquet beld at one of the hotels. On taking his seat at the table, his firet act was to turn down the wine and champagne glagses that were beside his plate and were then re- xnoved by the waiter. Several of the city dailies referrced to the matter, but I have not a duubt but 'What tlîoge present '¶vho liad their own glasses filled, had more respect for that young man, because he hail principle enough te, defy custom, and dared te let it be known in that fashionable assemb- lage, just how he stood on the temper- ance quetion. Such yeung mnen as these are what the world neede, those -Who dare te do right, because it je right. The father referring te, hie son's rapid progress in hie studies added, \"but bis mother and I were more pleased at his turning down hie, glasses, at that vine and ýchampagne dinner, tian anytiing elee.\" Mabs. Washing Ciothes My last idlea was given te mne, anid J ar grateful te tlîe giver. lt is te sit down te wash dis!ibes. Strange that se sim- ple a thing had not dawned on Me. But se it was. M'len fatigued withh the labor of running back andl forth fifty timies across the kitehen, I stili tihougit ît my duty te st iand while washing the piles of dishes that accumulated ait each repast. 1 bail goS se wrougbt up about it as even to wisuh we were back te the days of eat.ing from baves or eut of one iron pot. But thanks te the dear moxan from wNhom I got the. hint, I dropped. et oncýe from a state of toil and trouble into delightful ease-and. a chair. Se shaîl tic disagreeable work of wa.si- ing dishes beome quite comfortable and ref reslîing. \"Oh,\" says one, \"iew cau you hear te be se shiftless 2\" But I hold that we are more truly economical in the old-fashioned New Englýand way, if we are very saving of our strength ini common tbings (that is, if w1e do tiem equally well), and spare these vital forces for lilier uses. Broken Friendshlp 011! bow oft, frieuds lifeloîîg and sincere, Will'paît, and parting cause each other Pain. Tiîey would unde a thousand times again- And often from the slightest cause, a nmore (eld look, a liastv wvord, or given car To idie talk; a 1asping tone again, Miny cauise a hiart to smart ail day ý'Nithî pa'h- rThîîîs startsotlîe breacli for wbich we pay 50 {etr. Fri f lit lioaled i wiit tlat» great balîn of ol. J \\Ve cali forgiveiless, 15 will grow A nd I idi iev(er ider, da -y byday-. lil lieuI it,ý \u003cuc o-in i%, grow calinly 8 et il,,s ever giuarid oîîrselx-es, for oh! teŽ h e iort, andu frieîîds too dear te Long *tt; t, il, c t t lit. LItîîxra Leiglh. Standi Asthma. Mauy have lt Lctlna ad have tried lti ttitlics they think thiat tl' el f-r t lein. They should \"et s rect'ix ýdI c lte unnufacturers 1 I Kellogg', A-îtltma Remedy front a, desperate as their t ( I t cases titis * taîî~.~ I uiliptt t hep. ~.,, i *~i - n -Y: t~t.; tAS~ .. 5'-4~ ave-, -, t t, - Wenua i à the Hom",
         "room for y or niglit groat city the City r make n woman to an\"9 knowledge A young saw hlm electrical me a few stant city branch of bas been ly, by re- betures te ýIegivaphy. Lhe presi- U~on gave ýt beld at is seat at urn down sses that Sthen re- ferrvd to luubt but ,heir ow» for that principle red to let Sassemb- - temper- ias these iose -Who is right. n's rapid \"but bis Bd at hie bat wine any-thing Mabjs. aund -1 am -4t down so sim- me. But 'itai the rth fifty t'hought bhing the Sart eaeh ip about k to the .out of the dear hint, I toil and a chair. )f wash- ale and iow can it I hold rnical in way, if mgth ini Io them e vital rfl~M'T=~~BJ Wji( F 1 Or Neyer Before Such an Instantaneous and Sensational Success Neyer before has an automnobile succe.1 I t is large enough for the whole famUly- been so ral)id, so definîte and so 0weil.noeaevpiewtinteraho h The $850 Overland has made history. it --jriy eoniic1t-- maint-ai1ir---tiIlt nif nia rks-t1ie--entfrance of'-a new v--auto-(\u003e1o-Ï)iI e vaitlue ttwe best quality miaterials - snappy, stlylisli -a car conmplete in every respect at a prwice and s~peedy--and coniplete in evëry sense. which xvas hitherto tlîougrht impossible. I n lhort, it'is just another striking 1,ekanple 'Yet lhere it is - a l)o\\verful fi Ve Plt\u003ec1e 1.cr'i w at ')tir large î\u003er iduction eîîale ~s ',t d(o. t )lring car complete for onfly $85,0. I t c îuel cuuiioipletc-only $850! Catalogue on-request. Please address .Dept. 678 Willys-Overland, Limited., Head Office and Works, West Toronto, Canada \u003ct- Y Y Il \u003cY srncere, eh other 1I times mause, a i ear again, ail day we pay dt bah»n dlay. rcalinly r oh! dear 'to y have ive tried ink that y should facturers dy frorn as their ;es tilis 'Ip. J-ý",
         "10l vt' ici t y 4- 1' FICO1UR Bet'tèr Bread Backed by a Reputation Eorned. in the WESTERN - - AA't Ot''MILLS Cl Milers t~o the People PURITY Maré B .read ani -r'"
      ],
